JT,JD,tool_list,skill_list,degree_list,clean
BA,"You will:
Support agile team in translating end user requirements into set of user product criteria for technical development team & developing documentation
Connect with team to confirm product commitments
Conduct data analysis and research required for development team to make decisions
Collaborate with team to understand, analyze, document, and communicate platform requirements
Partner with key stakeholders to articulate and refine product vision throughout the iteration process
Help design team in translating product needs/requirements into deliverable units of work
Able to synthesize metrics such as: user satisfaction/adoption, quality of products delivered, time-to-market, timely delivery etc.
Collaborates closely with agile teams to translate business requirements and operational metrics between user groups and developers
Provide definitions for product criteria, readiness, completeness etc.
You have:
2-4 years of experience in a healthcare setting in a role such as data/business analysis
Bachelor's degree in Health Informatics, Computer Science, Information Systems or related
SAFe certification or exposure to agile methodologies a strong plus
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills, with ability to synthesize user needs and pull insights out of data
Excellent communicator able to negotiate with business to clarify needs vs. wants/likes to balance with development cost and risk
Ability to break down and describe business needs into work supporting an iterative and incremental delivery model
Credibility with both business leaders, product designers, & developers
#LI-POST
Benefits
Competitive compensation packages | Sick Time | Generous Vacation + 12 holidays to recharge & refuel | Internal Career Mobility & Performance Consulting | Medical, Dental, Vision, FSA & Dependent Care | 403b retirement savings plan match | Tuition Reimbursement | Parental Leave & Adoption Assistance | Commuter Spending Account | Fitness Discounts & Wellness Program | Resource Networks | Life Insurance & Disability | Remote Flexibility
Closing
Examples of reasonable accommodation include making a change to the application process or work procedures, providing documents in an alternate format, using a sign language interpreter, or using specialized equipment.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"If you enjoy working in a highly collaborative, analytical, fast-paced and dynamic environment, this is the right opportunity for you!
The ideal candidate will be highly skilled in all aspects of data analytics, including mining, generation and visualization.
The role is committed to transforming data into readable, goal-driven reports for investors and business leaders.
Position Summary
Essential Job Functions:
Responsible for the timeliness and integrity of data in CRM (Salesforce.com) and finance/operating data systems (iLevel) and likely other data in the future
Will support the Human Capital, Investor Relations, Business Development and Portfolio Operations function with insightful and useful reporting and analysis from these systems
Will have a career path in the exciting Private Equity industry with options to progress into more Financial or other functional responsibilities
Candidate Requirement
Required Skills:
Excellent excel, database and PPT skills
Understanding of income statements, balance sheets and cash flow reports and how they tie together
Good people management skills, ability to follow-up and ensure data is received timely and correctly in a professional manner
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to take initiative and work independently, while demonstrating strong teamwork
Must be able to work in a fast-paced environment, manage time and priorities under pressure and meet deadlines
Specific Technology platform requirements:
Salesforce.com (experience with this specific CRM tool is heavily desired):
Create custom objects, design page layouts, adjust fields and create custom reports.
Ability to use Salesforce data loader and Conga reporting solutions
Understanding of Pardot or other email marketing software
Ability to map data from financial statements.
Qualifications:
Undergraduate degree, preferably finance, economics, business or accounting related
Minimum two years of experience in a professional business context involving data management, analysis and reporting
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'econom']"
BA,"Excellence Delivered As Promised.
It’s more than a slogan.
What You Will Do
Performs complex data and business process analysis to identify opportunities for improvement, need for additional decision-support tools and information, and to arrive at actionable recommendations that can be implemented to improve business outcomes.
Detailed responsibilities include the following:
Gather and interpret customer business needs via interviews, business process analysis, surveys, site visits, use cases, task and workflow analysis, scenario planning, and by conducting workshops to elaborate requirements/specifications
Monitor and track Key Performance Indicators (KPI) required for the program on a daily, monthly and annual basis
Lead or participate on internal projects and manage the successful execution of projects coordinating the activities of a multidisciplinary team of professionals
Concisely document business needs in a manner that conveys clear understanding to other team members and customer stakeholders
Effectively communicate and collaborate with internal team members and external stakeholders to establish a technical vision, analyzing trade-offs between usability and performance
Analyze information needs and business challenges to determine how to best address these needs through the delivery of customized decision support tools and services
Produce feasibility reports based upon compiled research, advice of subject matter experts and exercise of expert judgment
Identify solution options, recommend new reports, and assess on both technical and business suitability dimensions
Create innovative solutions to complex problems
Keep up to date with technical as well as industry developments and trends
Minimum Qualifications
College degree within an Economics/Business, Engineering, Math, Statistics and / or Technology related discipline
2+ years’ experience in a high-volume data/transaction environment.
A systematic approach to problem solving with a high attention to detail.
Excellent commercial, analytical and business case development skills.
Professional oral and written (presentation/data visualization) communication.
Business process engineering skills.
Excellent MS Excel and database capabilities.
Ability to present with confidence and prepare concise and complete Executive Summaries.
Across more than 60 offices, 2,500+ highly qualified professionals are united in an unyielding commitment to deliver excellence to every client and every project, every day.
All qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veterans status or other characteristics protected by law.
Local residents will be given preference.
NO AGENCIES PLEASE: Unsolicited resumes from third party agencies will not be accepted.
Working Hours: 8 AM – 5 PM
Employment Status: Full-time
Internal Requisition ID: 2020-6508
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This global practice supports clients in many different industries facing challenges of developing and implementing tailored concepts for risk recognition, measurement, and control.You'll work in teams of typically 3 - 5 consultants, playing an active role in all aspects of client engagement.You will assist client teams in understanding and quantifying risk exposures, evaluating risk strategies, and building and maintaining risk models by being staffed full-time on one engagement or providing ad-hoc assistance to several engagements.This includes gathering and analyzing information, formulating and testing hypotheses, and developing and communicating recommendations.
You'll also have the opportunity to present results to client management and implement recommendations in collaboration with client team members.
Business Analysts receive exceptional training as well as frequent coaching and mentoring from colleagues on their teams.
This support includes a Partner from your local office or practice assigned to you to help guide your career as well as several weeks of formal training in your first two years as a Business Analyst.Additionally, you'll receive guidance and support from your local office or practice in the selection of client projects, helping you to develop your skills and build your network.
* Undergraduate degree with an outstanding record of academic achievement in a quantitative discipline such as math, statistics, economics, finance, operations research, financial engineering, engineering, physics, etc.
* Typically 1-4 years' experience in risk management (any industry sector but healthcare or pharmaceutical a plus) and/or experience in a consultancy (with risk focus) and/or comparable experience in banking, insurance, risk regulation & compliance [AML, fraud, KYC, etc.
], advanced analytics, data privacy, IT/Tech risk, climate risk, etc.
* Strong interest in and passion for risk topics - could be broadly interested or have a specific interest within a sector: banking/financial services, insurance, corporate, and/or in a specific function: risk regulation & compliance, advanced analytics, crisis management etc.
* Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities* Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills* Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment* Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization* Ability to communicate complex ideas effectively - both verbally and in writing - in English and the local office language(s)* Willingness to travel
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analysts roles are targeted at graduate entry level candidates and are the first step into management consulting.
Working under the guidance of an experienced consultant, their key role is to collect, analyse and synthesise data from a variety of sources.
The insights and understandings from their analysis provide important inputs to the project team's recommendations and solutions.
BAs also provide input to client presentations, and work with other team members on day-to-day delivery of projects - for example, they may assist with developing and issuing RFPs and evaluating proposals from suppliers.
They interact with clients and their suppliers as needed.
BAs are typically involved in client facing projects at client sites from day one, so they need to be able to learn fast and get up to speed quickly and work effectively under pressure.
They must be able to work independently, while also being team players who are willing to contribute wherever needed to ensure the success of the project.
The ability to prioritise their work effectively in the face of sometimes competing demands is also essential.
BAs are expected to challenge existing ways of doing things and suggest new ideas.
However, they are also expected to be able to justify their conclusions and recommendations with relevant experience and rigorous, fact-based analysis.
Essential Requirements • An exemplary academic background; preferably with a top degree in Engineering, Science, Business, or Economics
• Must have the right to work in the USA
Desirable Requirements • Strong analytical skills and problem solving ability
• Ability to isolate key issues and draw sound conclusions
• Proficiency in the use of Excel and PowerPoint
• Proactive, inquiring approach
• Strong communicator with the ability to influence stakeholders
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Overview
Provides analytical, planning, coordination, and implementation support to performance improvement activities and projects across VNSNY CHOICE Health Plans.
Assists department leadership with tracking implementation, monitoring organizational change effectiveness, designing analytical approaches, as well as data collection and analysis, report writing, and process mapping.
Responsibilities
Assists department with articulating business issues and designing project approaches.
Provides data collection, analytical support to team and monitors assigned projects.
Defines core processes and maps current states for redesign projects; assists with solution design.
Provides facilitation support at meetings as required.
Develops trusting relationships with leadership across VNSNY.
Collects and analyzes performance and financial data.
Summarizes, creates, and distributes reports as needed.
Tracks and monitors project work plans, including objectives, tasks and time frames to ensure deliverables are completed on time.
Responds to changing project circumstances and communicates issues to project leadership.
Takes a flexible, team player approach, willing to pitch in whenever and wherever needed.
Writes reports, memos and other communications as needed.
Coordinates report production as needed.
Represents the departments capabilities and mission effectively to internal and external customers.
Communication is tactful, empathetic, professional, clear and assertive when needed.
CA2020
Qualifications
Education: Bachelors Degree in Business, a related discipline, or the equivalent work experience required.
Masters Degree in Business Administration, Public Administration or related field preferred.
Experience: Minimum three years progressive experience in consulting, operations or financial analysis, or related discipline required.
Proficient with personal computers, including Microsoft Windows Excel, Word, Access, Power Point required.
Project management and facilitation skills required
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"About the Role:
Key Responsibilities
Support Project Manager in defining and prioritizing project tasks.
Research and document project landscape.
Conduct stakeholder engagement sessions to identify system and policy requirements.
Analyze and prioritize requirements and identify associated risks.
Develop, execute and manage software test plan with cases.
Develop system documentation and supporting artifacts.
Perform situation quality assurance on data sets.
About You:
Required Qualifications
Business analysis experience required, including full SDLC implementation experience, requirements elicitation and landscape analysis
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Healthcare experience
Experience working on collaborative, cross-functional teams
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Business Analysis Certification a plus (PMI or IIBA)
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience in Business Analysis is required.
An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"This initiative, spanning all client-facing business units and corporate functions, will drive innovation and strategic change through technology, data science, and deep analytics.
The team partners with key business leaders and industry experts to build transformational technology to drive revenue, maximize efficiency, and optimize the allocation of resources.
They will work closely with end users, product managers, UX and other technology partners to develop designs for implementation.
Responsibilities include:Analyze and decompose current state business processesDefine target state business processes and align functional solutionsDocument process flow diagrams, business/functional requirements and user storiesInformation gathering activities such as surveying, analyzing and evaluating processes, products and services, by using a variety of internal and/or external dataAssist with all phases of SDLC with emphasis on requirements, UAT and Change ManagementAssist in coordinating business unit subject matter expert meetings in order to solicit and cross-reference business and functional requirementsHelp ensure project team is adhering to project plans and helping to identify and resolve discrepanciesRequirements:3 years in a large organization or major consulting organization focused on a Business Analysis within the Equity, Fixed Income or Investment Banking businessesKeen interest in learning new process and technologiesInquisitive and continuously focused on identifying inefficiencies and improving business processesThorough documentation skillsExcellent interpersonal skills and ability to thrive in a collaborative environmentGoal-orientated, self-motivated and adapts to changing situationsStrong organizational and analytical skills; must be detail orientatedSalesforce or Tier1 knowledge
",[None],"['end user', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['end user', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"ResponsibilitiesNBCUniversal's Program Management, Strategic Business Operations team operates as a central program operations group embedded across Ad Sales, Distribution, Marketing, Research, Technology, Legal, and HR.
The team consists of trusted partners working together to implement strategic programs throughout the enterprise in order to effectively close gaps between central business and technology groups across a variety of projects.
This role will be responsible for analyzing & documenting processes and procedures, identifying systems across the enterprise, and identifying any operational or compliance gaps against data models & controls.
",[None],"['research', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Operations Regulatory Control (ORC) Change Teams primary responsibility is to execute regulatory change initiatives in Operations Control.
Its remit includes:
• Implementation of new regulations
• Remediate issues noted by regulators and auditors
• Build controls strategic framework
Primary purpose of this role is to act as a change professional in addressing regulatory changes and developing controls for recent regulatory reforms.
Responsibilities:
Establishes and oversees the application of operational risk policies, technology and tools, and governance processes to create lasting solutions for minimizing losses from failed internal processes, inadequate controls, and emerging risks.
Independently assess risks and drive actions to address the root causes that persistently lead to operational risk losses by challenging both historical and proposed practices.
Governance and oversight may include (not limited to) technology operational risk, risk for example.
Serves as a subject matter expert for Issues Management (KPI/KRI/Corrective Action Plans)
Resolves transactional level escalations coming from the vendor or internal partners
Analyzes a multitude of scorecards/performance management tools in an attempt to mitigate exposure (risk/financial/regulatory)
Collaborates to resolve any issues which fall within the terms of the contract.
Develops and maintains relationships across the business users and Lines of Defense to better understand and deliver customer requirements by responding to changes in the internal and external business environment
Qualifications:
6-10 years experience navigating and networking across an enterprise utilizing internal and external resources Third Party Oversight/Vendor Oversight experience preferred Business writing experience preferred
In depth knowledge of Mortgage Servicing Operational processes and technology platforms supporting the Operations.
Education:
Bachelors/University degree, Masters degree preferred
-------------------------------------------------
------------------------------------------------------
Time Type :Full time
------------------------------------------------------
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE.
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE.
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE.
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'kpi']",1.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'kpi']"
BA,"Free Online Training & Placement Opportunity for Business Analyst Graduate/ Fresher’s
Thinking to start a career in IT.?
Business Analysis Planning and Monitoring
Elicitation and collaboration
Requirements life cycle management
Strategy Analysis
Requirements analysis and design definition
Solution evaluation
Water fall
Agile
Eligibility Criteria:
Minimum 0-2 yrs.
experience with Bachelor's/Master's degree in Computer Science or equivalent with valid status.
Eligibility for training: Citizens / GC / CPT / OPT / H4/L2EAD
If you are interested please reply back with your updated resume.
For more details you can reach me out at:Sarala.d@ellianse.com
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"iHeartMedia also leads the audio industry in analytics and attribution technology for its marketing partners, using data from its massive consumer base.
This person will work with stakeholders from within the entire iHeartMedia organization, ensuring understanding and representation of strategy and goals within product development.
When encountering a problem this position requires demonstrated creativity in solutioning, weighing the tradeoffs and efforts, identifying the best path forward, and exercising good judgment to drive ahead.
Responsibilities:
Elicit requirements from stakeholders and subject matter experts using interviews, documenting analysis, conducting requirements workshops, creating storyboards, surveys, business process analysis, use cases or user stories, scenarios, event lists, competitive product analysis, task and workflow analysis.
Work with the product manager or project sponsor to document the project's business requirements and support efforts throughout development cycle, from requirements gathering, testing and UAT.
Deliver business requirements documentation and associated artifacts to garner appropriate sign offs and confirmation these meet objectives defined.
Elicit information from stakeholders to define and document holistic end-to end processes that incorporate various enterprise business units.
Write requirements specifications according to standard templates, using natural language simply, clearly, unambiguously, and concisely.
Represent requirements using alternative views, such as visual analysis models (diagrams), prototypes, or simulations, where appropriate.
Interact with internal and external clients to extract, interpret and communicate data.
Draw out key business insights and provide actionable recommendations.
Lead requirements analysis and verification, ensuring that requirement statements are complete, consistent, concise, comprehensible, traceable, feasible, unambiguous, and verifiable, and that they conform to standards.
Participate in peer reviews of work products derived from requirements specifications to ensure that the requirements were interpreted correctly.
Track requirements and manage changes to baseline requirements through effective and appropriate application of change control processes and tools.
Implement ways to develop awareness and reuse requirements across projects.
Develop subject matter expertise on assigned efforts, as well as how other applications integrate within the associated environment.
Collaborate with technical stakeholders to develop user acceptance test plans and use cases for assigned projects.
Track UAT deficiencies against test plans.
Develop UAT defect registry and track project efforts to resolve test deficiencies.
Develop end user guides for various technical programs/efforts.
Qualifications:
3+ years of experience in an operations or project management related position with a track record of successful execution.
3+ years of experience in gathering business input and writing business requirements documentation with business implementation.
Be extremely proficient in systems thinking skills to see the interactions and relationships between the people, processes, and technology involved in an environment.
Analytical skills represented throughout all phases of SDLC.
Highly organized, exceptional problem-solving skills, ability to multitask and manage competing priorities.
Proven experience leading projects and delivering against commitments and timelines
Ability to work independently, and strong desire to overcome challenges and results oriented
Ability to explain complicated or technical information in a simple way to non-technical audiences
Interpersonal skills, to help negotiate priorities and to resolve conflicts among project stakeholders (such as customers, product management, and engineering).
Tenacious commitment to continuous business improvement.
The ideal candidate must also possess a flexible work style.
Experience in agile software development organizations.
Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Media/industry knowledge is preferred.
",['excel'],"['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Required:
1.
Bachelor's Degree in Information Technology or Computer
Science or similar field of study
2.
84 months of experience in business analysis in
Information Technology on SDLC projects; including developing business cases, gap analysis, functional and non-function requirements, test cases/plans and participating in User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and reviewing UAT results.
3.
84 months of experience using recognized business analysis methodologies (such as JAD sessions) to elicit business needs and requirements from stakeholders, and developing/revising flow charts, and process models describing as-is or to be system and business processes
4.
60 months experience working for State, Federal or Local government agencies.
5.
60 months of experience querying and interrogating data using complex SQL on DB2 or Oracle platforms using tools such as SQL query tools and using MS Access.
6.
24 months experience with Medicaid and/or health care industry data and its analysis
7.
60 months of experience analyzing and developing reporting needs/reports from three perspectives: senior management, power user, and ad hoc, using industry standard (e.g.
Cognos, OBIEE) reporting software.
8.
24 months experience with working in a Project
Management office, working with Project Managers and teams,
and using standardized methodologies (such as waterfall and
agile) and templates, participating in the evaluation of project
readiness for deployment.
Requested Documentation Please submit copy of resume, certification, and degree.
The Medicaid Data Warehouse Bureau is the primary
repository for Medicaid in New York State and is the main
provider of Business Intelligence about Medicaid Data.
The
Bureau is comprised of two functional areas, the Medicaid
Data Warehouse (MDW) and the Medicaid Analytics
Performance Portal (MAPP).
The MDW includes the Medicaid Information Services Center,
a Data Warehouse, business Intelligence capabilities,
reporting capabilities, and user support and litigation
requests.
MAPP includes Delivery System Reform Incentive
Payment (DSRIP), Health Homes and Value Based Payment
(VBP) projects
The Business Analyst will work closely Medicaid Data Warehouse (MDW) program staff, vendor staff, and other stakeholders to define and develop requirements all aspects of the MDW.
Specific duties include:
"" Analyzes, develops and revises flow charts, process models and technical specifications describing as-is or to-be Information Technology (IT) systems or business processes
"" Prioritizes IT system requirements and gains stakeholder
agreement for IT projects or business process change documents detailing the project
"" Assists with developing presentations to justify and explain IT system or business process requirements.
Evaluates the outcomes of systems testing, and confirms that the results are consistent with the system or business process specifications
"" Reviews proposals from staff and recommends to management the criticality of revising system or business process requirements during and after IT system implementation, if applicable
"" Determines the impact of software and hardware releases on the IT system
"" Assists with the development of training related to business
systems implementation for users
"" Writes Queries
"" Assists in querying Data sources to determine the validity of
project outputs
"" Documents data architecture
","['cogno', 'oracl', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'information technology', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['cogno', 'oracl', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'information technology', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Memo is: The manager is looking for candidates with more business/product knowledge and experience with Business Analyst tasks and responsibilities, not just systems.
Knowledge and experience with IBOR a plus.
Candidates can be located in Boston or NJ.
Knowledge in SWIFT messaging, FTP, and MQ is preferred.
Fund accounting experience and knowledge of database applications are also a big plus.
Please update your submitted candidates to make sure they follow these criteria and are still available and interested.
Thanks!
- Lead internal and/or external client workshops/meetings to gather, understand, and set client’s project goals, workflows, complex business needs, gaps, and opportunities.
- Conduct and coordinate business analysis efforts for projects and initiatives.
Determine how changing business needs will affect the system, product, process, and solution.
Describe the business need and potential solution in terms that both business and technical teams can understand.
Review and approve all technical documentation related to the approved solution.
- Propose improvements to documentation and project structure.
Required Function 2:
- Oversee project management activities on assigned tasks to ensure projects stay on budget and are completed within agreed upon timeframes.
Develop project plans and achieve outcomes according to budget reviews and escalate budget and/or change of scope variances as appropriate.
- Identify current and strategic project staffing needs.
- Ensure current and accurate documentation of the solution.
Oversee and/or perform testing of systems changes, development of product announcements and any needed modification to client demonstrations.
- Supervise and participate in all aspects of user acceptance testing, including documentation of test cases and test scripts, testing, tracking defects, and analysis of results.
- Provide cost estimates to the business sponsors for the proposed solution.
Using an ROI approach, advise the business areas on how to move forward to achieve business goals.
Required Function 3:
Required Function 4:
- Identify and qualify additional revenue generation opportunities.
Required Function 5:
- Coach and mentor analysts in accomplishing stated division goals and assigned projects.- Participate in staff reviews assigned to related projects.
- Lead and/or assist with post project reviews.- Identify process improvements for the division to continually improve efficiency and lower the cost of doing business.
Additional Job Requirement 1:
- BA/BS degree and/or equivalent work experience.- 7+ years related work experience.- Masters of Business Administration a plus.- Financial services industry knowledge and experience.- Understanding of custody operations and fund accounting workflows, as well as an understanding of the key roles assumed by Custodians, Fund Accountants, Fund Administrators, and Transfer Agents preferred.- Demonstrated application of project management principles, practices, tools and techniques, including business case development, ROI analysis, planning, scope and issues management, budgeting, and facilitation.
Additional Job Requirement 2:
- Proficiency using windows based applications, including MS Office applications such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, and MS Project.
- Knowledgeable in SWIFT messaging, communication methods such as FTP and MQ, and other systems and Internet technologies.
- Ability to recognize one's own strengths and limitations, taking appropriate initiative to pursue development activities and seek assistance as needed.
- Creative and effective problem solving and analytical skills.- Ability to provide insight to process improvement and be a dependable source for new ideas.- Experience in leading and creating a positive team environment.
- Proven ability to influence morale and team spirit within the division.
- Ability to take action in solving problems, while exhibiting a realistic understanding of the scope of the issue.
- Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively, including targeting the communication to the audience and negotiation.
Ability to compose, edit, and review sophisticated written materials.
- Oral communication skills including the ability to facilitate effective meetings and to deliver presentations.- Consultative and advisory skills with a proven ability to build confidence in interacting with internal and external clients.
- Ability to multi task.- Flexible and adaptable in dealing with a client's evolving needs.- Ability to meet deadlines and work under pressure.- Ability to lead, direct, and develop junior talent, including providing constructive feedback and performance evaluations.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The founding team is well-positioned with over 40 years of combined experience working for and with the biggest media companies in the world.
Join a small team creating a big impact product.
What You’ll Do
Create a detailed business analysis.
Monitor customer accounts to track data accuracy.
Identify market trends and best practices related to data configuration and reporting
Identify and manage the resolution of outstanding issues within customer accounts
Skills and Qualifications
4 or more years of business analysis and/or technical project management experience
Advanced Excel skills and strong SQL experience
Familiarity with Amazon Web Services and Agile development methodologies preferred
Strong communication, organization and presentation skills
Confidence in presenting to senior-level decision-makers on project status and business analysis
Educational attainment of a Bachelor's Degree or higher
Proven analytical skills
Ability to read and write code is a plus
","['amazon web services', 'excel', 'sql']","['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"As the creator of the world's first electronic stock market, its technology powers more than 100 marketplaces in 50 countries, and 1 in 10 of the world's securities transactions.
To learn more, visit: http://www.nasdaq.com
Manages the business requirements across the system development lifecycle.
Provides guidance to sales, new clients and existing customers in the preparation of the requirement documents to ensure that the characteristics of the functionality is well defined, clear and understands the demands of customers as well as the internal organization.
Builds and manages plans to engage new business ventures and validates business requirements with stakeholder groups.
Your role and responsibilities:
Builds and maintains strong client relationships and provides day to day client support.
Under supervision, assists business owners and stakeholders in defining business and system requirements.
Assists in the writing of the detailed functional specifications for others.
Under supervision designs solutions for clients ensuring that SLA's (service level agreements) and KPI's (key performance indicators) are met.
Communicates client requirements to operational teams and subcontractors.
Education Required: Degree qualified in Computer Science, Business/Finance or related discipline, or equivalent work experience.
Experience Required: At least 1 year
",[None],"['kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Additionally, this individual will work with functional leaders on various product performance projects and assisting with other ad-hoc projects.
Responsibilities
Assist with the ongoing analysis of business performance to support daily business operations
Provide analytical support that drives key sales and finance decisions
Design and interpret key performance metrics.
Deliver insights & recommendations
Assist in developing and delivering presentations for senior executives
Analyze competitive intelligence and pricing to improve product performance
Support strategic initiatives
Assist in troubleshooting operational issues as they surface; propose changes to systems/ processes to fix root causes
Prepare analysis and recommendations for strategic decision making
Assist with ad-hoc project management
Skills/Requirements
To be considered for and to perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.
Desired Skills/Experience:
3+ years of relevant work experience
Valuable work experience focused on quantitative analysis, Excel, and logical reasoning
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university
Self-starter and a high degree of motivation to go above and beyond the task at hand
Exceptional problem-solving skills: demonstrated ability to structure complex problems, develop solutions
Strong presentation skills, especially related to building compelling PowerPoint presentations
Work experience in consulting, finance, or sales operations is a plus
Experience with Salesforce strongly preferred
Experience with SQL, Tableau, R, Python and/or Business Objects (or similar analytical packages) a plus
Experience with JIRA, Confluence, and Aha!
a plus
Perks
Competitive salary
Excellent medical, dental, and vision insurance
Paid Family Leave
401(k) with match
Health club discounts, including up to a $400 annual fitness reimbursement
Flexible work options and paid Volunteer Day!
In addition to an open, diverse, and inclusive culture built on transparency and continuous improvement, Watermarkers enjoy a competitive benefits packages, including flexible work arrangements, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, wellness perks, and more!
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'jira']","['financ', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'jira', 'financ', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign, and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills:
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping the focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
A well defined and structured individual who can document, track, and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes, and conducts walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge, etc)Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst ( for Technical Writing Role)
Contract 6-12 months
Work from Home with Travel to NY East Harlem Area
Must travel once in 2 weeks to East Harlem.
NY
JD:
Must have least 8 years of proven Technical Writer Experience
Must have least 3 years of Business Analyst Experience, preferably in Healthcare industry
Must have expert level experience in MS Visio, PowerPoint, and related
Must be good at creating process flows, work flows, documented procedures, best practices etc.
Highly preferred: Experience with Radiology Processes and Clinical Applications Work Flows.
Must be good at understanding business operations, dependencies, and documentation of the same.
Must be good at working in collaborative environment.
",['powerpoint'],"['busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"You are able to work in a fast-paced environment to manage competing priorities, meet agreed-upon deadlines, and deliver high-quality work.
The ideal profile of this position calls for a flexible and well-rounded individual - someone who is self-motivated, detailed oriented, collaborative and has strong communication skills.
Who you are:
Function as a technical business analyst by understanding business requirements and transforming those requirements into data mapping specs.
Understand the full end-to-end impacts of an initiative and have the ability to identify any impacts to other cross-functional teams/applications that also work on production issue resolutions.
You can articulate complex concepts in a way that is understandable to non-technical stakeholders;
You have excellent analytical and critical reasoning skills;
You are a proactive problem-solver, even in areas of uncertainty and ambiguity;
You possess strong collaboration skills and approach problems with positive intent while driving towards resolution;
Job Responsibilities
Monitor, troubleshoot, and resolve problems with Boomi integrations.
Collaborate with the development team to architect efficient and stable integrations
Document and analyze current business processes and underlying systems/applications
Lead the research, development & implementation of special projects, as needed;
Provide guidance on the monitoring, troubleshooting, and resolution of support issues in collaboration with the appropriate stakeholders.
Communicate and collaborate effectively with technical peers and business users
Basic Job Requirements
Bachelor's degree
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills
Adept and proactive at problem-solving and conflict resolution
Minimum of 3 years experience working with Data Integration teams.
Worked with teams at least 2 to 3 full integration projects involving on-premise and Cloud applications
Functional experience with ERP systems (i.e.
NetSuite,SAP)
SQL language proficiency with at least one of the common database platforms such as SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, and/or DB2 database management systems
Ability to work well under pressure; manage tight deadlines and situations where conflicting priorities arise
Preferred Experience
Strong understanding of integration architecture options such as SoA and APIs
Experience working with any Job Scheduling tool (i.e.
Control M, JAMS)
Functional experience with ERP systems (i.e.
NetSuite, SAP)
Hands-on experience on Integration Platforms such as Boomi, MuleSoft; AnyPoint, Pentaho, and Informatica
","['pentaho', 'excel', 'sql', 'mysql', 'erp system', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['pentaho', 'excel', 'sql', 'erp system', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Visit home.barclays/who-we-are/ for more details.
These include a competitive salary and pension, health care and all the tools, technology and support to help you become the very best you can be.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"A Business Analyst is required to work within and, at times, lead teams developing and delivering transformational change projects on behalf of major investment banks and other top-tier financial services companies.
Through investment in research, training and development, the opportunity also exists to develop specific areas of deep expertise.
Skills and qualities
The following skills and qualities are considered indispensable:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills to support the authoring of business documents and presentations, running workshops and managing relationships with stakeholders.
An ability to conduct careful, structured analysis on complex problems or requirements in order to identify and present defensible conclusions and solutions.
Accurate and comprehensive gathering of requirements to enable the formation of coherent specifications.
A thorough understanding of the software development lifecycle and the role of the business analyst within it.
Experience in delivering logical and comprehensive test strategies and clear, concise test cases.
Five-plus years of experience working in the investment banking industry, preferably with one or more areas of specialism.
A practical knowledge of trade lifecycle and risk processes.
It would be an advantage to demonstrate:
A good knowledge of one or more financial product sets, including market structure, pricing methodologies and risk characteristics.
Some experience of business process modelling and optimisation and its documentation.
The ability to independently plan, organise and manage one’s own work and provide guidance and oversight for that of others’
An ability to independently plan, organise and manage his or her own work – while providing guidance and oversight for team members.
Familiarity with any programming, querying or scripting languages.
Understanding of market or credit risk and associated regulations.
Ability to analyse regulatory requirements and produce formal specifications.
Above all, the successful candidate will be proactive, organised and focused keenly on delivering results.
They will be expected to remain diligent, cool-headed and professional at all times.
Experience
The successful candidate will have a track record of working within a team to conduct and deliver high-quality analysis work in challenging environments, preferably as a practitioner.
They will be experienced in dealing with senior stakeholders and taking responsibility for quality and delivery.
Compensation, careers and culture
Remuneration includes base salary, bonuses and benefits.
NO AGENCIES PLEASE
",['excel'],"['risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills:
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities
Work closely with customers to identify and document their as-is and to-be states and requirements
Foster collaboration, innovation and creativity within the BA Team and among cross-functional internal and customer project team members
Serve as the conduit between the customer community and the product management team for application enhancements
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs
New York, Los Angeles or Lebanon
Desired Skills and Experience
3 to 6 Years of overall professional work experience as a Business Analyst
Degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent work experience
Knowledgeable in Agile / Scrum and UML modeling
General knowledge of the entertainment, high tech or life sciences and/or experience in one or more of the following process areas is a plus:
Intellectual Property and Rights Management
Royalty accounting
Licensing and distribution
Contract management
Listening skills, to understand what people say and to detect what they might be hesitant to say
Analytical skills, to critically evaluate the information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a more general understanding, distinguish presented user requests from the underlying true needs, and distinguish solution ideas from requirements
Ability to work hard and thrive in a fast-paced environment while managing multiple projects
Ability to work as part of a team and interface with software developers for a large enterprise system
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Able to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts
Ability to listen to business requirements and translate them into application configurations
Able to travel 60 – 80% on an average yearly basis
No Visa restrictions
",['excel'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
If you are an IT Business Analyst with experience implementing Workday/HR Systems, please read on!
Some of your functions in this role:
- Working closely with the business to gather and document requirements
- Build technical documentation working with the IT teams from start to finish
- Participate in the UAT testing
- Own all the business analysis functions working in a Agile environment
- Create user documentation, training materials as well as train business users
What You Need for this Position
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field
6+ years working as a Business Analyst, working on enterprise level projects
3+ years working on Workday(strong preference) or any other HR System implementation - REQUIRED
Experience in an Agile environment
Ability to manage multiple projects at a time with multiple business stakeholders
Strong communication skills working with all levels of business stakeholders
Demonstrated documentation skills, business requirements documentation, technical specifications, training and user documentation
What's In It for You
Local Candidates ONLY please.
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Mid-Level (36-60 Months)
Candidate is able to work without assistance
Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology or Computer Science or similar field of study.
36 months of business analysis in Information Technology on SDLC projects; including developing business cases, gap analysis, functional and non-function requirements, test cases and plans
36 months of experience using recognized business analysis methodologies to elicit requirements from business users.
36 months of experience querying and interrogating data using SQL on DB2 or Oracle platforms using tools such as SQL query tools and using MS Access.
12 months experience with Head Start data and its analysis
36 months of experience analyzing and developing reporting needs/reports from three perspectives: senior management, power user, and ad hoc, using industry standard (e.g.
Cognos) reporting software
36 months experience working in a formal Project Management office, working with Project Managers and teams, and using standardized methodologies and templates.
","['cogno', 'oracl', 'sql']","['information technology', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['cogno', 'oracl', 'sql', 'information technology', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
EZOPSNew York, NY
Key Responsibilities:
Business Analysis
Analyzing client operations processes & defining solutions
Working closely with internal business, technicians, developers to agree to end client business specifications
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders
Performing regression and user acceptance testing
Work closely with QA to ensure regression & UAT test cases are correct
Working with the end client to onboard software and application
Product Development
Defining detailed specifications and test cases requirements
Ensuring solutions meet end client business needs and requirements
Research & Development for new products for Product Roadmap
Client Onboarding
Product SME for client onboardings & support queries
Requirements:
Candidate should have experience in Financial Services Operations and understand the processes involved between Front to Back Offices
Ability to talk to different audiences, clients, management or developers
Ability to simplify complex information
Experience writing detailed requirements analysis
Candidate is expected to be a strong team player and work effectively in cross-organization situations
Excellent written and communication skills
Excellent written and communication skills
Ability to research tasks independently using prior operations experience
Ability to work independently and multi-task, taking ownership of tasks and using their initiative to produce high quality results
Comfortable working towards tight deadlines
Track record navigating ambiguity in a fast-paced environment within a dynamic organization
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
3+ years Operations experience
Business Analyst experience
Experience working alongside Technology team
Expertise within the financial services industry
At least 3 years working with Microsoft Products, (Excel and PowerPoint, and be adept at data queries and formatting, pivot tables, report writing, and presentations)
Good interpersonal skills with a natural ability to work with and support colleagues, ability to adapt to and work independently and effectively
Nice to have:
Experience writing Product Specifications
Understanding of Machine Learning / Artificial Intelligence
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Flexible schedule
Parental leave
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'regress', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Project work in more than 25 countries
Extensive industry experience in B2B markets
Responsibilities:
Create and use analytical models to simulate or forecast business problems and results
Conduct data analysis including basic statistical analysis
Participate in client interviews and related fact-finding initiatives
Use and develop communication skills to communicate project findings, conclusions and recommendations with your peers and clients
Prepare initial drafts of high quality, error free deliverables
Participate in client meetings to review and present analytical approaches and interpret results
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree with solid academic achievement
Coursework in business administration, finance or economics is a strong plus
1+ years of relevant professional experience
Good business acumen and awareness of business trends
Moderate to advanced Excel and PowerPoint skills are required
Quantitative skills and general problem solving skills for business problems
Strong interpersonal and team working skills
Good communication skills (written and verbal)
Ability to learn quickly and resourcefully
High degree of motivation, flexibility and creativity
Positive attitude and strong willingness to learn from mentors and peers
Ability to travel (sometimes on short notice)
EEO Employer.
Pre-employment background check required.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The CSS team is the backbone of the organization delivering operations and execution while intersecting with multiple cross-functional teams.
You'll help identify system enhancements, identify and remedy software bugs, create and deliver training globally, provide change management support and work closely with new regions to onboard new departments onto the platform.What's in it for you?
* Prepare complex models and analyses of key performance indicators in order to support operational and strategic decisions.
* Provide recommendations to solve problems and ways to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of processes, quantifies their impact, defines their benefits, and shares with management.
* Develops process flows, business requirements, and tools required to provide data to the various business systems.
Guy Carpenter delivers a powerful combination of broking expertise, trusted strategic advisory services and industry-leading analytics to help clients adapt to emerging opportunities and achieve profitable growth.
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst ?
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.Required Skills?Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written ?Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay ?Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
?Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
?Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design?Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision?Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems ?Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off?Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable?Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
?Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Data/Information Mgt Int Anlst is a developing professional role.
Deals with most problems independently and has some latitude to solve complex problems.
Integrates in-depth specialty area knowledge with a solid understanding of industry standards and practices.
Good understanding of how the team and area integrate with others in accomplishing the objectives of the sub function/ job family.
Applies analytical thinking and knowledge of data analysis tools and methodologies.
Requires attention to detail when making judgments and recommendations based on the analysis of factual information.
Typically deals with variable issues with potentially broader business impact.
Applies professional judgment when interpreting data and results.
Breaks down information in a systematic and communicable manner.
Developed communication and diplomacy skills are required in order to exchange potentially complex/sensitive information.
Moderate but direct impact through close contact with the businesses' core activities.
Quality and timeliness of service provided will affect the effectiveness of own team and other closely related teams.
Qualifications: 2-5 years relevant experience Ability to think strategically and the ability to engage resources outside of their direct control to achieve objectives Know-how on analytic tools (SAS E-miner, Knowledge Seeker, SPSS etc.)
Big data and machine learning experiences are (R, Python etc.)
Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Key Responsibilities:
Develop and automate production of various statistics and reports (Valuation, Risk, Pl.
Predict, Pnl Explain, Scenario Analysis).
Work with Risk and Investment Team members and Portfolio Managers to build out analytics in order to capture data as completely as possible.
Work closely with users and key stakeholders to understand requirements, ensure thorough communication and ensure that expectations are being managed.
Help manage releases and deployments of updates to firmwide systems.
This will include monitoring performance, maintaining source control of code, and ensuring code and processes are well-documented.
Investigate and resolve production issues in a timely manner.
Modeling of data structures and processes for equities, fixed income, FX, credit, rates, volatility and exotic products.
Other duties as assigned.
Desirable Candidates:
Bachelor's Degree or further degree in Data Science or other quantitative subject.
Strong programming, technical, and analytical skills.
Experience with Tableau, Python and developing web applications.
Solid understanding of Relational Databases, with strong T-SQL skills using SQL Server.
Excel/VBA experience would be useful.
Ability to focus on multiple projects at once and troubleshoot problems quickly.
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python']","['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'risk', 'data', 'predict', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Experience
The successful candidate will have a track record of working within a team to conduct and deliver high-quality analysis work in challenging environments, preferably as a practitioner.
They will be experienced in dealing with senior stakeholders and taking responsibility for quality and delivery.
The following skills and qualities are considered indispensable:
Excellent written and verbal communication skills to support the authoring of business documents and presentations, running workshops and managing relationships with stakeholders.
An ability to conduct careful, structured analysis on complex problems or requirements in order to identify and present defensible conclusions and solutions.
Accurate and comprehensive gathering of requirements to enable the formation of coherent specifications.
A thorough understanding of the software development life-cycle and the role of the business analyst within it.
Experience in delivering logical and comprehensive test strategies and clear, concise test cases.
Five-plus years of experience working in the investment banking industry, preferably with one or more areas of specialism.
A practical knowledge of trade lifecycle and risk processes.
It would be an advantage to demonstrate:
A good knowledge of one or more financial product sets, including market structure, pricing methodologies and risk characteristics.
Some experience of business process modelling and optimization and its documentation.
The ability to independently plan, organised and manage one’s own work and provide guidance and oversight for that of others’
An ability to independently plan, organised and manage his or her own work – while providing guidance and oversight for team members.
Familiarity with any programming, querying or scripting languages.
Understanding of market or credit risk and associated regulations.
Ability to analyse regulatory requirements and produce formal specifications.
Above all, the successful candidate will be proactive, organised and focused keenly on delivering results.
They will be expected to remain diligent, cool-headed and professional at all times.
Excellent, stable organization with internal growth available
",['excel'],"['risk', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"United States - New Jersey, United States - New York
Business management, administration and support
Global Wealth Management
Job Reference #
214356BR
City
Weehawken
Job Type
Full Time
Your role
• Establishing relationships with business stakeholders to identify and address relevant areas; Client Risk, Periodic KYC (PKR) data analyses, develop monthly metrics for the quality control testing team, middle office and other AML KPIs Evaluate effectiveness of processes and controls; proactively identify gaps, define solutions, and execute on process and control improvements
• Actively collaborating with other teams and SMEs to identify relevant data sources, help develop value-add assessments and deliver critical time bound rollouts
• Advising stakeholders on analytical approaches, and performing a business analysis role, helping flesh out requirements and document, before building anything.
• Blending and analyzing data (different grains, different subjects) from various sources towards providing support for stakeholders.
• Effective communication and presentation skills.
Strong ability to take an ill-defined concept, analyze and translate it into functional and non-functional specifications to drive meaningful business decisions.
• Effective presentation skills with the ability to inform/educate stakeholders about the findings of the analysis
• Work closely with and establish effective communication channels with key stakeholders, SMEs and clients to gather project requirements, specifications and limitations in order to develop state of the art reporting capabilities.
• Communicate effectively across all levels of the organization
Your team
Working in the Financial Services Inc. First Line of Defense, supporting the head office as well as the FA teams and supervisors in the field.
Duties span client periodic reviews, a variety of data remediation projects, KPIs, KPCs, dashboards, metrics, and a wide variety of ad-hoc analytics requests.
Expert advice.
Wealth management.
Investment banking.
Asset management.
Retail banking in Switzerland.
And all the support functions.
Disclaimer / Policy Statements
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Reports to: Director of Financial Planning and Analysis
The Business Analyst will develop and monitor data quality metrics to ensure all data and reporting needs are met.
This is a perfect opportunity for someone who can rapidly adapt to change and outline opportunities and solutions for a business.
KNOWLEDGE AND RESPONSIBILITIES
• Partner with operations and business teams to consult, develop and implement KPIs, automated reporting and dashboards, and process improvements to meet business needs.
• Product portfolio management: annual business unit and category strategic planning with strong market insight development
• Plan and execute an annual plan tailored to each category to achieve targets
• Develop and implement effective pricing structure to maintain the overall category competitive advantage in the market
• Sales analysis including price, volume, and product mix impact
• Menu pricing opportunities based on market trends and product mix analysis
• Profitability per item and category
• Actual vs theoretical COGS analysis
• Productivity analysis
• Marketing actions Return On Investment
• Performance by trade channels
• Manage the forecasting and budgeting processes by partnering with the operations and heads of department, including:
• Sales projections, including Price and Menu change impact
• Impact of initiatives to reduce costs and improve profitability
• Corporate expenses projection by function
• Consolidation, analysis and presentation to the management
WHAT YOU NEED TO HAVE
• Minimum of 3 years’ financial experience
• Bachelor’s Degree in Finance, Math, Accounting or related field but MBA preferred
• Experience in a Big 4 or Financial institution preferred.
• Experience in the restaurant industry preferred.
• Proven analytical background.
• Advanced Excel and Financial modeling skills.
• Excellent communication skills, including written and oral presentations.
• Problem-solver.
• Highly developed sense of customer service and interpersonal skills.
• Conscientious about timeliness of assignments & quality of work product required.
• Ability to manage multiple projects.
• Ability to work extended work hours and travel as needed to support business needs.
• Ability to adapt to change.
WHAT’S IN IT FOR YOU?
• Competitive compensation
• Discounted meals during your shift
• Free Cake for your Birthday
• Medical, Dental, Vision benefits
• Paid time off, paid Holidays
• High Performance Culture
",['excel'],"['financial modeling', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'financial modeling', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"Additionally, you will work with the head of the E-commerce team on new initiatives, doing diligence on new solutions and providing market research and benchmarking on an ad hoc basis.
Provide timely insights and recommendations on KPI’s, looking for emerging trends and insights.
Perform deep dive analyses into specific KPIs to understand the underlying influences and factors on what drives the business.
Lead projects within ecommerce/digital analytics that show effectiveness of site enhancements & campaigns.
Coordinate with Digital Marketing & CRM to provide comprehensive results on seasonal campaign performance.
Manage the dashboards and BI tools for the ecommerce team, making sure that they are up to date and pulling in relevant information.
Lead implementation and testing of new tags as needed.
With supervisor, conduct industry benchmarking and due diligence research to support new project and initiatives.
Coordinate efforts with internal stakeholders to assist with movement of projects from idea, to project scoping, to final development.
Track external and competitive trends within the ecommerce industry and provide insights and recommendations.
BA/BS degree in Business, Marketing, Data Analytics, Mathematics/Statistics, or related areas of study
3-5 years professional experience, with at least 2 year of experience using site analytics tools (Adobe Analytics (Omniture), Google Analytics, Coremetrics) on ecommerce websites
Experience with tag management systems and tagging for new site features, site changes and QA testing
Familiarity with SEO optimization tactics a plus
Must demonstrate business acumen and analytical skills
Have an understanding of and passion for the digital retail landscape, digital marketing tactics, and the analysis and measurement of them
Ability to multitask and achieve deadlines in an efficient, timely, and accurate manner
",['bi'],"['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.Required Skills?Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written ?Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay ?Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
?Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
?Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design?Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision?Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems ?Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off?Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable?Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
?Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
Powered by JazzHR
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Demonstrated interest in financial services, capital markets, or portfolio management is preferred, but not required.
On-the-job training is provided!
This role will open up within the next 1-2 months.
Overview
You should be motivated to learn and achieve, and will be working directly with managers and senior advisors on managing client portfolios.
The Business Analyst will be responsible for delivering ad hoc projects to support leadership, working with the solutions team leads on strategic initiatives which will include the assessment of business strategy, actionable metrics and process improvements.
Successfully navigating the client services organization and building strong working relationships with clients and partners is important for this role.
Responsibilities
Work on presentations, proposals and various ad-hoc projects
Conduct market and portfolio analysis
Work closely with management team to drive strategic priorities
Help senior managers activate and maintain key client relationships
Promote process improvement and optimized efficiency, help design and develop process improvements
Build strong working relationships with a variety of business partners and clients
Assist with operational tasks, and maintain a high level of organization
Conduct market research and perform financial analysis
Qualifications
Ability to execute within a fast-paced and demanding environment, while managing multiple concurrent projects
Strong proficiency with PowerPoint, Excel, and Word
Highly energetic, self-motivated , agile team player with the ability to work with diverse working styles
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with ability to articulate complex concepts in a clear and concise manner
Confidence and skill to think strategically, develop solutions, and present recommendations to business leaders or clients
Strong skills in problem solving, business processes and attention to detail
Quick learner; proven ability to quickly learn business processes and adapt to ever changing priorities
Superior judgment and discretion working with both confidential and sensitive information
Strong people and relationship building skills
A strong interest in capital markets, portfolio management, and asset management
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"FHIR
Agile – Scrum
Epic/Userstory/ETC
Balsamiq/wireframing
Healthcare
Jira/Conflunce/Other tools
Desired Skills:
CSPO would be a plus
Responsibilities:
The role requires 4 to 12 years of relevant work experience
Managing and analyzing business requirements with the ability to prioritize during changes and conflicts
Independently facilitating user groups to drive consensus
Ability to write detailed descriptions and analysis of user needs business impacts and systems functionality for software development life cycle
Providing and reviewing estimates at the project level
Ability to work independently and share learnings with fellow colleagues
Understanding the project schedule and plan/prioritize work schedule for a team to meet time deadlines consistently
Delivering all assigned tasks on time/ahead of time with expected quality and within budget Constraints
Taking ownership of projects assigned with successful deliveries and recognize and escalate situations as deemed necessary
",['jira'],"['busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['jira', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The demand for automation is ever growing with requirements from Regulators to perform frequent disaster recovery tests and Sustained Resiliency events.
* Influence senior management and application teams' automation strategiesQualifications:* Bachelor's degree in computer science or related area* 10+ years of project experience across a broad array of technologies with expertise in more than one technology area* 5+ years developing and/or architecting large, high volume systems* Proven knowledge of J2EE and one or more development languages (e.g.
Java/JQuery, Javascript, Python/Jython, Perl, Ruby, Groovy, C++/C#, .Net, VBScript, SQL and Ansible etc.
)* Hands on experience in API and web service development* Hands on with Continuous Integration and Continues Delivery automation tools/frameworks (e.g.
Cucumber, Selenium Grid, Junit, Jenkins and JIRA, etc.
)* Working experience with platforms/OS/Servers (e.g.
Windows Server, Linux/Unix, J2EE, IIS, Apache, Tomcat, etc.
","['unix', 'jira', 'linux', 'perl', 'sql', 'jqueri', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']",[None],1.0,"['unix', 'jira', 'linux', 'perl', 'sql', 'jqueri', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']"
BA,"Skill (Primary):Business Analyst
To create| assign and track the project [module] work plans for delivery and also provide technical guidance for work completion.
(1.)
To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
(2.)
To participate and facilitate the walkthrough' to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements.
(4.)
To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage.
(5.)
To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements
Â
Please send resumes toÂsgottumukkula@esharpedge.com
Â
Â
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"As the link between business functions and IT, these individuals will be accountable for evaluating and understanding existing processes to provide solutions that ensure realization of business value.In this position you will:* Manage business partner expectations by leading the analysis of business and IT requirements across the organization's value chain.
* Evaluate information and data gathered from multiple sources, identify impacts and decompose high-level information into details.
* Facilitate business model design sessions with SMEs and document existing and future procedures, systems, and workflows.
* Work with product owners to drive the alignment, assessment, and prioritization of identified demands within the respective business change.
* Collaborate with Product Owner to define and manage project scope, anticipating issues while proactively recommending solutions.
* Work with business and technical partners to design digital flow for application implementations.
* Document business requirements / user stories and support population and curation of the platform backlog.
* Prepare release notes, help test functionality including development of test cases for UAT and business training.
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Requirements At least 3+ years working as a Business Analyst Strong knowledge of CRM, preferably Salesforce Must be able to write detailed user stories, translate business needs into functional requirements Collaborate with developers, product managers and business stakeholders to prioritize and manage product roadmaps and backlog Experience with implementation, integration andor migration of CRM platforms Excellent attention to detail and strong communication skills, written and oral Bachelors Degree in Computer Science
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Do you want to be part of a team that encourages your growth, supports your ambitions and makes it a priority for you to reach your goals?
Is helping people part of who you are?
As a business analyst you’ll have an opportunity to be part of a dynamic work group, and be responsible for eliciting business and technical requirements, performing gap analyses for capabilities, understanding technical dependencies, and helping to envision creative solutions to both business and technical challenges.
What success looks like.
Actively solving problems
Expressing resilience and courage to persist through inevitable challenges
Displaying agility by showing willingness to be a generalist
What your days and weeks will include.
Work very closely with the Program Owner and Tech Lead(s)
Document requirements (functional & non-functional) and create user stories
Analyze and decompose business rules
Assist other team members with understanding the business requirements
Operate independently on multiple project tasks
Participate in all phases of project planning, execution, and testing
Provide project support on an as-needed basis to help set direction
Brainstorm and research/resolve issues creatively to meet program objectives and long-term strategy
Support multiple projects in an Agile environment
Produce applicable artifacts per SDLC /Audit requirements
The skills that make you a great fit.
Basic requirements:
Bachelor’s degree
5 years of experience
Authorized to work in the United States without sponsorship, now or in the future.
Exceptional oral and written communication and facilitation skills
Demonstrated ability to be a self-starter, comfortable working autonomously and with ambiguity
Proven ability to work in a fast-paced environment with multiple teams and third-party vendors
Demonstrated experience defining requirements for large scale technology projects
Demonstrated experience with functional and unit testing
Demonstrated ability to balance understanding of broad program scope
Three years’ experience in Agile team environments (e.g.
Scrum or Kanban)
Preferred Requirements:
7 years of expereince preferred
Three years of experience in an information security environment
Working experience within Financial Services (e.g.
insurance, retail annuities), with a focus on technology, cyber security or information risk initiatives
Five years of experience in Agile team environments
Kanban facilitation experience
And your voice will always be heard.
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Duration: Long term Contact
Â
Details:
Need Minimum 7+ Years of IT experience
BA with Wealth management/Banking/Financial
Commercial Insurance domain experience is preferred
Experience collaborating with business partners from multiple disciplines to elicit, document, prepare and manage business requirements
Experience working with IT Stakeholders
Should be able to design solutions for complex business problems and act as a bridge between IT and business organizations
Experience writing User Story, Business Requirement Document, Functional Requirement Document and Use cases
Should have solid experience of establishing meaningful traceability between related requirements
Must have hands on experience utilizing industry standard diagram techniques to enhance the clarity of definition, including: process flows, context diagrams, use cases, wireframes, etc.
Very good experience in Agile.
Experience conducting Agile ceremonies, contributing to product backlog selection, product demo etc is needed.
Good Analytical and Communication skills.
Good Planning and Co-ordination skills
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The successful applicant will be meticulous, objective-focused and technical.
The responsibilities of this role involve but are not limited to the following areas:
perform business analysis, data analysis, resolve data quality issues
produce reports that help guide the business
liaise with PM's and stakeholders on detail level issues
Candidate must have:
6+ years of experience in a Business Analyst role in an Investment Bank / Financial Institution
hands-on data analysis and data aggregation skills
data management experience (data quality, data governance, data lineage, etc.)
strong Excel skills, SQL Server skills, Access
SME in at least one capital market product (e.g.
derivatives, equities, etc.)
Desired skills:
Finance / Accounting background
Cognos, Tableau, QlikView
CFA, FRM
Questions?
careers@delvglobal.com
","['tableau', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql']","['busi', 'financ', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['tableau', 'cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'busi', 'financ', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Business Analyst Summary:
This includes assisting in the development of consistent business continuity documentation, creating current and future state business process models and completing business requirement management activities.
They work closely with all project stakeholders and team members in the development of functional requirements for projects.
They are also responsible for working with each functional area to conduct process mapping workshops and propose recommendations for increasing efficiency through process changes and automation.
Job Responsibilities:
Provide templates, support and guidance to all groups during the development of business continuity documentation
Identify, analyze and document all current state business processes
Analyze current business processes and needs and propose effective solutions to address those needs and improve efficiencies
Facilitate the development of business requirements and process models through interviews, document analysis, workshops and other tools during project planning activities
Ensure alignment and define success measures for projects in relation to the current corporate goals and strategies
Assist in the development of project plans and milestones
Manage business requirements and change requests during project execution
Work with data analysts to report on project outcomes and results
Job Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration or a related field is required
Content Knowledge and Skills:
Level 3 CBAP Certification Required
Scrum Product Owner Certification Preferred
Proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, Visio and Outlook
Exceptional communication skills (written and oral) are required
Previous Experience
5+ years of experience analyzing and documenting business processes and requirements
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Business Analyst (BA) works with stakeholders from all business units and related third parties to define and document business processes and software requirements for technology initiatives, including online products, content management systems, and business information systems.
In addition, the Business Analyst will build test scripts and perform User Acceptance Testing, running tests, documenting results, organizing testing meetings, and preparing results for audit/compliance.
Responsibilities
Analyze current business processes and systems, define needs and document business change requirements
Work with various business groups to assess and enhance processes, systems and workflows
Monitors project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
Draft system specifications
Configure business workflows
Work with IT coordinating systems enhancements and updates to meet business needs
Validate and verify requirements that meet business needs
Create/write test scripts, functional requirements and use cases for testing enhancements
Test systems to ensure specifications are met
Provides references for users by writing and maintaining user documentation and supplies help desk support
Qualifications
Knowledge of Vizio is a plus
Experience writing and reviewing business processes, functional design and working among development teams
Experience with User Acceptance Testing
Bachelors Degree preferred
Ability to work independently and contribute to team effort
Maintains user confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential
Creative, analytical thinker and problem solver
Excellent communication skills: verbal, written and interpersonal
Exceptional ability to learn and teach new software systems/upgrades
Capable of multitasking and has consistent follow-up skills; meets deadlines
High attention to detail and accuracy, conscientious, professional demeanor, reliable
Exceptional time management skills
Requirements
1-3 years experience working as a BA interfacing with technical teams
Intermediate to advanced Microsoft office skills
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Flip the Script on Rx Prices
This is a unique opportunity to join a start-up in its early stages and help create a legendary client experience.
Why become a Senior Business Analyst?
Because you enjoy modeling ambiguity and charting a course through uncertainty.
The senior analyst will provide valuable analytical output and quantitative insights to support both near-term plans as well as the long-term strategic vision.
You should enjoy modeling and data analysis to support quantitative-driven decision-making process.
You are comfortable with data cleaning, manipulation, and analysis in Python/R or other statistics languages when large data requires these tools.
And you're not afraid of industry and market research to stay ahead of the competitive environment.
This role will include a mix of long-term strategic projects and short-term tactical tasks.
Basic Qualifications:
4+ years' experience with pharmacy benefit managers, medical / pharmacy insurance plans, or other intermediaries in the healthcare space.
4+ years of relevant experience with data mining, SQL, reporting, and/or statistical modeling.
Ability to think clearly, problem-solve, and prioritize in a fast-paced and ambiguous environment.
Confidence to develop ideas independently and execute on them with limited supervision.
Familiar with Excel modeling using formulas.
BS Degree in Math, Statistics, Finance, or other quantitative disciplines.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with an app-based platform.
Experience with R and/or Python.
Knowledge of SQL and Tableau (or other dashboard tools).
Master's degree in Math, Statistics, Finance, or other quantitative disciplines.
Equal Opportunity Employment
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'supervis', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'supervis', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Sound Knowledge of Capital market domain Knowledge of Client reporting Should have Understanding of Account Portfolio , Benchmark data, Account performance, Contribution, Cash flows, AUM, Transaction data and reports i.e.
Capital gain purchase Should be able to Write specification for reports, which data source and components to be used in the reports Should be able Help in derivation of calculated fieldsdata in the reports after discussion with business users Should be able to confirm if new Vermillion Reporting System report values are bettermore accurate than the current report whenever there is a discrepancy between the two Good to have knowledge of Vermilion reporting or other reporting tools and SQL (Optional)
",['sql'],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['sql', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"You will work alongside other business analysts and report directly to the project manager.
Your main tasks will include performing detailed requirements analysis, documenting processes, and performing some user
acceptance testing.
To succeed in this role you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to non-technical users.
Responsibilities:
● Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
● Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
● Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
● Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
● Performing requirements analysis.
● Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
● Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
● Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
● Requirement gathering.
● Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
● Providing leadership, training, coaching, and guidance to junior staff.
● Allocating resources and maintaining cost efficiency.
● Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
● Performing user acceptance testing.
● Managing projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
● Updating, implementing and maintaining procedures.
● Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
● Managing competing resources and priorities.
● Monitoring deliverables and ensuring timely completion of projects.
Requirements:
● A bachelor’s degree in business or related field or an MBA.
● A minimum of 2 years of experience in business analysis or a related field.
● The ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions.
● Good documentation skills.
●Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",1.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team at the New York offices.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills:
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
Regards,
Patrick Smith
Senior Recruiter
646-668-4440
psmith@tsrconsulting,com
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"* Serve as Equities Technology Business Analyst, Project Manager, and Subject Matter Expert; areas of focus will include, execution workflows, order management, exchange and client connectivity, and regulatory reporting obligations.
* Full ownership and in-depth knowledge of application functionality required to train and on-board new users potentially unfamiliar with detailed workings of equities applications.
* Write detailed business and integration requirements documents using the Confluence/Wiki based documentation approach aligned with an Agile / sprint-based development methodology.
* Create detailed GUI mock-ups and other visual requirements to be presented alongside user requirements to development teams and key stakeholders.
* Work actively and closely with software development teams to ensure user requirements are clearly understood and developed as specified in the documentation.
* Participate in software development staff planning as they write detailed functional and design specifications to govern field, message, and user interface level details.
* Gather development and testing estimates and including these in formal project plans.
* Conduct comprehensive functional testing during the development process ahead of QA and UAT* Document use-cases for inclusion by QA within formal regression test suite and working with user acceptance testing (UAT) staff on user testing.
These include a competitive salary and pension, health care and all the tools, technology and support to help you become the very best you can be.
",[None],"['regress', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['regress', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"The Role
As a Business Analyst you will work closely with the product management and quality compliance teams translating design documents into functional specifications.
System process mapping and business requirements are to be well documented in order to deliver high quality solutions.
You will also help improve efficiencies and quality of documentation within the business.
What You'll Do
Transform and maintain current and future design documents into functional business requirements in cooperation with Product Management
Ensure the quality and timeliness of the requirements process to drive prompt and efficient validation processes
Confirm consistent traceability of design documents to functional business requirements
Evaluate and prioritize requirements for risk-based validation testing based on impacting government regulations
Work with compliance and validation teams to communicate requirements in a manner that allows for efficient and effective validation outputs
Assist the technical writer in developing documentation for various application modules
Requirements
Strong background in business process analysis, requirements engineering, and process design modeling
Excellent verbal and written communication with the ability to present complex design concepts into clear and concise requirements
Self-motivated, resourceful, and able to meet responsibilities with minimal direct supervision
Experience with 21 CFR Parts 11 and 203
Bachelor’s Degree from a 4 year accredited institution
Nice to Have
Experience with SaaS based solutions, especially Salesforce
Perks & Benefits
Flexible PTO
Allocations for continuous learning & development
Health & wellness programs
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, religion, national origin or ancestry, age, disability, marital status, pregnancy, protected veteran status, protected genetic information, political affiliation, or any other characteristics protected by local laws, regulations, or ordinances.
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['risk', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'risk', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The candidate will be providing financial modeling to enable decisions regarding IT projects and programs.Will require expert financial modeling experience and advanced Excel, knowledge of engagement economics and IT cost accounting.
IT projects, operations, and charge-back knowledge is essential.
The analyst will analyze each deliverable, ensuring profitability and value for money to the end client.
Responsibilities:
Financial management and benefits realization reporting on each project stage
Financial modeling to assist client in making decisions
Designing dashboards for the client
Working with the finance and sales teams and reviewing profitability
Working with the pre-sales team to understand a client's program goals and writing the financial report for the statement of work
Incorporating deliverables identified into the post-sales design
Create reporting dashboards for the client
Education and Experience:
4 years of analysis and data gathering
5 years' experience of IT Budget or Cost Center Management
Ability to assess and mitigate risks
Ability to connect project results and business/financial benefits
Experience of working in financial services/technology
Good knowledge of modeling, cost accounting and benefits realization
Data Visualization using tools like Tableau or Power BI
Good MS Office experience - advanced Excel
Job Requirements:
financial modeling, IT cost accounting
","['ms office', 'power bi', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau']","['risk', 'financial modeling', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'econom']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'tableau', 'risk', 'financial modeling', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'econom']"
BA,"Analyses will have to be carried out in order to determine areas that need improvement.
It is also important to have strong research skills in order to determine the latest trends and solutions.
When problems are detected, the analyst should carry out problem-solving techniques in order to come up with a solution.
When solutions are implemented, the analyst should continue to monitor these solutions to analyze their efficiency and to make continuous improvements.
Knowledge of SQL is important, in order to be able to analyze data from databases.
The business analyst should be able to carry out analyses, such as cost benefit analyses.
Therefore, strong mathematical skills are essential.
Presentation and report-making skills are important in order to present the findings to upper management.
Requires a master’s degree in information technology or a related field.
Prefers proven experience in IT business analyses over the educational requirements.
.
",['sql'],"['research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you a skilled Business Analyst with a solid financial services background?
This is a contract to hire opportunity and applicants must be willing and able to work on a w2 basis.
Responsibilities of the Business Analyst:
Elicit, define, and document business requirements
Write functional specifications and perform business process design with ops teams
Liaise between internal and external business community and IT teams
Lead requirements validation and perform system integration testing
Requirements of the Business Analyst:
Bachelor's degree in a relevant discipline required
At least 5 years of experience as a BA
Background in financial services
Project management experience
Ability to communicate across diverse stakeholders
Detail-oriented; ability to lead a project from end to end
Domain knowledge in FX Risk Management and/or legal documentation is ideal
Keywords: Business Analyst, Project Management, Business Process Improvement, FX Risk Management, Financial Services
Job ID: 338104
For more information, visit http://www.eliassen.com.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst (BA) works with stakeholders from all business units and related third parties to define and document business processes and software requirements for technology initiatives, including online products, content management systems, and business information systems.
In addition, the Business Analyst will build test scripts and perform User Acceptance Testing, running tests, documenting results, organizing testing meetings, and preparing results for audit/compliance.
Responsibilities
Analyze current business processes and systems, define needs and document business change requirements
Work with various business groups to assess and enhance processes, systems and workflows
Monitors project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
Draft system specifications
Configure business workflows
Work with IT coordinating systems enhancements and updates to meet business needs
Validate and verify requirements that meet business needs
Create/write test scripts, functional requirements and use cases for testing enhancements
Test systems to ensure specifications are met
Provides references for users by writing and maintaining user documentation and supplies help desk support
Qualifications
Knowledge of Vizio is a plus
Experience writing and reviewing business processes, functional design and working among development teams
Experience with User Acceptance Testing
Bachelors Degree preferred
Ability to work independently and contribute to team effort
Maintains user confidence and protects operations by keeping information confidential
Creative, analytical thinker and problem solver
Excellent communication skills: verbal, written and interpersonal
Exceptional ability to learn and teach new software systems/upgrades
Capable of multitasking and has consistent follow-up skills; meets deadlines
High attention to detail and accuracy, conscientious, professional demeanor, reliable
Exceptional time management skills
Requirements
1-3 years experience working as a BA interfacing with technical teams
Intermediate to advanced Microsoft office skills
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Position Type: Contract
Position Summary:
This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team at the New York offices.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision.
Job Responsibilities:
-Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
-Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
-Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
-Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
-Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring wherever applicable
Required Skills:
-Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
-Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
-Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
-Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
-Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
-Basic Financial Services knowledge is enough but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc.)
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This role will also interface with other IT team members and partnering business functions to ensure successful alignment across groups.
The IT Business Analyst -R&D role engages with business users to understand and document detailed business requirement, workflows, reporting specifications and help define operational system processes.
This position requires having a good understanding of Pharmaceutical R&D business processes specifically in the areas of Clinical Operations, Clinical Development, Regulatory Affairs & Quality Systems.
This person will have the ability to analyze and understand the usage of existing system landscape both on-premise as well as COTS/SaaS solution capabilities and create detailed business requirements for implementation using the right fit model.
The position also requires strong project management, written and verbal communication skills and an ability to collaborate with management, users and other teams within the organization.
The ideal candidate will be well versed in technologies used in R&D and Quality such as CTMS/EDC, SAS, Veeva, Master Control, EDMS and other analytical software packages.
Role works with department leads to identify opportunities, develops business cases, defines requirements and works closely with counterparts and the project team to ensure successful system implementations and their support.
Requirements
The candidate should be able to provide valuable thought leadership that helps drive business success.
They should be comfortable listening and understanding business needs, asking insightful questions, and working with a team to solution and execute on the solution.
Portfolio Management in this position outlines your responsibility for managing the business / client requests and working with the Director of R&D IT in demand planning, portfolio and financial management for all IT engagements.
Project Ownership as a responsibility requires you to drive execution of key projects as well as understand how they work and integrate into the business ecosystem.
Perform business and functional analysis activities for projects as required.
Analyze business requests to determine the best approach to creating successful resolution delivery solutions/projects effectively and efficiently.
Process understanding and documentation.
Ensure that project documentation is complete and all Quality requirements are executed upon.
Ensure that all customer expectations have been met through delivery of services or projects
Analyze and understand existing system landscape utilized by R&D, identify opportunities for improvement and make proposals for solution implementation
Create, manage and maintain process diagrams and process definition documents
Gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes
Be the ""Go To"" resource for business users in troubleshooting 2 nd level system issues
Performing the role of project manager in leading and managing implementations of on-premise as well as 3rd party applications.
Other duties as assigned
Required Experience
Experience and Skills
Qualifications
5+ years of experience working as a System Analyst within R&D IT environment
5+ years of experience in project management and business analysis
PMP certification is a plus
Understanding the Business - Will know the business and the mission-critical technical and functional skills needed to do the job; understands various types of business propositions and how businesses operate in general; learns new methods and technologies easily.
Communicating Effectively - Writes and presents effectively; adjusts to fit the audience and the message; strongly gets a message across.
Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge
Have keen sense of quality awareness to support regulated system processes
Willing to travel to the other offices if needed
Skills & Knowledge
Hands on working knowledge of SAS as an implementer - installed, configured and supported SAS applications
Good understanding of Veeva R&D suites specifically Submission & Registration Vaults
Familiar with CTMS/EDC applications and related technology/processes
Familiar with Quality Management Systems and related technologies such as MasterControl, Electronic Document Management System
System validation experience is a must
Good understanding of SDLC and CFR Part 11 is a big plus
MS SharePoint Online, Office 365 experience
Agile Project Management
Business Analysis/Requirements Analysis
Life Sciences Analytics Experience and familiarity with various tools such as Spotfire/EAST
Knowledge/Experience with the IT Infrastructure Library (ITIL) framework - a plus
Experience working on a Life Sciences organization
","['r', 'sa']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['r', 'sa', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Hi,
Role: Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ Months
Competencies Business Analysis, IFS Functional Consultant, Oracle eBS - Financials Advanced
Experience (Years) 8-10
Essential Skills Skills Mandatory : Functional analyst for Vena application
Desirable Skills Skills Desired : functional analyst for Vena application
",['oracl'],['busi'],999.0,"['oracl', 'busi']"
BA,"Hello Associates,
Position: Business Analyst
Qualifications
â Develops detailed documentation of client needs; gathers both functional and non-functional requirements
â Experience using Atlassian tools Confluence and Jira
â Creates detailed user stories including acceptance criteria
â When needed identifies, develops and supports business process changes
â Experience defining software requirements for complex products using the Agile software delivery methodology
â Ability to understand complex technical concepts and present them in simple terms to non-technical team members and clients.
â Interacts with Office of Information Technology (OIT) PMs and their customers.
â Develops and deliver supporting business processes
",['jira'],"['busi', 'information technology']",999.0,"['jira', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"JobTitle: Technical Business Analyst
Duration: 6 months to start with extensions expected
Understanding of Azure DevOps, which is the tool of choice, to build and manage the requirements backlog.
Client facing, communication, soft skills required, specific experience, industry experience.
6-8 years experience
This position will be remote until Covid=19 restrictions are lifted
",['azur'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['azur', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Details:
Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 24 Months
Required Skill:
Â60 - 84 Months:ÂCandidate is able to work independently, without assistance and provides guidance to others.
May have an advanced education.Â(Required)
Â60 months experienceÂfacilitating meeting with users to identify & gather business requirements.
Â60 months experienceÂdocumenting functional requirement, business rules & complex security requirements.
Â48 months experienceÂin writing test plans & cases and Performing unit & regression testing.
Â48 monthsÂstrong SQL coding experience for writing SQL data queries for extraction and/or validation of application data.
Â12 months experienceÂwith SharePoint for writing and Maintaining team/project documentation.
ÂBachelor's degree
",['sql'],"['regress', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['sql', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 30 Months
Assist in facilitating requirements for data migration by working with stakeholders to define business needs for specific deliverables, and documenting them in a consistent, complete and, above all, useful way for the team that will eventually design and deliver a solution.
Manage large-scale business analysis work or projects with distinct deliverables to a solution.
Recognize business process management methodologies (e.g., elicitation and documenting of business process requirements, business process modeling, As-Is and To- Be workflow development and gap analysis, best business practice research, target environment definition, etc.)
to define and analyze current business processes in order to remodel/design new processes and improve on existing ones.
Develop test plans for projects to ensure user and program requirements are met.
Internal and external stakeholder communications and outreach, including the development of presentations and other materials that promote the rethinking of core business processes and envisioning of a reengineered environment.
Facilitation of multiple project teams to gather and document business process requirements.
Capable of working without assistance and can provide guidance for others.
Perform thorough analysis and gather information from the business for redesign and document existing business process using UML diagrams.
Required Skills
60 months working on large scale Business Requirement Projects with at least 150+ users which involved the application of strategies to collect business process requirements for new applications.
60 months experience working as the Lead Business Analyst on projects that utilized business process management methodologies (e.g., elicitation and documenting of business process requirements, business process modeling, As-Is and To- Be workflow development and gap analysis, best business practice research, target environment definition, etc.)
to define and analyze current business processes in order to remodel/design new processes and improve on existing ones.
24 months of analysis in migrating legacy data into an enterprise COTS solution and analyzing other integrated dependent systems to new COTS solution
60 months experience with internal and external stakeholder communications and outreach, including the development of presentations and other materials that promote the rethinking of core business processes and envisioning of a reengineered environment.
24 months experience identifying data quality issues, data quality, data validation rules, database constraints, and other data migration efforts.
",[None],"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Guy Carpenter is seeking candidates for the following position based in the Hoboken, Seattle, or Edina office (ideally) or to work on remote basis within the United States:
Business Analyst What can you expect?
The CSS team is the backbone of the organization delivering operations and execution while intersecting with multiple cross-functional teams.
You'll work closely with both vendors and end users to understand the Guy Carpenter workflow to integrate and optimize artificial intelligence to optimize the platform.
You'll help identify system enhancements, identify and remedy software bugs, create and deliver training globally, provide change management support and work closely with new regions to onboard new departments onto the platform.
What's in it for you?
Opportunity for global impact, to work with dynamic and diverse teams across functions and regions to help shape future of work
Competitive pay and outstanding benefits to help colleagues and their families live better - physically, mentally, and financially
Generous time away from the office and paid time off to give back through non-profit community service
Employee Resource Groups which provide access to leaders, relevant volunteer and mentoring opportunities, and interactions with counterparts in industry groups and client organizations
Collaborate with stakeholders across the organization to identify critical data elements and define process, business rules, definitions, and tolerance levels.
Prepare complex models and analyses of key performance indicators in order to support operational and strategic decisions.
Provide recommendations to solve problems and ways to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of processes, quantifies their impact, defines their benefits, and shares with management.
Develops process flows, business requirements, and tools required to provide data to the various business systems.
Conduct data audits and ensure that data audits are effective in increasing the quality of workforce products
Identify trends and best practices and suggest how to improve current practices.
What you need to have:
Business Analyst experience coupled with excellent communication skills to present complex stories and influence change
Project management experience delivering complex solutions to increase workflow
Be a self starter with the ability to work effectively with a remote team
Flexibility to work across time zones to collaborate with global stakeholders (and/or potentially travel in the future)
Experience creating effective training materials for end users
Operate with ""can do"" mind set to provide ""go live"" support and become the subject matter expert / super user
What makes you stand out:
A healthy intellectual curiosity coupled with critical thinking skills
Background in IT and/or the reinsurance industry
KOFAX Software and/or TOTALAGILITY Software
Guy Carpenter delivers a powerful combination of broking expertise, trusted strategic advisory services and industry-leading analytics to help clients adapt to emerging opportunities and achieve profitable growth.
For more information, visit www.guycarp.com and follow Guy Carpenter on LinkedIn and Twitter @GuyCarpenter
#LI-AV1
Requisition #: R_094882-en
6ahf9io63
",['excel'],"['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"As the link between business functions and IT, these individuals will be accountable for evaluating and understanding existing processes to provide solutions that ensure realization of business value.In this position you will:* Manage business partner expectations by leading the analysis of business and IT requirements across the organization's value chain.
* Evaluate information and data gathered from multiple sources, identify impacts and decompose high-level information into details.
* Facilitate business model design sessions with SMEs and document existing and future procedures, systems, and workflows.
* Work with product owners to drive the alignment, assessment, and prioritization of identified demands within the respective business change.
* Collaborate with Product Owner to define and manage project scope, anticipating issues while proactively recommending solutions.
* Work with business and technical partners to design digital flow for application implementations.
* Document business requirements / user stories and support population and curation of the platform backlog.
* Prepare release notes, help test functionality including development of test cases for UAT and business training.
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"New York State Immunization Information System (NYSIIS)
Two candidates will support data exchange and data quality efforts for NYSIIS, including onboarding of providers to New York State Implementation Guide for HL7 version 2.5.1 Immunization Messages and verifying message compliance to the national ONC Meaningful Use requirements for electronic submission of immunization data.
The BA's will be responsible for maintaining and updating ACCESS programs.
The BA's will perform technical activities to enhance interoperability of NYSIIS with electronic health records used by health care practices across New York State.
Projected contract will end on January 30, 2023.
• Communicate with vendors and provider offices regarding HL7 file specifications and testing information and answering initial questions.
• Review and test data files from provider's Electronic Health Record (EHR) system to verify file formatting and completeness.
This will include a combination of manual review and use of automatic software tools.
• Work with provider office and EHR vendor to address any issues or concerns with test file.
• Assist provider office staff with data file submissions and
addressing any questions or concerns that arise through
data exchange.
• Monitor data exchange jobs to review the status of files
that have been submitted to NYSIIS, identify errors and
follow-up with provider office/vendor.
• Assist provider office/EHR with significant data quality or
file format issues discovered in data file submissions.
• Assist with the development and maintenance of
materials documenting standard operating procedures for
data exchange with NYSIIS.
• Maintain MS ACCESS tracking systems and compile
statistics regarding EHR vendor and provider
associations with each other and their communications
with NYSIIS.
• Perform general data analysis and generate reports to
support data quality improvement activities to maintain a
complete, accurate, timely data set.
preparation and analysis; identify problems, and run
standard data coverage reports.
• Monitor data exchange jobs to review the status of files
that have been submitted to NYSIIS, identify errors and
follow-up with provider office/vendor.
10711
www.rmscorp.com
",[None],"['statist', 'commun', 'data']",1.0,"['statist', 'commun', 'data']"
BA,"Experience working in large KYC Programs is a MUST
Over 10 years of experience is a MUST
Experience working in large Investment Banks and in IT Projects is a MUST
Should have experience working with and reporting to senior stakeholders
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"More than one million registered users across 1,400 customers and partners access the world's most-used platform for clinical development, commercial, and real-world data.
Discover more at www.medidata.com.
Your Mission:
Designs, develops and manages activities for a specific product or group of products from product definition and planning through production, release, and end of life
Serves as the central resource with design, process, manufacturing, test, quality and marketing as the product(s) move to production and distribution
Involvement lasts throughout all stages of a product’s lifecycle including modifications, upgrades and maintenance of the product or product line
Your Competencies:
Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors.
Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action
Builds productive internal/external working relationships
Normally receives general instructions on routine work, detailed instructions on new projects or assignments
Your Education & Experience:
Typically requires a Bachelor’s degree and a minimum of 2 years of related experience; or an advanced degree without experience; or equivalent work experience
#LI-AS2
",[None],"['data', 'normal']",1.0,"['data', 'normal']"
BA,"This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
Furthermore, this position will work with the Scrum Master, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
Education Level Bachelor's Degree
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Global Specialty (GSF) Team is seeking an exemplary Business Analyst with broad technical skills to develop data visualizations and build automation solutions that drive business decision making and process improvement.
The ideal candidate will draw upon advanced analytical, problem solving skills, and passion for delivering business insights and analytics.
The complexity of research and skills for a Business Analyst is well beyond basic data entry and extraction.
It involves design and development of automated data pipelines, sophisticated analytical model and intuitive data visualization.
In addition, this role is on a large analytical team that supports a wide range of businesses including: Prime Now, Whole Foods Market, Central , etc.
The following provides some detail of the job duties and responsibilities.
- Data extraction, manipulation and production from database tables (e.g.
Data Warehouse)
- Automation and tool development using and/or programming language
- Design and implementation of analytical model
- Development of data visualization using commercial suites
Basic Qualifications
· 2+ years of industry SQL experience
· Prior experience with and VBA
· Prior experience with data visualization (e.g.
Tableau, QuikSight, Power BI)
Preferred Qualifications
· 5+ years of relevant experience in a business analyst, data analyst or statistical analysis role
· Prior experience in analytical modeling
· Proficiency in one modern programming language
· Advanced working knowledge of data mining using ETL, data warehouse as well as Excel
· Experience in developing requirements and formulating business metrics for reporting
· Proven problem solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, and exceptional organizational skills
","['power bi', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Technical Business Analyst - Contract Role
Position Type: Contract
Part of the squads as a Technical BA for Agile initiatives in Salesforce/CRM space and performs the following functionalities:
-Work with business partners/product owners to recommend and influence requirement statement
-Decide on the story board, epics and story mapping
-Understand the business processes impacted by the request
-Lead solution conversations between development and business groups by providing:
-Impacted Teams (see checklist internal and downstream)
-Current State and Target State workflow diagrams
-Data mappings
-Screenshots/mockupse.
-Use Cases/Scenarios
-Document all necessary details to User Stories required for development team to develop the solution
-Monitors that the suggested solution is being followed and identify business, analysis and understanding gaps
-Review technical tasks added to Jira Stories, and answer questions related to the solution/requirements
-Push to ensure that each impacted development team is aware of dependencies and handoffs
-Review test scripts for gaps - there can be two reviews - one with business and one overall with all stakeholders
-Keep an eye out for efforts where end to end testing is required and approach QA lead and SM to orchestrate that and ensure the same set of data is flowing through the test cases.
-Evolve into a SME and support the product accordingly
","['jira', 'salesforc']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'salesforc', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Do you have 1 to 2 years business experience, but not sure where your current job is heading?
Consider a career with an insurance industry leader.
Looking for a career opportunity?
Consider Financial Services.
Just come with a willingness to learn and bring your computer savviness!
Job Function:
Supports the development and maintenance of property and casualty insurance products with shared responsibilities for growth and profitability.
The primary role for the Business Analyst is to query, analyze, present data findings and make recommendations to business stakeholders.
Analyst will be asked to compile data and build interactive reports which present findings to key decision makers in order to drive value for the organization.
Analyze and research business problems and determine effective solutions while automating data delivery with selfservice reporting.
Partner with the business units within the organization to design and implement business intelligence solutions.
Work productively in a team environment to develop and effectively document business requirements used for the design and development of targeted program solutions while monitoring quality metrics.
Effectively leverage and work with technology-based tools to enable data analytics and data management while training users in the use of the technology.
Accountability for the adherence of operational quality assurance as well as corporate compliance within the technology based solutions developed in-house.
Coordinating regulatory and compliance data calls ensuring all reporting is processed in a timely manner.
Responsibilities
Develop, construct, test, and maintain databases.
Design and develop data sets that deliver accurate, consistent results for reporting Support regular and ad-hoc data needs for end users.
Provide recommendations and implement ways to improve data reliability, efficiency, and quality Evaluate impact of action plans.
Working knowledge of data analysis tools preferred.
Ability to lead cross functional teams to take appropriate action Assist in the training process when appropriate.
Compile and verify data utilized for monthly reporting.
Translate business requirements into technical requirements for developing processes.
Perform ad-hoc analysis to find solutions to business inquiries.
Requirements:
Four year college degree in related field Minimum 2 years office experience Knowledgeable in analyzing financial results, profitability, and forecasting.
Attention to detail with ability to manage multiple tasks/priorities while working in a fast-paced environment.
Flexibility to handle multiple assignments with little supervision.
Excellent project management skills.
Excellent verbal, written communication and presentation skills.
Strong mathematical aptitude and analytical skills required.
Quantitative analysis and critical thinking skills.
Intermediate experience using Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Access.
Department Account Management & Service
Required Experience: Less than 1 year of relevant experience
Required Travel: No Travel Required
Required Education: Bachelor's degree (4-year degree)
The EEO is the Law poster and its supplement is available here at http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm .
EEOAA Policy at https://hubinternational.jobs/eeo/
E-Verify Program at https://hubinternational.jobs/e-verify/
This contact information is for accommodation requests only; do not use this contact information to inquire about the status of applications.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This individual will work to gather, analyze and document business and functional requirements related to new and existing systems as well as be responsible for all user acceptance testing.
Responsibilities
Lead effort to understand the business needs, gather requirements and translate to effective documentation for both stakeholders and developers
Develop test plans and coordinate testing in conjunction with the technical team, business users and stakeholders
Evaluate business processes, anticipate upcoming requirements and uncover areas for improvement
Assist in developing the project plans, scope, and objectives
Monitor project progress by tracking activity, resolving problems, and effectively communicate plans and insights to team members and management
Ability to present findings within brainstorm sessions, requirement meetings and status meetings.
Manage changes to the project scope and project schedule
Create and maintain comprehensive project documentation
Ability to manage competing resources and priorities
Manage expectations with both internal and external parties
Successfully manage relationships with all stakeholders
Requirements
Proven working experience as a Business Analysis with 5-7 years’ experience in the financial sector
Solid technical background with understanding and/or hands-on experience in software development and workflow processing including in Agile and Waterfall Project Management methodologies
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Solid organizational skills including attention to detail and multi-tasking skills
Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office particularly Project, Visio and PowerPoint
Ability to deliver results on time, on budget, and to the very highest standards.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst
The companys merchandise mix and assortments are constantly evolving as merchants and planners focus on what customers want to buy and respond by delivering great discounts on a wider variety of name brand merchandise.
A career that fits you
Teamwork
Amazing culture and people
Customer focus
Are you ready for the next big move in your career?
The culture demands hands-on, close engagement at all levels, and the ability to think and act strategically.
Within this culture, there are many opportunities to attain and even exceed personal goals quickly while partnering with professionals across multiple categories.
This creates a win-win culture with a rigorous standard of performance for everyone.
Structured for growth and profitability, individuals are measured on performance rather than process.
What this yields is an environment that is invigorating and offers a clear, compelling reward system for the team.
Additional information is available at:
www.rossstores.com
www.ddsdiscounts.com
About this job:
With the support of the Manager, the Business Analyst will work to identify key opportunities for improvements.
This role will support the MDO vision to be the central point of contact for all master data needs within a certain data domain (i.e.
supplier or product hierarchy).
Partnering with their Manager, the Business Analyst will ensure that all requests are prioritized, addressed and resolved in a timely manner.
Responsibilities:
Point of Contact for Business
As point of contact for multiple business departments across the organization, the Business Analyst will be playing an important role to support multiple business units address regular request, and troubleshoot issues
Analyze data to troubleshoot or provide data insights and business visibility
Documentation
Ensure that existing governance and process documents are up to date based on changes in requirements or business needs
Request Management
Manage work flow and requests in a Master Data Management Tool.
Execute on all (change) requests from business effectively to ensure that they are implemented according to set data governance standards and processes
Process improvement/Projects
Identify and provide solutions on ways to service the business better
Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree with a concentration in Business, Economics, Finance or Computer Science, or an equivalent diploma
3 years of experience as a Business Analyst, (preferably in Retail or in an IT field), with strong process, data, and systems understanding
Prior Data Governance and Administration experience or exposure preferred
Thorough knowledge of business process documentation that includes prior experience with documenting Merchandising, IT or Finance workflows, processes and requirements
Ability to work with both business (non-technical) and IT (technical) with ability to communicate/translate requirements easily and effectively between all parties
Strong understanding of productivity suite software (i.e.
Microsoft Office)
Strong analytical skills
Ability to follow established practices, policies and procedures
Strong communication skills
Ability to build working relationships and bring about cooperation from leadership and working teams
Ability to adjust with changing work environments, priorities and goals
Job requires ability to work in an office environment, primarily on a computer.
Requires sitting, standing, walking, hearing, talking on the telephone, attending in-person meetings, typing, and working with paper/files, etc.
Consistent timeliness and regular attendance
Vision requirements: Ability to see information in print and/or electronically
#LI-AS4
'216688
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business_Analyst
consulting, and business process outsourcing services, dedicated to helping the
world's leading companies build stronger businesses.
Headquartered in Teaneck,
technology innovation, deep industry and business process expertise, and a
global, collaborative workforce that embodies the future of work.
With over 75
NASDAQ-100, the S&P 500, the Forbes Global 2000, and the Fortune 500 and is
ranked among the top performing and fastest growing companies in the world.
and domain consulting through industry and technology expertise.
than 5300 experienced consultants with a broad range of domain and subject
matter expertise.
transforming operations around the Future of Work , improving the
efficiency and effectiveness of IT, maximizing the value of enterprise
solutions, and innovating with state of the art technologies.
We_Provide_a_Number_Of_Business/IT_Consulting_Services_Including
Business Strategy
IT Strategy & Roadmap Development
Process Re-Engineering & Transformation
Enterprise Architecture & Technology Selection
Domain Solutions
Program Management, Enterprise Analytics, Process and Quality Consulting.
serve the following industry domains: Banking & Financial Services, Insurance,
Health Care, Life Sciences, Technology, Communications, Information, Media &
Entertainment, Retail, Consumer Products, Manufacturing & Logistics, and Travel
& Hospitality.
The CBC team is a high performing organization that is
analysts such as Forrester and Gartner.
Role_And_Responsibilities
Business Analysts have the opportunity to deliver immediate value to clients by
working with a project-based team of consultants.
Analysts will help access the
client s business and technology challenges and deliver innovative solution
Business Analysts are responsible for facilitating the requirements analysis
process, developing strong working relationships with business partners and
building domain expertise.
Key responsibilities for Business Analysts include:
Develop relevant industry and technology knowledge
Draw conclusions from the market / industry trends, client issues and
implement strategic and technology solutions.
Researching industry initiatives, identifying and responding to client
opportunities and developing client deliverables.
Required_Skills_And_Qualifications
Bachelor s Degree in Business, Computer Science, Information Systems,
or Engineering.
Ability to grasp business needs and assess impacts to complex business
operations and systems.
Ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving
environment.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Demonstrated capabilities in teamwork and leadership
Self-motivated and strong initiative
Professional client presence
Ability to work as part of a cross-cultural team including flexibility to
support multiple time zones when necessary.
Willingness to travel
Solid Microsoft Office skills including Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access,
and Project
diverse environment.
creed, color, national origin, ancestry, age, marital and family status,
classification protected by state, federal or local law.
permanent residence (otherwise known as a Green Card ) for this role.
to fill future needs within the business.
This job posting represents potential
Although the position is not
If a job
will notify you.
for the specific open position.
opportunities.
Employee Status : Full Time Employee
Shift : Day Job
Travel : No
Job Posting : Jun 26 2020
About_Cognizant
services companies, transforming clients' business, operating and technology
models for the digital era.
helps clients envision, build and run more innovative and efficient businesses.
consistently listed among the most admired companies in the world.
Learn how
@USJobsCognizant.
member of the Veteran Jobs Mission.
leverage the leadership, loyalty, integrity, and commitment to excellence
instilled in them through participation in military service.
All qualified applicants will
receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender, identity,
sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability,
protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
If you have a disability that requires a reasonable accommodation to search for
a job opening or submit an application, please email
with your request and contact information.
Show moreShow less
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['classif', 'commun', 'logist', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'classif', 'commun', 'logist', 'busi']"
BA,"Need a strong Business Analyst who understands the functional piece of Dynamics AX.
Should have 365.
Will be working closely with a Project Manager.
Job Responsibilities
Strong experience as a BA in a Microsoft Dynamics manufacturing environment
Ability to analyze and define business processes aswellas accepted best practices pursuant to an upgrade from Dynamics 2009 to 365
Document and create BRDs for all user requirements and work with both users and technical staff to ensure properdocumentation and development.
Facilitate, or supervise facilitation of, all aspects of QA and user acceptance testing.
Update business process documentation to reflect changes in processes and systems as they occur.
Provide end user training and support.
Must have excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
Ability to work independently and be self-motivated.
3-5 years of Microsoft Dynamics AX experience.
Ability to work in a team environment.
Proven capability to collaborate with business stakeholders at all levels.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Contribute to all stages of the project lifecycle - change initiation, design and delivery, through to benefits realization and will support of more senior project managers.
Partner with business and technology teams to analyze, interpret, and document requirements for complex business problems and recommend comprehensive technology solutions.
Develop solutions that are strategic, cost effective and meet business requirements.
Define the project approach, building stakeholder buy-in around the project plan, commitments and changes.
Manage delivery proactively, balancing scope, schedule, communications, budget and risks.
Work within project controls and procedures and establish quality assurance processes.
Manage relationships with internal and external stakeholders.
* Strong background in Capital Markets and in depth knowledge of financial instruments - equities, fixed income, FX, commodities, derivatives.
* Working experience in trade life cycle including trade processing, settlement, collateral, to support business transformation initiatives.
* Business analysis including technical initiatives in a financial product area or a functional area within the Securities businesses.
* Agile methodology and experience in front to back to risk collaborating with corresponding technology teams.
* Credit risk, market risk, operational risk and experience interfacing with Internal Audit and Regulators.
* Conducting data analytics supporting businesses including knowledge of but not limited to SQL, Big data, Hadoop, Python etc.
* Creation of core project documentation including business requirements, functional requirements, technical specifications etc.
","['hadoop', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['hadoop', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The successful applicant will be analytical, challenge-oriented, adaptable, and a highly competent self-starter who relishes the prospect of working in a dynamic environment with significant opportunities for industry exposure and career development.
Responsibilities:
preparing BRD's and FSD's, performing gap analysis
supplementing testing team by designing test scripts and performing UAT
building tactical tools in MS Excel via advanced macros and/or via Access databases to enable data analysis
performing data analysis, resolving data quality issues
working on vendor integrations
producing reports that help guide the business and give them the ability to base business decisions on data
Candidate must have:
previous or current experience in the role of a Business Analyst in an Investment Bank or another Financial Institution
10+ years of experience, one more senior than the other (VP level)
derivatives SME
experience with swap reporting
hands-on data analysis and data aggregation skills, data quality experience
data governance and data architecture experience
ability to work with and understand complex processes
experience facing off to senior management
Desired Skills:
strong knowledge of SQL and Access
familiarity with statistical analysis tools (Python, R)
familiarity with data visualization (e.g.
Qlik, Tableau)
familiarity with at least one of the following: MarkitServ, TIW, GTR
CFA/FRM certification
proficiency in at least one of the following methodologies: SDLC, Six Sigma, Waterfall, Agile, Prince 2, SCRUM
bachelor's degree in a related field
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'python']","['busi', 'statist', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'python', 'busi', 'statist', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"Junior Sales Representative
Vela is a leading independent provider of trading and market access technology for global multi-asset electronic trading.
Vela's ticker plant, execution gateways, trading platform, and risk and analytics software deliver a unique, ultra-low latency technology stack to simplify and streamline electronic trading.
With access to more than 250 venues, Vela provides global coverage across all major asset classes.
Vela's clients include traders, market makers, brokers, banks, investment firms, exchanges, and other market participants.
Vela is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
Job Profile
Vela is currently seeking a talented Junior Sales Representative who will act in a traditional Lead Generation role to help grow the business.
This is an entry level role but a high-profile position for an assertive self-directed individual seeking to fast track their sales career.
Candidates must be able to hit the ground running and produce immediate results.
This role is ideally suited to a self-motivated individual who relishes being at the forefront of business activities and thrives on their own successes and those of the team and organization.
Key Accountabilities
Collect and record the contact information of prospects and leads
Navigate corporate structures to identify decision makers and determine buying process
Identify prospect's business needs and goals to determine solution
Work closely with Sales Manager to increase close ratio and number of new customers
Able to build strong networks in and outside the organization
Strong communication and organizational skills
Knowledge, Skills & Experience Required
1-2 years' sales experience, or transitional experience in fintech trading software product management or client support
Understanding of equities, derivatives and fixed income a plus
Excellent time management skills
Ability to multi-task and prioritize under pressure, while maintaining high quality output and meeting deadlines
Strong presentation skills
Attention to detail in all aspects of work is essential
Confident communicator
Logical and methodical at trouble-shooting
Good appreciation of the Sales cycle (previous sales/client support or product management experience an advantage)
Understanding of financial markets and related terminology
Further Information
For any further information please get in touch at hr@tradevela.com
or call +1 646 713 2773.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and deliveryimplementation.
Required Skills Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis design Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable Exposure to AgileScrum is a must.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc) Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and businessdata analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
Regards, Patrick Smith Senior Recruiter 646-668-4440 psmithtsrconsulting,com
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Category: Other Area(s)
Hi
My name is Dadan and I am a Sr.
Details
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Title: Business Analyst II
Duration: 6+ Months
Project Overview:
Lookers Internal Instance of Looker requires ongoing maintenance and upkeep.
Candidates must have prior experience or familiarity with Look ML there are no exceptions or substitutions.
Top 3 Daily Responsibilities:
(3 bullets of the workers main responsibilities on the project)
Execute Analytics Reporting Requests Using LookML
Code Review LookML of other members of the team.
Skill/Experience/Education
Mandatory
Bachelors degree required
3 Years of experience in Data Modeling with LookML and SQL
Specific Tools or Applications experience: Looker, Salesforce CRM, Financial Analytics
Desired
LookML -- Advanced (3-5)
SQL -- Advanced (3-5)
Data Analysis - Advanced (3-5yr)
Job Type: Contract
Experience:
LookML: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
","['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['data modeling', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'data modeling', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (BA)
The Business Analyst will work with internal and external stakeholders to gain an understanding of data requirements and operational processes.
This position will collect and measure key metrics in order to evaluate client success and business impact.
Over time the expectation is that the Business Analyst will become a source of knowledge within the business on the relationship between customer data and operations performance.
The work of the Business Analyst will directly support the goals an initiative of the Client Success Managers and leadership team.
Essential Job Functions
Conduct research and analysis as directed by the client-facing team members
Take the lead on ad-hoc analysis requests from the business
Track and measures ongoing client activities to optimize performance
Measure and analyze historical data and report on trends
Analyze and document complex business processes
Dig into large data sets and existing reports to find, document and communicate anomalies
Engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously
Prepare weekly reports in Excel, Word and PowerPoint
Required Skills and Experience
3-5+ years of business analysis experience required
Bachelorâs degree required; Business analysis certification a plus
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook required
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills required
Strong written and verbal communication skills required
The ability to cooperate and collaborate with cross-functional teams required
Health Care and HIPAA experience preferred
Familiarity with the basics of database structure and logic is preferred
1-3+ years of software experience preferred
1-3+ years of Salesforce experience preferred
Benefits
Powered by JazzHR
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"This position reports to the Director of Account Management, and is based in New York City (Chelsea/Garment District).
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Within a list of Apparel/Fashion accounts, the Retail Analyst will:
Attend and actively participate in routine luxury fashion account client meetings, both on- and off-site.
Maintain customer satisfaction throughout the account management process: this includes applying exceptional written and verbal skills, keen ability to “problem-solve” and decipher user inquiries, and collaborate efficiently between internal teams and client contacts.
Validate, on occasion and when needed, retail data using excel.
Utilize listening and probing skills to identify and assess the client’s needs.
Exercise sound judgment to analyze and identify solid opportunities in line with corporate strategy.
Provide feedback to the various internal teams to help drive new solutions, create more effective marketing tools, and improve current solutions.
Requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including solution-based issues management.
Demonstrated ability to work well under tight deadlines and pressure without compromising standards.
Proven competency of intermediate-to-advanced Excel skills required.
Display a high level of energy and sense of urgency to drive both exceptional client satisfaction and internal efficiencies.
Charismatic, bright and analytical with a “can-do” mentality.
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE PREFERRED FOR POSITION:
1-2 years experience in apparel/fashion merchandising, buying, planning or related activities.
Proven success in managing internal and external relationships, communications.
Proven ability to comprehend basic retail math and utilize intermediate-to-advanced excel skills across daily activities.
SAP, BlueCherry, RLM, Island Pacific, Retail Pro, QlikView, Microstrategy, Cognos,).
Fashion or consumer products industry knowledge preferred.
","['cogno', 'excel']","['math', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['cogno', 'excel', 'math', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job #: 1072055
This is an exciting opportunity to manage within the front office Technology initiatives on trade capture, risk and P&L, regulatory reporting on credit products.
If you or someone you know is interested, please send an updated resume to Joanna Warchol, jwarchol@apexsystems.com.
Position: Quantitative Business Analyst
Duration: 18 month+ contract with potential for conversion
Compensation: Based on experience
Responsibilities:
Risk Engine computes Risk, PL Explain, Ledges and complex scenarios for bond, credit derivatives, interest rate derivatives, Loans and mortgage derivatives.
The numbers produced by this system are used by traders, risk managers and MO personnel on a daily basis.
Work with traders and portfolio strategist to ensure the daily risk is delivered accurately and on time.
Provide business analysis support to traders, risk managers, trading support personnel and Finance.
This includes explaining and justifying Risk, P/L Explain and GL numbers.
Assist business teams in system User Acceptance testing planning and execution.
Team with FO Quant, Risk Quant, model validation and analytics developers to support new credit derivative products and model valuation.
Participate in various retirement, business enablement and regulator initiatives with business and horizontal Technology teams.
Core skills:
Extensive knowledge of fixed income finance and option pricing.
Knowledge of stochastic finance and credit derivative is a plus.
3-5 year experience in high pressure working environment within a financial institute.
Ability to successfully deliver complex/critical projects in challenging environments.
Experience in Agile/Scrum Management and Agile Tools.
Ability to multitask across several project and assignment.
Experience operating in a decision-making role.
Experience facing off to the business
Good communication skills and collaborate effectively across diverse/global teams.
Knowledge of Python is helpful
Knowledge of SQL, Python is helpful
EEO Employer
","['sql', 'python']","['risk', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'python', 'risk', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"JD:Business Analyst/Consultant - Risk & Finance Regulatory Reporting Consulting Domain Knowledge required- Understanding of various regulatory reporting such as US-GAAP, IFRS, FATCA, Basel IIIStrong analytical profile with working experience in Banking and Finance domainShould have excellent communications skills to have meaningful interactions with international clientsRoles / Responsibilities-Use business analysis tools and techniques to capture and clearly articulate the business problems, identify inefficiencies and define business requirements/solutions for achieving the required client goals.
Manage the front to back project life cycle, including the following1.
Requirements gathering and documentation2.
Request management and prioritization3.
Analyzing technical components and processes4.
Document use-cases, flow diagrams, state diagram, data models, activity diagram, API documents, etc.
As a business analyst, a consultant will have to elucidate business requirements from clients, understand the requirements and prepare FRD's, FSD's as required.Work with technical teams to carve out solutions based on business requirements (via FRD's, FSD's)and act as a bridge between business and technical teams to architect the required solutions.Candidate should be comfortable digging through logs, databases, and performing ""hands-on"" testing to understand applications as and when required.As a leader should be able to work with multi-faceted teams and also if required, help in grooming fresh talents into the line of business.As required, governance of client teams for routine operations and help in handling/managing client escalations.Work with leadership to develop subject matter expertise around capital markets/regulatory reporting by creating thought leadership content and also have to work as a leader around such initiatives as required.Should be able to adapt to the changes and quickly align to new processes, operating models and other technological changes.Other skills required- SQL knowledge, Unix, Understanding of SDLC, Agile methodologiesWhat's in it for you?
""Nearest Major Market: New York CityNearest Secondary Market: NewarkJob Segment: Consulting, Business Analyst, Unix, Database, SQL, Technology
","['unix', 'excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",999.0,"['unix', 'excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Required Skills:
FHIR
Agile Scrum
Epic/Userstory/ETC
Balsamiq/wireframing
Healthcare
Jira/Conflunce/Other tools
Desired Skills:
CSPO would be a plus
Responsibilities:
The role requires 4 to 12 years of relevant work experience
Managing and analyzing business requirements with the ability to prioritize during changes and conflicts
Independently facilitating user groups to drive consensus
Ability to write detailed descriptions and analysis of user needs business impacts and systems functionality for software development life cycle
Providing and reviewing estimates at the project level
Ability to work independently and share learnings with fellow colleagues
Understanding the project schedule and plan/prioritize work schedule for a team to meet time deadlines consistently
Delivering all assigned tasks on time/ahead of time with expected quality and within budget Constraints
Taking ownership of projects assigned with successful deliveries and recognize and escalate situations as deemed necessary
",['jira'],"['busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['jira', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst, E-Commerce
Job Overview:
They will be responsible for analyzing different solution requirements, communicating these requirements to the development team, investigating issues, application/product testing and ensuring quality of technical changes.
This individual should demonstrate and appreciate the highest-levels of customer service, communication, productivity and professionalism.
In addition, the candidate should have a strong ability and aptitude for leadership and self-motivation, possess well-sharpened analytical skills, and ideally a background or level of expertise in retail business/consumer goods.
Essential Responsibilities:
Collaborating closely with stakeholders and business users to elicit their business/functional needs and effectively compile and document them to better understand the motivation behind new project(s), enhancements and/or features and forecast future system design and development.
Distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs and appropriately prioritize all of the requirements for this role based on appropriately identified factors.
Confirming that all of the appropriate stakeholders are involved in any given project and obtaining the required information needed for capturing and validating the requirements and other artifacts you set forth.
Translating functional specifications into usable technology solutions, and the development of business artifacts (such as use cases, business models, etc.).
Reinforcing that all of the requirements youve implemented support the delivery of business value, fulfill departmental goals and objectives, and meet stakeholder needs and expectations.
Adhere to the Software Development Life Cycle
Validate that the requirements are covered by the solution
Participate in creating the test plans
Assist in User Acceptance Testing
Provide input to project plan and risk assessment
Participate in Quality Assurance and testing of new applications
Leading and navigating the User Acceptance sessions in order to confirm the requirements for implementation have been met prior to deployment.
Being accountable for successfully managing any changes and conflict that may arise during the requirements gathering process.
All other duties as assigned.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
5+ years experience with creating documentation for communication with varied audiences.
Deep understanding of business requirements elicitation and how to use this data to create the appropriate programs/projects.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including presentation skills, interpersonal and relationship management skills (in both technical and business settings).
Self-motivated, creative, passionate and able to acclimate into a fast-paced & dynamic environment.
Working knowledge of all aspects of Systems Development Life Cycle, Change Management, Release Management, Configuration Management, Quality Assurance and Testing, Requirements Gathering, Project Management, and Systems Analysis and Design.
Self-directed and independent worker who can also lead cross-functional and cross-organizational projects.
Familiarity with Relational Design, Object Oriented and Service Oriented Architecture is a plus.
Experience with Business Intelligence & reporting tools such as Tableau, QlikView, Crystal Reports, Business objects or Cognos is an asset.
Advanced skills with all Microsoft Office Software for the creation of management reports, presentations, and analysis.
Skilled with merging diverse data from different platforms, formats and environments.
Any experience with responsive design a plus.
All jobs are and will continue being awarded based on merit.
Powered by JazzHR
","['tableau', 'cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['tableau', 'cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.Essential Duties and responsibilities:Project Delivery Responsibilities:* Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
business rules, data mapping, and product integrations)* Architect solutions based on client's needs by utilizing established ELM Solutions methodologies and tools, industry experience and best practices* Analyze client's existing systems of record to create data conversion mappings into ELM Solutions core products* Document functional requirements and partner with the development team to translate into technical requirements* Gather and document reporting requirements* Complete the configuration spreadsheet based on client requirements* Coordinate and organize client product training* Support user acceptance testing and production support tickets* Act as the primary client advocate and problem solver throughout the implementation process* Review and validate deliverables from development team and quality assurance resources against requirements and provide feedback* Coordinate activities and communication of requirements with internal and external teamsProject Operations Responsibilities:* Assist the program manager in tracking project delivery* Assist program manager in identifying and challenging scope and work estimates that seem extraordinary, providing acceptable alternatives as needed* Communicate functional or scope risks against statement of work to program manager in a timely manner* Provide a successful and seamless hand-off of client to customer supportOther Duties:* Perform quality assurance tasks when needed* Understand project management and quality assurance best practices* Foster team spirit within the team and across teams within the department* Attend seminars and web events to maintain professional and industry knowledgeJob QualificationsEducation:Bachelor's degree required preferably in business, finance, accounting, MIS, computer science or a related fieldExperience:* Minimum 2-4 years of experience in implementing and supporting technology solutions, gathering requirements, participating in client interviews and meetings, and providing value-add services preferably in corporate legal departments* Professional consulting experience is highly preferred* Experience implementing and integrating with ERP systems* Experience working with relational databases* Experience in gathering requirements rel
","['erp', 'erp system']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"This is a 12 month + contract position.
This position is for a Business Analyst for the FA Platforms Team at the client's New York charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis and design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring wherever applicable
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis and resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones
Requirements:
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must
Basic Financial Services knowledge is enough but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc.)
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This position entails creating trade and application flow diagrams, data analysis in SQL or MS Excel and writing requirement documents.
- Ability to own a business problem and provide solutions timely and accurately.
- Projects assigned could be on an enterprise level, Front to Back and may also be required to work with third-parties.
- Maintains a project dashboard for senior management status reporting.
- Learn current trade flow, able to spot limitations and provide a straight thru solution.
- Gather requirements from Front Office businesses and provide solutions.
- Creates trade/system flow and ppt presentations.
- 4+ years of experience
#LI-CG1
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'busi']"
BA,"Creates and manages SDLC documentation and obtains signoff from appropriate stakeholders
Elicits and documents business requirements, suggesting solutions and/or changes
Performs as is/to be analysis of business processes and tools
Develops business cases, traceability matrices, swim lane diagrams, RACI diagrams and other documentation as needed
Facilitates User Acceptance Testing
Manages requirements changes
Ensure alignment with business strategy/tactics
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst
TASKS & DUTIES
Coordinates analysis activitiesbetween multiple resources for enterprise-wide projects.
Elicits requirements through methods such as interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, user scenarios, scenarios, business analysis, and task and workflow analysis.
Coordinates with multiple business units simultaneously to define complex business processes and determine crossdepartment/division/agency dependencies and communications.
Leads the critical evaluation of information gathered from multiple sources, reconciles conflicts, narrows down high-level information into details, abstracts up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguishes user requests from the underlying system needs.
Presents analysis findings to stakeholders at all levels of management.
Provides recommendations for improving processes and policy to meet business objectives.
Utilizes enterprise-wide requirements definition, management systems, and software development life cycle methodologies to proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements and deliver the following factors as needed: Functional Requirements/Business Requirements Document (iii), Use Cases, Graphical User Interface (GUI), Screen and Interface Designs.
Analyzes end-user requests for information and creates ad hoc reports from various databases using query tools.
Works with users and/or project managers to define and document concepts and processes which entail consultation with various stakeholders to ascertain required project scopes, business requirements, and deliverables for systems.
Recommends modifications, enhancements, and improvements to current IT systems and related applications required to ensure the deployment of project plans and initiatives.
Serves as a major conduit between internal and external customers and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Using natural language and in accordance with standardizes templates prepares functional specifications that define the system being proposed to meet business requirements.
Collaborates with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision by analyzing tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Serves as a liaison between the business units and technology teams that support purchased software.
Manages process modernization and analysis projects, including the development of scope, schedule and budget documentation, including spreadsheets, reports, plans, schedules, charts and specifications.
Prepares and conducts analysis of various IT projects and software needs, and conducts operational and procedural analysis of systems to define business and system requirements that meet key business objectives.
Documents current and future process flows, as well as business architecture documents using industry standards and various modeling techniques.
Creates and implements Requirements Management Plan including identification of stakeholders, decomposition of theproject scope into manageable units, identification of requirement attributes for traceability, requirements prioritization and reporting.
Creates functional wireframes and prototype that demonstrate functionality, features, content, and user flow of an application
APPLICATION MODERNIZATION & ENHANCEMENTS
4+ years of experience in the following:
Utiliz Business Analysis tools such as JIRA, Balsamiq & MS Visio.
Work and coordinate with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
Oversee project deliverables.
Design data model and application prototypes.
IT DEVELOPMENT & MANAGEMENT
6+ years of experience in the following:
Utilize Business Analysis tools such as: JIRA, Balasamiq & MS Visio.
Work and coordinate with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
Oversee project deliverables.
Design data model and application prototypes.
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst
NYC, NY
Please let me know if you have any questions:
Work with Business and IT to refine and update Business Requirement Documents (the data scope, criteria and specification) for the purpose of Risk Assessment
Facilitate User Acceptance Testing, to communicate and obtain feedbacks from the businesses to document issues based on test scripts and test cases
Project Management timeline with IT and LOBs to coordinate test plans and document resolution steps
Create User Operations Manual for the various roles for the Risk Assessment Application and conduct user training
Provide User and IT supports throughout development, UAT, and Go-Live stages
Assist on Phase 2 Application development based on new Business Requirements
Develop metrics and dashboards with business intelligence tool on Qlik applications
Job Requirement:
Minimum 4 years' experience as a Business Analyst or similar position
Experience with creating and maintaining Business Requirement, and Functional Specification Documents
Proficient with MS Office, Advanced MS Excel and Access
Demonstrated analytical, quantitative, problem-solving and conceptual skills
Experience in Compliance Application and Qlik is preferred but not required
Knowledge of Java, SQL and HTML, SDLC on web applications and database development
Fast learner to understand in-depth application capabilities and functional designs with optimization and efficiencies
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'qlik', 'java']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'optim', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'qlik', 'java', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst:
Agency: The New York City Department of Social Services.
Project Name: IT Development and Management.
Duration: Up to 5 Years.
Currently, ITS is expanding its role to encompass increased need for the design, customization, testing, implementation, and production deployment of various projects and releases as well as management between ITS Offices and other DSS program areas.
Having a project portfolio to properly reflect users' business needs and ITS' workload is a crucial part of ITS' operation.
Therefore, there is a need for IT consulting resources for the expanding responsibilities in this division.
Tasks & Duties:
• Coordinate Testing of application.
• Develop test cases and acceptance criteria.
• Coordinate QA testing and acceptance between QA staff, developers, and stakeholders.
• Implement information technology quality assurance standards.
• Develop business and technical requirements.
• Identify user stories and translate them into technical requirements as required.
• Develop user stories and break down requirements into deliverable functionality.
• Review the requirements with the stakeholders for their approval.
• Provide Management Reporting and Information dissemination.
• Analyze and document current systems and processes as currently implemented.
• Make recommendations for improvements based on client feedback.
• Work directly with business stakeholders, clients, designers, developers, and engineers to coordinate the.
Required Skills:
• Minimum 6-8 Years Experience in Business Analysis tools such as : JIRA, Balasamiq &MS Visio.
• Minimum 6-8 Years Experience working and coordinating with the Technical teams in understanding the requirements.
• Minimum 6-8 Years Experience in overseeing project deliverables.
• Minimum 6-8 Years Experience in designing the Data model and application Prototypes.
Looking forward to hearing you.
--
Regards,
Asim Ghafar
Technical Recruiter.
1107 North Point Blvd, Ste 228
Baltimore, MD 21224
Office: 443-836-4932 X 1004
Cell: 239-666-8767
hr3@zd-techsolutions.com
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Hi,
Greetings!!!
Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 12+Months with possible extension
Interview Mode: F2F Mandatory.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Meet with decision makers, system owners and end users to define business, financial and operation requirements and system goals, identify and resolve system issues.
Participate in/lead design session in prototyping new system for the purpose of enhancing business process and operations and information process flow.
Collaborating in the planning design ,development ,and deployment of new applications and enhancements to existing applications.
Create mockups ,system models ,specifications ,diagrams ,and charts to provide direction to system Programmers.
Execute complex ad-hoc database queries using SQL for troubleshooting, reposting and QA .
Coordinate and perform in-depth tests, including end user reviews, for modified and new systems, and other post-implementation support.
Participate as a business analyst in agile environment including the creation of user stories, user stories, user story estimation, sprint planning, demo, retrospective.
Qualifications:
Proven experienceÂon Agile projects in a business analyst capacity.
3+Years' experience working as business analyst on a CURAM application.
5+Years' experience using wire framing tools.
Advanced PLSQL skills and abilities.
Extensive practical knowledge in importing data for use in report software, spreadsheets, graphs and flow charts.
Excellent written oral communication skills.
Ability to conduct research into systems issues and products as required.
Ability to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Â
If interested, kindly do share profiles to madhavi(t)impetususa(dot)com and shahab(at)impetususa(dot)com
Â
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'end user', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'end user', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Other functions specific to this team are managing SOX controls and managing statutory data updates.Job Responsibilities* Manage the flow of data from Finance/IT to Actuarial on a quarterly basis, including file manipulation into standardized form* Identify, analyze and draw conclusions using financial reporting tools and the general ledger* Streamline reconciliations and obtain sign-offs from team members* Document business processes and best practices, including SOX reports* Work on ad hoc projects and reportsRequired Skills/Experience* MS Excel (advanced spreadsheet knowledge, formulas, pivot tables, MS Query, macros, etc.
",['excel'],"['financ', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'financ', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Job title: Business Analyst
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary:
Negotiable
Job published: 2019-10-03
Job ID: 41514
Responsibilities:
Complete project life-cycle management launching new PM Teams into production
Lead new strategy roll-out projects internally with Technology, Operations, Legal, Compliance and Risk groups, and, externally with Brokers, Exchanges and Vendors
Provide day-to-day support for various operational procedures such as broker data management, compliance monitoring, trading, and business continuity
Requirements:
This is a selective position.
The ideal candidates will have a combination of software development and communication skills with some experience working in a financial services organization, specifically with futures and FX.
2 years of relevant work experience is a plus.
Must have the ability to assist veteran specialists while simultaneously managing multiple long-term and short-term projects independently under very tight project deadlines.
Ability to communicate via producing documentation at all levels.
Working experience of one of the Linux/Unix scripts.
Perl, bash, and etc.
Working experience with Linux/Windows Operating Systems and distributed storage solutions preferred.
Familiarity with industry standards of server and storage hardware preferred.
Working experience with Python.
Working experience of either C++, C#, or Java programming.
Working experience with SQL.
Additional experience with database design is a plus.
Candidates with specific work experience and knowledge of market regulations in these areas will be strongly preferred but not required.
Education:
A BS in finance, statistics, math, and engineering or computer science is strongly preferred
If you would like to be considered for the position of Business Analyst or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below.
","['unix', 'python', 'linux', 'sql', 'perl', 'c', 'java']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'python', 'linux', 'sql', 'perl', 'c', 'java', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Job Number: 20-05387
Want to be part of the Energy Industry?
Position Overview:
This role will support the Application program that entails upgrading several critical applications to ensure they continue to function, and to support Client's goal of becoming a Digital Utility.
This program includes the following projects:
Apps Upgrade
IB/Integration Bus Upgrade
Integration Gateway upgrade (DataPower)
SiteCore Cloud Migration
Live Data Servers Upgrade
Content Server Upgrade
Responsibilities:
The Business Analyst plays a key role gathering functional and technical requirements, conducting data mapping, preparing test plans and scripts, executing testing, assisting with completion of Disaster Recovery and Technology Impact documents, assisting with stakeholder communications and change management.
The BA will, at a minimum:
Inventory existing applications requiring upgrades.
Document functional requirements for each application to be upgraded.
Create Business Process flows / Business process documents
Create Technical Requirements documents
Create Requirements Traceability Matrices
Create Test Plans, Scenarios and Scripts.
Execute testing.
Assist team with stakeholder communications
Assist team with completion of provided Technology Impact Assessment forms
Weekly status reports.
Meeting agendas, materials, and minutes for weekly meetings.
Required Qualifications:
Extensive experience in developing detailed requirements functional and technical.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and interpersonal skills.
Excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
A deep understanding of technical concepts, principles and terminology.
Knowledge of data science concepts and experience gathering data requirements.
Ability to communicate effectively across many different levels of technical and business teams.
Experience with Agile and hybrid waterfall project methodologies.
Superior presentation and negotiation skills.
Proven management and organizational skills.
Strong adaptability and capacity to work in fast-paced environments.
Experience with Azure, AWS, DataPower, IBM Integration Bus/Websphere a plus
Experience with DevOps and associated tools (Azure DevOps a plus).
Experience with Project Portfolio Management tools (Innotas/PPM Pro) a plus.
Utilities and Governmental experience is a plus.
401k Retirement Savings Plan administered by Merrill Lynch
Commuter Check Pretax Commuter Benefits
If interested, you may contact:
Pam Saba
pamela.saba@eclaro.com
6466952945
Pam Saba | LinkedIn
","['aw', 'azur', 'excel', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['aw', 'azur', 'excel', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"JobDescription :
Role: Senior Business Analyst
Grade (for internal candidate relevance): 11
Role:
The Lead Business Analyst provides strategic business analysis services to business partners.
The focus of this position will be the documentation of business requirements and associated business processes/workflows in support of initiatives and projects.
The position will also work extensively with internal and external development resources in knowledge transfer of requirements and insuring understanding of how those requirements are reflected in applications/systems requirements.
This position will interact and support both business users and technology and in close partnership with project stakeholders.
They will also be a Leader for an Agile Scrum team.
Essential Accountability:
• Gather/analyze/document business requirements leading to the development of a business solution.
• Support the development of internal workflow design through systems, new and revised procedures and product designs, including the user interface aspect and the development of rules-based analysis for new or existing products.
• Support the establishment of new projects by facilitating visioning sessions with business users and producing associated Vision documents.
• Develop metrics for quantifying associated business value for assigned projects
• Recognize and communicate the effects and impacts of requested changes to established projects, systems and applications, as needed.
• Supports in the identification and management of project scope, and supports status reporting to the Project Leader as needed.
• Mediator between developer, Quality Assurance and product owners.
Collecting requirement from PO, getting it developed by the developer, getting it tested with the help of QA and developers and ensuring the rollout to production.
Business Analysis:
• 8 + Years of relevant experience.
• Standard requirements gathering and analysis.
• Process Mapping
• Functional and Technical Specifications
• Data flow diagrams
• Requirements Management / Planning (Prioritization, Change Control)
• Agile knowledge and practice
• Ensuring precise delivery
Additional skills :
It would be helpful if you can demonstrate that you have some knowledge and hands-on experience in the below areas:
• SQL
• Data management
• Knowledge of Platts products and commodities market a huge plus
Preferred Qualification
For more information, visit www.platts.com.
Only electronic job submissions will be considered for employment.
If you need an accommodation during the application process due to a disability, please send an email to: EEO.Compliance@spglobal.com and your request will be forwarded to the appropriate person.
The EEO is the Law Poster http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf describes discrimination protections under federal law.
Job ID :
254993
Posted On :
3/14/2020 12:05:53 AM
New York
",['sql'],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['sql', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Business Analyst
What can you expect?
The CSS team is the backbone of the organization delivering operations and execution while intersecting with multiple cross-functional teams.
Youll help identify system enhancements, identify and remedy software bugs, create and deliver training globally, provide change management support and work closely with new regions to onboard new departments onto the platform.
What's in it for you?
Opportunity for global impact, to work with dynamic and diverse teams across functions and regions to help shape future of work
Competitive pay and outstanding benefits to help colleagues and their families live better physically, mentally, and financially
Generous time away from the office and paid time off to give back through non-profit community service
Employee Resource Groups which provide access to leaders, relevant volunteer and mentoring opportunities, and interactions with counterparts in industry groups and client organizations
Collaborate with stakeholders across the organization to identify critical data elements and define process, business rules, definitions, and tolerance levels.
Prepare complex models and analyses of key performance indicators in order to support operational and strategic decisions.
Provide recommendations to solve problems and ways to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of processes, quantifies their impact, defines their benefits, and shares with management.
Develops process flows, business requirements, and tools required to provide data to the various business systems.
Conduct data audits and ensure that data audits are effective in increasing the quality of workforce products
Identify trends and best practices and suggest how to improve current practices.
What you need to have:
Business Analyst experience coupled with excellent communication skills to present complex stories and influence change
Project management experience delivering complex solutions to increase workflow
Be a self starter with the ability to work effectively with a remote team
Flexibility to work across time zones to collaborate with global stakeholders (and/or potentially travel in the future)
Experience creating effective training materials for end users
Operate with can do mind set to provide go live support and become the subject matter expert / super user
What makes you stand out:
A healthy intellectual curiosity coupled with critical thinking skills
Background in IT and/or the reinsurance industry
KOFAX Software and/or TOTALAGILITY Software
The companys 75,000 colleagues advise clients in over 130 countries.
With annualized revenue approaching $17 billion, Marsh & McLennan helps clients navigate an increasingly dynamic and complex environment through four market-leading companies including Marsh, Mercer and Oliver Wyman.
#LI-AV1
",['excel'],"['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Coordinates analysis activitiesbetween multiple resources for enterprise-wide projects.
Elicits requirements through methods such as interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, user scenarios, scenarios, business analysis, and task and workflow analysis.
Coordinates with multiple business units simultaneously to define complex business processes and determine crossdepartment/division/agency dependencies and communications.
Leads the critical evaluation of information gathered from multiple sources, reconciles conflicts, narrows down high-level information into details, abstracts up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguishes user requests from the underlying system needs.
Presents analysis findings to stakeholders at all levels of management.
Provides recommendations for improving processes and policy to meet business objectives.
Utilizes enterprise-wide requirements definition, management systems, and software development life cycle methodologies to proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements and deliver the following factors as needed: Functional Requirements/Business Requirements Document (iii), Use Cases, Graphical User Interface (GUI), Screen and Interface Designs.
Analyzes end-user requests for information and creates ad hoc reports from various databases using query tools.
Works with users and/or project managers to define and document concepts and processes which entail consultation with various stakeholders to ascertain required project scopes, business requirements, and deliverables for systems.
Recommends modifications, enhancements, and improvements to current IT systems and related applications required to ensure the deployment of project plans and initiatives.
Serves as a major conduit between internal and external customers and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Using natural language and in accordance with standardizes templates prepares functional specifications that define the system being proposed to meet business requirements.
Collaborates with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision by analyzing tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Manages process modernization and analysis projects, including the development of scope, schedule and budget documentation, including spreadsheets, reports, plans, schedules, charts and specifications.
Prepares and conducts analysis of various IT projects and software needs, and conducts operational and procedural analysis of systems to define business and system requirements that meet key business objectives.
Documents current and future process flows, as well as business architecture documents using industry standards and various modeling techniques.
Creates and implements Requirements Management Plan including identification of stakeholders, decomposition of the project scope into manageable units, identification of requirement attributes for traceability, requirements prioritization and reporting.
Creates functional wireframes and prototype that demonstrate functionality, features, content, and user flow of an application.
PROJECT SPECIFIC TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS
POSITIONS
APPLICATION MODERNIZATION & ENHANCEMENTS
4+ years of experience in the following: Utiliz Business Analysis tools such as JIRA, Balsamiq & MS Visio.
Work and coordinate with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
Oversee project deliverables.
Design data model and application prototypes.
POSITION
IT DEVELOPMENT & MANAGEMENT
6+ years of experience in the following: Utilize Business Analysis tools such as: JIRA, Balasamiq & MS Visio.
Work and coordinate with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Technology
Business Analyst
New York City, NY, USA
Responsibilities
Understand current business process and systems with the objective of providing functional design inputs for the proposed technology solution
Work with stakeholders in Trading Business, Technology and PMO to run meetings, coordinate and document requirements gathering in Foreign Exchange & Fixed Income Space
Create high quality documentation for Business and Functional Requirements
Analyze data sets, create flow diagrams, prepare high level summaries and workflows
Work in close co-ordination with the development leads on enhancements and defects, and assist with troubleshooting / resolution of application bugs and business value added
Engaging successfully with software developers and testers to ensure quality delivery, on time
Planning, estimating, managing risks and issues, project reporting, managing stakeholders, and building strong relationships with the business
Assist in project execution through JIRA, providing tracking to technical teams and status updates for internal and business stakeholders.
Develop best practices to be used in evaluating, selecting and implementing technologies for use within FXLM technology more broadly
Requirements
Knowledge/Experience:
About 5-8 years’ experience as Business Analyst with any Investment/ Global Bank in Trade Processing, Risk Management areas
Should understand FX/Fixed Income full front to back workflow (front office, middle office, back office functions)
Exposure to full trade processing lifecycle starting viz., deal capture, deal execution, risk management, confirmations, accounting, settlements etc.
Familiarity with SDLC and Agile development methodologies
Any experience on payments flows, especially cross-border payments is a plus
Strong academic record ideally with a Bachelors or Master’s degree in Computer Science, or related technical discipline from a top tier University or equivalent master’s degree (MBA) with specialization in Finance
Spanish speaking is a Must.
",['jira'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi']"
BA,"OVERVIEW: The purpose of the Business Analyst (BA) is to plan, design, develop, test and launch efficient business and operational systems in support of organizational functions and business processes.
The BA will work directly with organizational stakeholders to evaluate process requirements, proactively identify anomalies, document and recommend innovative and efficient solutions.
Additionally, the BA will create and manage project documents including project plans, milestones, risks, scheduling, and change management.
The Business Analyst will generate and compile reports based on findings, complete with probable causes and possible solutions to systems issues and will provide ongoing daily support of all relevant systems, processes and related functional areas.
Specific duties include, but are not limited to, the following:
· Assist in the requirement sessions with end users and develops business specifications and project documentation.
· Drives application enhancement including analysis, design specifications, implementation and user acceptance focusing on the analysis and design of efficient and innovative workflows.
· Coordinates projects and/or changes using a concise, consistent methodology to coordinate activities, schedule resources, track budget and ensure accuracy and completeness in a timely manner.
· Maintain, communicate, and champion repeatable methodology including a set of standard principles and procedures for managing projects and change.
· Assist in the generation of test plans and data.
· Reports gaps in policies, procedures, and operating controls to leadership to ensure member impact and risk is mitigated.
· Functions as a business lead and/or a project manager on departmental and/or organization wide projects.
Ensures that the Project Team completes milestones as outlined based on the project scope and business requirements.
· Acts as the technical liaison between users, vendors, and IT to ensure technical specifications are captured and delivered.
· Assists with vendor management on assigned applications.
Adheres to the goals and standards set forth by the Service Level Agreement (SLA).
· Provides support to assigned functional areas and track assigned programs and systems, including troubleshooting of errors and issues as they are identified through resolution
· Performs additional duties as required.
Soft skills include, but are not limited to the following:
· Fosters diverse, high-performing culture that accomplishes organizational changes, goals and priorities.
Facilitates a team-work oriented environment.
· Promotes and maintains a positive work atmosphere by behaving and communicating in a manner consistent with professional standards to get along with members, co-workers, management, and vendors.
· Keep abreast of industry developments including but not limited to changes in regulations and technology.
· Excellent communicator with the ability to translate data into actionable insights
Requirements
· Bachelor's Degree in a related field or the equivalent work related experience.
· 2+ years of experience in the financial services industry with a thorough knowledge of financial principles, front and back office processing and financial institution regulations.
· 2+ years Business Analyst experience on projects of small to medium in size and complexity, with demonstrated experience in workflow/process analysis, requirements gathering and documentation, and creation and execution of testing plans.
· Experience with core banking processing platforms like Symitar, Spectrum, Servicing Director and Akcelerant are a plus
· Experience writing SQL scripts for report writing and data mining is a plus
· Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (including: Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Project, SharePoint and Visio and SQL Server)
· Highly ethical.
Span of Control / Direct Reports
No Direct Reports
8am - 5pm
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst
Duration : - Long term
Responsibilities and Duties
o Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
o Strong problem solving and analytical skills.
o Excellent written and oral communication skills a MUST.
o PC literate in Windows environment including MS Office.
o Demonstrated ability to build and maintain strong networks.
o Self-confidence combined with openness to learning and applying new skills and concepts.
o Good sense of humor.
o Knowledge of or ability to understand technical terminology and concepts.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $68,000.00 - $73,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['ms office', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 12+ Month
Status : FT
Job Code: 0039
JOB REQUIREMENTS:
The role requires at least 3 years of Wealth domain and Supply Chain experience.
Candidate must have 8-10 years of experience as Business Analyst.
candidate should have strong experience with Wealth Management.
Willingness to commit to the growth and success of the Trade and Supply Chain Solutions group, working closely with the development team to do so.
Willingness to travel if required to support the business needs.
Travel could be as much as 75%.
Proven ability to collaboratively work with client management and other staff to define requirements for sometimes new areas of business.
Superior oral and written communication skills, including presentation skills.
Proven collaborative approach to working with co-workers at all levels.
Comfortable in a dynamic work environment where individual initiative and accountability is a given.
An analytical and creative approach to solution design and problem solving.
An understanding of technology and the development life cycle is important.
An understanding of object-oriented principles and modeling would be a plus.
Working with SaaS solution is a plus.
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, sex, religion, age, physical or mental disability, veteran status, citizenship status or any other status protected by federal, state or local law.""
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business AnalystManhattan, NYBusiness Analyst Manhattan, NY
This candidate will be a key member and work closely with the Product Management Team.
This is a FULL TIME POSITION.
H/She will need the following to be considered:
The right candidate should communicate well because they will be working with Internal and external stakeholders.
Must have ability to create documents that are legally reviewed (very high on reviewing documents with their legal team)
Doing requirement gathering and working experience in Waterfall/Semi-Agile.
Payment or Banking experience will be Best to have (CHIPS, RTP, ACH) even basic knowledge works because they have ample of documents and videos to train people.
Supportive of team initiatives and decision-making process, including contributing to concept development and solution design Performance Standards
Work with the Innovation Designer to support the creation of visual artefacts of the findings, insights, and prototypes through the project lifespan
UML and Use Case development
If you meet the above requirements, please send updated resume ASAP.
",[None],"['busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Business Consulting
Sr. Business Analyst (Capital Markets)
New York City, NY, USA
Responsibilities
Gather requirements from business users.
Write clear business requirements and functional specifications.
Document all requirements and solutions.
Requirements
08+ Years of strong experience as a Business Analyst.
Alternative Investments / Capital Markets background is MUST.
Strong analysis skills with experience analyzing data from various sources.
Should be able to query data from Database and analyze.
It is preferred if candidate can read technical code (just reading is enough for analysis purpose).
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Coordinates analysis activities between multiple resources for enterprise-wide projects.
Elicits requirements through methods such as interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, user scenarios, scenarios, business analysis, and task and workflow analysis.
Coordinates with multiple business units simultaneously to define complex business processes and determine cross-department/division/agency dependencies and communications.
Leads the critical evaluation of information gathered from multiple sources, reconciles conflicts, narrows down high-level information into details, abstracts up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguishes user requests from the underlying system needs.
Presents analysis findings to stakeholders at all levels of management.
Provides recommendations for improving processes and policy to meet business objectives.
Utilizes enterprise-wide requirements definition, management systems, and software development life cycle methodologies to proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements and deliver the following factors as needed: Functional Requirements/Business Requirements Document (iii), Use Cases, Graphical User Interface (GUI), Screen and Interface Designs.
Analyzes end-user requests for information and creates ad hoc reports from various databases using query tools.
Works with users and/or project managers to define and document concepts and processes which entail consultation with various stakeholders to ascertain required project scopes, business requirements, and deliverables for systems.
Recommends modifications, enhancements, and improvements to current IT systems and related applications required to ensure the deployment of project plans and initiatives.
Serves as a major conduit between internal and external customers and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Using natural language and in accordance with standardizes templates prepares functional specifications that define the system being proposed to meet business requirements.
Collaborates with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision by analyzing tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Serves as a liaison between the business units and technology teams that support purchased software.
Manages process modernization and analysis projects, including the development of scope, schedule and budget documentation, including spreadsheets, reports, plans, schedules, charts and specifications.
Prepares and conducts analysis of various IT projects and software needs, and conducts operational and procedural analysis of systems to define business and system requirements that meet key business objectives.
Documents current and future process flows, as well as business architecture documents using industry standards and various modeling techniques.
Creates and implements Requirements Management Plan including identification of stakeholders, decomposition of the project scope into manageable units, identification of requirement attributes for traceability, requirements prioritization and reporting.
Creates functional wireframes and prototype that demonstrate functionality, features, content, and user flow of an application.
Required Qualifications:
6+ years of experience in utilizing Business Analysis tools such as: JIRA, Balasamiq & MS Visio.
6+ years of experience in working and coordinating with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
6+ years of experience in overseeing project deliverables.
6+ years of experience in designing data model and application prototypes.
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Client: SwissRe (Do not post anywhere)
Visa: Open
JD:
Business Analyst-Location Armonk NY (Commercial insurance knowledge prior experience on Majesco insurance software implementation+ Mid level).
a.
Minimum 6 years of P&C Commercial Insurance experience in Policy Admin BA role
b.
Must have COTS Product implementation experience with insurance policy systems such as Guidewire, Duck Creek, Majesco, Insurity or other policy products.
c. Experience in requirements analysis and requirement gathering methodologies specifically writing user stories.
d. Capable of working closely with development team to ascertain that the solution being developed meets the documented requirements.
e. Experience in reviewing, writing and executing detailed test cases based on requirements.
f. Strong attention to detail with excellent analytical and troubleshooting skills.
g. Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
h. Highly motivated self-starter possessing superior organizational, time management and prioritization skills required to manage workload under stringent deadlines.
i.
Demonstrated experience in successfully leading projects or teams preferred.
j.
In depth knowledge of software development life-cycle.
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
","['excel', 'c']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'c', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Someone who is driven to get things done and views obstacles as an exciting challenge that demands a creative solution.
In this role you will perform business analysis, research, and testing to support key business initiatives and maintain and implement products and solutions.
The individual operates as a key spokesperson for clients to ensure appropriate communication and follow through of activities.
S/he makes decisions on client-related technology development and management activities and ensures the correct business functionality, requirements, and industry standards are addressed with proposed solutions.
Some of your key responsibilities include:
Participate in and contribute to internal and/or external client workshops/meetings to gather, understand and document client's project goals, workflows, complex business needs, gaps, and opportunities.
Conduct business analysis efforts for projects and initiatives.
Determine how changing business needs will affect the system, product, and process.
Describe the business need and potential solution in terms that both business and technical teams can understand.
Review all technical documentation related to the approved solution.
Ensure current and accurate documentation of the solution, including business requirements documents, use cases, and wire frames.
Understand the system architecture and functionality and assess the feasibility of client requests and applies the features of the various products as applicable.
Compose business requirement documents, use cases, issue logs, project status documents, scope change documents, mapping specifications, test plans, test cases, scope statements, and business cases.
Participate in industry and professional networks to ensure awareness of industry standards, trends, and best practices.
Identify gaps in current products or solutions and participate in creating new solutions to fill these gaps.
Solve difficult problems as needed through proposing insightful, knowledgeable, effective solutions.
Participate in project management activities on assigned tasks to ensure projects stay on budget and are completed within agreed upon timeframes.
Escalate budget and/or change of scope variances as appropriate.
Provide cost estimates, based on input from the technology team, to the business sponsors for the proposed solution.
Using an ROI approach, work with the business areas to recommend how to move forward to achieve business goals.
Identify additional revenue generating opportunities.
Qualifications:
BA/BS degree, and/or equivalent work experience.
6+ years related work experience.
Financial services industry knowledge and experience preferred.
An understanding of the key roles assumed by Custodians, Fund Accountants, Fund Administrators, and Transfer Agents preferred.
Experience applying project management principles, practices, tools and techniques, including business case development, ROI analysis, planning, scope and issues management, budgeting, and facilitation.
Proficiency using windows-based applications, including MS Office applications such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Access.
Working knowledge of MS Project.
Demonstrated knowledge of SWIFT messaging, communication methods such as FTP and MQ, and other systems and Internet technologies.
Creative and effective problem-solving and analytical skills.
Ability to recognize one's own strengths and limitations, taking appropriate initiative to pursue development activities and seek assistance as needed.
Proactive and results-oriented.
Demonstrated ability to work in a team-oriented environment.
Excellent written communication skills.
Ability to communicate effectively and with clarity, with ability to negotiate.
Consultative and advisory skills with ability to work and communicate professionally with internal and external clients.
Organizational skills and ability to multi-task.
Experience developing and delivering presentations.
A collaborative environment that enables you to step outside your role to add value wherever you can
Direct access to clients, information and experts across all business areas around the world
A culture of inclusion that values each employee's unique perspective
High-quality benefits program emphasizing good health, financial security, and peace of mind
Rewarding work with the flexibility to enjoy personal and family experiences at every career stage
Volunteer opportunities to give back to your community and help transform the lives of others
Full time
Jersey City
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['research', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'research', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"is:
Business
Analyst with a strong experience in Healthcare domain.
Good
understanding of Healthcare Industry standards, Electronic Data Interchange
(EDI), HIPAA Code Sets, Regulatory changes including ICD9-ICD10
conversions
Knowledge of
Medical Claims Processing, and HIPAA regulations
Job Function
TECHNOLOGY
Role
Business Analyst
Job Id
157864
Desired Skills
Business Analysis
",[None],"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"• 3 years of relevant work experience Assess functional requirements while understanding the business needs customer expectations
• Analyze user interface problems and create on brand design solutions that bridge user and business goals.
• Conduct user experience research to improve existing and new applications
• Work with graphic designers to create aesthetically pleasant and consistent user interface design elements
• Demonstrate the highest level of understanding of current site use cases and functionality
• Assist product development managers web developers and software engineers throughout entire development cycle including implementation & testing
• Strong hands on with latest version of Angular 4 x HTML 5 CSS Node js Build the Tiles and Layout for portals
• Experience working in Financial Banking domain preferred
• Good Communication Interpersonal and Documentation skills
","['node', 'angular']","['research', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['node', 'angular', 'research', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business AnalystLocation: Newark, NJDuration: 2 MonthsDescription:* Must be proficient in Advanced Excel - Pivot, dashboarding, macro writing* Must be able to analytical to help Director understand trends in dataset on a weekly basis* Must have an understanding of databases to help the team build out certain reports from* Must be an effective communicator - will need to help facilitate and take notes in two key meetings weekly.
* Must be a good problem solver.
Resolves issues and improves operational performance on a cross-functional/departmental basis.
This is a senior level position working independently with guidance only in the most complex situations.Responsibilities:* Investigate service related issues to identify root cause of issues; identify and communicate business needs assessments as necessary.
* Develop forecasting tools using current technology/systems (Access, Excel, Monarch, etc.
)* Translate business requirements and assist IT with the development of technical specifications.
* Develop solutions based on data analysis to increase business efficiency.
* Lead or participate in internal and external project workgroup(s) and presentations.
* Conduct User Acceptance Testing (UAT) for projects, implementations, system fixes and enhancements, etc.
* Prepare materials for internal and external audit activities; review audit findings/reports for accuracy and completeness.
If appropriate, formulate rebuttal and/or corrective action steps.
* May coach/mentor less experienced staff, assist in on-boarding of new staff and/or distribute and follow-up on work assignments.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'forecast', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'forecast', 'busi']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
Position Type: Full Time
Job Purpose:
The role will focus on supporting the trading platform, with an immediate assignment to work on the migration of markets to the new technology platform.
The candidate will have an opportunity to evaluate current trading systems’ capabilities, explore the current competitive landscape, analyze and document new functionality and coordinate with internal business, legal and regulatory teams.
Responsibilities:
-Collaborate closely with Senior Business, Development, QA and project management teams, to elicit and document requirements, taking ownership through project lifecycle
-Data querying and analysis to recognize trends, identify outliers and support the decision-making process
-Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs
-Document processes through workflow diagrams and wireframes/mock-ups
-Create trading and operational scenarios to convey requirement complexity
-Analyze test cases to ensure adequate test coverage
-Monitor system deficiencies and collaborate with Development and QA to determine appropriate solutions
-Document client specifications and support the creation of product notices
Knowledge and Experience:
-At least three years of experience in a Business Analyst role in the Financial Services industry with a desired focus on Options and Equities trading
-Strong analytical and communication skills with the ability to interpret customer needs
-Understand basics of the various types of messaging (e.g.
tag/value, binary) and communication protocols (e.g.
Multicast, TCP/IP)
-Understanding in exchange supported order types, allocation methodologies and risk features
-Firm understanding in multi-legged strategies
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'outlier', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'outlier', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"About the role
The role of the Business Analyst is to organize data from different sources, develop KPIs, build dashboards, manage reporting, mine insights for the team, and drive improvements in business and marketing initiatives.
Responsibilities
Mine various large data sets for actionable insights and trends
Leading ad-hoc data and analysis requests
Evaluate media mix and marketing spend, making recommendations to increase sales and improve ROI
Statistical analysis including split testing, forecasting, surveys, cohort analysis, regression, etc.
Assist with data modeling projects such as marketing mix models, pricing optimization, customer segmentation, etc.
Qualifications
2 to 5 years of experience in an analytical role
Knowledge of marketing (both digital and offline) required
Combination of strong interpersonal skills, business sense, and excellent analytical skills
Skilled with SQL, Excel, Google Analytics, and data visualization tools (especially Tableau).
Experience with R or Python preferred
Strong understanding of experimental design and statistics for decision-making.
Ability to work closely with a wide variety of non-analyst stakeholders across departments, and understand how to efficiently meet their needs.
Must be resilient and able to find creative solutions to problems
Interest in the language-learning required.
Multilingualism a plus
Education and background
BS/BA in marketing, business, or a quantitative field preferred
Benefits
Working at an international start-up with a strong sense of mission
Competitive pay and 401K matching
Responsibility from day one; you can make an impact!
Strong skill and career development, frequently working closely with the CEO and other department heads
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['regress', 'data modeling', 'experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'regress', 'data modeling', 'experimental design', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Hello Folk,
*Experience candidate preferred
*USC/GC preferred
• Learn business processes related to the complex accounting application
• Gather business and technical requirements for application modifications and enhancements
• Assist in the testing process through the development of test cases and data
• Document business process and/or program changes
• Works on multiple applications.
• Develops innovative and creative output based on interpretation and analysis.
• Provides design and documentation at an application or function capability level.
• Support Senior BA and Project Manager in meeting team objectives, preparation of project estimates and plans.
Qualifications and Skills
• Excellent Writing and Communication Skills.
• Bachelor’s/Master’s degree in computer science, Information Management, or related field.
Thanks,
Maya
maya@vastekgroup.com
619-503-1822
",['excel'],"['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Education Level : Bachelor's Degree
Experience Level : Level 3
Local to Tristate
USC-GC
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision.
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Technical Business Analyst - Contract Role Role: Part of the squads as a Technical BA for Agile initiatives in Salesforce/CRM space and performs the following functionalities: 1.
Work with business partners/product owners to recommend and influence requirement statement 2.
Decide on the story board, epics and story mapping 3.
Understand the business processes impacted by the request 4.
Lead solution conversations between development and business groups by providing: a. Impacted Teams (see checklist ?
internal and downstream) b.
Current State and Target State workflow diagrams c. Data mappings d. Screenshots/mockupse.Use Cases/Scenarios 5.
Document all necessary details to User Stories required for development team to develop the solution 6.
Monitors that the suggested solution is being followed and identify business, analysis and understanding gaps 7. Review technical tasks added to Jira Stories, and answer questions related to the solution/requirements 8.
Push to ensure that each impacted development team is aware of dependencies and handoffs 9. Review test scripts for gaps - there can be two reviews - one with business and one overall with all stakeholders 10.
Keep an eye out for efforts where end to end testing is required and approach QA lead and SM to orchestrate that and ensure the same set of data is flowing through the test cases.
11.
Evolve into a SME and support the product accordingly
","['jira', 'salesforc']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'salesforc', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"1.
Client Services /new client on-boarding
2.
3.
Capital Market revenue.
Any kind of specialized asset class knowledge is a plus.
This is a dynamic BA/PM role where the resource will be working with the front, middle to back office users to analyze requests and hover between multiple environments.
Basic SQL skills are needed.
",['sql'],[None],1.0,['sql']
BA,"MS Dynamics CRM Admin/Developer and .Net developer with 7+ years of experience.
Proven achievements in effectively collaborating with various technology teams within fast-paced, deadline-driven environments.
Able to comprehend, relate, recommend and transfer business user requirements to technology applications and processes
",[None],"['recommend', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'busi']"
BA,"The post-acute home care industry is booming with continued 10-15% natural growth expected over the next 20 to 30 years.
Business Analyst (BA)
The Business Analyst will work with internal and external stakeholders to gain an understanding of data requirements and operational processes.
This position will collect and measure key metrics in order to evaluate client success and business impact.
Over time the expectation is that the Business Analyst will become a source of knowledge within the business on the relationship between customer data and operations performance.
The work of the Business Analyst will directly support the goals an initiative of the Client Success Managers and leadership team.
Essential Job Functions
Conduct research and analysis as directed by the client-facing team members
Take the lead on ad-hoc analysis requests from the business
Track and measures ongoing client activities to optimize performance
Measure and analyze historical data and report on trends
Analyze and document complex business processes
Dig into large data sets and existing reports to find, document and communicate anomalies
Engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously
Prepare weekly reports in Excel, Word and PowerPoint
Required Skills and Experience
3-5+ years of business analysis experience required
Bachelors degree required; Business analysis certification a plus
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook required
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills required
Strong written and verbal communication skills required
The ability to cooperate and collaborate with cross-functional teams required
Health Care and HIPAA experience preferred
Familiarity with the basics of database structure and logic is preferred
1-3+ years of software experience preferred
1-3+ years of Salesforce experience preferred
Benefits
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"*Perform data analysis.
*Write detailed business requirements.
*Understand and document detailed business requirements and translate business needs into technical systems and process improvement solutions.
*Perform financial data sourcing gap analysis, data analysis and solutioning.
*Develop test plans, cases and scripts for system releases and manage and/or execute functional testing and user acceptance testing.
*Assist with development and implementation of a short-term and long-term IT and process strategy.
*Assist with management of issues / risks on projects with timely issue escalations and suggestions for issues resolution.
*Provide periodic status reports to project leads / managers.
*Conduct detailed process analysis (via user interviews and work observations) and develop process maps and data flow diagrams as needed.
*Conduct training to end users on changed processes and new applications.
*Assist project management team with evaluation of different process and/or technology solutions.
",[None],"['risk', 'end user', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'end user', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title:
Business Analyst
NY
Required Skills:
Business Analyst, Agile, financial
* Financial services must (Bank/Brokerage)
* Agile BA Must
This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team at CLIENT's New York offices.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills:
• Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written
• Self- motivated individual that will dig deep to uncover facts and not rely on assumptions or hearsay
• Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
• Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
• Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
• Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
• Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable
• Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
• Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
• Furthermore, this position will work with the Scrum Master, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
• The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
• The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
• The ideal candidate will be a self-motivated team player committed to delivering on time and should be able to work under minimal supervision
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"You would be welcomed to a friendly, inclusive environment where you can learn, and collaborate with some of the most talented people in the industry.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Lead the implementation of data governance tools and practices.
Develop control structures to ensure the accuracy and quality of data through all upstream and downstream data channels.
Coordinate the resolution of data integrity and collection gaps by working with the game development and data engineering teams.
Provide thought leadership and participate in projects that involve any of the upstream or downstream data flows and processes.
Assess the current processes and technology in use to make recommendations for effective and practical data governance organization, processes, and technology.
Review and enrich the current reporting development methodology / processes and make recommendations on the level of documentation that needs to be performed and metadata that needs to be captured.
Identify and document data quality problems through data profiling and advanced analysis.
Meet with business stakeholders to gather requirements for self-service reporting and analysis.
Translate complex business requirements into focused technical requirements and data solutions.
Project manage the implementation of data governance.
Prioritize projects through broad cost / benefit analysis.
Present plans and post analysis to stakeholders in a concise and easy to understand format.
Tackle complex problems with a strategic mindset and create thoughtful recommendations and action plans for solving those problems.
QUALIFICATIONS
8+ years of professional experience.
5+ years of experience as Business Analyst.
3+ years of experience in Data related projects (Data Governance, Master Data Management, Reporting, etc.).
Hands-on experience in project management, preferably in the following sectors: e-commerce, digital products, digital video, sports, media and entertainment.
Experience with managing third party vendors.
SKILLS
Process improvement mindset - the ability to identify and implement opportunities to improve existing business processes.
Excellent prioritization skills - ability to evaluate and prioritize a wide array of opportunities within a highly dynamic environment.
Excellent communication skills - comfortable communicating to internal product and development teams, as well as written communications for consumer-facing audiences.
Flexibility to adapt to changing business requirements, and ability to power through ambiguity.
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment with a track record of success in leading cross-functional initiatives.
",['excel'],"['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Technical Business/Data Analyst (Multiple openings)
Employment Terms: Fulltime with benefits
You will leverage data to drive operational efficiencies, provide key data driven insights, enable new opportunities and innovate on behalf of business customers.
Responsibilities also include conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design.
They will also monitor performance and develop quality control plans to identify improvements.
Responsibilities
Acquire data from primary or secondary data
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Documenting all project related artifacts like Business Requirement Document, Business Use case document, System Use case document, Project Plan, Quality Assurance test plan, User testing plan, Demand request document, Change request document, End User training document, Business user training document
Organizing daily standup calls with the developers, testers and leads to track status
Generate actionable insights through the development of metrics dashboards and deep dive analyses
Providing customer insights to Product Management as new initiatives are being identified, prioritized, implemented and deployed
Serving as a business metrics guru and insight provider in the organization
Acting as a key interface between business and technical divisions
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Requirement
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or a related field and or equivalent experience
8 years of solid BA/DA experience with excellent business management and technology coordination skills
Should have good knowledge and experience of the software development lifecycle
Prior working experience as a Data Analyst or Business Data Analyst
Technical expertise with data models, database design development and data mining techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages such as Business Objects or equivalent, Relational databases (SQL etc), familiarity or knowledge of programming such XML, JavaScript and ETL frameworks
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
The Group is at the forefront of innovation to address the entire breadth of clients’ opportunities in the evolving world of cloud, digital and platforms.
With Altran, the Group reported 2019 combined revenues of €17billion.
People matter, results count.
They are honesty, boldness, trust, freedom, team spirit, modesty and fun.
Disclaimer
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender identity/expression, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, genetics, veteran status, marital status or any other characteristic protected by law.
Physical, mental, sensory or environmental demands may be referenced in an attempt to communicate the manner in which this position traditionally is performed.
Click the following link for more information on your rights as an Applicant - http://www.capgemini.com/resources/equal-employment-opportunity-is-the-law
","['javascript', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['etl', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['javascript', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'etl', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'statist']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst will support the development of Business Requirements Documents for a product and pricing software tool and establish a Business Analysis Framework that can be utilized for future programs.
Specific responsibilities will include:
Define and agree on a standard template for Business Requirements Documents (BRDs)
Establish a baseline schedule for eliciting and documenting specific requirements
Schedule and conduct SME interviews to gather requirements for the back-office business case
Conduct interview sessions to complete BRDs for all Product and Pricing.
Required Skills:
Strong analytical skills
Strong writing, presentation and communication skills
Ability to impact operations and effect change without being confrontational
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive
Ability to work independently and with others
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills
Experience developing requirements for Software Tools is highly desired
Familiarity with Operations Processes for Product Management and Pricing a big plus
5-7+ years of experience working as a BA and bachelor’s degree
Job Type: Contract
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Key Responsibilities
Regularly monitor relevant listservs and communities.
Define iterations and user stories; own product vision and roadmap, program backlog, and ROI of products/systems.
Provide expert level support (Level 2 & 3) and monitoring on room scheduling and resource management systems.
Directly manage projects related to space management systems and service enhancements.
Maintain a productive working relationship with all space utilization stakeholders including, but not limited to, IT PMO, Enterprise Applications and Emerging Technologies teams, Space Planning, Facilities and Security, Provost Office, Public Programs and Venue Rentals staff.
Build reports, extracts and/or dashboards in Tableau and/or Microsoft Excel to support business analysis, project proposal development, and measuring solution outcomes.
Form, serve on or lead relevant University committees and working groups as required.
Perform other related duties as assigned or requested.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'dashboard', 'busi']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'dashboard', 'busi']"
BA,"Skill, Experience & General information Required:
Should have experience in writing stories in Scrum and Agile environment
Should have exposure to BDD or DDD model
Exposure to the retirement management and asset management services
Excellent analysis and critical reasoning
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Exposure to Mobile and/or UI applications
Exposure to user experience
",['excel'],['commun'],999.0,"['excel', 'commun']"
BA,"* Improve corporate operational and cost efficiency through procedure development, improvement projects, performance/financial benchmarking and best industry practice recommendation.
* Enhance data integrity through continuous software modification or upgrades to ensure streamline data processing and effective procedural implementation.
* Consult with users and discuss with system developers to determine software and/or system functional specifications to ensure system meets business needs.
* Conduct and analyze system program QA/QC testing based on system design specifications to ensure the executions of programs or codes and detect, correct and report the bugs or defects in the systems.
* Document the system design specifications and business analysis flows, and conduct computing system trainings to users.
* Design/Create/Develop Query reports and business intelligence analysis reports.
* Analyze received work requisitions and communicate with users and system analysts to propose improvement/development specifications based on business knowledge and best judgment if it is feasible to apply/modify the existing systems within a reasonable timeframe.
* Analyze system-generated abnormal reports to propose control enhancement mechanism to streamline business processes.
* Develop/revise corporate procedures and related system SOPs to standardize business operations and/or meet regulatory requirements with user trainings.
* Review/propose individual goals and milestones for the assigned departmental annual goals.
* Carry out annual goal items based on the milestones and propose goal review/progress status on a monthly basis.
* Perform business analysis assignments and propose recommendations for top management in the decision making process.
* Assist Internal Audit to propose/revise audit checklist and provide necessary opinions on related audit findings to ensure business/operations are in line with corporate policies and procedures.
* Carry out other duties and responsibilities as assigned by management from time to time.
* Ensure compliance with federal, state and local laws and regulations.Minimum Qualifications:* 4-year college degree required.
* Business/Accounting/MIS/Computer Science related majors and/or advance degree preferred.
* Experience in or competency of project management.
* MS Office software skills* Excellent oral/written communication skills (required in English and preferred in Mandarin)* Computer literacy and proficiency in documentation skills* Ability to work independently in a fast paced environment.
* Must have regular, reliable attendance as well as the ability to work outside the regular schedule as required.
* Demonstrate exceptional teamwork and customer service; behave professionally; treat others with respect and dignity.
* Physical requirements include duties common to a regular office environment.
","['ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Project Overview
This program includes the following projects:
Niagara Apps Upgrade
IB/Integration Bus Upgrade,
Integration Gateway upgrade (DataPower)
SiteCore Cloud Migration
Live Data Servers Upgrade
Content Server Upgrade
Job Functions & Responsibilities
The BA will, at a minimum:
Inventory existing applications requiring upgrades.
Document functional requirements for each application to be upgraded.
Create Business Process flows / Business process documents
Create Technical Requirements documents
Create Requirements Traceability Matrices
Create Test Plans, Scenarios and Scripts.
Execute testing.
Assist team with stakeholder communications
Weekly status reports.
Meeting agendas, materials, and minutes for weekly meetings.
Skills
Extensive experience in developing detailed requirements functional and technical.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, and interpersonal skills.
Excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving abilities.
Experience with Agile and hybrid waterfall project methodologies.
Superior presentation and negotiation skills.
Proven management and organizational skills.
Strong adaptability and capacity to work in fast-paced environments.
Experience with Azure, AWS, DataPower, IBM Integration Bus/Websphere a plus
Experience with DevOps and associated tools (Azure DevOps a plus).
Experience with Project Portfolio Management tools (Innotas/PPM Pro) a plus.
Utilities and Governmental experience is a plus.
Education & Certifications
BS in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field from an accredited school, or equivalent.
IIBA Entry Certificate in Business Analysis (ECBA)
IIBA Certified Business Analysis Professional (CBAP)
IIBA Agile Analysis Certification (AAC)
IQBBA Certified Foundation Level Business Analyst (CFLBA)
IREB Certified Professional for Requirements Engineering (CPRE)
PMI-Professional in Business Analysis (PBA) Certification
Certifications in Agile, DevOps a plus
","['aw', 'azur', 'excel', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['aw', 'azur', 'excel', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The candidate for this position will also be accountable for coordinating aspects of platform development, testing, and deployment.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, sex, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis.
Accommodations are available upon request for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Applicants for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States.
This position does not meet the employment requirements for individuals with F-1 OPT STEM work authorization status.
",[None],['account'],999.0,['account']
BA,"The challenges of affordable healthcare continue to create new opportunities.
These high-quality healthcare plans are designed to help keep people independent and living life on their own terms.
The Data Analyst works collaboratively with the Claims Director in supporting the department to deliver timely and accurate payment of claims.
",[None],"['data', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Expert-Level Business Analyst directs and the preparation and analysis of various IT projects and defines, documents, and validates processes and business rules to identify business and system functional requirements that meet key business objectives.
Additionally, the Expert-Level Business Analyst conducts meetings and any other activities that include Data analytics, mapping and database analysis to elicit, define, document, prioritize, and validate business and system functional requirements.
Creates business and system functional requirement documents, as well as complex reports, studies, survey findings, and other business analysis artifacts.
Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates, using natural language, for medium to enterprise level systems.
Document current and future process flows, as well as business architecture documents using industry standards and various modeling techniques.
Create and implement Requirements Management Plan including identification of stakeholders, decomposition of the project scope into manageable units, identification of requirement attributes for traceability, requirements prioritization & reporting.
Elicit requirements using interviews, customer documents, workshops, surveys, site visits, and business process descriptions, analysis of business rules, scenarios, tasks and workflow analysis, and any other business analysis techniques for both new and existing processes and procedures.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, decompose high-level information into details, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
Serve as the liaison between the customer community (internal and external customers) and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Proactively plan and facilitate the successful implementation of the product, service, or end result of the program or project
Work with project management staff members to raise and resolve issues, set project deadlines, and mitigate project risks.
Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously.
Works independently with users and various stakeholders to define concepts, processes, and requirements and under direction of project managers.
Create functional wireframes and prototype using Axure RP Pro that demonstrate functionality, features, content, and user flow of an application.
Utilize Caliber Author and to track, trace and manage accurate requirements throughout the project lifecycle.
Good understanding of Business, Data and Solution Architectures.
Usage of Progressive API Frameworks and platforms.
Performs data analytics to optimize statistical efficiency and quality of data.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
84 months experience in analytical and product management skills, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into business, functional, application and operational requirements.
84 months experience in Business Requirements elicitation and definition.
84 months experience in Business modeling techniques and standards such as UML
84 months experience in Use Case/User Story development
84 months experience in meeting planning, presentation and facilitation skills.
84 months experience working with project stakeholders to define and develop business processes and procedures
84+ months of experience utilizing either Waterfall or Iterative/Incremental methodologies for Business Requirements management.
Bachelor’s Degree
IIBA CBAP or CAPM Certification (or working towards) preferred.
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The Role: IT Business Analyst Intern for the IT Project Management Office
Work with organizational partners to elicit, articulate, and document requirements that capture organization needs.
Assist in project management processes including creating project plans and status reports, tracking changes and action items, and following up on project-related tasks
Identify, understand, and manage obstacles to achieving business results to ensure mitigation activities are taking place
Research best practices and identify an optimal path forward for new system development and designs including SharePoint and AWS environments
Participate in design reviews and walk throughs to communicate systems designs and validate proposed solutions
Participate in the discussion and decisions regarding project methodology, processes and technology solutions.
Perform other duties as assigned.
What qualifications do you need?
Pursuing an undergraduate or Masters degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, or related field
Minimum 3.0 GPA
Ability to effectively communicate new processes to technical and non-technical stakeholders
Experience with Microsoft Office including Excel, PowerPoint, Word, OneDrive, and SharePoint
Self-starter, analytical thinker with initiative who can manage multiple tasks and adapt and respond quickly to a fast-paced environment
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Strong critical thinking and problem solving skills
IT domain experience including application development, architecture, project management, or quality assurance a plus
The Nitty - Gritty
Salary will be competitive and commensurate with experience.
Why?
Please submit a resume and cover letter.
Online submission in PDF format is preferred.
No phone calls, please.
Only applicants selected for interviews will be contacted.
What this means is that:
Powered by JazzHR
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'aw']","['optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'aw', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"-Assisting with the business case analysis
-Eliciting requirements
-Requirements analysis and organization
-Translating and simplifying requirements
-Creating requirement and design documents, workflow diagrams, mockups
-Requirements management and communication
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"REPORTS TO: Managing Director, Business Intelligence
Organization Overview:
POSITION SUMMARY:
JFNA is looking for a Business Analyst to join a new Business Intelligence team.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Coordinate data collection efforts across JFNA program areas
Design and execute meaningful and user-friendly reports for JFNA and Federation professionals and leadership
Document business processes and key performance indicators (KPIs)
Handle Salesforce customer support requests as they come in: forgotten passwords, process confusion, data upload needs, report/dashboard creation needs, etc.
Run routine and project-based database maintenance
Identify opportunities to extend data collection to support other JFNA program needs
Other duties as assigned
QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor Degree or higher
Comfortable with data, statistical analysis, and quantitative reporting
Strong Excel skills
Strong interpersonal communication skills; excellent oral and written communication skills
Excellent project management and organizational skills with attention to detail and commitment to follow-through
DESIRED SKILLS/EXPERIENCE:
Business Intelligence software such as PowerBI, Tableau
Database design / management, query design
Experience working in an Agile environment
","['tableau', 'excel', 'powerbi', 'salesforc']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'powerbi', 'salesforc', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Additionally, this individual will work with functional leaders on various product performance projects and assisting with other ad-hoc projects.
Responsibilities
Assist with the ongoing analysis of business performance to support daily business operations
Provide analytical support that drives key sales and finance decisions
Design and interpret key performance metrics.
Deliver insights & recommendations
Assist in developing and delivering presentations for senior executives
Analyze competitive intelligence and pricing to improve product performance
Support strategic initiatives
Assist in troubleshooting operational issues as they surface; propose changes to systems/ processes to fix root causes
Prepare analysis and recommendations for strategic decision making
Assist with ad-hoc project management
Skills/Requirements
To be considered for and to perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty and responsibility satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.
Desired Skills/Experience:
3+ years of relevant work experience
Valuable work experience focused on quantitative analysis, Excel, and logical reasoning
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university
Self-starter and a high degree of motivation to go above and beyond the task at hand
Exceptional problem-solving skills: demonstrated ability to structure complex problems, develop solutions
Strong presentation skills, especially related to building compelling PowerPoint presentations
Work experience in consulting, finance, or sales operations is a plus
Experience with Salesforce strongly preferred
Experience with SQL, Tableau, R, Python and/or Business Objects (or similar analytical packages) a plus
Experience with JIRA, Confluence, and Aha!
a plus
Perks
Competitive salary
Excellent medical, dental, and vision insurance
Paid Family Leave
401(k) with match
Health club discounts, including up to a $400 annual fitness reimbursement
Flexible work options and paid Volunteer Day!
In addition to an open, diverse, and inclusive culture built on transparency and continuous improvement, Watermarkers enjoy a competitive benefits packages, including flexible work arrangements, comprehensive medical, dental and vision plans, wellness perks, and more!
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'jira']","['financ', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'jira', 'financ', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Type: 6+ month contract
Analyses will have to be carried out in order to determine areas that need improvement.
It is also important to have strong research skills in order to determine the latest trends and solutions.
When problems are detected, the analyst should carry out problem-solving techniques in order to come up with a solution.
When solutions are implemented, the analyst should continue to monitor these solutions to analyze their efficiency and to make continuous improvements.
Knowledge of SQL is important, in order to be able to analyze data from databases.
The business analyst should be able to carry out analyses, such as cost benefit analyses.
Therefore, strong mathematical skills are essential.
Presentation and report-making skills are important in order to present the findings to upper management.
Many positions require a master’ s degree in information technology or a related field.
Other positions prefer proven experience in IT business analyses over the educational requirements.
Many positions offered are full-time.
",['sql'],"['research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"What will you contribute?
Reporting to the Commercial Lending Product Manager(s) candidate will collaborate with the Development and Product Management teams on product requirements, design, documentation, and risk mitigation strategies.
Participate in business case development, market research, and competitive intelligence analysis.
Develop business requirements and collaborate in the translation of business requirements into technical requirements.
Define system and functional requirements.
Responsibilities & Deliverables:
Your deliverables as a Business Analyst will include, but are not limited to, the following:
Creates recommendations and feature definition to address market opportunities.
Gathers information from stakeholders to document functional, system, and/or data requirements.
Perform product system impact analysis to determine affected functional areas of the application.
Collaborates with team members to create detailed functional and/or technical specifications for complex development of new or modifications to existing applications or systems.
May review requirements developed by other staff and provide guidance to improve requirement quality as necessary.
Collaborates with team members in the development of specifications to create unit and integrated test cases.
Assists in the analysis of results of unit and integration testing.
Provides overall direction for product enhancements and general product development requirements.
Serves as a liaison between internal and external stakeholders
Collaborates with technical communications writer to develop proper and thorough documentation (internal and external) describing product changes as appropriate.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, and distinguish defects from enhancement requests.
May design and implement training plans.
Identifies continuous improvement opportunities for Product Management processes.
May act as a team lead for project work and facilitate meetings, webinars, and focus groups.
Assist in release preparation duties including release notes, bulletins, and/or supporting documentation.
Required Experience:
3-5 years of business analysis or relevant experience.
Financial industry experience required, specifically in the primary and/or secondary syndicated loan space.
Prior use of industry applications FiS/ACBS or AFS preferred.
Proficient with Microsoft Office applications.
Strong technical, analytical, and development skills including the ability to provide solutions to a variety of business problems of complex scope and complexity.
Strong verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills required.
Ability to mentor less experienced analysts.
Advanced facilitation skills to conduct and facilitate focused requirements analysis discussions.
Ability to work independently or within a team environment and handle multiple projects simultaneously.
Demonstrated ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams.
Ability to organize and lead others in accomplishing project goals and objectives.
Knowledge of the Software Development Lifecycle.
Advanced knowledge of defining system and functional requirements.
*************************************************************************************************************
The above statements describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required.
If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability please contact your recruitment partner.
*************************************************************************************************************
",['microsoft'],"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"OVERVIEW: The purpose of the Business Analyst (BA) is to plan, design, develop, test and launch efficient business and operational systems in support of organizational functions and business processes.
The BA will work directly with organizational stakeholders to evaluate process requirements, proactively identify anomalies, document and recommend innovative and efficient solutions.
Additionally, the BA will create and manage project documents including project plans, milestones, risks, scheduling, and change management.
The Business Analyst will generate and compile reports based on findings, complete with probable causes and possible solutions to systems issues and will provide ongoing daily support of all relevant systems, processes and related functional areas.
Specific duties include, but are not limited to, the following:
Assist in the requirement sessions with end users and develops business specifications and project documentation.
Drives application enhancement including analysis, design specifications, implementation and user acceptance focusing on the analysis and design of efficient and innovative workflows.
Coordinate projects and/or changes using a concise, consistent methodology to coordinate activities, schedule resources, track budget and ensure accuracy and completeness in a timely manner.
Maintain, communicate, and champion repeatable methodology including a set of standard principles and procedures for managing projects and change.
Assist in the generation of test plans and data.
Reports gaps in policies, procedures, and operating controls to leadership to ensure member impact and risk is mitigated.
Functions as a business lead and/or a project manager on departmental and/or organization wide projects.
Ensures that the Project Team completes milestones as outlined based on the project scope and business requirements.
Acts as the technical liaison between users, vendors, and IT to ensure technical specifications are captured and delivered.
Assists with vendor management on assigned applications.
Adheres to the goals and standards set forth by the Service Level Agreement (SLA).
Provides support to assigned functional areas and track assigned programs and systems, including troubleshooting of errors and issues as they are identified through resolution
Performs additional duties as required.
Soft skills include, but are not limited to the following:
Fosters diverse, high-performing culture that accomplishes organizational changes, goals and priorities.
Facilitates a team-work oriented environment.
Promotes and maintains a positive work atmosphere by behaving and communicating in a manner consistent with professional standards to get along with members, co-workers, management, and vendors.
Keep abreast of industry developments including but not limited to changes in regulations and technology.
Excellent communicator with the ability to translate data into actionable insights
Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in a related field or the equivalent work related experience.
2+ years of experience in the financial services industry with a thorough knowledge of financial principles, front and back office processing and financial institution regulations.
2+ years Business Analyst experience on projects of small to medium in size and complexity, with demonstrated experience in workflow/process analysis, requirements gathering and documentation, and creation and execution of testing plans.
Experience with core banking processing platforms like Symitar, Spectrum, Servicing Director and Akcelerant are a plus
Experience writing SQL scripts for report writing and data mining is a plus
Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (including: Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Project, SharePoint and Visio and SQL Server)
Highly ethical.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'probabl', 'data mining', 'data', 'end user', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
New York, NY
12 months contract minimum
This position is for a Business Analysis for the FA Platforms Team at the New York offices.
The charter of this team is to provide business analysis support for the FA Platforms to help drive the requirements, execution of the technical redesign and strategy of the platform to meet the goals of the business and delivery/implementation.
Required Skills:
Assertive individual who can push and facilitate requirements discussion with minimum to no level of supervision.
Ability to manage requirements and definition of the overall platform, keeping focus on technical requirements for users to be able to successfully use and navigate through the platform on their day to day activities.
Liaison between Business Users and Technical team in analysis & design
Well defined and structured individual who can document, track and work on Functional, Data requirements seamlessly with minimum supervision
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems
Plans, organizes and conduct walkthrough with Business Units and Technical team for common understanding across teams of requirements and sign off
Provides technical assistance to peers, mentoring where ever applicable?
Exposure to Agile/Scrum is a must.
Basic Financial Services knowledge is sufficient but Technical knowledge is a must (e.g.
Ability to understand system behavior, interaction and dependencies, Data knowledge etc)
Furthermore, this position will work with the ScrumMaster, Product Owners, PMs and business/data analysts in the team and work with other platform teams, driving issue analysis & resolution, educating peers, and drive the project throughout the SDLC process until execution.
The candidate should be flexible, highly adaptable and excellent team player.
The candidate should expect to work in a global virtual team along with NY and India team members, sometimes across multiple time zones.
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Media Domain - Business Analyst
At least 7+ years of
experience as business analysts , Media Domain experience is must
Having knowledge of
TV program schedule and broadcasting is
good to have
To act as a liaison
between the business and technical teams, analyze and document functional
requirements to the assigned project team as per defined business requirements
of the client.
To prepare and / or
aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (2.)
To
maintain the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and
storage.
To participate and
facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to
Business Requirements.
To understand the
business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
To prepare business
requirement documents for automation/enhancement
Experience in setting
up Media retentions & management process
The CoE is supported by the right skills, resources, technologies and methodologies and helps develop customized solutions to better manage the entire product lifecycle.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"What You’ll Do
The role requires strong data analysis and problem-solving skills as well as a creative and inquisitive nature to identify opportunities and address challenges in a professional and confident manner., along with championing new processes and inspiring other improvements.
Responsibilities
• Coordinate with internal cross-functional teams including Procurement, Logistics, Sales, Business Planning, etc.
to support customer requirements
• Perform data analysis to develop recommendations and improvements
• Independently resolve issues, using escalations when appropriate
• Communicate clearly with internal and external stakeholders
• Be flexible to support rapidly changing customer requirements in a positive manner
Requirements
• Basic understanding of operations
• Ownership mentality
• Bias to action
• Clear communicator
• Familiar with data analysis programs and techniques
• Ability to adjust priorities quickly in a fast-changing environment
• Project management experience
Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor’s Degree preferably in Business, Supply Chain Management, or equivalent
• 0-3 years’ work experience (with degree)
",[None],"['data', 'logist', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'logist', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Responsibilites:
-As a Business Analyst, you are to understand and assess business requirement using best practices and modelling techniques
-Your role is to be a functional expert in business processes such as Audit, Tax, Finance, Customer, Supply Chain.
-You will explore, gather, and analyze business variables to understand challenges and develop user stories.
-you manage the user stories in the product backlog and maintain knowledge of IT development processes to deliver a secure and functioning product which brings value to client.
-You collaborate with internal cross-functional team of product management, business owners, Design team, and Technical architects in aligning product backlog to the broader picture.
Requirements:
-Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent quantitative field.
-Strong interpersonal skills and ability to project manage and work with cross-functional teams.
-Preffered SQL knowledge with relational databases, query authoring (SQL) as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases.
-Capable of learning new technology in a fast paced environment.
",['sql'],"['financ', 'busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['sql', 'financ', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst
NYC, NY
Contract
Senior Business Analyst with Instrument Reference data expertise (MUST)
Experience working with Data vendors like - Reuters, Bloomberg etc
Experience working on Products like GoldenSource, Asset Control, Eagle PACE, MarkIT EDM etc would be a plus
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Duties: Analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to automate or improve existing systems and review computer system capabilities, workflow, and scheduling limitations.
Utilize Agile, HP Quality Center, SAP Query Builder, Fircosoft Trust & Continuity, Fircosoft Utilities, SWOT Analysis, Informatica, Tableau, Python, SQL, PL/SQL, Oracle, UML, J2EE, Web 2.0, and ERWIN, among others.
Req: Bachelor's degree or equivalent in related field and adequate experience in the related industry.
Mail resume with proof of work eligibility to: HR Dept, 50 Cragwood Rd.
#132, South Plainfield, NJ 07080.
United States,New Jersey,South Plainfield,07080
Position Type
Full Time
","['tableau', 'oracl', 'sql', 'python']",['analyz'],1.0,"['tableau', 'oracl', 'sql', 'python', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 6-12 Months
Interview: In-Person Preferred
Required Experience:
6+ years of experience in following:
Utilize Business Analysis tools such as JIRA, Balsamiq & MS Visio.
Work and coordinate with Technical teams to document business and functional requirements.
Oversee project deliverables.
Design data model and application prototypes.
",['jira'],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst - Contractor
Domain Required: Commercial and or Retail Lending
Mid Level BA with experience in (in priority order):
Bank Loans,(highest) -CSI and CRE- Consumer- FiserveSignature Core- implementing nCINO Loan Origination Platform which sits on a Salesforce platform-Salesforce Knowledge-
Person should be very well rounded on Loans but not a master-
Roll up their sleeves and collect info from the business for the Loan System implementation.
Able to work independently.
",['salesforc'],['busi'],1.0,"['salesforc', 'busi']"
BA,"Candidates for this role can sit remotely.
You will work as part of a nimble team, contributing to large-scale initiatives that impact product lines and teams across the organization.
You should be comfortable breaking down and solving complex problems.
You should be able to communicate in a clear and concise manner this includes being comfortable engaging with product managers, technical leaders and other key stakeholders to build consensus, define an approach and rationale for prioritization, and communicate project status, findings, and escalations on a regular basis.
Key Tasks Partner with technical leadsproduct managers to groom the backlog Provide guidance and insight for projects impacting the platforms Work with product managers to define the vision and product roadmap Be a part of a scrum software development team Provide oversight and training to system power users REQUIREMENTS B.S.B.A.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],['commun'],1.0,['commun']
BA,"Identifies and documents detailed business requirements, functional requirements and system specifications for internet applications.
Perform analysis and reporting of marketing and operational data.
Essential Job Functions Conducts and/or participates in the analysis of business processes and functional requirements preparing appropriate documentation needed by the development team Develop applications, procedures and reports for marketing data and product performance metrics Support product managers with ad hoc analysis of product and channel performance Design and manage statistical tests of new features, products and distribution channels to guide product management decisions Evaluates external application products that could address business requirements and develop recommendations where appropriate Assists with the design and implementation of training programs for customer support Assists in planning, developing and executing test plans Assists in the development of workflow and process diagrams and gap analysis Performs other duties as assigned Qualifications: 2- 5 years of experience with technical data analysis & reporting, functional design, software development processes, and software testing Strong understanding of relational database structures and concepts Experience with SQL query design, html, scripting, and report writing Highly proficient in Excel, Word, Access and Power Point.
Must be results-oriented and possess an entrepreneurial spirit that thrives in a demanding, fast-paced work environment.
Knowledge of Internet marketing and search engine marketing a plus.
Excellent interpersonal, business communication, and writing skills Excellent thinking, analysis, and decision making skills BA/BS required.
• Present analytic solutions to key decision makers and executive teams.
• Analysis and optimization of online metrics EXPERIENCE & QUALIFICATIONS • Must be results-oriented and possess an entrepreneurial spirit that thrives in a demanding, fast-paced work environment.
• 3-5 years work experience in a business environment in which internal departments and management is heavily reliant on quantitative analysis to draw conclusions.
• Highly proficient in Excel, Word, Access and Power Point.
• Knowledge of Internet marketing and search engine marketing and optimization a plus.
• BA/BS required.
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Volunteer)
*Note: The following is an opportunity for flexible, part-time, volunteer work.
* This is a remote-from-home position.
Are you a person with strong business acumen and exceptional critical thinking that you employ to turn data insights into strategic action?
Are you interested in learning the ins and outs of a nonprofit organization in a challenging and rewarding environment?
Do you constantly ask questions about how to use analytics to improve the business?
Check out WhoWhatWhy.org.
Youll quickly see that were a credible solution to the raging debate over whether the news is fake or not, with agenda-free research and publishing bracingly fresh analysis.
Not left-wing, not right-wing, not consensus-seeking.
(2) Ideologically driven outfits catering to a specific mindset and not daring to reveal things that would upset their readers or force them to reconsider their values.
Yes, were a nonprofit that wasnt funded by a zillionaire.
This position requires a high level of leadership, analysis, relationship management, and multi-tasking.
The analyst will also help to build out an analytics platform and to model critical aspects of the business like creating awareness, acquiring customers, engagement, and retention.
Responsibilities
Develop analytical frameworks and models to optimize performance and process efficiency.
Build and manage reports showing the health of key business metrics across platforms.
Manages end to end analytical projects to conduct analysis, research customer and industry reports to recommend new strategies and then to lead the initiative and monitor its impact.
To build reports in Google Sheets and Microsoft Excel as well as using dashboard technologies to represent data visually.
Collaborate with the editorial staff to help drive media for growth, develop new strategies and communicate results, and provide marketing and editorial with data-driven insights around the types of stories and content that resonate with users
Assist the team with optimization projects related to subscriber engagement, email marketing, website conversion, subscriber retention
Manage projects for core functional areas by preparing and maintaining implementation plans, managing project issues, and ensuring project tasks are completed.
Qualifications
3-5 years of experience in Business Analysis
Proficient with analytical tools and languages supporting data analysis, reporting, and visualization - Excel, Microsoft Office, Google Collaborative Apps (Docs, Sheets, Slides), Tableau, R, Python.
Exceptional communicator across all levels of the organization; able to effectively tell stories with data and present findings to a non-technical audience.
Ability to work with minimum supervision and self-motivated to drive projects to the finish line
Strong organizational and project management experience, including problem-solving skills and the ability to multi-task, handling multiple projects simultaneously.
Demonstrate a collaborative spirit and ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Three years of industry or non-profit experience (media experience preferred)
Perks
Channel your passion in a stimulating environment
Learn the nuts and bolts of nonprofit operations in an up-and-coming organization
Develop new skills and gain valuable experience that can enhance your professional trajectory
Do amazing work on a flexible, part-time basis
Have fun while you make a difference
Your work will be seen!
Expectations
(Though doing more is not discouraged!)
If you possess a high level of self-motivation, work well independently but also have strong collaboration skills and enjoy the opportunity to partner with like-minded individuals, and can commit quality time per week on a regular basis to help achieve team goals, wed like to hear from you.
If there is no option to attach a cover letter, please send a cover letter to hr@whowhatwhy.org.
You should confirm your understanding that this is, initially, a volunteer position.
Thanks!
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
Retail/e-Comm experience is a must.
IT Business Analysts are responsible for enhancing the quality of IT products and services, analyzing data to inform business decisions and finding technological solutions to business needs, among other duties.
The best IT Business Analysts have exceptional interpersonal skills as they need to act as a communication link between the IT and Executive branches.
IT Business Analyst Responsibilities:
Liaising between the IT department and the Executive branch.
Acting as an information source and communicator between business branches.
Understanding strategic business needs and plans for growth.
Enhancing the quality of IT products and services.
Analyzing the design of technical systems and business models.
Utilizing IT data for business insights.
Analyzing business needs.
Sourcing and implementing new business technology.
Finding technological solutions to business requirements.
Producing reports on application development and implementation.
Running A/B tests and analyzing data.
Analyzing data to inform business decisions.
IT Business Analyst Requirements:
Degree in Computer Engineering, Business Administration or related field.
3+ years in an IT management position.
5+ years in a technology-driven role.
Excellent problem-solving skills.
Analytical mindset.
Exceptional interpersonal skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Attention to detail.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Ref ID: 02944-0011470720Classification: Business Analyst
Compensation: $30.40 to $35.20 hourly
Does this sound like you?
• Admin high risk low touch activities for this role • Working knowledge of various parts of Corporate Actions including: Merger, Dividend, Proxy, P&I, coupon payments, • Not speaking directly to clients • Mainly mandatory corporate actions • Tender offer (voluntary) vs. Merger (mandatory) • Proxy season receive votes from clients, clients will go into portal and submit votes for meeting, • Training: Will be around 2-3 weeks of cross training with person going on Maternity leave.
All qualified candidates are encouraged to submit their resumes to Jonathan.Li@RobertHalfFS.com
Job Requirements:
2+ years of Corporate Actions experience
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
© 2020 Accountemps.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
NrKGUIdi69
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"PERMANENT FULL TIME JOB
NO THIRD PARTY RESUMES
NO H-1 SPONSORSHIPS
Agile BAs (Manager / Senior Consultant Level)
Domains;
Risk, Finance, Legal & Compliance, Operations (i.e.
Shared Services generally)
Ideally;
Worked in both waterfall (BRD, FRD) model and also Agile (Epics, Feature, User stories, story maps etc.)
Worked in a test driven development (TDD) environment or behavior driven development (BDD) environment
Experience of direct management of junior product managers/analysts/BAs
Required;
Experienced in Agile practices from either a product management or tech analyst perspective (Epics, Feature, User stories, story maps etc.)
Experienced in either working with product owners and other end-user stakeholders in extracting requirements and prioritizing into Epics
Familiar with building MVPs and Roadmaps
Experienced with working with scrum leaders on the backlog grooming and sprint prioritization processes
Experienced with either building test cases are written that enable UAT testing of user-stories if not in a TDD/BDD world
Experience of standard SDLC tools; Jira, Confluence, Sharepoint etc
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Experience:
Agile Business analyst: 7 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
New York, NY 10016 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Multiple locations
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",['jira'],"['risk', 'financ', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'financ', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst for Non-Profit Organization
My client, a leading non-profit organization located in Downtown Manhattan is seeking a Business Analyst to join the newly created team.
This individual will be a key player in developing processes, providing recommendations and contributing to improvements in the new department.
Responsibilities of the Business Analyst:
Quality checks of data, raising concerns to management as needed
Design reports for leadership
Serve as point of contact for Salesforce requests
Document processes and KPIs
Ensure data cleanliness
Experience Preferred for the Business Analyst:
Experience with software such as Tableau, Salesforce, PowerBI, SQL a plus
Experience with database design
Non-profit industry experience a plus
If you or someone you know is interested in this role, please reach out directly to Ashley DeSimone adesimone@cfstaffing.com
Id: EB-4965706348
","['tableau', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'kpi']",999.0,"['tableau', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'kpi']"
BA,"Understand the business process areas assigned and become a subject matter expert in the day to day operations and activities of those areas of responsibility
Utilize business analysis skills to develop, recommend, and lead new processes and procedure
Build and leverage relationships with internal business partners and external partners to deliver technology solutions
Responsible for the capturing of business requirements for modules assigned
Responsible for assisting the client in developing the use case for the initiative
Responsible for the fit-gap and design of initiative assigned, which describe the functional design of the system, its business rules, reports, interfaces, enhancements, workflows and gap analysis
Responsible for the system design and configuration of the applications in area of responsibility
Responsible for the development of use cases, testing scenarios, and mock-ups/prototypes for initiatives assigned
Create and update key documents as determined by the lead for assigned initiatives
Provides quality assurance, testing and updates to test plans and script documents as needed
Responsible for the successful and timely completion of assigned tasks
Provide insights and recommendations from analysis and speak to impacts on the business
Identify and resolve problems in a timely manner, gather and analyze information, develop alternative solutions, and work well in individual and group problem solving situations
Be a subject matter expert on area of expertise including best practices and technology trends
Partner with client and colleagues and develop strategic focus regarding the applications within their specific functional area
",[None],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Analyses will have to be carried out in order to determine areas that need improvement.
When problems are detected, the analyst should carry out problem-solving techniques in order to come up with a solution.
Requirements Knowledge of SQL is important, in order to be able to analyze data from databases.
The business analyst should be able to carry out analyses, such as cost benefit analyses.
Therefore, strong mathematical skills are essential.
Presentation and report-making skills are important in order to present the findings to upper management.
",['sql'],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Ability to create business requirements, specifications and other documents in support of projects.
(BRD & FRD).
Comfortable with a fast-moving environment and Quick learner with excellent business communication skills.
Stakeholder Management
Experience in Finance technologies, Agile and Waterfall methodology
Experience with Writing User Stories, Jiras, Maintaining Product Backlog & Sprint Planning
Data analysis and problem solving skills, logical and analytical skills
Strong knowledge of Capital Markets Finance domain.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to operate across multiple projects
Ability to quickly digest new information and learn new businesses and processes
Self-motivated with a strong sense of ownership and accountability for tasks
Ability to multi-task and work in a fast pace environment
An ideal candidate will demonstrate excitement for technology and business.
S/he will also be able to handle competing demands on time and manage his/her work to deadlines.
Flexibility in outlook is essential.
A lot interaction with business users and global development teams in different time-zones is involved.
Domain: (this is must)
- Project: Backoffice Accounting Project - Migration of Mutual Fund Revenue Billing tool to Client Revport tool
- Domain Knowhow Required : Understanding of Mutual funds & other Capital Market products.
Accounting/GL Implementation experience will be a big plus .
Minimum qualifications
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, or Business Administration
","['excel', 'jira']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"• The Business Analyst is to ensure all business requirements have been documented and approved by the Business and IT Stakeholders and Sponsors.
• The Business Solutions Analyst will interview business, document requirements, prepare use cases and facilitate the User Acceptance Testing.
• Consultant will assist with business KPIs, methods of reporting to reflect results and will assist with technological enhancements that will meet those KPIs.
• Consultant will interface with all levels of management, project team both internally and externally including all associated vendors.
Some of the major responsibilities will be under the direction of the Project Manager will conduct the following activities.
• Interview local managers and call-handling associates.
• Transcribe the current processes including lead managers' reporting processes and metrics.
Include a traceability and create use cases, test scripts and facilitate the User Acceptance Testing for business acceptance of the entire platform.
• Request for Statement of Work
• Understand and contribute as a project team member with regards to the contact center Cisco solution including IVR call flows, speech recognition, voice and screen recording, workforce management, screen pops, softphone and reporting.
• Support IT and staff readiness to provide the appropriate end-user training.
• Serves as liaison with vendors and IT regarding go-live requirements.
• Develop policies and procedures for go-live implementation
That's the power of true partnership.
Job Requirements:
",[None],"['busi', 'kpi']",999.0,"['busi', 'kpi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Tasks the role will be performing:
• Co-ordinate Testing of application
• Develop test cases and acceptance criteria
• Coordinate QA testing and acceptance between QA staff, developers, and stakeholders.
• Implement information technology quality assurance standards.
• Develop business and technical requirements
• Identify user stories and translate them into technical requirements as required
• Develop user stories and break down requirements into deliverable functionality.
• Review the requirements with the stakeholders for their approval.
• Provide Management Reporting and Information dissemination
• Analyze and document current systems and processes as currently implemented.
• Make recommendations for improvements based on client feedback.
• Work directly with business stakeholders, clients, designers, developers, and engineers to coordinate the building of applications to spec and
Requirements for the position:
Minimum 8 Years Experience in Business Analysis tools such as JIRA, Balasamiq and MS Visio
Minimum 8 Years Experience working and coordinating with the Technical teams in understanding the requirements
Minimum 8 Years Experience in overseeing project deliverables
Minimum 8 Years Experience in designing the Data model and application Prototypes
Date First Created: 04/21/2019
Powered by JazzHR
oHmEahiT2v
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"This Analyst will support the team in all things communication-related, take responsibility for reporting and analytics, and create actionable insights for the division.
A successful candidate in this role will be a self-starter and have excellent communication and analytical skills both quantitatively with data and qualitatively drawing insights and conclusions from their work.
As a Senior Business Analyst you will:
Support strategy formulation, financial decision-making, preparation of board materials, and business development activities by providing presentation materials and actionable analysis based on data
Craft Executive presentations, talking points and briefing memos for senior internal and external engagements in partnership with cross-functional teams
Partner across all business lines and functions, including finance and sales management, to draw insights from monthly forecasting and sales performance
Manage critical KPIs and build performance dashboards to help drive operational decisions with numbers and analysis
Manage and execute a communication plan for the senior leadership team aimed at increasing transparency and alignment across a 6,000+ division
Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in Economics, Business, and/or Finance preferred
History of mastering PowerPoint and Excel and large data sets; experience with Salesforce and PowerBI or similar BI tools is a plus
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills with ability to lead and influence internal stakeholders
Effective at working with multiple stakeholders, self-directed, proactive, strong business sense, and accountable to meeting deadlines
Unmatched attention to detail and the ability to manage multiple workstreams without sacrificing quality
-----------------------------------------------
Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are considered on a case-by-case basis.
This contact information (email and phone) is intended for application assistance and accommodation requests only.
Resumes are only accepted through the online application process, and only qualified candidates will receive consideration and follow-up.
For information please click on the following links:
Right to Work
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Pay Transparency Statement
-----------------------------------------------
Current Colleagues
","['excel', 'salesforc', 'bi', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'powerbi', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst will partner across the organization to create/refine business requirements/ user stories, and define functional specifications.
This role will proactively contribute to process refinements and reengineering and to continuous productivity gains that impact digital technology team and the areas beyond.
This role will often be called upon to support projects in one or more technology streams at any given time.
They must be self- managed and meet agreed targets and objectives.
Document ‘as is’ and ‘to be’ processes and functional requirements document (FRD), including data flows, business rules and use cases.
this role will be able to make recommendations on functional best practices, process reengineering, usability decisions within context of the project they are working on.
This role will act as a bridge between business capabilities asks and technical implementations of these asks.
As such, this role will be regarded as an expert on topics of scale, functional complexity, scope etc.
regarding such implementations.
Strong stakeholder communication skills
Exp Level: 6 – 10 Years
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title : Business AnalystLocation : Ridgefield Park, NJ
Duration: 8+ Months Contract (6/15/2020 2/28/2021)
Note:
Must be able to speak Korean/English bilingual, 5+ years related experience
Business Analyst will gather and document business requirements, configuration designs, test plans and results, and other deliverables required to implement solutions.
Works closely with technology infrastructure, business software applications, and business operational partners to create scalable and efficient process automations.
Responsibilities
• Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
• Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
• Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
• Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
• Performing requirements analysis.
• Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
• Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
• Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
• Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
• Providing leadership, training, coaching, and guidance to junior staff.
• Allocating resources and maintaining cost efficiency.
• Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
• Performing user acceptance testing.
• Managing projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
• Updating, implementing and maintaining procedures.
• Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
• Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
• Managing competing resources and priorities.
• Monitoring deliverables and ensuring timely completion of projects.
Job Requirements:
Job Title : Business Analyst
Duration: 8+ Months Contract (6/15/2020 2/28/2021)
Note:
Must be able to speak Korean/English bilingual, 5+ years related experience.
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",999.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"8-10+ Years of experience in BA PM Alternative Investments Capital Markets background Strong analysis skills with experience analyzing data from various sources Good Project Management skills Should be able to query data from Database and analyze middot It is preferred if candidate can read technical code (just reading is enough for analysis purpose
",[None],['data'],1.0,['data']
BA,"Technology
Business Analyst from Insurance Domain or Retirement Domain
Harrison, NJ, USA
Responsibilities
Carry out independent and extensive requirement analysis for retirement insurance product by linking various existing design documentation.
Link different business components or designs and derive comprehensive business understanding for high quality designs.
Understand various SDLC models with knowledge & exposure in the functional areas of underwriting, policy administration and
Should be proficient in all phases of requirements management (including gathering, analyzing, detailing and tracking requirements)
Requirements
7+ years of business analysis experience, preferably in retirement Insurance with 2+ years.
Should have working experience with:
Retirement industry knowledge focusing on Defined Contribution Plans including 401k, 403b and other plan types
Understanding of Retirement Plan Process Flows and Administration
Recordkeeping Software, Plan Documents, Plan Provisioning including Eligibility, Auto Enroll, Contributions, Loans, Withdrawals
Certification from any recognized insurance institute is preferable - ALMI / FLMI - Preferred
Experienced with Agile SCRUM methodology and business analysis methodologies – Preferred
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Candidates for this role can sit remotely.
Summary:
You will work as part of a nimble team, contributing to large-scale initiatives that impact product lines and teams across the organization.
You should be comfortable breaking down and solving complex problems.
You should be able to communicate in a clear and concise manner; this includes being comfortable engaging with product managers, technical leaders and other key stakeholders to build consensus, define an approach and rationale for prioritization, and communicate project status, findings, and escalations on a regular basis.
Key Tasks:
Partner with technical leads/product managers to groom the backlog
Provide guidance and insight for projects impacting the platforms
Work with product managers to define the vision and product roadmap
Be a part of a scrum software development team
Provide oversight and training to system power users
REQUIREMENTS:
B.S./B.A.
with 2 years of experience in building a product backlog for a software development team
Well versed in using Jira to manage a backlog and Confluence to document product and project information
Demonstrates agile and lean mindset to drive feature development incrementally
Strong technical background, either from academic, engineering, or hands-on product development experience
Proven experience in eliciting requirements, performing gap analyses, creating user stories, test cases, and wireframes
Experienced in analyzing data to draw business-relevant conclusions and in data visualization techniques and tools
Ability to document system design, create specifications, flow charts, and other related diagrams based on needs
Ability to lead by influencing others, without the need to project formal authority, especially in cross-functional and executive settings
Well versed in defining roadmaps and collaborating with teams that employ agile/scrum software development methodologies
Strong consensus and relationship-building skills
Ability to craft clear, compelling recommendations supported by strong analysis and business logic, and articulate them to the organization to gain support for recommendations
Experience in working with multiple vendors and offshore teams
Strong understanding of the software development lifecycle
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",['jira'],"['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This position offers full time benefits and longevity for talented associates who can work on a W2 without sponsorship.
This position is for a Business Analyst permanent position in Parsippany, NJ.
Be prepared to make an immediate impact, join a collaborative, fast-paced, cross-functional team, and gain exposure to strategic decision-makers!
Role Summary:
Seeking a Business Analyst (BA) to partner with business departments to gather business requirements, define & document business processes, participate in system design and support all phases of software development.
Ability to work well in a dynamic environment, think creatively, work independently, and handle multiple tasks simultaneously.
Job Objectives:
Works closely with department managers and users to define and analyze business and operational problems, process improvement opportunities and requirements
Evaluates methods of improving efficiency and cost-effectiveness of business, technical, and operational processes
Organizes and leads team meetings as required, publishes minutes, action items and issues
Quickly evolves into the Subject Matter Expert (SME) understands and grasps both the technical and functional aspects of large Projects
May assist in developing training materials, handouts, and desktop procedures
Maintains up-to-date technical knowledge by attending education workshops, reviewing product releases, attending vendor user conferences and training
Work closely with department managers and Project Management Office to plan, launch and deploy timely deliverables based on roadmap
Organize and manage application features and backlog to meet deadlines based on overall strategic vision and roadmap
Core Competencies
Business Process Analysis – Defining, assessing, and improving operations processes and workflow
Attention to Detail – focusing on the details of work content, work steps and final work products
Innovation – Imagining and devising new and better ways of doing things
Tools – Highly proficient in MS Office products, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio, Project, etc.
Self-Management – showing personal organization, self-discipline, and dependability
Analyzing & Interpreting Data – drawing meaning and conclusions from quantitative or qualitative data
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree and/or equivalent experience required
2-5 years of progressively responsible experience in professional business systems analysis
3-5 years implementing and/or supporting mid to large scale ERP software (Workforce Management, Financials, Human Capital Management), SaaS preferred
2-5 years working on an Agile project team in a fast-paced software implementation environment
Strong organizational, planning and time management skills
Strong problem solving, critical thinking and conflict resolutions skills
Strong English communication skills, both written and oral
Ability to work efficiently with peers, end users, and 3rd party vendors
Up to 25% travel
Ability to work off hours as required
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'erp', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'erp', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Share
Job ID: FA-0100-532
Open Since: 2019-11-22
City: Union
State: New Jersey
Country: United States of America
Job Skills:
Experience as a Business Analyst (8+ years)
Experience in agile methodologies, tools, standards, and procedures
Experience writing user stories
Ability to write and execute basic SQL queries
Ability to create prototype screens and process flows
Ability to gather and interpret relevant data and information
Ability to understand processes/problems and the ability to share that understanding with developers and/or designers
Ability to analyze and document complex business processes
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group of executives, managers and subject matter experts.
Fluent in Microsoft Office suite
Ability to multi-task
Excellent time management skills
Ability to facilitate meetings with Business stakeholders
Process modeling, data modeling, JAD, RAD
Creativity with an eye to developing new and innovative solutions
Minimum Experience: 7 Yrs
Functional Area:
iSeries DB2 Data analysis experience
Strong experience with Web-based applications
Retail Application & Business Knowledge/ JDA
Major supply chain package experience
Roles & Responsibilities:
As a Business Analyst, you will possess a combination of application development and implementation skills as well as strong analysis and design skills.
Client will utilize these skills as part of a team responsible for the development and/or implementation of enterprise-wide supply-chain & custom retail solutions.
During the project life cycle, you will be responsible for partnering with users, staff, contract developers and QA analysts to ensure the successful delivery of critical projects.
As a key contributor to the team you must have experience in the following:
• Collecting and analyzing the project’s business requirements by coordinating interviews, requirement workshops, business, and workflow analysis.
• Preparing accurate and detailed requirement specification documents, user interface guides, and functional specification documents.
• Documenting the acquired results of analysis and workflows as well as obtaining sign-off from the appropriate business units.
• Ability to communicate effectively with external business partners and internal teams to deliver the requirements of the project.
• Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously.
• Strong knowledge of retail processes; including Supply Chain.
• The candidate will be involved in iSeries & Web Applications both desktop & mobile
Experience in JAD is a plus as well as experience in data and process modeling.
Education:
Bachelor of Science in Computer Science or related field.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"experience.
This role will study existing system capabilities and work to add and design new ones.
Will develop workflow diagrams, data flow diagrams, traceability matrix and system specifications.
Will understand system input, processing and output requirements.
Must also be strong in recommending system controls and overall requirements collection to final deployment.
The successful candidate will work with an existing feature team of highly technical engineers to extend the functionality and performance of companyrsquos sophisticated trading system that manages significant amounts of firms trading flow.
MAIN ACCOUNTABILITIES Study, Design, and implement cutting edge market connectivity system Sitting alongside algo developers and traders to communicate varying needs Ensure order management is consistent with best execution practices Continuously work with colleagues and business leaders to advance each otherrsquos skills REQUIRED SKILLS Experience with Client and Market Connectivity products Knowledge of investment management operations and trading execution solutions Familiar with application development software and hardware platforms.
Ability to understand business(es) supported and itsrsquo terminology.
Ability to coordinate between Applications and business units.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Preferred Qualifications Bachelor degree in computer scienceinformation technology or information systems Strong financial background related to capital markets, payment systems and trust accounting.
Subject matter expert in business with knowledge or experience utilizing applicationsystem being supported.
Mastered understanding of applications supported with an advanced knowledge of interfacingintegrated applications.
Python scripting experience (or equivalent) FIX Binary Connectivity Protocol Proficiency in network protocols such as TCP multicast Please send resume to marisolmdmsrecruiting.com
","['excel', 'python']","['data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'python', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'hardwar']"
BA,"The Data/Information Mgt Int Anlst is a developing professional role.
Deals with most problems independently and has some latitude to solve complex problems.
Integrates in-depth specialty area knowledge with a solid understanding of industry standards and practices.
Good understanding of how the team and area integrate with others in accomplishing the objectives of the sub function/ job family.
Applies analytical thinking and knowledge of data analysis tools and methodologies.
Requires attention to detail when making judgments and recommendations based on the analysis of factual information.
Typically deals with variable issues with potentially broader business impact.
Applies professional judgment when interpreting data and results.
Breaks down information in a systematic and communicable manner.
Developed communication and diplomacy skills are required in order to exchange potentially complex/sensitive information.
Moderate but direct impact through close contact with the businesses' core activities.
Quality and timeliness of service provided will affect the effectiveness of own team and other closely related teams.
Qualifications: 2-5 years relevant experience Ability to think strategically and the ability to engage resources outside of their direct control to achieve objectives Know-how on analytic tools (SAS E-miner, Knowledge Seeker, SPSS etc.)
Big data and machine learning experiences are (R, Python etc.)
Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['spss', 'r', 'sa', 'python', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This position will be responsible for understanding and documenting user needs so that an appropriate system can be developed to meet those needs.
This will be accomplished by identifying user problems with the existing system and opportunities for reengineering.
Qualified candidates will possess a Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related discipline and five years' experience as a Systems/Business Analyst.
Experience should include solid background in user problem identification, problem assessment, development of alternative solutions, cost/benefit analyses of alternative solutions and working with programmers during the design, development and implementation phases of the project to ensure that user needs are being satisfied.
Outstanding verbal and written communication skills, proven problem solving ability and excellent negotiating skills are essential.
Experience in preparation of project plans a must.
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Purpose/Summary:
Axiom developer/BA needed for Y15 and BAU shortage of resources
Key Responsibilities:
· Design and develop Regulatory solutions on AxiomSL ControllerView framework
· Working closely with BAs and Axiom developers to create and maintain sustainable regulatory reporting solutions within Controller View
· Reviewing and optimizing existing code within a BAU setting
· Working within Agile development methodologies to consistently deliver quality code in a timely manner
· Supporting testers and business users through code promotions and post-implementation
· Helping to refine and reinforce good development standards in day to day work
· Reviewing business requirements pre-development and working with BAs to ensure that specifications are able to be understood and implemented
· Perform code reviews
· Write design document and technical specifications
· Identify, track, monitor and communicate possible problems, scope changes, variations and contingencies where needed
Required Experience/Background/Skills:
· SQL knowledge required
· Experience with Oracle/SQL/Autosys/Axiom Scripting Language are beneficial
· Strong verbal and written communication skills essential to properly understanding and resolving needs
· Teamwork and interpersonal skills are a must
· Excellent analytical skills
· Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or a related field
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst / Consultant
As a Salesforce Consultant you will leverage your business and technical skills to uncover pain points within the client's current technology and processes.
This is the ideal position for someone with experience as a Salesforce Admin, Business Analyst, or Salesforce Consultant looking for a role working on a full-scale Salesforce implementation from start to finish.
*This project could be delayed due to market uncertainty.
If interested in other roles, please join the Talent Network for consideration: https://www.pinkuspartners.com/salesforce-talent-network/
Facilitate requirements development sessions in order to gain an understanding of the customer’s current state.
Present implementation needs and options confidently to technical teams as well as a C-Level audience.
Strong attention to detail is required.
Elevate the client experience as a knowledgeable liaison between technical teams, testing teams, and business stakeholders during the implementation phase.
Lead discovery workshops which may include large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations
Execute rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Perform business process modeling, user experience modeling, and basic technical architecture diagramming.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities)
Requirements:
Strong attention to detail
5+ years of experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Salesforce Admin Certification Required, additional certifications preferred
You have a strong understanding of Salesforce functionality and can clearly communicate its capabilities and limitations to customers.
Ability to build and demonstrate prototypes in Salesforce.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
You have experience with Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Community Cloud functionality.
You are a highly motivated individual with a desire to learn and contribute.
You have strong presentation and communication skills.
Hands on experience working with companies implementing Salesforce.com functionality in some of the following areas is preferred:
System Implementation & Adoption
Salesforce.com Service Cloud
Salesforce.com Community Cloud
Salesforce.com Sales Cloud
Experience with data migration tools is a plus.
Quickly scale your business with experienced and pre-vetted Salesforce Talent.
Job Type: Contract
License:
Salesforce (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Analyses will have to be carried out in order to determine areas that need improvement.
It is also important to have strong research skills in order to determine the latest trends and solutions.
When problems are detected, the analyst should carry out problem-solving techniques in order to come up with a solution.
When solutions are implemented, the analyst should continue to monitor these solutions to analyze their efficiency and to make continuous improvements.
Knowledge of SQL is important, in order to be able to analyze data from databases.
The business analyst should be able to carry out analyses, such as cost benefit analyses.
Therefore, strong mathematical skills are essential.
Presentation and report-making skills are important in order to present the findings to upper management.
Prefer a master’s degree in information technology or a related field.
Prefer proven experience in IT business analyses over the educational requirements.
",['sql'],"['research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'research', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Full time - NYC - No Visas or C2C
They currently own over 80 companies and are growing.
They are offering shared services to all of their portfolio companies, such as Finance, Human Resources, IT, Procurement, Project Management and Legal.
In this role, you will be responsible for bringing IT system solutions to life.
Responsibilities:
Effectively partner with stakeholders in order to elicit, analyze, validate requirements for changes to business processes, policies and information systems
Document and drive end-to-end business and functional requirements by working with functional unit leaders, with a special focus on post-merger systems integration (as additional companies are purchased).
Identify opportunities where IT solutions can drive business and technical improvements, e.g.
via automation.
Perform basic system configuration, set-up; collaborate with technical team and external partners for customizations and advanced configuration changes
Develop UAT test scripts, perform user acceptance testing and document results in test protocols
Provide technical support and training to both in-house and remote users.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Business Administration or related field required
A minimum of 5 years’ experience as an IT Business Analyst, including Systems Administration experience
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with ability to interact with all levels within an organization in both technical and non-technical terms
Excellent MS Office skills across PowerPoint, Excel and Word
Ability to work with a team collaboratively and within deadlines
Strong experience with HRIS related information systems such as Workday
Additional enterprise business application platforms (ERP, CRM, Office 365, SharePoint Online, Data warehouse, Business Intelligence/Visualization Reporting tools, etc.)
desired
Familiarity with agile implementation and software development methodologies and tools a plus.
Experience with all stages of business analysis and IT implementation lifecycles
Some project management experience desired
Strong customer service and relationship management focus
Self-motivated, proactive, independent and responsive; requires little supervisory attention
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'erp', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'erp', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Technical Business analyst
Contract
Part of the squads as a Technical BA for Agile initiatives in Account Approval transformation space and performs the following functionalities
Work with business partners/product owners to recommend and influence requirement statement
Decide on the story board, epics and story mapping
Understand the business processes impacted by the request
Lead solution conversations between development and business groups by providing
Impacted Teams (see checklist ?
internal and downstream)
Current State and Target State workflow diagrams
Data mappings
Screenshots/mockups
Use Cases/Scenarios
Document all necessary details to User Stories required for development team to develop the solution
Monitors that the suggested solution is being followed and identify business, analysis and understanding gaps
Review technical tasks added to Jira Stories, and answer questions related to the solution/requirements
Push to ensure that each impacted development team is aware of dependencies and handoffs
Review test scripts for gaps ?
there can be two reviews ?
one with business and one overall with all stakeholders
Keep an eye out for efforts where end to end testing is required and approach QA lead and SM to orchestrate that and ensure the same set of data is flowing through the test cases.
Evolve into a SME and support the product accordingly
Have a good understanding of technical platforms
Strong communication skills
",['jira'],"['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['jira', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Responsibilities.
-Manage the data collection and reporting of information related to IT development capacity, work assignments, timesheets, reporting and planning of capacity into the future.
Ensure that revenue is being collected for all client-specific work.
0Support the CTO, VP of Development and VP of Infrastructure in the development, documentation and communication of the annual IT budget.
Track expenses and variances to budget and work to stay on budget and scope.
- Participate in the annual and quarterly planning process to ensure headcount and budget considerations are properly and thoroughly represented.
-Assist in the management of budgets and expenditures for non-personnel costs.
-This includes assisting in the management and negotiation of significant vendors and outsourcing contracts.
",[None],"['commun', 'data']",999.0,"['commun', 'data']"
BA,"The Team:
The role requires effective management of both short term, tactical solutions as well as longer term, multi-quarter strategic initiatives.
A successful candidate will be a proficient PM/BA who communicates and collaborates effectively, taking ownership and accountability for all aspects of each project assigned to them.
They will manage requests throughout their life-cycle from business analysis, to prioritization, to collaboration with technical counterparts, through to delivery and business acceptance.
The ability to work across a wide range of stakeholders; business and technical, internal and external is central to the role.
Responsibilities:
Reporting to the PM/BA Lead, the PM/BA will evaluate current tactical issues, lead small/mid-size initiatives, and contribute to enterprise-wide strategic initiatives.
Work with front and back office stakeholders across the organization to design and deliver comprehensive reference data solutions across a wide range of asset classes, geographies, and instrument types.
Assist in management front/middle office requests to development teams to ensure concepts are properly evaluated, implemented, and risk assessed.
Evaluate systems for opportunities to automate with focus on highest return on investment.
Help design and implement metrics for tracking product and operational health.
Manage tracks within larger strategic initiatives.
Work with stakeholders within the organization to refine and improve knowledge and processes.
Design and implement processes that facilitate the use and administration of reference data.
Required Skills
5 or more years of professional experience in financial services, particularly reference data or technology
Extensive product knowledge across a broad array of financial products and Instruments
Experience supporting data integration, data governance, data life cycle management, data quality, and data strategy
Strong analytical, quantitative skills
Project Management and Business Analysis experience
Experience in developing metrics (Tableau preferred)
Python, SQL, or similar for data analysis and tool building (preferred)
Education: BA/BS Bachelor’s Degree (STEM degree preferred)
","['tableau', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Temp-to-Perm opportunity.
Interested candidates, please email a copy of your resume along with salary expectations to Darton Wendell; dwendell@genuent.com.
No C2C.
Responsibilities:
Prepare data using VBA and Macro
Understand MS SQL Server and DB structure to maintain
Create/Run queries on SQL DBs based on business needs
Create output with Excel/SRSS/BI Tools (Qlik)
Gather or receive business requirements to start programming
Understand the concepts of BI & Data Analytics tools
Requirements:
3+ years of experience in a similar Data focused Analytical role, 5+ years preferred
Bachelor’s Degree preferred
Experience gathering requirements & writing technical specifications
Data visualization experience
3+ years of experience with SQL & VBA
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'bi', 'qlik', 'db']","['busi', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'qlik', 'db', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"Job Title: Technical Business Analyst
Type: Contarct
Duration: Long Term Contract
Primary Skills: Part of the squads as a Technical BA for Agile initiatives in Account Approval transformation space.
Performs the following functionalities:
· Work with business partners/product owners to recommend and influence requirement statement
· SQL experience Must
· Decide on the story board, epics and story mapping
· Understand the business processes impacted by the request
· Lead solution conversations between development and business groups by providing
o Impacted Teams (see checklist ?
internal and downstream)
o Current State and Target State workflow diagrams
o Data mappings
o Screenshots/mockups
o Use Cases/Scenarios
· Document all necessary details to User Stories required for development team to develop the solution
· Monitors that the suggested solution is being followed and identify business, analysis and understanding gaps
· Review technical tasks added to Jira Stories, and answer questions related to the solution/requirements
· Push to ensure that each impacted development team is aware of dependencies and handoffs
· Review test scripts for gaps ?
there can be two reviews ?
one with business and one overall with all stakeholders
· Keep an eye out for efforts where end to end testing is required and approach QA lead and SM to orchestrate that and ensure the same set of data is flowing through the test cases.
· Evolve into a SME and support the product accordingly
· Have a good understanding of technical platforms
· Strong communication skills
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
","['jira', 'sql']","['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['jira', 'sql', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"IBA: Independent Business Analyst
Compensation: You can potentially earn between $40,000 to $60,000 Annually (Base+Commission+Residual)
Employment Type Full-Time
Why Work Here?
“one of the developing companies in Entrepreneur 360 magazine”
§ Daily bonuses & Weekly comissions
§ Monthly Residual Income up to 50% profit sharing
§ Opportunities for career advancement
§ Comprehensive ongoing sales training
§ H1-B Sponsorship for qualified candidates
§ Office space with full support
§ Unlimited paid marketing materials
Responsibilities
§ Receive and work warm leads from interested clients
§ Selling and installing payment processing solutions to small and midsize businesses with varying financial needs.
§ Achievement of established performance expectations.
§ In order to present introductions to 1-3 people in a time
Desired Qualifications
§ Strong negotiation and influence skills
§ Direct-sourcing and prospecting new client experience
§ Patient, dare to challenge, can bear certain pressure
§ Intermediate Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, and Outlook) skills
§ Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills
§ Ability to interact with all levels of an organization
§ Strong presentation skills
§ Fluent in English and prefer other languages (E.g.
Mandarin, Spanish, Korean, Hindi, etc.)
§ Fluent in English and prefer other languages (E.g.
Mandarin, Spanish, Korean, Hindi, etc.)
https://gofirmus.com
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"·    Design scalable and highly-available system components for enterprise workloads on Azure Cloud platform
·       Migrating enterprise workloads to Azure public cloud from On-Premises and other public clouds
·       Perform Azure cloud administration, infrastructure provisioning and end to end Project Management
·       Configure various azure services such as Azure Active Directory (AAD), Domain Services, Azure Security Center, Authentication, Multi Factor Authentication (MFA), Data Privacy, Key Management (Azure Key Vault)
·       Create Json scripts for Azure Resource Manager (Infrastructure as Code) templates for automated resource deployment
·       Implement functionality in Java, JavaScript, Web Technologies (ReactJs), develop corresponding unit test cases and scripts to automate deployment in cloud virtual machines (VMs)
·       Manage Identity and access management (IAM) and configure role-based access (RBAC) for the Engineering, Business and Support teams
·       Business Continuity Planning (BCP) and Disaster Recovery (DR) for hybrid cloud and fully cloud environments
·       Perform discovery and assessment of VMWare machines in On-Premises, public cloud workloads using Azure Server Migrate Tool
·       Prepare the VMs for migration, conduct multiple runs of test migration and performing the production run
·       Deploy standalone web applications using Azure App Service
·       Conceptualize and implement solutions based on Azure Serverless (Event Grids, Functions) to streamline master data and incremental loads
·       Configure metric dashboards and alerts for monitoring, optimizing workloads and deployments
·      Define scope and secure projects with excellent RFP & SOW design and Sales Lifecycle Management skills
·       Application maintenance & support, Change Requests (CRs) and responding to outages during off-hour software deployments in line with established Service Level Agreements (SLAs)
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $95,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
www.incipientcorp.com
https://www.facebook.com/IncipientCorp
Work Remotely:
No
","['java', 'excel', 'azur', 'javascript', 'cloud']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['java', 'excel', 'azur', 'javascript', 'cloud', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job #: 1076505
If interested in discussing the position further, please send an MS Word version of your resume to Jill Petillo, jpetillo@apexsystems.com.
Here are the details:
Position: Business Analyst
Rate: Negotiable
Duration: 1 year contract with potential to convert to permanent employment
Day-to-Day Responsibilities:
The primary responsibilities will include: eliciting business requirements from business users and subject matter experts, define and document requirements, write functional specifications, and perform business process design in conjunction with operations teams.
Lead requirements validation and traceability analysis, manage scope and requirements throughout the project lifecycle, Lead development of common standards and tools, Assist in operational rollout and support, and Translates business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization.
Fully document all requirements and solutions.
Liaise with internal and external technology partners.
Work closely with administration, technology, and operations partners.
Participate in releases, perform system integration testing.
Perform/organize user acceptance testing.
Prepare project status reports for Senior Management.
Use strong communication skills, both verbal and written, with particular emphasis on the production of clear and detailed written Business Requirements and Functional Specifications.
Requires ability to work independently (self-motivated) and with a distributed team (i.e., physically located in other regions).
Must build and maintain strong relationships with business and technology partners; Understand and analyze business processes & workflows.
Must Haves:
Requires understanding of the Structured Finance business and an interest to further develop this knowledge.
10-15 years of relevant work experience required
Nice to Haves:
An ideal candidate will have domain knowledge in FX Risk Management and/or dealing with legal documentation and its impact across the organization
Selling Points for Candidates:
Large bank, ability to get foot in the door for capital markets
Potential to convert to permanent employment
EEO Employer
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Performs analysis of business goals, objectives, and needs of the business.
Review business project and service requests and plans, documents requirements, and designs business processes.
Makes recommendations for changes and improvements to support business systems and activities, and leads the initiatives to implement.
Provides project management functions for multiple projects/requests throughout the project life cycle, including, authoring various projects related documents, managing communications and business relationships, and assists with validation through the testing phase.
BA Serves as the liaison between the business and technology teams.
SPECIFIC DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Leads efforts with business partners and technical teams to perform analysis, define requirements, and present innovative solutions that solve business problems, or that meet business project and service request needs.
Partners with IS management and business teams to define project direction, create project plans, and leads project meetings with technical, business and project management staff.
Leads key project activities.
Drives project efforts and facilitates project related meetings.
Gathers and translates business requirements and works with technical staff to translate tactical business requirements in to functional requirements, thus driving technical improvements, enhancements, and/or creation of new applications.
Communicates project direction and scope, and negotiates with teams to work through constraints and alternatives.
Negotiates and manages project scope, progress, and client expectations.
Follows the project life cycle process including writing Business Requirements documents (BRD)
Communicates project updates as necessary to management, business, and technology teams.
Keeps current with all available technical options, development procedures and innovative solutions for key business initiatives.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Any Graduate, Post Graduate, MBA, Engineering
Good Interpersonal and Negotiation Skills
Good Analytical Skill
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"OVERVIEW:
Do you love wearing multiple hats and impacting technical projects while working cross-functionally?
ABOUT YOU:
This will require a hands-on analyst who can bridge the gap between local market requirements and global service offerings.
ABOUT THE TEAM:
YOUR IMPACT:
Your primary responsibilities as a Business Analyst will be:
Work closely with key stakeholders including Business Partners, business sponsors, product owners, development and support teams, and other parties involved in the successful scoping, development, testing, delivery, implementation and on-boarding for the systems and applications
Elicit and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, user stories task and workflow analysis
Have primary responsibility for backlog management, maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for an agile project
Provide the primary point of coordination between local market delivery teams and global delivery teams
Coordinate and oversee stakeholder engagement activities, ensuring continued alignment with local and global strategies
Work with local markets to define, structure and deliver against a phased program of work based on a generic plan which is tailored to individual markets
Ensure a continued focus on successful delivery and providing genuine business value and benefits (i.e., business benefits rather than just technical delivery)
YOUR QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other STEM-related majors with demonstrable IT skills
Minimum 4-5 years of professional experience in a Business Analyst role, with strong planning, problem solving and decision-making skills as well as business case development/benefits realization experience
Experience with enterprise BI tools such as Tableau, Power BI, etc
Solid understanding of Agile and traditional business analysis methods; proven experience of working with an agile backlog, creating and maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for upcoming sprints
Experience with managing full SDLC cross-functionally, including business process modelling, scenarios, user stories, use cases, acceptance criteria, etc.
Strong knowledge on relational databases and ability to understand and craft entity relationship diagrams
Experience with writing moderately complex SQL queries for data analysis and understanding how data integration and interfaces between multiple systems work
Comfortable working closely with software development teams - both onshore and offshore and managing stakeholders cross-functionally as well as end users, product owners, etc to ensure successful delivery and business adoption of new technology
A proactive ""can do"" attitude and a willingness to be ""hands on"" when required
DESIRABLE:
Well versed in data warehousing concepts/issues and knowledge of data modelling, both dimensional and relationship
Experienced working within the media industry
Familiar with business change / transformation management training and experience
Have some experience with .NET, SQL, Visual Studio Online (VSTS/TFS), Teams, SharePoint, and Visio
A good understanding of technology trends and movements
WPP is the world leader in marketing communications services.
Virtual Office Tour: https://roundme.com/tour/368027
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'tf']","['data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'tf', 'data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"This is a 6 month + contract position.
Seeking a Business Analyst II
Lookers Internal Instance of Looker requires ongoing maintenance and upkeep.
Responsibilities:
Execute Analytics Reporting Requests Using LookML
Code Review LookML of other members of the team.
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree required
3 Years of experience in Data Modeling with LookML and SQL
Specific Tools or Applications experience: Looker, Salesforce CRM, Financial Analytics
Desired:
LookML -- Advanced (3-5)
SQL -- Advanced (3-5)
Data Analysis - Advanced (3-5yr)
","['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['data modeling', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'data modeling', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Mid-Level BA for NYC
Business Analyst #1539 8-19-19
Address: 4 Irving Place New York, NY 10003
Positions: 1
Duration: > 12 Months
Rate: 35-47 max
F2F interview must.
GC/USC
Assignment Details:
<u>
The candidate will join the mapping applications support team.
As part of their role, they will be working on multiple projects including a Windows Server upgrade and the rollout of Geographic Information System (GIS) project.
Some the responsibilities within the project include maintaining the project timelines and collaborating with IT teams to perform analysis on the status of each task.
The candidate will review and update the business process for all mapping applications and potentially identifying ongoing opportunities for enhancements and optimization.
The candidate will help with application support including documenting of any support issues that are encountered, and will be required to have a technical background to help with the support of the mapping applications.
They should coordinate the resolution of the issue and help the application support team to perform root cause analysis of the issue.
The Business Analyst will create and provide metrics on the applications on a regular basis including trending and variance-based reports on the mapping applications.
</ul>
Skills & Requirements:
Candidate has to be local to NY region in order to be considered for an interview.
<u>
Business Analyst with a technical background, has solid analytical skills.
At least 3 yearsâ experience as a Business Analyst
Minimum one-year experience with CAD & GIS/Mapping applications support.
Coordinates project team activities.
Familiarity with application support processes.
Experience of Enterprise IT infrastructure & architecture.
Reporting on project and application metrics.
Experience in writing and reviewing technical documents.
Experience using Microsoft Project, SharePoint and Visio.
</ul>
The following are not required for this position but would be considered as a valuable asset in a potential candidate:
Minimum one-year experience with CAD Mapping applications
Experience with web/JS API from Google, Bing, etc.
Basic understanding of electric and gas operating models in Utility companies.
",['microsoft'],"['optim', 'busi', 'gi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'optim', 'busi', 'gi']"
BA,"The Senior Project Manager/Business Analyst will operate within the Product Management team as the liaison between the business and IT development to support various systems that facilitate the organization's key operations.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"**Responsibilities** Reporting to the Head of the Information Technology Group, the BA is part of the ITG team.
This position entails creating trade and application flow diagrams, data analysis in SQL or MS Excel and writing requirement documents.
- Ability to own a business problem and provide solutions timely and accurately.
- Projects assigned could be on an enterprise level, Front to Back and may also be required to work with third-parties.
- Maintains a project dashboard for senior management status reporting.
**Qualifications** - Learn current trade flow, able to spot limitations and provide a straight thru solution.
- Gather requirements from Front Office businesses and provide solutions.
- Creates trade/system flow and ppt presentations.
- 4+ years of experience \#LI-CG1 **Job Locations** _US-NY-New York | US-NY-White Plains_ **Posting Date** _1 month ago_ _(6/9/2020 4:08 PM)_ **_Career Category_** _Data Analytics_ **_Position ID_** _2019 - 0671_ **_Corporate Title_** _Associate_ **_Type_** _Fulltime-Regular_ _SMBC is an EO employer - M/F/Veteran/Disability_
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Resolves issues and improves operational performance on a cross-functional/departmental basis.
This is a senior level position working independently with guidance only in the most complex situations.
Provide weekly and monthly group reporting for internally billed CDH groups
Process check stops, reissues requests received for prior CDH platform
Identify/deposit provider refunds from paid HRA claims
Manage and create CDH/Cross Accumulation Purchase Orders (PO’s)
Prepare month end accrual for pending invoices
Support Finance Area with month end account reconciliations
Maintain relationship with CDH vendor to provide quality customer service
Monitor and track AR recoveries from CDH Vendor
Education:
Bachelor's degree required.
Knowledge:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or status as an individual with a disability and any other protected class as required by federal, state or local law.
",[None],"['financ', 'account']",1.0,"['financ', 'account']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst/ Data analyst - Data Mining
*** can provide a superior foundation for building a professional career - a place for people to learn, to achieve and grow.
Technology
***'s sizeable investment in technology results in quantitative trading systems, cutting-edge modelling and simulation software, comprehensive risk and security systems, and robust client-relationship capabilities, plus the worldwide infrastructure that forms the backbone of these systems and tools.
Team Profile (Data Center of Excellence)
The Data Center of Excellence department is recruiting for an enthusiastic and delivery focused business and process transformation analyst who will partner with other technology and business departments to develop and execute on a business process transformation strategy to streamlines front to back business processes and data architectures.
The team vision is a multi-year effort to simplify firms data architecture and business processes front-to-back with goals of reducing infrastructure and Client costs, improving the ability to demonstrate control for data, empowering developers by providing consistent means of handling data and providing a platform to implement future change initiatives faster, cheaper and easier.
Responsibilities
Lead the evaluation, design, implementation, and management of innovative emerging digital technologies like Process Mining, Task Mining, Business Process Management & Optimization, Robotic Process Automation and beyond
Perform business process analysis using process mining tools to create process maps, identify process variants & bottlenecks, and come up with meaningful insights about process
Create data models, customer-specific dashboards and analysis to enable data-driven process impact assessment and recommendations for process optimization through use of enterprise modeling capabilities including but not limited to Process Mining
Leverage strong technical focus and demonstrable experience of architecting technology solutions along with deep business knowledge to realize tangible business benefits through adopting the data strategy and architecture principles
Lead Value Stream Mapping, Business Process Improvement & value creation workshops with stakeholders to understand current state business processes, business needs & challenges and translate them into process mining and transformation plans
Create metrics & KPIs to measure and monitor current process performance as well as ongoing improvements
Build business cases and ROI calculations, leveraging industry benchmarks and best practices
Requirements
6+ years of relevant experience developing applications/solutions for a global financial services institution
2+ years of extensive experience in designing and implementing large scale process transformation and automation solutions using one or more of the following methodologies Process Mining, Task Mining, Robotics Process Automation, Process Mapping
Experience in working with Business and Technology departments to develop and execute on a data strategy, design data architecture to solve data quality issues, eliminate data redundancy and streamline front to back data flows
Demonstrable experience in utilizing strong business and technology skills to solve data-centric business problems
Hands-on experience with SQL across different databases like Sybase, DB2, MS SQL Server
Experience with Agile Software Development Lifecycle methodology and related tooling.
For example -JIRA, Scrum, Kanban, Product backlog management, BDD using tools like JBehave or Cucumber etc.
Strong problem solving skills, business acumen, and demonstrated excellent oral and written communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences.
Skilled in customer and leadership presentations
Project and Program management experience
Desired Skills:
1+ years of Process Mining or Engineering experience using Celonis
2+ years of BI, Data Management and Data Mining experience
3+ years of hands-on working experience with varied and complex data sets, building ETL (extract transform load) processes using scripting language like Python
Experience working with various front-to-back groups like Sales and Trading, Quants, Operations, Finance, Treasury, Settlements, Documentation/Confirmations, Market Risk, Credit Risk, Liquidity Risk, Collateral and Margins; and understanding of data-centric issues that these groups face and possible solutions
Understanding and experience with BPMN to model As-Is and To-Be business processes
Demonstrated knowledge and skills in enterprise data management, data governance, data quality principles & methodologies
Experience with data-centric tools and technologies around Data Lineage, Dictionaries, common data access APIs, golden source identification / master data management, ontology/taxonomy development, Data DevOps, Metadata management
Understanding of and experience with Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing
Experience with curating, organizing and classifying the data with appropriate concept models and developing taxonomies and/or ontologies in RDF/OWL or other formal knowledge representation systems
//
EEO Employer
Minorities/ Females/ Disabled/ Veterans/ Gender Identity/ Sexual Orient
//*
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'python', 'jira']","['risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'natural language processing', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'python', 'jira', 'risk', 'data mining', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'nlp', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Business Analyst has broad-based responsibilities for the functional design, specification and deployment of Finance Systems initiatives at both a Legal Entity and IHC level.
This includes:
Elicit, analyse, and document user requirements and business processes.
Undertake data assessment, data gap analysis and remediation.
Develop functional specification requirements for IT development and to ensure user requirements are met.
Perform System Testing to ensure development is in line with functional specification.
Plan and manage User Acceptance Testing and migration testing up to successful delivery of end product.
Manage issues and escalate effectively.
Participate in project planning and cost estimates.
Ensure on-time quality delivery of projects and activities assigned.
Report on and monitor status of Finance COO team projects on a regular basis (weekly) as to inform all stakeholders of ongoing program status.
Liaise with cross-functional teams (business groups, IT and PMO organizations) in New York, New Jersey, California, Montreal, Mumbai, London and Paris.
Rotate on the functional production support of key finance systems.
",[None],"['financ', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"IMPORTANT NOTICE: In order to be considered for this position, you MUST attach your resume.
Shareholder Engagement | Governance Advisory | Sustainability | Strategic Investor Relations | Say on Pay | ""Vote No"" | Environmental, Social and Governance Shareholder Proposals | Activism Defense | Hostile and Complex M&A | Defense Preparedness
Responsibilities:
Key aspects of the role include, but are not limited to:
Maintain and enhance existing management reporting (weekly, monthly and quarterly reporting)
Develop various internal and external analyses, including market, competitive and industry
Assist with the design, project management and performance of various operational and technology projects
Qualifications:
In addition to excellent analytical and presentation skills, the successful candidate should have strong judgement, discretion, work ethic and communication skills, and possess the following:
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Economics, Finance, or other related field
Approximately 2 to 4 years of relevant work experience
Familiarity with financial analysis and reporting
Strong qualitative and quantitative analytical skills
Strong written, verbal and communication skills with the demonstrated ability to work with multiple stakeholders
Comfort handling highly confidential information
High level of competency in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, sexual orientation, national origin or any other category protected by law.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'econom']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'econom']"
BA,"Enterprise Support Business Analyst
New York
Refer someone
The Enterprise Support Projects team is responsible for governance of the Risk Management Group-wide project portfolio and delivery of key risk projects.
In this role, you will join an experienced team and focus on the delivery of strategic business process improvements, technology enhancement initiatives and drive change and innovation.
You’ll have the opportunity to identify and document improvements to processes and assess solution options whilst developing recommendations with associated business cases.
Other responsibilities include developing target operating models and proposing detailed designs and delivery of solutions that ensure requirements are met and benefits are realized, whilst identifying, communicating and managing risks to solution delivery.
This role requires a bachelor’s degree and 5-8 years of relevant experience in consulting or the financial services sector.
Understanding and having the ability to communicate complex concepts, whilst demonstrating strong analytical skills, combined with the ability to view the bigger picture, are all imperative for this position.
Its divisions include Credit, Prudential, Capital and Markets, Market Risk, Operational Risk, Compliance, Quantitative Applications and Internal Audit.
For more information, please visit www.macquarie.com/careers
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, marital status, gender identity or any other impermissible criterion or circumstance.
*GD #LI-AMERICAS
",[None],"['risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The ideal candidate will efficiently and quickly understand and communicate client requirements for successful project delivery.
They should speak in English.
Responsibilities
· Analyze an organization and understand what makes it tick
· Provide expertise in the area of business case development
· Facilitate workshops and sessions that generate the content for solutions and gain buy in for solution
· Create and articulate the ""big picture"" of the solution to delivery and client teams to understand cross functional inter-dependencies and impact
· Define key objectives and 'to-be"" state, identify success factors, and comprehend constraints, challenges and risks
· Educate and championing the processes and practices of the Agile methodology
· Orchestrate the collaboration between, Product Owner, Business Sponsors, SMEs, Testers and Development groups by removing roadblocks and facilitating communication
· Become a trusted and valued partner of the Product Owner, client's business stakeholders and client executives
· Be an inspiration for innovation to the client.
· Create and support sales activities
· Maintaining strong expertise and knowledge of current and emerging technologies and products
Qualifications
· A broad enterprise-wide view and understanding of business processes and drivers having significant work experience at a senior level within large medium size business corporations
· Development experience or project management experience is required
· Experience prioritizing competing demands and obtaining buy-in from stakeholders
· Ideally experienced working as part of a consulting organization
· Demonstrated ability to manage and resolve conflict with stakeholders
· Experience modeling business processes using a variety of tools and techniques
· Strong facilitation experience
· Demonstrated ability to understand and explain issues from both a technical and a business functional point of view
· An understanding of traditional development approaches, and the ability to compare and contrast benefits of each
· 1+ year Java development experience would be preferred.
",['java'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['java', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Please note this is for W2 pay only.
3rd party candidates are not accepted at this time.
Please send resumes to Aleta at Aletaforbestc.com.
Requirements and Responsibilities NOTE This person will be bringing Agile experience to this team as a value-add.
Required Skills Minimum of 3 year Financial Services industry experience.
Preferred This should be in support of financial trading or account management applications Minimum of 4 to 5 years as a Business Analyst.
Required Wealth Management Highly Preferred.
Financial trading experience is also preferred.
Some experience in Project Management would be highly beneficial.
Responsibilities Experience with various Business Analysis Methodologies including different agile disciplines.
Experience with Agile methodology should include writing user stories, managing scrum calls, prioritizing backlog, etc.
Proven ability to meet deadlines while simultaneously working multiple projects bull Estimates time required to deliver project artifacts and reports progress toward delivery goals throughout the project bull Leads key stakeholder analysis process bull Interacts with project stakeholders to elicit and document project requirements by translating business needs into testable, developer-ready requirements bull Produces professional quality project artifacts including but not limited to business requirement documents, requirement plans, models (e.g.
data, event, context and process), traceability matrices, use cases, issue logs and other documents as needed.
",[None],"['account', 'busi']",999.0,"['account', 'busi']"
BA,"This candidate will be focused on daily CAT reporting monitoring and error correction process.
Ideal candidate will have experience with transactional analysis.
Prior experience with reporting regulations such as Trade Reporting, OATS or CAT preferred.
Responsibilities:
Perform daily monitoring of CAT regulatory reporting and perform necessary repairs
Complete user acceptance testing, error tracking, escalation and resolution management
Ability to collaborate with developers or outside vendors to ensure the technical work is aligned with business/functional requirements
Conduct periodic testing and data verification for various business units to ensure compliance with regulatory requirements
Monitor changes to the CAT technical specs
Understanding of transaction reporting regulations, in particular OATS and CAT
Qualifications:
Familiarity with broker-dealer order and trade management systems
Knowledge of transaction reporting regulations, in particular OATS and CAT, a plus
Excellent communicator and team player with strong attention to detail and analytical thinking
Confidence to interact with traders and counter party contacts
Strong capabilities for using MS Office tools such as Excel, Word.
MS Access a plus
Requirements:
Bachelors degree
1-3 years' experience in a supervision/compliance role within the financial services industry
","['ms office', 'excel']","['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Minimum 4 years of Experience working with planning, process analysis, and problem-solving.
Minimum 3 years of Experience working with Microsoft dynamics.
Minimum 4 years of experience working with Microsoft Office products such as MS Project, MS Access, Visio, PowerPoint, Excel, and Word.
Minimum 4 years of experience in software engineering and information technology.
Minimum 4 years of Experience in Microsoft SQL Server databases, SQL Reporting tools
Minimum 4 years of Experience working with Microsoft TFS, TFS Release Manager and Cognos
Minimum 3 years of Experience in TFS Test Manager, QA testing, Test Plan and Test Cases.
Minimum 4 years of Experience in Software Development Life cycle – Agile methodology.
","['cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'tf']",['information technology'],999.0,"['cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'tf', 'information technology']"
BA,"This candidate will be focused on daily CAT reporting monitoring and error correction process.
Ideal candidate will have experience with transactional analysis.
Prior experience with reporting regulations such as Trade Reporting, OATS or CAT preferred.
Responsibilities:
Perform daily monitoring of CAT regulatory reporting and perform necessary repairs
Complete user acceptance testing, error tracking, escalation and resolution management
Ability to collaborate with developers or outside vendors to ensure the technical work is aligned with business/functional requirements
Conduct periodic testing and data verification for various business units to ensure compliance with regulatory requirements
Monitor changes to the CAT technical specs
Understanding of transaction reporting regulations, in particular OATS and CAT
Qualifications:
Familiarity with broker-dealer order and trade management systems
Knowledge of transaction reporting regulations, in particular OATS and CAT, a plus
Excellent communicator and team player with strong attention to detail and analytical thinking
Confidence to interact with traders and counter party contacts
Strong capabilities for using MS Office tools such as Excel, Word.
MS Access a plus
Requirements:
Bachelors degree
1-3 years' experience in a supervision/compliance role within the financial services industry
","['ms office', 'excel']","['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you a Salesforce Business Analyst searching for a new opportunity?
This position stands on a permanent full-time basis.
Responsibilities:
Technical Support
*Manage ongoing Tier 1 technical support requests, this includes managing and maintaining a caseload.
*Provide updates on all cases via case comments on a daily basis as well as Identify problem areas and provide recommendations for future enhancements.
*Properly escalate cases to supervisor documenting requirements gathered and provided solution(s)
*Create training materials and documentation for internal SalesForce users
*Support Tier 1 by assisting users in reports creation and modification, this includes troubleshooting for report cases as well as assisting with reports and dashboard conversion from Classic to new SF Lightning instance.
Business Needs Analysis and Development
*Document new development required by organization, confer with Senior SalesForce Administrator and consultants to plan/execute changes
*Work with functional leads to transform and develop new requirements into SalesForce design and implementation.
Research and disseminate SalesForce best practices that help drive user adoption and success.
*Facilitate and support technical meetings and design reviews, including meeting planning and follow-up,
Qualifications:
*0+ years of business analyst experience
*Experience defining requirements and writing functional documentation
*Salesforce experience
*Knowledge of data management
*Fluent with Excel (macros, pivot tables, charts)
*Excellent communication
Preferred
*SalesForce certifications
*Project Management
*Technical Support experience
Job ID: 179939
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
The companys merchandise mix and assortments are constantly evolving as merchants and planners focus on what customers want to buy and respond by delivering great discounts on a wider variety of name brand merchandise.
A career that fits you
Teamwork
Amazing culture and people
Customer focus
Are you ready for the next big move in your career?
The culture demands hands-on, close engagement at all levels, and the ability to think and act strategically.
Within this culture, there are many opportunities to attain and even exceed personal goals quickly while partnering with professionals across multiple categories.
This creates a win-win culture with a rigorous standard of performance for everyone.
Structured for growth and profitability, individuals are measured on performance rather than process.
What this yields is an environment that is invigorating and offers a clear, compelling reward system for the team.
Additional information is available at:
www.rossstores.com
www.ddsdiscounts.com
About this job:
The Senior Business Analyst will identify key opportunities for improvements and contribute to critical operational/process improvements or projects.
This role will support the MDO vision to be the central point of contact for all master data needs within a certain data domain (i.e.
vendor/supplier or product hierarchy).
They will ensure that all requests are prioritized, addressed and resolved in a timely manner.
The Senior Business Analyst may represent the team in meetings with executives or key business partners.
They will be able to independently work, managing deliverables and expectations.
Responsibilities:
Point of Contact for Business
As point of contact for multiple business departments across the organization, the Senior Business Analyst will be playing an important role to support multiple business units address regular requests, and troubleshoot issues
Analyze data to troubleshoot or provide data insights and business visibility
Ability to partner with cross functional teams
Documentation
Ensure that existing governance and process documents are up to date based on changes in requirements or business needs
Develop foundational domain specific operational processes and reporting structures related to Master Data Management
Request Management
Manage work flow and requests in a Master Data Management Tool.
Execute on all (change) requests from business effectively to ensure that they are implemented according to set data governance standards and processes
Process improvement/Projects
Identify and provide solutions on ways to service the business better
Play a role on enterprise-wide initiatives involving Master Data across the organization
Develop and manage business cases to deliver tangible business value
Develop/leverage frameworks or models to design new solutions or approaches
Compliance and Adoption
Promote adoption of data governance processes by establishing clear understanding (e.g.
conducting periodic refresher workshops), and improving the MDO governance processes based on ever changing needs of the business and other partners.
Provide Manager with solutions or best practices
Verify all Master Data Management processes around data governance are followed
Play an integral role in escalating requests that do not comply with the governance set by MDM
Build deep content knowledge around how the business end-users use this foundational data to run the business
Mentorship
Work and partner with Business Analyst on complex challenges as they arise
Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree with a concentration in Business, Economics, Finance or Computer Science, or an equivalent diploma
5 years of experience as a Business Analyst, (preferably in Retail or in an IT field), with strong process, data, and systems understanding
Prior Data Governance and Administration experience or exposure preferred
Thorough knowledge of business process documentation that includes prior experience with documenting Merchandising, IT or Finance workflows, processes and requirements
Ability to work with both business (non-technical) and IT (technical) with ability to communicate/translate requirements easily and effectively between all parties
Strong understanding of productivity suite software (i.e.
Microsoft Office)
Strong analytical skills
Ability to follow established practices, policies and procedures
Strong communication skills
Ability to build working relationships and bring about cooperation from leadership and working teams
Ability to adjust with changing work environments, priorities and goals
Job requires ability to work in an office environment, primarily on a computer.
Requires sitting, standing, walking, hearing, talking on the telephone, attending in-person meetings, typing, and working with paper/files, etc.
Consistent timeliness and regular attendance
Vision requirements: Ability to see information in print and/or electronically
#LI-AS4
'216725
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will play a key role to implement changes and improvements to key HR processes and services that will enable business performance.
The focus will be on workforce administration and compensation.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Utilize BABOK to gain an understanding of departmental business needs, processes, and data sources.
Translate business needs into technical requirements and/or user stories
Plan elicitation tasks and activities as well as create elicitation timelines
Manage the requirements gathering phase of the software development life cycle (SDLC) and produce relevant artifacts;
Develop supporting analysis including data dictionaries and use cases or acceptance criteria
Review and assess the adequacy of Call Handling requirements and review city infrastructure
Engage with public safety and stakeholder agencies to understand their needs, issues, concerns and potential barriers to migration
Determine the level of effort to procure, plan, design, and implement a NG 911 system
Incorporate applicable federal, state and professional organizations’ standards and guidelines for a NG 911 system
Basic Qualifications:
12+ years of experience in a particular technical and/or business application, product, platform, methodology
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Preferred Qualifications:
Deep Subject Matter Expertise in the APCO international Next Generation (NG) 911 standards
Deep Subject Matter Expertise NG911 Call Handling and processing application routing
Deep architectural understanding of NG911 contact center software
Deep Subject Matter Expertise in GIS Selective router integration for 911 call aggregation
Deep knowledge in OSP connections and terminations
Active professional memberships
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'gi', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'data', 'gi', 'busi']"
BA,"3-5 year experience in high pressure working environment within a financial institute.
Ability to successfully deliver complexcritical projects in challenging environments.
Experience in AgileScrum Management and Agile Tools.
Good communication skills and collaborate effectively across diverseglobal teams.
Knowledge of Python is helpful Knowledge of SQL, Python is helpful Technical experience dealing with software teams Experience with Product Python exp preferred Ability to Project Manage, understand issues and drive direction.
","['sql', 'python']",['commun'],999.0,"['sql', 'python', 'commun']"
BA,"New York, NY
The Global Markets Operations Technology group is seeking a business analyst who will be responsible for helping drive forward a multi-year program to renovate the existing operations technology platforms.
As part of an agile cross functional team, the candidate will be working closely with developers (UI and server side).
The successful candidate will interact closely with front-office and operations users and technology teams globally to analyze current business flows and come up with detailed plans to migrate onto the next-generation systems.
Qualifications:
• Strong analytical and problem solving skills
• Ability to make sense of large data sets
• Excellent interpersonal skills; positive attitude; team player; flexible
• Must be able to face off to senior business and technology leaders globally
• Strong written and verbal communication skills, able to lead meetings, follow-up, negotiate and resolve ambiguity
• Basics in financial markets & banking operations.
• Keen attention to detail and strong sense of ownership and accountability for work
• Committed to constant teaching and learning, both functionally and technically
• Motivated to work closely with other team members of varying levels of seniority and experience within a cross functional team
• Familiar with automated testing approaches such as acceptance testing and specification by example
• Familiar and passionate about lean principles and agile methodologies and ways of working (Scrum, Kanban, XP)
• Must have strong Microsoft Office skills (Excel, PowerPoint)
• Must be a self-starter and have the ability to work with little to no supervision
Desired Skills
• Strong front-office business knowledge (preferably also a working knowledge of FIX).
Alternatively, a robust understand of middle office & control, along with SWIFT knowledge
• Knowledge of accounting principles, clearing and settlement / asset services would be desirable
• A proven track record in a similar role
• Experience of large scale projects
• A passion for technology and banking operations
• Project management experience
• Familiar with Visio or similar flow chart tool
• Basics in computer programming and the JVM ecosystem a plus
PLEASE SEND RESUME AND CONTACT INFORMATION TO: tom.hodges@prospectinfosys.com
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"As a Business Analyst, on the Product Management team, you will help companies like Autism Learning Partners, Chancelight, Trumpet Behavioral Health and Bluesprig streamline their Practice Management and Clinical Operations.
Key Accountabilities:
Assists Product Owner/Product Management in the definition of high-level business requirements (features) and the prioritization of the product backlog.
Constructs workflow charts and diagrams to help visualize requirements.
Participates in external customer demos and validation of features and user stories.
Formulates features, user stories, and acceptance criteria.
Collaborates with software developers to research existing business and system processes.
Collaborates with UI/UX on usability and UI design.
Collaborates with QA to ensure high quality testing.
Leads and documents requirements definition sessions with business, clinical, and technical stakeholders to better understand functional, data, user interface, and non-functional requirements.
Works within practices and policies for writing, updating, and managing requirements to ensure repeatable processes and delivery of value.
Performs functional acceptance testing of development work to ensure that the product meets the business and functional requirements.
Participates in release planning activities as scheduled.
Identifies opportunities for improving quality and efficiency and participates in process improvement initiatives.
Desired skills and experience:
Bachelor’s in computer science, engineering, business administration or health related field.
Must have demonstrated ability and understanding of the application of information technology in the field of health care.
Attention to detail
Strong understanding of EMR software is highly preferred.
ABA experience a plus
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
4+ years of experience as a business analyst.
Knowledge and experience with Agile methodology
Experience with Jira a plus
She decided that there had to be a better way to manage her operations so she could spend more time on what mattered most — working with her clients and patients.
","['excel', 'jira']","['data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Technology
Sr. Business Analyst (Contact Center)
New York City, NY, USA
Minimum 8+ years of experience in Business Analysis.
Strong experience in creating BRD & FRD.
Strong experience in SQL & Excel.
Experience in Contact Center (Genesis / Avaya / Nuance) is Must.
Experience in Capital Markets is a plus.
Scrum Master certification is a Plus.
","['excel', 'sql']",['busi'],2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'busi']"
BA,"You will gather information across the organization and ensure follow ups and updates are accurate and documented.
You should feel comfortable analyzing, diagnosing and influencing IT process problems, while developing business requirements for strategic projects and new solutions.
This role reports to the Manager, Member Support Technology, who manages core service offerings for the team.
The ideal profile of this position calls for a flexible and well-rounded individual with operational and project management experience - someone who is self-motivated, detailed oriented, collaborative, and has strong customer relationship management skills.
Partner with Global and local Member Services communities to ensure a complete understanding of requirements and quality in the delivery of business solutions.
Form strong working relationships with member services and service design staff that run the core processes locally, regionally and globally
Document and analyze current business processes and underlying systems/applications.
Critically evaluate information gathered and recommend alternative solutions
Monitor project progress, identify and escalate potential project risks and delays to management
Communicate and collaborate effectively with technical staff and business users
Coordinate and lead discussions to ensure understanding and alignment to projects and initiatives
Recognize the relationship, dependencies and their impact to projects
Basic Job Requirements
Education or Certifications
3+ years of overall customer support IT experience
Minimum of a Bachelor's degree in a related field
Work Experience
3+ years of related experience in a business analyst or equivalent role
Proven ability to facilitate communication and provide support to both the business and technology team members in challenging technical, custom and package software implementation projects on a global level
Must have experience working simultaneously with multiple stakeholders, sponsors, and business partners, exhibiting an ability to prioritize multiple responsibilities.
Technical Skills
Experience working with Customer Support software such as Zendesk and Service Cloud
Experience documenting and analyzing processes, procedures, and/or policies.
Balance of strong business process knowledge and experience implementing mix of custom and package software to meet business needs
Knowledge of customer support and ERP system integrations
Computer Skills
Experience with Jira and Confluence.
Language Skills
Fluent in English (written and verbal) - other language skills would be beneficial
Global Experience
Prior global experience
","['erp system', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
Position Type: Full Time
About the IT Business Analyst:
The incumbent will work with partners and its portfolio companies to understand and document existing and future business requirements and translate them into to functional requirements and system specifications.
He/she will leverage both system and functional expertise to make recommendations for best-practices and assist the technical team with the implementation in the system.
In this role, you will be responsible for bringing IT system solutions to life.
This is a highly collaborative role, and you will have the opportunity to partner across multiple business units in order to understand their needs, analyze current system capabilities and gaps, and implement solutions on time and according to budget, and that meet the business goals.
Responsibilities:
-Effectively partner with stakeholders in order to elicit, analyze, validate requirements for changes to business processes, policies and information systems
-Document and drive end to end business and functional requirements by working with functional unit leaders, with a special focus on post-merger systems integration
-Identify opportunities where IT solutions can drive business and technical improvements e.g.
via automation
-Perform basic system configuration, set-up; collaborate with technical team and external partners for customizations and advanced configuration changes
-Troubleshoot user and system problems and work with the broader IT team or vendors as necessary to resolve the issues
-Develop UAT test scripts, perform user acceptance testing and document results in test protocols
-Provide technical support to both in-house and remote users, including training
-Stay up to date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems and conduct meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings
Requirements:
-Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Business Administration or related field required
-A minimum of 5 years’ experience as an IT Business Analyst, including Systems Administration experience
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills with ability to interact with all levels within an organization information in both technical and non-technical terms
-Excellent MS Office skills across PowerPoint, Excel and Word
-Ability to work with a team collaboratively and within deadlines
-Strong experience with HRIS related information systems such as Workday
-Additional enterprise business application platforms (ERP, CRM, Office 365, SharePoint Online, Data warehouse, Business Intelligence/Visualization Reporting tools, etc.)
desired
-Familiarity with agile implementation and software development methodologies and tools a plus.
-Experience with all stages of business analysis and IT implementation lifecycles
-Some project management experience desired
-Strong customer service and relationship management focus
-Self-motivated, proactive, independent and responsive; requires little supervisory attention
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'erp', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'erp', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job #: 1073735
This is an exciting opportunity to work on ongoing transformation program for existing tools for Business Resiliency/ Business Continuity and disaster recover.
If you or someone you know is interested, please send an updated resume to kweiss@apexsystems.com
Position: Business Analyst
Duration: Long term contract
Compensation: Based on experience
• Condensing tool sets from 4-6 down to 1; migrating to new tool.
• Will be responsible for building user stories, testing, QA, ensuring requirement to development in timely process
• Must have strong QA/Technical Writing experience
• Financial services experience
• Business Continuity planning tools, Disaster Recovery activity tools at enterprise level scale
• Lead BA driving design requirements, testing for BD/DR tools, merging multiple tools into one tool would be items that stand out on a resume.
• Comfortable with JIRA and Visio to build out stories.
Strong Excel skills.
• Knowledge of Agile methodology.
EEO Employer
","['excel', 'jira']",['busi'],1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'busi']"
BA,"This position works closely with business partners to deliver on key business objectives.
Candidates must have experience implementing and supporting applications with minimal supervision, and deliver results in a rapidly changing and dynamic environment.
Serve as a key point of contact between the IT team and business stakeholders
Partner with business communities to document requirements based on current and proposed business workflows
Participate in the development of project estimates, plans and schedules
Evaluate information from multiple sources and determine appropriate priority/resolution.
Facilitate meetings and brainstorming sessions
Translate high-level information into technical details
Prototype to represent requirement information in various visual formats to accompany documentation
Collaborate with development and QA teams to design, implement, and test business requirements
Communicate information effectively and in the appropriate format to IT colleagues and business partners
Identify innovative solutions to unique requirements
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree with a focus in business, finance, economics or computer science preferred
6+ years of business analysis (or related) experiences, preferably in financial services
Experience mapping/re-engineering business/process flows
Understanding of relational databases and working knowledge of SQL
Thorough knowledge of business analysis concepts necesary to work with development and quality assurance teams
Strong writing skills to create user stories, analysis, documentation, create presentations, business requirements and training materials.
Proficiency in presenting to colleagues, management as well as training on applications and business processes is also required.
Experience with data visualization software (e.g.
Qlik, Microsoft Power BI, Tableau) a plus
Operations, trust/accounting, report design, data analysis, programming experience a plus
Proven track record managing medium to large initiatives
Certified Scrum Master, Certified Project Owner, PMP, CCBA, CBAP preferred
Ability to manage multiple priorities effectively and work in a team environment
","['power bi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'qlik']","['data', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'data', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Job title: Senior Business Analyst
Job type: Permanent
Emp type: Full-time
Salary:
Negotiable
Job published: 2019-10-03
Job ID: 41513
Responsibilities:
Complete project lifecycle management shortening new PM Teams’ time to market
Provide day-to-day support for various operational procedures such as broker data management, compliance monitoring, trading, and business continuity.
Requirements:
This is a highly selective position.
The ideal candidates will have a combination of software development and communication skills with some experience working in a financial services organization, specifically with futures and FX.
Preferably 5 years of relevant work experience.
Must have the ability to independently manage multiple long-term and short-term projects under very tight project deadlines.
Strong written and oral communication skills
Working experience of one of the Linux/Unix scripts.
Perl, bash, and etc.
Working experience with Linux/Windows Operating Systems and distributed storage solutions preferred.
Familiarity with industry standards of server and storage hardware preferred.
Working experience with Python programming
Working experience of either C++, C#, or Java programming
Strong knowledge of SQL.
Additional experience with database design is a plus.
Candidates with specific work experience and knowledge of market regulations in these areas will be strongly preferred.
Education:
A BS or MS in finance, statistics, math, and engineering or computer science is strongly desired
If you would like to be considered for the position of Senior Business Analyst or wish to discuss the role further then please leave your details below.
","['unix', 'python', 'linux', 'sql', 'perl', 'c', 'java']","['data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['unix', 'python', 'linux', 'sql', 'perl', 'c', 'java', 'data', 'financ', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst
240 Hours Project
100% Remote
Business Analyst who is strong at business process simplification on Sales Cloud with an eye for automation and complex integrations
Specialist in Sales Cloud
Advanced Heroku Experience
","['salesforc', 'cloud']",['busi'],999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'busi']"
BA,"Agency Name:
NYS Dept of Health
Is this a Project/Program specific Position?
Yes
If YES, list the Project/Program Name:
NYS Medicaid Data Warehouse
The Medicaid Data Warehouse Bureau is the primary
repository for Medicaid in New York State and is the main
provider of Business Intelligence about Medicaid Data.
The
Bureau is comprised of two functional areas, the Medicaid
Data Warehouse (MDW) and the Medicaid Analytics
Performance Portal (MAPP).
The MDW includes the Medicaid Information Services Center,
a Data Warehouse, business Intelligence capabilities,
reporting capabilities, and user support and litigation
requests.
MAPP includes Delivery System Reform Incentive
Payment (DSRIP), Health Homes and Value Based Payment
(VBP) projects
Provide a list of the day to day tasks to be performed by the Selected Candidate:
The Business Analyst will work closely Medicaid Data Warehouse (MDW) program staff, vendor staff, and other stakeholders to define and develop requirements all aspects of the MDW.
Specific duties include:
"" Analyzes, develops and revises flow charts, process models and technical specifications describing as-is or to-be Information Technology (IT) systems or business processes
"" Prioritizes IT system requirements and gains stakeholder
agreement for IT projects or business process change documents detailing the project
"" Assists with developing presentations to justify and explain IT system or business process requirements.
Evaluates the outcomes of systems testing, and confirms that the results are consistent with the system or business process specifications
"" Reviews proposals from staff and recommends to management the criticality of revising system or business process requirements during and after IT system implementation, if applicable
"" Determines the impact of software and hardware releases on the IT system
"" Assists with the development of training related to business
systems implementation for users
"" Writes Queries
"" Assists in querying Data sources to determine the validity of
project outputs
"" Documents data architecture
Number of Position(s) being requested:
(Maximum of 5 per Attachment 7, Section 1.2.1)
1
Position Job Title:
(Per Attachment 4)
Business Analyst
Position Skill Level:
(Per Attachment 4)
Expert
Number of Form 2 Candidate Responses allowed per Contractor, per Position?
(1 or 2 per Attachment 7, Section 1.2.2)
2
Target Start Date:
(30 Business Days minimum and 90 Calendar Days maximum from date of request)
8/18/2020
Engagement Length in Months:
(2 to 30 per Attachment 7, Section 1.2.3)
24 months
Is this a Full or Part-Time Position?
(Full-Time is 40 Hours Per Week)
Full
If Part-Time, enter approximate number of hours per week:
What are the daily work hours?
(Note if negotiable or list preferred start and end time):
8:30 am to 5:00 pm negotiable
Where is the Home Base Region?
(Per Attachment 4)
Region 1
Where is the physical work office located?
431 Broadway, Menands, NY
What type of software is typically used by the Agency?
DB2, Oracle, ETL, SQL, Salient, Tableau, MS Project,
SharePoint, MS Office suite
What type of hardware is typically used by the Agency?
Agency is an Oracle Shop
Position Mandatory Qualification
Business Analyst - Analyzes an organization or business domain (real or hypothetical) and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology with distinct deliverables to a solution.
Expert 84+ months Candidate is able to provide guidance to large teams and/or has extensive industry experience and is considered at the top of his/her field.
Requested Qualification
Bachelor's Degree in Information Technology or Computer
Science or similar field of study
84 months of experience in business analysis in
Information Technology on SDLC projects; including developing business cases, gap analysis, functional and non-function requirements, test cases/plans and participating in User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and reviewing UAT results.
84 months of experience using recognized business analysis methodologies (such as JAD sessions) to elicit business needs and requirements from stakeholders, and developing/revising flow charts, and process models describing as-is or to be system and business processes
60 months experience working for State, Federal or Local government agencies.
60 months of experience querying and interrogating data using complex SQL on DB2 or Oracle platforms using tools such as SQL query tools and using MS Access.
24 months experience with Medicaid and/or health care industry data and its analysis
60 months of experience analyzing and developing reporting needs/reports from three perspectives: senior management, power user, and ad hoc, using industry standard (e.g.
Cognos, OBIEE) reporting software.
24 months experience with working in a Project
Management office, working with Project Managers and teams,
and using standardized methodologies (such as waterfall and
agile) and templates, participating in the evaluation of project
readiness for deployment.
Please submit copy of resume, certification, and degree.
Additional Information Requests:
Are there additional security requirements for the Authorized User?
Yes
If YES, include the additional security requirements:
Confidentiality agreements and network access
permissions may be required in this position
Will additional training potentially be required during the Engagement?
Yes
Consultant are required to attend mandatory workplace
training.
Examples of currently included courses are: Security
awareness, preventing sexual harassment, preventing
workplace violence, etc
What type and/or manner, of knowledge transfer is requested during the Engagement?
Consultant will work with state staff and transfer knowledge
gained to state staff.
Written documentation may be required.
Is travel anticipated during the Engagement?
No
If YES, list anticipated frequency and locations for travel:
","['ms office', 'cogno', 'sql', 'tableau', 'oracl']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'etl', 'information technology', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'cogno', 'sql', 'tableau', 'oracl', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'etl', 'information technology', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Role: Senior Business Analyst
Grade (for internal candidate relevance): 11
Role:
The Lead Business Analyst provides strategic business analysis services to business partners.
The focus of this position will be the documentation of business requirements and associated business processes/workflows in support of initiatives and projects.
The position will also work extensively with internal and external development resources in knowledge transfer of requirements and insuring understanding of how those requirements are reflected in applications/systems requirements.
This position will interact and support both business users and technology and in close partnership with project stakeholders.
They will also be a Leader for an Agile Scrum team.
Essential Accountability:
• Gather/analyze/document business requirements leading to the development of a business solution.
These are documented in high level requirements documents which then lead to the BRDs.
• Support the development of internal workflow design through systems, new and revised procedures and product designs, including the user interface aspect and the development of rules-based analysis for new or existing products.
• Support the establishment of new projects by facilitating visioning sessions with business users and producing associated Vision documents.
• Develop metrics for quantifying associated business value for assigned projects
• Recognize and communicate the effects and impacts of requested changes to established projects, systems and applications, as needed.
• Supports in the identification and management of project scope, and supports status reporting to the Project Leader as needed.
• Planning work and guide other BAs to meet project deadlines.
Mediator between developer, Quality Assurance and product owners.
Collecting requirement from PO, getting it developed by the developer, getting it tested with the help of QA and developers and ensuring the rollout to production.
Business Analysis:
• 8 + Years of relevant experience.
• Standard requirements gathering and analysis.
• Process Mapping
• Functional and Technical Specifications
• Data flow diagrams
• Requirements Management / Planning (Prioritization, Change Control)
• Agile knowledge and practice
• Ensuring precise delivery
Additional skills :
It would be helpful if you can demonstrate that you have some knowledge and hands-on experience in the below areas:
• SQL
• Data management
Preferred Qualification
• Bachelors in Computer Science, related field or equivalent work experience
Were the leading independent provider of information and benchmark prices for the commodities and energy markets.
For more information, visit www.platts.com.
S&P Global is an equal opportunity employer committed to making all employment decisions without regard to race/ethnicity, gender, pregnancy, gender identity or expression, color, creed, religion, national origin, age, disability, marital status (including domestic partnerships and civil unions), sexual orientation, military veteran status, unemployment status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state or local law.
Only electronic job submissions will be considered for employment.
If you need an accommodation during the application process due to a disability, please send an email to: EEO.Compliance@spglobal.com and your request will be forwarded to the appropriate person.
The EEO is the Law Poster http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf describes discrimination protections under federal law.
",['sql'],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['sql', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Introduction
Are you looking for a career that will allow you to use your unique blend of business acumen and tech savvy?
Be ready to navigate the complex relationships that make the business world run and find the actionable insights that result in great business decisions.
Your Role and Responsibilities
You will be part of a dynamic team of Salesforce.com professionals supporting the CRM Strategy and Solution delivery on the Watson Health Salesforce.com platform.
As a Salesforce Administrator, you will have the opportunity to work for an organization responsible for transforming and engineering robust data and analytics platforms across multiple products.
Therefore, in order to be considered for this position, you must have the ability to work without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
Your Role and Responsibilities include:
Partner with other Salesforce.com Admin and Development team members to ensure timely delivery of work to business stakeholders
Design, develop, test and implement solutions in a highly customized Salesforce.com CRM
Work with business partners to document business processes and system requirements
Prepare Requirements and Design documents, Configuration Workbooks, Test Cases and other documentation as required through the project lifecycle
Support and troubleshoot integrations between Salesforce.com and other Enterprise system
Ongoing improvements in the Salesforce.com instance by doing continues research of new Salesforce feature functionality
Regularly perform database de-duping and cleanup procedures
Therefore, in order to be considered for this position, you must have the ability to work without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
CIODEM20
Required Technical and Professional Expertise
5+ years solid Salesforce.com experience with demonstrated track record of success
Strong business process knowledge on Sales Cloud and/or Service Cloud
Proven experience in designing solutions on a Lightning platform
Business Analysis skills and experience with integrating CRM with business systems
Salesforce Certified Administrator
Preferred Technical and Professional Expertise
Effective at leading implementation and adoption of Sales and Support methodologies within the Salesforce CRM environment
Solid understanding of the Agile methodology
Solid understanding of the implementation and adoption of Lightning and Communities
High degree of CRM Strategy skills
About Business Unit
The Office of the Chief Information Officer (CIO) owns IBMs IT strategy and provides the tools, workstations, devices, and infrastructure that IBMers use to do their jobs every day.
What matters to you when youre looking for your next career challenge?
Maybe you want to get involved in work that really changes the world?
What about somewhere with incredible and diverse career and development opportunities where you can truly discover your passion?
Are you looking for a culture of openness, collaboration and trust where everyone has a voice?
What about all of these?
Impact.
Inclusion.
Infinite Experiences.
Do your best work ever.
IBMs greatest invention is the IBMer.
IBMers believe that the application of intelligence, reason and science can improve business, society and the human condition.
Therefore, in order to be considered for this position, you must have the ability to work without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Skills and Experience Required:
● Understanding of and expertise with analyzing, assessing and documenting, for both technical and non-technical users, Salesforce internal configurations
● Experience testing various Salesforce modules and configurations
● Experience configuring and documenting Salesforce processes and workflows
● Excellent communication and client interfacing skills, with the ability to discuss and present Salesforce technical concepts in non-technical terms, in writing and verbally, to business users
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"A department which values Diversity and
CRO Change Management team is looking
for an experienced AVP- VP Business Analyst/Project Manager to work on Risk
platform changes.
Opportunity is to work with global CRO
Change team.
This team is responsible for Business Data Analysis and delivery
of pan Risk projects.
The candidate will serve as the
dedicated face-off and representative of the “Sponsor” to “Supplier” functions
including Risk Change, Risk & Finance IT, Risk Innovation, and Risk and
Finance Data Analytics & Reporting
This role would be responsible for:
Interacting with the
team to deliver pan risk projects.
Authoring business
requirement documents, use cases, functional specifications and test
strategy/test plans.
Document business
processes, streamline various operations and seek opportunities for
improvements.
Managing user demo
sessions, conducting user acceptance testing, product roll out strategy
Coordinating with
respective Offshore-teams to get various projects delivered.
Understands the value
of diversity in the workplace and is dedicated to fostering an inclusive
culture in all aspects of working life so that people from all backgrounds
receive equal treatment, realize their full potential and can bring their full,
authentic selves to work.
This should be further elaborated on in your
application.
Business
Analyst/Project Manager with 5 years of work experience within Investment
Banking projects.
Detailed
understanding of Banking Risk Management practices and recommendations, and
Excellent Data
analysis skills with help of provided tools, and should have understanding of
SQL queries.
Medium proficiency is essential
Sound experience in
writing BRDs and FRDs and ability to coordinate execution of UAT test cases and
Regression testing is a plus!
Outstanding
interpersonal and time management skills along with strong written and verbal
communication skills.
Hardworking,
proactive with ability to learn in a fast paced environment
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'regress', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'regress', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This newly created position will bring together and interact with business groups and IT to define and improve the process to assure accurate agency management through all systems including but not limited to reporting, regulatory, compensation and compliance.
This role is responsible for defining the coordination of all projects that impact agency management processes and controls, including the Agency Data Repository System (ADR) to efficiently interact with all upstream and downstream systems.
You will work with Legal, IT, Finance, Product and other business groups as appropriate.
Specifically this position will:
Define any business impacts and resource requirements
Collaborate with IT to develop and implement full scale project plans
Manage project scope and budget to meet goals
Manage project resource allocation across business groups
Plan and schedule project timelines and dependencies in concert with IT Project management.
Provide direction and support to project team
Monitor and report on progress of the project to all stakeholders
Manage project changes and interventions to achieve project outputs
Communicate process changes to all business groups and ensure all groups are trained on updates.
Understand and communicate all downstream system effects of new process/projects.
Required Skills and Abilities:
Critical thinking and problem solving skills, with ability to work a project end to end.
Exceptional oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated strong work experience in project management capacity.
Knowledge of project management techniques and tools.
Proven experience in strategic planning, decision making and change management.
Planning and organizing.
Influencing and leading.
Advanced computer skills, including proficiency with Microsoft Office suite, and vendor platforms related to job functions.
SQL are a plus.
A Bachelor’s degree is required.
","['microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Title : Scrum Team Business Analysts
Product Strategy be aware of the changing landscape of payment services and cloud native technology - support Senior Product Managers and Head of Product in research and information contributing to development of product strategy.
Product Training spread the word!
With client and internal training programmes and approach based on released capabilities.
Product Performance understand and support Head of Product and Senior Product Managers with analysis of KPI's interfacing with Finance.
",['cloud'],"['financ', 'research', 'busi', 'kpi']",999.0,"['cloud', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'kpi']"
BA,"The main task is to support their Risk-Based Capital model adoption: Presently, a strategic initiative is underway to help lower the capital requirements.
Support the risk managers, risk analytics, and model validation teams by providing them with suitable technology solutions
Risk-Based Capital calculations are required to be validated by quantitative risk team.
This team develops suitable quant software or wraps 3rd party analytical libraries into packages to meet their needs.
The candidate will assist them in this process by devising a robust software development process and documenting them to regulatory standards.
REQUIREMENTS
5+ years of business analysis experience
Strong Market and Credit Risk Management knowledge
Business process engineering, requirement gathering and BRD preparations for enhancements to risk management framework
UAT and QA testing experience
Has to Understand VaR and Stress VaR as it related to products across FI, Equities, FX, Credit, etc.
Undergraduate degree and/or graduate degree in STEM, preferably computer science or financial engineering.
Experience working on SIMM or Libor initiatives a plus
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Technical Business Analyst
Duration: Long-Term
Role: Part of the squads as a Technical BA for Agile initiatives in Salesforce/CRM space and performs the following functionalities:
Work with business partners/product owners to recommend and influence requirement statement
Decide on the story board, epics and story mapping
Understand the business processes impacted by the request
Lead solution conversations between development and business groups by providing:
Impacted Teams (see checklist ?
internal and downstream)
Current State and Target State workflow diagrams
Data mappings
Screenshots/mockupse.Use Cases/Scenarios
Document all necessary details to User Stories required for development team to develop the solution
Monitors that the suggested solution is being followed and identify business, analysis and understanding gaps
Review technical tasks added to Jira Stories, and answer questions related to the solution/requirements
Push to ensure that each impacted development team is aware of dependencies and handoffs
Review test scripts for gaps – there can be two reviews – one with business and one overall with all stakeholders
Keep an eye out for efforts where end to end testing is required and approach QA lead and SM to orchestrate that and ensure the same set of data is flowing through the test cases.
Evolve into a SME and support the product accordingly
Job Type: Contract
Experience:
Technical BA: 10 years (Preferred)
Salesforce/CRM: 6 years (Preferred)
Data mappings: 6 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['jira', 'salesforc']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'salesforc', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Minimum Requirements 8 years or more experience documenting, designing and managing user requirements.
Experience defining business and functional requirements.
Experience documenting clear and concise user stories and acceptance criteria.
Experience with user-centered analysis techniques.
Extensive experience with documenting requirements in Microsoft DevOps.
Must be knowledgeable of Microsoft Dynamics CRM.
Broad understanding of software development and web technologies.
Familiarity with Business Intelligence technologies (e.g.
Microsoft Power BI, Oracle BI) Highly proficient with report development in Microsoft Office Access, Microsoft Excel, and Power BI.
Perform multiple projects on small teams.
If interested, please forward a latest copy of your resume with contact information to (Abdul 973.324.7917 araheemsprucetech.net)
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'bi', 'oracl']",['busi'],999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'oracl', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Transaction Advisory Services (Capital Transformation - Strategy & Operations)(Manager) (Multiple Positions), Ernst & Young U.S. LLP, New York, NY.
Serve as a Strategy & Operations professional to prepare and execute mergers and acquisition plans to maximize synergies and financial benefits from transactions.
Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.
Manage and motivate teams of professionals with diverse skills and backgrounds.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Maintain long-term client relationships and networks.
Cultivate business development opportunities.
Full time employment, Monday – Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am – 5:30 pm.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
Alternatively, will accept a Master's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or related field and 4 years of work experience.
Must have 1 year of experience in business integrations, divestitures, or carve-outs including experience with quantitative and qualitative analysis.
Must have 3 years of experience in conducting assessments of technology, finance, operations, manufacturing, or supply chain infrastructure.
Must have 1 year of experience in the integration or separation of client operations.
Must have 1 year of experience in synthesizing approaches in complex integration or divestiture conflicts.
Requires domestic and international travel up to 80% to serve client needs.
Employer will accept any suitable combination of education, training or experience.
This particular position at Ernst & Young in the United States requires the qualified candidate to be a ""United States worker"" as defined by the U.S. Department of Labor regulations at 20 CFR 656.3.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Real-Time Risk Innovation
Overview
Responsibilities
Use business analysis skills to translate SME margin requirements and methodologies into platform-specific technical requirements for Margin Development team.
Assist Development and QA teams in integrating exchange margin replication tools.
Facilitate communication with third party exchanges to understand data and calculation details.
Liaise with Data team to ensure availability of security data required for margin calculations.
Serve as a margin platform expert for the Support team.
Source and maintain exchange margin specifications and parameter files.
Skills and Requirements
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to communicate high level business concepts to technical teams and technical details to project sponsors.
Comfortable with attention to detail.
Strong ability to work independently as well as collaborate as part of a team.
Familiarity with margin optimization and capital efficiencies between OTC products and futures.
Familiarity with Javascript and BPMN tools.
Proficiency with database queries to assist Development, QA, and Support teams.
Minimum 3 years financial experience/MBA preferred.
Work Environment
You can expect to provide specifications from many sources including:
Stakeholders expectations
General use cases
Business requirements
Proof of concept work
","['javascript', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",2.5,"['javascript', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Data/Information Mgt Sr Anlst is a seasoned professional role.
Applies in-depth disciplinary knowledge, contributing to the development of new techniques and the improvement of processes and work-flow for the area or function.
Integrates subject matter and industry expertise within a defined area.
Requires in-depth understanding of how areas collectively integrate within the sub-function as well as coordinate and contribute to the objectives of the function and overall business.
Evaluates moderately complex and variable issues with substantial potential impact, where development of an approach/taking of an action involves weighing various alternatives and balancing potentially conflicting situations using multiple sources of information.
Requires good analytical skills in order to filter, prioritize and validate potentially complex and dynamic material from multiple sources.
Excellent communication and diplomacy skills are required.
Regularly assumes informal/formal leadership role within teams.
Involved in coaching and training of new recruits.
Significant impact in terms of project size, geography, etc.
by influencing decisions through advice, counsel and/or facilitating services to others in area of specialization.
Work and performance of all teams in the area are directly affected by the performance of the individual.
Qualifications: 5-8 years of experience Ability to think strategically, creatively problem solve, and the ability to engage resources outside of their direct control to achieve objectives Working experience in a quantitative field Experience in segmentation, modeling, and optimization Understanding of the consumer lending market and customer life cycle Know-how on analytic tools (SAS E-miner, Knowledge Seeker, SPSS etc.)
Other job-related duties may be assigned as required.
Developing comprehensive measurements of client level capital returns based on Risk Capital and TCE for use in optimizing the use of scarce capital is one of the key goals of ICG.
The individual hired will be responsible for designing and implementing processes for monthly production of Risk Capital and TCE driven client returns as well as for developing the transaction calculator for deal evaluation.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['spss', 'excel', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",999.0,"['spss', 'excel', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"To learn more visit Please find below JD Sitecore Developer Key Mandatory Skills- BA with LabVantage, LIMS, Data Migration Should have experience as Business Analyst (working on LabVantage) Understand the current LIMS landscape study Assessment ad verification with the stakeholders Identification of improvement opportunities to processes and functionalities in Labvantage Gap findings and recommendations Understand the As-Is architecture (standards Vs requirements) Define Data migration strategy from Watson LIMS to LabVantage LIMS LabVantage training requirements Budgetary costs and estimation on implementation other related costs Technical documentation User impact assessment.
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"8 to 10 years of experience in IT
3+ years of experience in Programming systems within Media & Entertainment, preferably with Broadcast/Cable networks.
Knowledge of Programming, program scheduling and finance business areas.
Track record of effectively working with development and testing teams to arrive at effective solutions
Knowledge of Agile and SDLC concepts.
Business process analysis and redesign experience: strong business analysis skills; process mapping; business process redesign and implementation
Systems implementation skills: requirements/process analysis, conceptual and detailed design, configuration, testing, training, change management, support
Experience working with multiple systems and integrations between systems
",[None],"['financ', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'busi']"
BA,"The ideal candidate for this position is detail-oriented and highly innovative.
He or she will also be responsible for translating business needs to IT solutions, and vice versa, with current programs, projects and initiatives in mind.
This position is located in Wilmington, CA.
Key Job Duties:
Experience in both information technology and business administration
Assume responsibility for project tasks and ensure they are completed in a timely fashion
Monitored and controlled job cost process and tracked expenses, increasing sales and profits
Established quality control processes, resulting in substantial defect margins reduction
Coordinated deliverables and shipping logistics by incorporating and controlling business processes and guidelines.
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Estimated initial project costs and resource
Elicit, analyze, document, validate, and provide user acceptance of requirements and business processes
Participate in documenting and evaluating work processes and business re-engineering opportunities using a variety of approved techniques
Contribute to the ideation, definition, and development of business needs that will yield improvement and value to county technology, services
Support of ACX’s custom production processing system
Support of JD Edwards and Sage financial applications
Understanding key ACX business processes and workflows, in order to develop and tailor applications and systems to support the processes and workflows
Conduct Usability testing with end users including prototyping potential solutions.
Assign, instruct, coach, mentor, and monitor workload of other Business Analysts on projects and assignments.
1st and 2nd Line Support role for Sage X3, which requires application support of Sage X3 as well as technical support with diagnostic skills, Sage X3 service packs and patches etc.
Keep track of on-going migration of customer data from existing systems.
Prepare use case scenarios for ensuring all business rules.
Install and test application functionality and compatibility of software products.
Manage software upgrades and support solutions.
Qualifications
Minimum of 7 years of Information Technology and Business Administration
At least 4 years in managing an IT Team and leading projects
Bachelor’s Degree or Master's Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business Analysis and/or Computer Engineering or a related field from an accredited institution whose accreditation is recognized by the U.S. Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation
Prior experience working and/or supporting ERP (manufacturing), SAGE, CRM, Business Intelligence, and/or HCM systems; Working knowledge of SQL
Advanced level skills in MS Office (Project, Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook), and the ability to work within Web based applications
Agricultural background preferred
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp']","['data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'end user', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'end user', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Excellence Delivered As Promised.
It’s more than a slogan.
What You Will Do
Performs complex data and business process analysis to identify opportunities for improvement, need for additional decision-support tools and information, and to arrive at actionable recommendations that can be implemented to improve business outcomes.
Detailed responsibilities include the following:
Gather and interpret customer business needs via interviews, business process analysis, surveys, site visits, use cases, task and workflow analysis, scenario planning, and by conducting workshops to elaborate requirements/specifications
Monitor and track Key Performance Indicators (KPI) required for the program on a daily, monthly and annual basis
Lead or participate on internal projects and manage the successful execution of projects coordinating the activities of a multidisciplinary team of professionals
Concisely document business needs in a manner that conveys clear understanding to other team members and customer stakeholders
Effectively communicate and collaborate with internal team members and external stakeholders to establish a technical vision, analyzing trade-offs between usability and performance
Analyze information needs and business challenges to determine how to best address these needs through the delivery of customized decision support tools and services
Produce feasibility reports based upon compiled research, advice of subject matter experts and exercise of expert judgment
Identify solution options, recommend new reports, and assess on both technical and business suitability dimensions
Create innovative solutions to complex problems
Keep up to date with technical as well as industry developments and trends
Minimum Qualifications
College degree within an Economics/Business, Engineering, Math, Statistics and / or Technology related discipline with 2+ years’ experience in a high-volume data/transaction environment.
A systematic approach to problem solving with a high attention to detail.
Excellent commercial, analytical and business case development skills.
Professional oral and written (presentation/data visualization) communication.
Business process engineering skills.
Excellent MS Excel and database capabilities.
Ability to present with confidence and prepare concise and complete Executive Summaries.
Across more than 60 offices, 2,500+ highly qualified professionals are united in an unyielding commitment to deliver excellence to every client and every project, every day.
All qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veterans status or other characteristics protected by law.
Local residents will be given preference.
NO AGENCIES PLEASE: Unsolicited resumes from third party agencies will not be accepted.
Working Hours: 8 AM – 5 PM
Employment Status: Full-time
Internal Requisition ID: 2020-6508
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Tools & Reporting
Los AngelesOperations - Product opsExperienced
Responsibilities
About the Role:
In this critical position, you will leverage analyses and suggest data-driven solutions to enable your key partners to draw relevant conclusions throughout the product and operations lifecycle.
You will be a champion and project manager for development of new tools such as a user communications or market research platform when necessary.
Responsibilities:
Interview key stakeholders to reveal operational inefficiencies and uncover hidden problems beyond what is obvious
Utilize data visualization and descriptive statistics to connect disparate ideas into cohesive, well-grounded insights for scalable and intuitive reporting
Analyze quantitative and qualitative datasets to generate impact-driven recommendations for cross-functional partners including Product, Music, Content Programming, and Creator Partnerships.
Potential to own, manage and in some cases advocate business cases for development of new tools
Communicate effectively with technical and non-technical audiences both verbally and in writing
Hold oneself accountable for contribution goals and acts with a sense of urgency, embracing high-value stretch over safe goals
Qualifications
- 1-3 years of experience in data science or analytics role
Proficiency in SQL - able to write structured queries on large data sets
Takes a measured and thoughtful approach to difficult situations, be comfortable with ambiguity, and be able to bounce back quickly from team challenges
Self-motivated individual with strong organizational and problem solving skills including the ability to transition between detailed data and high-level insights.
Four-year degree or equivalent in a quantitative field like statistics, economics, applied math, engineering, or other technical field.
Preferred experience in statistical programming (e.g., R, Python, MATLAB)
Preferred experience with a data visualization tool (e.g.
Mode Analytics/Chartio/Tableau/Qlikview)
Preferred experience working with international partners at different time zones
Share to
","['sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Wednesday, July 8, 2020
You will be responsible for reviewing, analyzing, and evaluating business systems and user needs.
Documents requirements, defines scope and objectives, and formulates systems to parallel overall business strategies.
For consideration, qualified candidates only, submit letter of interest with salary requirements and resume.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience
5-8+ years of experience eliciting, documenting and maintaining business requirement
Experience developing and maintaining Use Cases, Requirements Traceability Matrix, User Stories
Excellent understanding of SDLC processes, such as Waterfall or Agile
Excellent communications (verbal and written), problem solving and analytical skills
Experience identifying testing scenarios and documenting test cases, executing tests, and leading UAT
Your responsibilities will include:
Identifies, assesses, and documents business and technical requirements, understanding business priorities and advising business on options, risks and costs versus benefits of various solutions
Runs and manages requirements gathering sessions; obtains appropriate business and IT signoff
Conducts research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within or outside the business, and if not, assist with determining whether new solutions are feasible
Accountable for the delivery of business and technical requirements documentation
Works closely with Application Designers and Developers to ensure understanding of requirements that will be used for creating application architecture and design specifications
Develop use cases, flow charts, functional diagrams and descriptions to communicate application design or integration specification
Participates in test results meetings and executes traceability activities to determine cause of bugs, system errors and failures during testing
MPI does not file visa petitions or sponsor applicants for work visas in this job classification.
Submissions will be reviewed; only candidates most closely matching the requirements of the position will be contacted.
About MPI
Recognized as an Employer of Choice for its employee-focused work environment, competitive compensation and benefits, MPI is a recipient of the World at Work Seal of Distinction.
Equal Opportunity Employer
Other details
Pay Type
Hourly
",['excel'],"['risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title:
Principal Business Analyst
Full Time/ Part Time:
Full-time
Primary Purpose
Provides high level technical support to business unit segments in financial consulting, process costing, process improvement, new product/services development planning, and performance measurement support and analysis.
Duties and Responsibilities
Prepares business unit financial plans and supports business unit management in preparation of strategic plans.
Prepares analyses of financial and operational data to assist operational departments and business unit management to achieve performance targets.
Manages business unit revenue and cost planning and analysis and provides support to management in development and coordination of the resource allocation process at the business unit including modifying and/or improving the process as business needs change.
Acts as the financial resource for business unit segments relative to financial planning, analysis and budgeting, new product/services development and implementation, workflow analysis and costing information to evaluate and ensure competitiveness.
Manages the tracking and analysis of operational and financial performance measures and indicators.
Coordinates the preparation of OM and capital budgets for business unit segments that this position is responsible for.
Analyzes information requirements and leads development of computerized solutions to meet such requirements.
Manages and develops a team of business/financial planning consultants.
Performs other duties as assigned (no more than 5% of duties).
Qualifications:
Qualifications
Education
Bachelor's Degree Accounting, Finance, or Business Administration, or equivalent experience.
Required
CPA, CMA, MBA and/or other professional certifications/advanced degrees.
Preferred
Experience
8 years relevant experience required.
Skills and Abilities
Possesses a high level of specialized knowledge regarding financial, accounting and regulatory matters and is considered an expert/authority in these areas.
Experienced project leader.
Able to organize, plan, control, coordinate, and effectively manage cross-functional assignments and projects.
Able to convey complex technical information in a clear and concise manner to technical and non-technical audience.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Able to persuade and influence those with divergent views to achieve a consensus.
Good knowledge of ""generally accepted accounting principles.
Advanced understanding of the interrelationship of utility rate making, tax, and finance concepts.
Must have a strong understanding of accounting and costing principles and methodologies.
Must have the ability to identify issues, analyze data, develop, recommend, and implement solutions.
Must possess initiative, decision-making skills and problem-solving abilities.
Licenses and Certifications
CPA, CMA, MBA and/or other professional certifications/advanced degrees.
Preferred
Posting End Date:
Jul 27, 2020
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Business Analyst Position Summary The Business Analyst (BA) is primarily responsible for developing quality software requirements alongside business stakeholders.
The BA assumes overall performance responsibility for developing and delivering technical solutions to business problems.
The BA advances the companyrsquos mission by developing, analyzing, and documenting application requirements.
The BA works closely with the Director, Software Engineering (DSE), Vice President of Information Technology, Chief Operating OfficerChief Information Officer (COOCIO), and the software development team to accomplish goals and project objectives.
Duties Responsibilities Essential Job Functions Effectively maintains and builds relationships with external business partners and internal department stakeholders.
Responsible for cross-functional activities to ensure all external organizations and internal departments are involved.
Resolves requirement conflicts and barriers as they arise.
Solicits, analyzes, and defines functional and non-functional technical requirements and priorities with the business owners and other cross functional stakeholders using process flows, technical requirements lists, specifications, diagrams, scenarios, mockups, andor models Works directly with customers to develop requirements and see them through the approval process.
Provides clear and consistent communication of requirement status both internally and with business partners and customers.
Monitors the SDLC ensuring that accurate QA and UAT is completed, and participate with developing test cases based on business requirements.
Maintains the Requirement Approval Process and continuously develop improvements.
Assists team members in planning, estimating and controlling requirements.
Captures and manages project risksissues and the execution of risk mitigationcontingency plans and any necessary escalations.
Creates or updates policies and procedures, as required.
Analyzes, develops, prioritizes, communicates and coordinates application changes to fulfill business objectives.
Provides enhanced technical and procedural support for all Help Desk calls.
Participates in user acceptance testing of system enhancements and projects Conducts product spec reviews with key stakeholders to ensure requirements are complete and well understood.
Presents upcoming changes and newly developed features in written format and at department meetings Provides 247 support for mission critical software solutions such as, digitalDONOR which is critical to recovery and call center operations.
Implements advanced strategies for gathering, reviewing and analyzing data requirements.
Prioritizes initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
Manages competing resources and priorities with a great attitude.
Leads ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Other Responsibilities Responsible for representing OneLegacy and for providing customer service in a professional manner when working with staff and other customersvendors.
Required attendance at department staff meetings.
Performs all duties and responsibilities in compliance with safety guidelines, policies and procedures, regulations as outlined in the Code of Federal Regulations, and other applicable federal, state and local laws.
a.
Performs quality control practices as defined by the policies and procedures.
Supports the organizationrsquos Standards of Professional Conduct as outlined in the OneLegacy Policies and Procedures, and the mission, vision and values of the organization.
Maintains a neat and organized workstation and environment.
Performs other duties and projects as assigned.
Competencies and Skills Experience with Microsoft Office Suite, Visio, Jira and MS Project.
Working knowledge of SQL and Web technologies including JavaScript, CSS and HTML.
Basic knowledge of networking and security related to network technologies.
Knowledge of developing test scripts for validation testing purposes.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast paced and deadline driven environment.
Ability to interact and work with all levels of an organization.
Illustrates a dedication to meeting requirements of internal and external customers, responding to all customer requests promptly and thoroughly.
Strong verbal and written communication skills including ability to work in a team environment, give honest, direct feedback, is a solid verbal and written communicator, and ability to tailor communication to audience.
Ability to present in front of staff at department meetings and in front of existing and new potential customers.
Utilizes initiative and judgment to manage shifting priorities, risks and competing interests of multiple projects.
Meets deadlines, prioritizes appropriately, copes well with change, and maintains composure under pressure.
Strong understanding of both client-server and web application development concepts.
Ability to understand engineering concepts, business case development, modeling techniques, and costbenefit analysis.
Thorough understanding of the project life cycle process to effectively manage through the complexities of the business solution.
Exceptionally strong leadership and communication skills to effectively manage multidisciplinary teams.
Expert knowledge in requirement management with experience analyzing complex workflows.
","['javascript', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['javascript', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Sr. Business Analyst
Los Angeles, CA
Responsibilities:
Extract and integrate data from multiple databases/system sources via SQL and reporting tools to support status reporting and analytical efforts related to ecommerce management, services, execution, planning and tracking.
Develop and manipulate spreadsheets, databases, and data and web analytical tools
Cross service analysis that focuses on video, music and gaming divisions.
An understanding of a la carte and subscription based business models.
Defining the annual budget across services including revenue and cost projections, operating profit and P&L view development
Tracking and reporting multiple critical financial indicators to leadership on a monthly basis including revenue, studio and label revenue share payments, development and marketing costs, marketing value analysis, etc.
Financial modeling of various business structure, M&A options for various services within the business
Financial modeling and business case development for new growth ventures across services.
Develop data analysis and status reports as the need arises to meet management requirements
Provide thought-leadership in ongoing financial measurement and analysis of SIE's services.
Identify new insights and opportunities for analytic projects
Analyze data from online marketing campaigns: user response, web site conversions, feature usage, attrition rates.
Support online customer analyses, such as: Customer Segmentation, Retention Analysis, Lifetime Value Analysis, Marketing return on investment, Brand Research, Site Utilization
Provide detailed monthly and quarterly financial overviews to management.
Participate and support in delivering results and presentations to clients
Qualifications:
SQL programming skills required
R Visualization experience
SPSS Modeler/SAS (Enterprise Guide)/SAS (Enterprise Miner) or similar experience
Business Model development and Forecasting abilities
Minimum 4 years of experience in a business intelligence role, marketing analysis, business and/or financial management tasks for commercial organizations, preferably within the ecommerce space.
A BA/BS Degree is required
Experience with standard BI Tools (Tableau, MicroStrategy, Business Objects, , Cognos, etc.)
and web tools including Omniture, DFA, Webtrends, Visual Science, Coremetrics, WebSideStory, etc
Expert user of Microsoft Office (Work, Excel, Access, Project, and PowerPoint) as well as Visio in order to prepare all documents, presentations, tables, briefings, and worksheets Strong written & verbal communication skills
All persons will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, pregnancy, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, legally protected physical or mental disability, covered veteran status, status in the U.S. uniformed services, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, genetic information or membership in any other legally protected category.
#LI-GD1
","['cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'spss', 'sa']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['cogno', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'spss', 'sa', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
· The primary responsibility of an entry-level business analyst includes supporting data gathering and providing review and analysis of data.
· Other day-to-day duties include ensuring data integrity, participating in data quality control and validation, and producing requirements documents for various business development activities.
· An entry-level business analyst may also create and execute test scripts under supervision.
Qualification and Experience
· Bachelor’s / Master’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems., Electrical Engineering, Electronics Engineering, Management Information Systems, Software Engineering.
· 0-2 years of Prior Industry Experience is a plus.
",[None],"['supervis', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['supervis', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"TBD
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"The Junior Business Systems Analyst will work with stakeholders from all business units.
The incumbent will be responsible for defining and documenting business processes and software requirements for technology initiatives.
The Jr. Business Systems Analyst works directly with, and provides support to, the business operations, Engineering, quality assurance, and customer service teams.
Responsibilities:
Provides support and feedback within the Business Systems team
Develops, manages and collaborates on standard practices and processes
Build and maintain lasting relationships with all business stakeholders
Actively promote the value of Business Analysis throughout the organization
Responsible for solicitation, analysis, estimation and review of analysis efforts
Perform business and systems analysis and document requirements
Analyze and document Business and System process flow diagrams
Create SDLC artifacts including Business/Functional requirement documents
Qualifications:
Master’s in IT / Computer Science
0-2 years’ relevant experience
Open to Re-locate
Ability to multi-task, organize, take initiative, follow up independently and as a team with minimal supervision
Critical thinking and problem solving skills with minimal supervision
Excellent organization, verbal and written communication skills
Uses knowledge and resources to make informed decisions
Powered by JazzHR
uxtqUEPQvT
",['excel'],"['analyz', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"This position participates in the development of insurance products and analyzes the performance of current insurance policies in force.
* Creates timely financial models and projections based on analyses to support organizational decision making.
* Drives conversations with organizational leaders to understand business implications of current trends.
* Develops financial plans and ad hoc reports for organizational leaders and in support of various initiatives.
* Analyzes industry trends and makes recommendations.
* Evaluates capital expenditures and depreciation.
* Develops automated reporting and forecasting tools for more efficient use of data.
* Develops and tracks key performance indicators to enhance business performance.
* Communicates key performance indicators to stakeholders and business units.
* Prepares presentations for internal and external parties.
* Analyzes the interaction of business units.
* Leads the monitoring of performance of various insurance products.
* Participates in the development of new insurance products.
* Inspires trust and confidence through the strategic and diplomatic handling of relationships.Other Functions* All other duties, as assigned.Competencies* Leadership Qualities.
* Interpersonal Skills.
* Communication Proficiency.
* Time Management Skills.
* Organizational Skills.
* Technical Capacity.
* Personal Effectiveness/Credibility.
* Presentation Skills.
* Good Judgment.
* Ethical Conduct.
* Decision Making Propensity.
* Discretion/Confidentiality Sensitivity.
* Financial Management Prudence.
* Problem Solving/Analytical Skills.
* Thoroughness/Detail-oriented.Managerial/Supervisory ResponsibilityThis position has no direct reports.Work EnvironmentThis job operates in a professional office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, filing cabinets and fax machines.Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk and to hear.
The employee frequently is required to sit and stand; walk; use hands to hold, handle or feel; and reach with hands and arms.Position Type and Expected Hours of WorkThis is a full-time position.
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.QualificationsRequired Education and Experience* Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance or Economics* Advanced knowledge of Microsoft ExcelPreferred Education and Experience* 3-5 years of related experience in the insurance industry* EAS/Sungard and BizNet experience
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend']"
BA,"Absolutely-56.7% in year-over-year revenue growth in 2016.
Definitely.
**What You'll Be Doing:** The Business Analyst (BA) is responsible for the creation and documentation of business requirements, standard processes and operational workflows that improve efficiency through process reengineering and automation.
The position will partner with internal and external Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) to build detailed requirements and provide end-to-end analytical oversight during project life cycle.
The incumbent will act as a dependable liaison between Information Technology (IT) and NCH business partners to interpret requirements, set expectations and conduct Joined Application Requirements gathering sessions (JARs) for larger initiatives Ideal candidate will be able to provide subject matter expertise about Healthcare Products and Implementations/Expansions for internal and external clients.
Resource will have direct interaction with Senior Leadership and Operational Business Owners.
+ Serves as the main point of contact to document scope changes and obtain internal/external stakeholder approvals in relation to requirements.
+ Tracks requirements to the test cases during QA testing by reviewing results/approvals to ensure high quality of deliverables.
+ Determines operational objectives by studying business functions, gathering information, evaluating output requirements and formats.
+ Communicates directly with Implementation Management team to insure timely updates to the scope / requirements + Act as a liaison between IT and NCH business units by: + Providing clear definition of requirements and insuring complete understanding by technical team + Providing a single point of contact for business units into IT and acts as a conduit between the two organizations in relation to the scope and project's requirements + Making recommendations for product enhancements + Participate in business process modeling sessions, acting as a documentarian, co-facilitator, facilitator or subject matter expert in sketch sessions.
+ Conduct interviews and perform analysis to create business cases for projects.
+ Conduct preliminary investigation for all project requests.
Review requirements, specifications, test, support and training plans to ensure they are in line with business objectives on projects.
+ Participate in root cause analysis to recommend product enhancements or other appropriate actions to improve productivity for both the business units and IT.
+ May assist as a project coordinator with selected initiatives.
+ Coordinate training development and work with training staff for timely rollout of new product/process.
+ Provide subject matter expertise in healthcare processing and utilization management processes Claims processes expertise is desired but not required + Identifies process areas for improvement in collaboration with IT and business operations team.
Uses fact base data analysis for sizing opportunity and recommends prioritization based on operations provided ROI (Return on Investment) + Conduct requirement gathering sessions with SMEs, document requirements, and builds prototype (as required) to obtain stakeholder sign-off.
+ Maintains regular and consistent attendance.
+ Performs other duties as needed.
**The Experience You'll Need (Required):** To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
+ Bachelor's degree in healthcare administration, information systems or a related field.
+ Equivalent education and experience combined may be accepted.
+ Business analyst experience, including three (3) years in managed care business is a plus.
+ Prior experience with NCH operations is a plus.
+ Project Management experience is a plus + Demonstrates proven ability to understand utilization management, healthcare claims processing and quickly grasp new technology.
+ Possesses effective verbal/written communication skills, especially via phone, with the ability to interact with various levels of personnel.
+ Able to work in a fast-paced environment, demonstrate excellent problem solving, critical thinking, and organizational skills.
+ Performs multiple tasks efficiently and accurately, have exceptional attention to detail and perform consistent work product validation/QA.
+ Self-motivated, self-directed, team oriented, and responsible, with a positive attitude and a proactive style.
Possesses the ability to operate in a highly variable work environment.
**
",['excel'],"['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"--------
Browse other high-impact jobs at withdolphin.com.
--------
They are seeking a proactive, multi-tasking, and collaborative Business Analyst to join their Los Angeles team.
The primary focus of the role is to ensure effective communication and serve as a liaison between researchers, engineers, product teams, designers, and senior leaders.
The ideal candidate must be self-directed to support the needs of different teams and products.
How You’ll Contribute
Document project requirements from a business and technical perspective; Work on product documentations, such as product FAQs, internal wiki pages, and training materials to help promote the broader team’s product knowledge
Communicate detailed requirement specifications to the development team
Do user research and explore user requirements, write user stories, and work with engineers to prioritize and launch features.
2+ years of technology industry experience working as a business/technical analyst
Experience conducting and administering several types of testing, for instance, User acceptance testing (UAT), regression testing, integration testing, etc.
Experience with ownership of deliverables for analytics or leading data-driven large-scale product features
Solid experience in writing SQL queries
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong written and verbal communication skills including technical writing skills
Bonus Points If You Have
Experience in technical product enterprise solutions and technical client facing integrations
Real-world coding experience in Python, Java, C++, Perl
Experience delivering commercial applications in AWS, Azure, or Google Cloud platform
--------
Browse other high-impact jobs at withdolphin.com.
--------
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Experience:
Business Analysis: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Language:
English (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
","['python', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'perl', 'azur', 'java']","['regress', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['python', 'google cloud', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'perl', 'azur', 'java', 'regress', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
El Segundo
Position Overview
This role interfaces and engages directly with the Front Office Portfolio, Risk, and Operational managers.
The ideal candidate enjoys a challenge and has the ability to frame and communicate complex issues in a way that everyone can understand.
Primary Responsibilities
Interface with business leads and functional SMEs, to identify and capture current state process flow and business requirements
Hands-on role in the creation and maintenance of critical project artifacts in particular; business requirements, system specifications, process flows and test/use case scripts
Work with project team to identify future state process flows and requirements to meet project objectives and strategic goals
Facilitate design review meeting and capture outcomes and update solution and requirement documentation
Prepare and present analysis findings to senior stakeholders and steering committees
Support the design and decision-making process with IT and business subject matter experts
Ensure clear communication is maintained across the project team and externally to all stakeholders
Qualifications & Experience
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Finance or similar field
Experience working across, and switching between, multiple projects concurrently
Experience with vendor implementation projects and internal build technology projects
Experience creating project artifacts for data driven initiatives i.e.
data dictionaries, data flow diagrams and data validation requirements
Comfortable working with and analysing large and complex data sets and the ability to distill and communicate findings
Proficient in both waterfall and agile methodologies
High degree of financial product literacy
Experience working directly with trading desks and/or portfolio managers
Experience performing detailed business analysis
Highly proactive, willing to take ownership of issues and follow through to resolution
Has the ability to be flexible and to adapt to changing circumstances and priorities
Organizationally diligent and meticulous with details
Is personable, open, and engaging, with a customer-facing attitude
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Responsibilities
Work closely with customers to identify and document their as-is and to-be states and requirements
Foster collaboration, innovation and creativity within the BA Team and among cross-functional internal and customer project team members
Serve as the conduit between the customer community and the product management team for application enhancements
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs
New York, Los Angeles or Lebanon
Desired Skills and Experience
3 to 6 Years of overall professional work experience as a Business Analyst
Degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent work experience
Knowledgeable in Agile / Scrum and UML modeling
General knowledge of the entertainment, high tech or life sciences and/or experience in one or more of the following process areas is a plus:
Intellectual Property and Rights Management
Royalty accounting
Licensing and distribution
Contract management
Listening skills, to understand what people say and to detect what they might be hesitant to say
Analytical skills, to critically evaluate the information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a more general understanding, distinguish presented user requests from the underlying true needs, and distinguish solution ideas from requirements
Ability to work hard and thrive in a fast-paced environment while managing multiple projects
Ability to work as part of a team and interface with software developers for a large enterprise system
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Able to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts
Ability to listen to business requirements and translate them into application configurations
Able to travel 60 – 80% on an average yearly basis
No Visa restrictions
",['excel'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Media)
Los Angeles CA
6+ Months
• 5-7+ years of professional work experience
• Prior experience in Media & Entertainment industry is mandatory
• Prior experience and understanding of IT application development projects is must.
• Should have atleast 2 IT project experience with Media customer
• Prior experience as an Business Analyst with strong customer facing skills
• Be part of and execute discovery, requirement gathering workshop with client
• Exposure and knowledge on contract lifecycle management process is preferred
• Creation and review closure of wire frames and design documents
• Creation of business requirement document
• Coordinate and lead the UAT execution
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Serve as support structure for Privacy Office initiatives that required Brand Outreach (e.g.
Will act as liaison between Privacy office and BrandProduct owners across the portfolio Will take legal and technical requirements and translate them into business and product owner communications and work with communications and training leads to execute against training and communications roadmap.
Will interface with Product owners to take feedback, test , troubleshoot implementations Will communicate concerns issues from the Privacy office and recommend solutions Requirements Project Management, Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related technical field.
Strong numeracy and analytical skills and experience working with complex data Comfortable working with, and ability to summarize key findings from, large data sets.
Strong computer skills and knowledge of databases Experience in aggregating, manipulating and visualizing data into actionable insight Methodical, accurate and organized with excellent attention to detail Clear, concise verbal and written communication skills Ability to work independently with ability to take initiative and prioritize workloads Ability to cope in a dynamic changeable environment in a calm and professional manner Ability to communicate to all levels of the organization, and with global teams Ability to identify risks throughout the project and providing mitigation strategy Strong Business AcumenSavvy
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Researching client organizations and industries – primarily, but not restricted to, financial services, consumer goods/retail, and tech/media/telecom
Identifying client issues related to long term growth, product positioning, marketing, operational improvements and efficiency, etc.
Creating hypotheses and collecting data to analyze from financial statements, Key Performance Indicators (KPIs) and benchmarks reports, industry metrics, and other relevant data sets
Analyzing large quantitative data sets using Excel to translate raw data into meaningful and digestible insights, and building advanced financial models using Excel where necessary to validate hypotheses
Preparing detailed PowerPoint presentations, business memos, and supporting documents to recommend course of action to key C-Suite executives, decision makers, and other stakeholders
Moving the client to action; developing pilots and outlining full-scale project plans to implement the strategic recommendations
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree with outstanding academic performance; Economics major or a related field with coursework in business/accounting/finance required
Proven record of leadership
Demonstrated critical thinking and problem-solving skills
Proficiency in structured analysis (financial modeling and/or statistical experience strongly preferred)
Ability to thrive in a service-oriented environment and maintain healthy relationships with both team members and clients
Strong attention to detail, organizational skills, and ability to handle multiple tasks in a dynamic setting
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills (both oral and written)
Ability to collaborate effectively with teammates and managers
Eagerness to learn and a desire to achieve personal and professional growth
Commitment to high-quality, on-time client service
All information received will be kept in strict confidence and used only for employment-related purposes.
Given the number of received applications, only short-listed candidates will be contacted for an interview.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Successful candidate will • Design and implement UI/UX best practices for apps and reporting • Design and implement reporting templates and documents • Help design and implement internal customer apps for work intake and performance measurement
Job category
Branch
Pay rate
Posted date
5/11/2020
Job ID
Job type
3-5 years experience managing application and reporting UI/UX
1-3 years creating Microsoft based CX solutions
1-3 years business analyst experience writing user stories and managing backlog or same period gathering, documenting, prioritizing, and managing requirements
",['microsoft'],['busi'],999.0,"['microsoft', 'busi']"
BA,"Ref ID: 00510-0011489597Classification: Project Manager
Compensation: $45.00 to $55.00 hourly
Key Responsibilities:
• Oversee and manage the operational aspects of ongoing projects and serve as a liaison between project management and planning, project team, and line management.
• Review status of projects and prepare status reports
• Review of Excel project data and assess progress and completion.
• Assess project issues and develop resolutions to meet productivity, quality and client satisfaction goals and objectives.
• Develop mechanisms for monitoring project progress and for intervention and problem solving with project and line managers, clients and other stakeholders
Job Requirements:
3+ years of prior relevant experience- Bachelor's degree in accounting or finance
Project Management detail oriented (PMP) Certification a huge plus
2-5 years of related experience or no experience with an advanced degree
Must be detail oriented
Must be proficient in Excel (v-lookups, large amounts of data)
Excellent communication skills and the ability to work independently.
Experience in a range of project management software like Microsoft Project, SmartSheet or other similar applications
If you meet the above requirements, please email me a copy of your resume at anjali.chandel@rhmr.com
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'commun']"
BA,"ONLY W2.
Candidates local to Los Angeles, CA preferred.
The Business Analyst will work with Product Management team to fine tune features and convert features into user stories.
They will be responsible for grooming stories with developers and QA team members.
As a part of SAFe process, this position will also prioritize user stories into future sprints while taking dependencies into consideration.
Responsibilities:
Work with Product Management to understand features and minimize gaps in requirements.
Responsible for converting features into user stories.
Ensure backlog is prioritized while taking technical and business dependencies into consideration.
Groom user stories with developers and QA to ensure requirements are clear and the team is ready to execute.
Demo stories to stakeholders and gather feedback.
Troubleshoot issues as they arise in various production and non-production environments.
Qualifications:
2 years experience as a Business Analyst or a Product Owner.
Proven ability to transform features into well-articulated business requirements as user stories.
Outstanding problem solving skills, attention to detail and ability to find the correct solution for complex business problems.
Self-motivated and able to handle requests from multiple team members with competing priorities.
Must have strong organization and communication skills.
Excellent written and verbal skills.
Understand agile software development process.
Strong proficiency with collaboration and agile tools (Rally, JIRA, Confluence) is a plus.
Experience with SQL is a plus.
Job Type: Contract
Pay: Up to $45.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 4 years (Required)
product owner: 3 years (Required)
Jira/ Rally/ Confluence: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Los Angeles, CA (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'jira', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'tune']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'tune']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will work with Product Management team to fine tune features and convert features into user stories.
They will be responsible for grooming stories with developers and QA team members.
As a part of SAFe process, this position will also prioritize user stories into future sprints while taking dependencies into consideration.
Responsibilities:
• Work with Product Management to understand features and minimize gaps in requirements.
• Responsible for converting features into user stories.
• Ensure backlog is prioritized while taking technical and business dependencies into consideration.
• Groom user stories with developers and QA to ensure requirements are clear and the team is ready to execute.
• Demo stories to stakeholders and gather feedback.
• Troubleshoot issues as they arise in various production and non-production environments.
Qualifications:
• 2 years experience as a Business Analyst or a Product Owner.
• Proven ability to transform features into well-articulated business requirements as user stories.
• Outstanding problem solving skills, attention to detail and ability to find the correct solution for complex business problems.
• Self-motivated and able to handle requests from multiple team members with competing priorities.
• Must have strong organization and communication skills.
• Excellent written and verbal skills.
• Strong proficiency with collaboration and agile tools (Rally, JIRA, Confluence) is a plus.
• Experience with SQL is a plus.
","['excel', 'jira', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'tune']",999.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'tune']"
BA,"JOB TITLE: Business Systems AnalystSkills:
• FIS IBS Core Banking experience required
• Professional experience in consumer lending strongly preferred
• Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
• Prior mortgage experience from point of sale to servicing.
• Understanding of federal/state regulatory policies and procedures.
• Thorough knowledge software development and maintenance methodologies including quality assurance and business cycle testing.
• Ability to develop detailed, clearly written business requirements and system/process workflows.
• Experience with planning, designing, and execution of user acceptance testing.
• Intermediate to advanced proficiency in MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio.
• Working knowledge of agile/scrum practices.
• Proven ability to lead projects and initiatives to achieve desired business results.
• Strong attention to detail and possess exceptional organizational skills.
• Excellent verbal and written communications skills.
• College degree preferred.
#LI-TS1
s•com is an Equal Opportunity Employer - All qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful under applicable law.
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Maintain and support Parts Application System to support AHM Parts Division Business operation.
Also maintain and support Parts Application system in the area of Parts Purchasing and Parts Inventory related to Invoice Balancing, shipping (Dealer Orders and Transfer Orders) as well as Demand Planning and Forecasting, and Order projection.
Responsibilities:
Analyzes business parts operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation
Works with business partners within one business function to align technology solutions with business strategies
Supports several moderately complex business processes • Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration, or other related field or equivalent work experience
13 years of relevant technical or business work experience
Skills required - SQL queries, project management, vendor management, Windows, Word for Windows, and System Design Life Cycle Concepts
Broad knowledge of hardware and software
Ability to learn quickly and contribute to a team effort
Excellent interpersonal and client-handling skills with the ability to manage expectations and have a logical approach to problem solving
","['excel', 'sql']","['analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"A reference data technology team focusing on building a strategic data quality platform is looking for an individual to fulfill a senior business analyst role working in a fast-paced environment.
The individual will be working closely with senior project and program managers as well as teams of developers and senior business analysts gathering project updates, coordinating production rollouts, creating and maintaining notification distribution, organizing and maintaining project deliverables and manage a global team.
Basic requirements:
Ability to quickly learn with minimal guidance.
Proactively communicate and collaborate with the application clients to gather business and functional requirements and deliver artifacts such as FRD, BRD, Use Cases, GUI, Screen and Interface designs.
Masters Degree in Information Systems or Computer Science and/or Masters and Finance background is a plus.
Knowledge of MS Excel, PowerPoint, Work, and Visio.
Oracle SQL Developer knowledge is preferred.
Qualifications:
0-3 years of relevant industry experience, preferably in financial industry.
Candidate must have knowledge of financial instruments and/or KYC, and/or accounts/entity data.
Strong analytical and project management skills required, in depth knowledge of SDLC, and thorough understanding of how to interpret business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.
Strong communication skills, ability to run user prioritization forums, senior management engagements, and facilitate training programs spanning multiple time zones.
Powered by JazzHR
KspBzDVaP2
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'oracl', 'sql']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Westminster, CA
•Submits mandatory compliance reports and survey responses to leaders.
•Coordinates data collection for reports and surveys across multiple OU’s.
•Monitors and tracks regulatory reporting requirements, including deadlines and escalations as needed.
•Stores reports in the SharePoint and Cobblestone document library.
•Develops and conducts annual reviews of reporting procedures and processes.
•Perform other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications
•3 years of experience with pulling and analyzing data, producing reports, and compiling surveys.
•Experience using the following Microsoft tools: Excel, PowerPoint, Word, and SharePoint.
Develops compliance reports and responses to surveys and data requests working with OU compliance professionals, attorneys, and subject matter experts.
Job category
Branch
Pay rate
Posted date
5/28/2020
Job ID
Job type
Experience using the following Microsoft tools: Excel, PowerPoint, Word, and SharePoint.Develops compliance reports and responses to surveys and data requests working with OU compliance professionals, attorneys, and subject matter experts
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"That's the power of true partnership.
Job Requirements:
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Nice to Have Familiarity with Saleforce ecosystemfamily of Products Unique Skill Sets Desired MUST have 7+ years Business Analyst experience with a solid technical background
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Position Type: Full Time Experienced, Full Time Entry Level
Job Responsibilities:
5: Monitors project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
7: Responsible for converting features into user stories.
Job Qualifications:
1:BS or MS degree in business administration, information systems, or business related field.
2: 2-3 years experience as a Business Analyst or a Product Owner
5: Proven ability to transform features into well-articulated business requirements as user stories
9: Experience with SQL is a plus
Compensation: Competitive Salary plus bonus
Offer sponsorship for H1B, Green Card etc
Contact: Alex
Job Function: Information Technology Business Analyst
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $55,000.00 to $80,000.00 /year
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $55,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
The job can be conducted remotely until Covid-19
Experience:
Business Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Agile Project Management: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL: 2 years (Preferred)
use case development: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Master's (Preferred)
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
www.ames-it-solutions.com
",['sql'],"['busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['sql', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Key Tasks:
Provides highly complex analytical support through the analysis and interpretation of data in support of cross-functional business operations
Leads the development of annual operating plans, capital budgets and forecasts, and build business cases for new business initiatives
Develops, prepares and analyzes highly complex reports for management review
Defines highly complex business requirements and provides analysis toward operational efficiency and drives change within the organization
Analyzes actual results against plan and forecast and recommends interventions where appropriate
Identifies opportunities for improvement in operational performance and notifies management of issues and problems requiring immediate attention
Works cross-functionally in analyzing, designing and developing business solutions
Provides analytical support for multiple, highly complex, projects simultaneously, establishes work plans and timelines; Coordinates with internal and external sources
Make presentations to various levels of management
Works under limited supervision, using established procedures
May instruct, guide and oversee work of lower-level professionals and/or non-exempt staff
REQUIREMENTS:
B.A/B.S.
degree and seven years of related experience and/or training, or equivalent combination of education and experience
Expert knowledge of automated systems in a production or operations environment
Ability to identify, analyze and resolve the most complex cross-functional problems related to business operations statistical analysis methodology
Expert knowledge of and ability to perform analyses such as, GAP analysis, process mapping, root-cause analysis, risk analysis and requirements gathering
Expert knowledge of PCs and related software applications
Excellent interpersonal and verbal/written communication skills
Excellent writing and presentation skills
Superior math, analytical and problem-solving skills and use of analytical tools (e.g.
MiniTab, Excel graphs)
Demonstrated project management skills
Ability to provide work direction to others
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'graph', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"clients.
Responsibilities:
• Work with the
business, leading user groups, to define and document leading edge business
processes
• Work with developers
in order to create a simple, meaningful, efficient solution to business and
systems requirements, and present this solution and obtain buy-off from the
user community.
• Generate requirements
documents that document the solution in business terms, and create clear
requirements to enable application development
• Develop test cases
for new designs that validate the process and the system solution, and be
willing to execute testing for bug fixes and new capabilities being released.
• Provide project
management skills to properly set and manage expectations and assure solution
delivery
• Understand data
modeling and be able to write SQL Queries against MS-SQL databases in order to
do define needed data structures to meet business requirements, do data
analytics, create “simple data update” statements, and generate reports using
SSRS
• As part of the
applications team, monitor/manage Change Requests (bugs and enhancement), and
be willing to operate the business applications Help Desk Phone
• Create and hold
formal training sessions for the user community
• Write/update
reference/user guides.
Basic Qualifications:
• Undergraduate degree
from an accredited university or college
• Minimum of 5 years of
experience operating as a business analyst with at least 2 years of experience
within manufacturing, quality, human resources, purchasing, or supply chain
management
• At least 2 years of
experience creating SQL queries and reports
• Minimum of 5 years of
experience operating as a business analyst with at least 2 years of experience
within manufacturing, quality, human resources, purchasing, cost accounting, or
supply chain management.
Preferred Skills and
Experience:
• Experience working in
a manufacturing or production environment
• Proven track record
of leading functional groups, defining, document and deploying process change
and associated systems capabilities
• SQL proficiency in
MS-SQL
• Ability to define,
document and create reports
• Strong analytical and
conceptual skills with the ability to create original and creative solutions
• Must have the ability
to cope with significant complexity while creating or modifying solutions
• The ability to work
closely with users, and be proficient with requirements gathering techniques
• Proven analytical
skills to properly evaluate and interpret cross-functional business
requirements
• Ability to resolve
complex issues related to enterprise-wide business requirements
• Strong presentation,
verbal, and written communications skills
• Development
experience a plus""
immediate consideration, please send your updated resume and contact info via
email sabir.ahmed@prolim.com or Contact (248) 876-0896 Ext 221.
companies.
They understand business as much as technology, and help their
customers improve their profitability and efficiency by providing high-value
technology consulting, staffing, and project management outsourcing
services.
Their IT and
PLM consulting offerings include; Advisory, PLM Software/Services, Program
Management, Solution Architecture Training/Staffing, Cloud Solutions, Servers/Networking,
Infrastructure, ERP Practices and QA Services.
Engineering services include
Data Translation, CAD/CAM/CAE, Process & Product Engineering, Prototyping,
and Testing/Validation within a wide range of markets and industries.
","['erp', 'sql', 'cloud', 'ssr']","['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['erp', 'sql', 'cloud', 'ssr', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Summary of Job Scope and Expectations:
The Business Analyst position is responsible for gathering business requirements and translates them into project documentation.
This position creates diagrams and process flows to support project documentation.
The Business Analyst participates in QA, user testing, and technical training.
This position understands both end-user systems and job functions in order to improve both.
Essential functions:
Reliable and dependable attendance is required.
Descriptions
Gathers business requirements and translates them into project documentation.
Creates diagrams and process flows to support project documentation.
Participates in QA, user testing, and technical training.
Records issues found during testing; ensures a timely resolution, working with the development team and DBA.
Begins to understand existing system design and functionality.
Acts as liaison between IS, business and vendors to resolve issues.
JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelors degree in Business, IS or related field
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:
Knowledge of basic accounting, P&L, B/S, COGS
Understanding of use case concepts
Strong computer/technology skills and proficient in Microsoft Office Suite and Visio
Communication (oral and written), presentation and facilitation skills
Financial and project management and analysis skills
Critical thinking and analysis skills and demonstrates proactive behavior
Time management, prioritization, and organizational skills
Ability to solve problems independently
Ability to work positively with other departments and Operations (win/win)
Ability to talk and share before a group
Ability to embrace change and continuous learning
",['microsoft'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Number: 341660
Position Type: Temporary
Required Skill Set:
HTML5, Java, Python, SQL, XML
**C2C is not available**
*Only U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. can be considered as W2 candidates.
**
Title:Business Analyst - Contractor Specialist
Duration:06/29/2020 to 01/23/2021
Descriptions:
Areas of Focus: Perform design and development of reports/dashboards using a range of modern business intelligence tools, including, Tableau, Alteryx (for ETL), Power BI or similar BI tools (e.g., Business Objects) in an Agile methodology.
SQL knowledge is a must.
Having hands on experience in web development including HTML5, Java/.Net to render Tableau reports into a web page is an add-on advantage for this role.
Having Python/R coding knowledge is nice to have.
Ability to work with internal customers to understand, translate and document reporting and dashboard requirements.
Experience with data modeling in support of systems migration or similar projects.
Create reports/dashboards and perform data collection and analysis utilizing data from various Client internal systems, including Oracle, SQL Server, relational databases as well other sources (e.g., data warehouse, vendor extracts, XML, JSON and flat file / text based structures).
Technical Skills:
Must haves: Tableau, Alteryx, SQL
Add-On advanatge : HTML5, Java/.Net
Nice to have: Python/R coding
Demonstrate flexibility in extracting and blending data from multiple source systems.
Ability to adapt quickly to change in a complex project environment.
Additional:
Bachelors degree required
8+ years of experience in the relevant functional and technical area described above
Expert understanding of databases, data relationships, quality and integrity.
Requires well developed communication skills, including excellence working in a team setting.
Excellent customer service focus, and excellent organizational and time management skills.
Capable of multi-tasking in a fast paced working environment.
Problem solving skills including the ability to research and answers key questions not answerable using known sources.
Must be able to work in a Labor/Management Partnership environment.
Demonstrated ability to provide status updates on project deliverables and autonomy in working against expected timelines.
Education: Bachelors
#CBRose#
","['power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java']","['dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'oracl', 'java', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Analyst as a consultant to support the CRM applications for the Field Sales, Sales Operations, Marketing, Sales Management business functions.
The candidate must have extensive experience in business systems analysis, software quality assurance testing, writing and listening skills, cloud implementation, and is able to work independently once provided direction and objectives.
This role will be working with the Business users to document business requirements and process diagrams and translate them into functional requirements for development.
Collaborate with team members to analyze end user issues and requests and perform functional and regression testing to support the execution of Customer Relationship Management strategies.
Responsibilities include middot Participating in deployment projects as a business analyst ndash including but not limited to requirements analysis, requirements documentation, and the creation and execution of test scripts.
middot Documenting business requirements, process diagrams and flows, functional requirements and data mapping.
middot Development and execution of testing of CRM application functionality in support of the release plan.
middot Performing functional testing and regression testing to validate the changes before moving to production.
middot Incorporating industry best practice in requirements analysis and system testing methodologies into standard work middot Supporting various business functions such as field sales and internal sales operation users on the all sales and marketing application and related business processes by analyzing and troubleshooting end user reported application issues.
middot Facilitating update and collaboration meetings with the business users and IT team.
middot Other tasks and duties as assigned.
Minimum Requirements middot Bachelorrsquos degree, preferably in computer science, business, or other relevant field.
middot 5 ndash 7 years of relevant business analysis and QA experience, preferably in healthcare or other relevant field.
middot Experience in Salesforce and SAP Cloud for Customer applications middot Experience working in and understanding large, complex global deployment projects.
middot Well versed in test planning and execution middot Well versed in waterfall SDLC and agile scrum methodologies.
middot Salesforce administrator certification is a huge plus.
Skills Qualifications middot Deep understanding of CRM Sales, Service and Quote To Cash processes.
middot Detailed understanding of and experience with building formal user and functional requirements, and quality assurance artifacts.
middot Experience having worked functionally across the organization to ensure global alignment on the use and impact of any changes in the applications.
middot Understands system infrastructure, and master data models.
middot Experience having been an active participant in complex systems projects and project groups.
middot Strong interpersonal skills with the proven ability to collaborate with cross functional teams.
middot Strong verbal and written communication skills middot Ability to liaise at all levels under pressure.
middot Strong training and technical presentation skills.
middot Demonstrated ability to multi-task and prioritize in a fast-paced environment.
middot A Certificate in any of the following is a plus Business Analysis, Systems Analysis, Salesforce.com.
middot SAP, SAP Cloud for Customer, Marketo knowledge a plus
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role and Responsibilities Determines and analyzes business needs and userrsquos strategic information requirements to define optimum systems requirements.
Write and maintain use case documents for business requirements.
Conducts tests, monitor results, and insures that the requirements are met.
Plans, schedules, and conducts online and batch tests, monitor results, and insures that the documented requirements are met.
Write and maintain test cases for difference applications.
Responds to all inquiries from internal and external customers as well as from carrier and vendor partners.
Keeps users current when new data and functionality become available.
Resolves and closes assigned work orders in the IT Departmentrsquos Help Desk System.
Helps troubleshoot the issue and provides steps to development team Other duties as assigned.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"On an as needed basis, the Business Analyst will be assigned the role of Project Manager for initiatives.
Typical duties are comprised of, but are not limited to project scope definition and development, analysis and documentation of business processes, business requirements, and System Specifications.
In addition, the Business Analyst shall verify that developed or acquired solutions meet the specified business needs, and assist with the user acceptance testing and system implementation.
The ideal candidate will have the following responsibilities Understand Child Care Subsidy (CC3) software application and all software applications used by the Agency.
Understand all funding terms and conditions for all subsidy programs.
Provide user support, diagnosis system problems and perform basic administration tasks in support of Child Care Subsidy (CC3) software application.
Interact with vendors, external entities and staff to resolve system issues.
Act as internal consultant to functional areas.
Analyze and document business process and workflow, gather user requirements, and define specifications for systems development or acquisition.
Re-engineer business processes to improve efficiency.
Project Manager for assigned initiatives which include the responsibilities to plan, develop specific course of action, timeframes and deliverables schedule, facilitate and lead meetings required to successfully implement projects, and to implement standardized project methodology.
Prepare and maintain documentation required to capture and communicate pertinent information and produce project deliverables.
Impart in-depth business knowledge to end users and project teams.
Evaluate developed or acquired solutions for optimal efficiency and best match for functional requirements.
Support team members throughout the project lifecycle.
Assist in design and implementation of user training programs.
Keep abreast of child care industry regulations and best practices.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EXPERIENCE, KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES YOU SHOULD POSSESS Bachelor's degree or minimum two (2) years equivalent work experience.
Project Management certification preferred.
Minimum of one year experience as a project lead implementing software applications as functional area proxy.
Four (4) years experience as a business analyst, preferably within a nonprofit environment Must have knowledge of business process analysis, including process documentation, requirements gathering and specification definition.
Must be familiar with project management best practices (PMI) and business process re-engineering methodology.
Knowledge of child care services funding and contractual requirements is desired.
Recruitment, hiring, training, and job assignments are made without regard to race, color, national origin, age, ancestry, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, disability, or any other protected classification.
",[None],"['classif', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi']",1.0,"['classif', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Your team will be 8 in total in a scrum/agile environment.
Preferred Requirements:
3+ years of experience as a Business Analyst
Experience in a scrum / agile environment
Great communication skills, both verbally and written
Knowledge of project management tools such as Jira and Confluence
Experience working with both technical and non-technical stakeholders
4 year degree in related field
Salary:
Up to 80K for the right person
Perks:
Completely work from home for now until Covid passes
Once people go back into the office, you'll receive 2-3 days per week telecommute options
Casual Dress Code
Full benefits
#zrcm
",['jira'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Key Tasks Provides highly complex analytical support through the analysis and interpretation of data in support of cross-functional business operations Leads the development of annual operating plans, capital budgets and forecasts, and build business cases for new business initiatives Develops, prepares and analyzes highly complex reports for management review Defines highly complex business requirements and provides analysis toward operational efficiency and drives change within the organization Analyzes actual results against plan and forecast and recommends interventions where appropriate Identifies opportunities for improvement in operational performance and notifies management of issues and problems requiring immediate attention Works cross-functionally in analyzing, designing and developing business solutions Provides analytical support for multiple, highly complex, projects simultaneously, establishes work plans and timelines Coordinates with internal and external sources Make presentations to various levels of management Works under limited supervision, using established procedures May instruct, guide and oversee work of lower-level professionals andor non-exempt staff REQUIREMENTS B.AB.S.
degree and seven years of related experience andor training, or equivalent combination of education and experience Expert knowledge of automated systems in a production or operations environment Ability to identify, analyze and resolve the most complex cross-functional problems related to business operations statistical analysis methodology Expert knowledge of and ability to perform analyses such as, GAP analysis, process mapping, root-cause analysis, risk analysis and requirements gathering Expert knowledge of PCs and related software applications Excellent interpersonal and verbalwritten communication skills Excellent writing and presentation skills Superior math, analytical and problem-solving skills and use of analytical tools (e.g.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
ZUq0kmVKJj
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will also examine the variables which impact SPT and MPG project profitability including production costs, overall budget variances, market box office trends, and related home entertainment products.
Core Responsibilities Communicate with the business users andor functional teams to develop business requirements and analyze information needs, delivering the follow artifacts as needed Functional Requirements, Business Requirements Documents, Use Cases, Wireframes, Test Cases, and Training Manuals.
Serve as the strategic interface between the users and the vendor andor internal IT groups to resolve problems and fulfill requests for package applications supported by the team.
Develop test scenarios and either test or oversee testing prior to delivery to business users coordinate with internal QA resource pool as needed.
Lead and perform functional testing, includes coordination of QA and UAT tasks.
Work with business users, PM and Senior Business Analysts to re-platform the existing legacy system and expand functionality, reporting and streamline performance in the new system.
Trend analysis helps in forecasting production costs and needs.
Build and maintain automated workflow to obtain approvals and wet signatures for various types of contracts, payments associated with contractual agreements and also cover outstanding commitments.
Participate in team strategic planning, supporting the initial analysis and assessment of proposed projects leading to the development of business cases.
Be proactive in identifying enhancements for existing applications, design user manuals and conduct training.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The candidate will support the new product development as well as the day-to-day maintenance of various studio technology products.
The candidate must possess strong communication skills and analytical skills to effectively work with the business users to determine requirements and translate them into technical solutions.
Create user stories, process modeling and data flow diagrams.
* Drive innovations and efficiency by implementing new business process through technology solutions* Work closely with architect and developers to translate business requirements into technology design and solution.
* Participate in sprint planning and other project activities required by Agile software development methodology* Design, testing and training* Define business rules, wireframes and system functions* Work closely with the business community and testing team to define and execute system testing.
Lead user acceptance testing of applications to ensure the quality of the delivered requirements and overall health of the system* Create user manuals and/or training documents.
Conduct user trainings and drive smooth and efficient implementation of changes* Production Support* Support business users on system configuration, admin and other business activities* Identify system issues.
Trouble shoot and analyze potential solutions including workaround* Work with business users to document, manage and prioritize bug fixings and enhancements* Work with architect and developers to test and release new system functionsQualifications:* Minimum of 5 years' experience as business analyst and/or system analyst* Familiar with SDLC (software development life cycle) and Agile methodology* Proficient with MS Office products, specifically advanced Visio, PowerPoint and Excel skills* Understanding of Entertainment industry and content lifecycle* Experience with Studio process and/or technology solutions such as title/catalog management, contract and deal management, avails, media asset management, work order management, content processing and delivery, B2B or B2C portals and OTT* Familiar with Agile tools such as JIRA and Confluence* Experience in creating, maintaining and supporting all application development artifacts including user stories, process flows, screen mockups, data diagrams, business rule definitions, design documents and reporting scripts* Strong analytical and system design skills, and problem-solving skills, with a track record of seeing tasks through to successful completion.
* Highly responsive with strong interpersonal and written/verbal communication skills* Comfort working in a technical environment and able to clearly communicate technical concepts to both technical and non-technical audiences* Ability to work independently, prioritize and juggle multiple deadlines and projects while keeping peers, partners and supervisor abreast of activities* Self-motivated, accountable, highly organized and have the ability to prioritize in a fast-paced environment* Bachelor's Degree or above in computer science or engineering preferred* MBA degree preferred
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'jira']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"OneLegacy, the non-profit organ and tissue recovery organization serving the seven counties of the greater Los Angeles area, has an immediate opening for a Full Time Business Analyst in the Los Angeles office.
The BA assumes overall performance responsibility for developing and delivering technical solutions to business problems.
The BA works closely with the DSE, Vice President of Information Technology, Chief Operating Officer/Chief Information Officer (COO/CIO), and the software development team to accomplish goals and project objectives.
Qualifications: Bachelor’s degree (BS) in related field from an accredited four-year college or university or equivalent work experience.
Minimum two years of Business Analyst experience or other software experience in a technical environment.
Certified Software Business Analyst or equivalent certification preferred.
Qualified applicants must be able to successfully complete the OneLegacy application and background screening process.
OneLegacy offers a competitive salary and an excellent benefits package.
",['excel'],"['busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Maintain and support Parts Application System to support AHM Parts Division Business operation.
Also maintain and support Parts Application system in the area of Parts Purchasing and Parts Inventory related to Invoice Balancing, shipping (Dealer Orders and Transfer Orders) as well as Demand Planning and Forecasting, and Order projection.
Responsibilities:
Analyzes business parts operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation
Works with business partners within one business function to align technology solutions with business strategies
Supports several moderately complex business processes
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration, or other related field or equivalent work experience
13+ years of relevant technical or business work experience
Skills required - SQL queries, project management, vendor management, Windows, Word for Windows, and System Design Life Cycle Concepts
Broad knowledge of hardware and software
Ability to learn quickly and contribute to a team effort
Excellent interpersonal and client-handling skills with the ability to manage expectations and have a logical approach to problem solving
","['excel', 'sql']","['analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Responsibilities
Conduct research to support Product Managers and Technical Architects on upcoming deliverables and milestones
Brainstorming with Product Managers and Technical Architects to design and integrate software architectures
Analyze business data to identify trends, draw conclusions, and develop recommendations
Work with cross-functional teams to discuss business requirements and effectively translate these requirements to client solutions
Collect and analyze data while also designing mechanisms to discover, monitor, and improve data reporting
Collaborate with cross-functional teams and stakeholders to deeply understand business objectives and create meaningful narratives that drive efficiency
Review and prioritize feature requests and bugs from internal and external stakeholders
Establish standard reporting processes for data analytics, QA, and other responsibilities
Contribute to Product Manager’s product strategy and roadmaps to drive business objectives
Qualifications
1-2 years of experience in project management or project coordination
Quantitative analytical experience and communication skills
Experience as being a key source of knowledge within an organization as it relates to a specific product, feature, etc.
Ability to identify areas of improvement for product processes and propose solutions to streamline workflow for internal and external stakeholders
Genuine interest and motivation to work in an information systems environment
Experience using data to solve business problems
Demonstrated ability to meet deadlines, thrive in a fast-paced work environment and manage multiple tasks simultaneously
Scrappy, resourceful, action and detail-oriented, with a high ownership mindset to deliver measurable impact
Data and insights-driven approach to deeply understanding products and how they work
Proven ability to engage and collaborate with others while using their time effectively
Endless curiosity when it comes to effectively reinventing processes and procedures
Self-starter attitude and ability to work autonomously
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"2+ years recent BA experience - Microsoft Office Suite, Visio, Jira and MS Project - Knowledge of SQL and Web technologies including JavaScript, CSS and HTML - Knowledge of networking and security related to network technologies - Client-server and web application development concepts - Test scripts for validation testing purposes Duties Responsibilities Essential Job Functions Effectively maintains and builds relationships with external business partners and internal department stakeholders.
Responsible for cross-functional activities to ensure all external organizations and internal departments are involved.
Resolves requirement conflicts and barriers as they arise.
Solicits, analyzes, and defines functional and non-functional technical requirements and priorities with the business owners and other cross functional stakeholders using process flows, technical requirements lists, specifications, diagrams, scenarios, mockups, andor models Works directly with customers to develop requirements and see them through the approval process.
Provides clear and consistent communication of requirement status both internally and with business partners and customers.
Monitors the SDLC ensuring that accurate QA and UAT is completed, and participate with developing test cases based on business requirements.
Maintains the Requirement Approval Process and continuously develop improvements.
Assists team members in planning, estimating and controlling requirements.
Captures and manages project risksissues and the execution of risk mitigationcontingency plans and any necessary escalations.
Creates or updates policies and procedures, as required.
Analyzes, develops, prioritizes, communicates and coordinates application changes to fulfill business objectives.
Provides enhanced technical and procedural support for all Help Desk calls.
Participates in user acceptance testing of system enhancements and projects Conducts product spec reviews with key stakeholders to ensure requirements are complete and well understood.
Presents upcoming changes and newly developed features in written format and at department meetings Provides 247 support for mission critical software solutions such as, digitalDONOR which is critical to recovery and call center operations.
Implements advanced strategies for gathering, reviewing and analyzing data requirements.
Prioritizes initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
Manages competing resources and priorities with a great attitude.
Leads ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Competencies and Skills Experience with Microsoft Office Suite, Visio, Jira and MS Project.
Working knowledge of SQL and Web technologies including JavaScript, CSS and HTML.
Basic knowledge of networking and security related to network technologies.
Knowledge of developing test scripts for validation testing purposes.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively in a fast paced and deadline driven environment.
Ability to interact and work with all levels of an organization.
Illustrates a dedication to meeting requirements of internal and external customers, responding to all customer requests promptly and thoroughly.
Strong verbal and written communication skills including ability to work in a team environment, give honest, direct feedback, is a solid verbal and written communicator, and ability to tailor communication to audience.
Ability to present in front of staff at department meetings and in front of existing and new potential customers.
Utilizes initiative and judgment to manage shifting priorities, risks and competing interests of multiple projects.
Meets deadlines, prioritizes appropriately, copes well with change, and maintains composure under pressure.
Strong understanding of both client-server and web application development concepts.
Ability to understand engineering concepts, business case development, modeling techniques, and costbenefit analysis.
Thorough understanding of the project life cycle process to effectively manage through the complexities of the business solution.
Exceptionally strong leadership and communication skills to effectively manage multidisciplinary teams.
Expert knowledge in requirement management with experience analyzing complex workflows.
","['javascript', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['javascript', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"What you'll do:
Analyzes systems to determine root cause of problems and creates system work flow
Partners with and provides support to project stakeholders throughout the SDLC in understanding and clarifying the requirements under examination
Schedule and lead ""Demo” sessions for team to provide overview of the work completed during a sprint
Lead regular story refinement to ensure appropriate level of detail is captured at the right time
What you've done:
Worked with Product Owner on backlog grooming and prioritization
Participated in Sprint Planning, Sprint Demos, Scrum Daily Stand-Ups, Retrospectives and Sprint Refinements
Analyzed existing business processes and identified gaps and areas in need of improvement
Demonstrated the ability to manage multiple tasks and adhere to project schedules
What you'll need to succeed:
5+ years of experience as a Business Analyst
2 years of Agile SCRUM experience
Updating Story Maps, Epics, User Stories, Acceptance Criteria and non-functional requirements
Excellent understanding of the SDLC
Hands on experience maintaining supporting Agile development updating Epics, User Stories and project documentation
Comfortable working with all levels of the organization and building relationships with internal customers
Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to manage multiple assignments in a fast paced work environment
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be responsible for financial analysis, financial modeling, forecasting, disposal reporting, and municipal fee calculations at each month-end.
This position reports to the Senior Manager of Finance and Compliance.Essential Job Functions:* Produce monthly reports of waste disposal and landfill diversion by municipality.
* Prepare monthly reports of municipal franchise fees and other fees (""city fees"") by municipality.
* Develop financial models to assess opportunities for revenue enhancement and cost reduction.
* Assemble information for responding to requests from auditors.
* Respond to requests from cities for ad hoc reports by retrieving and summarizing financial and operational data.
* Update customer accounts in the billing system with NAICS codes and Assessor's Parcel Numbers.
* Supervise the analytical tasks of the administrative staff.Qualifications & Environmental DemandsRequired Qualifications:* Bachelor's degree* 1+ years of experience in an accounting or finance role.
* Operationally oriented with the ability to correlate operating performance and financial trends.
* Experience with financial model developments; building models from 'scratch'.
* Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel (pivot tables, lookups and advanced formula utilization).
* Working knowledge of SQL with the ability to interpret and analyze large amounts of data, summarizing into concise financial models.
* Reporting software experience with Microsoft Access/Crystal Reports.
* Ability to perform physical requirements of the position with or without reasonable accommodations.Preferred Qualifications:* Master's Degree* Waste industry experiencePhysical/Environmental Demands:* Physical:* Sitting, seeing, hearing, & smelling continuously.
* Problem solving, oral/written communication, analytical ability, calculating, concentration, & interpersonal abilities continuously.
* Eye/hand coordination, fingering (typing), handling, & wrist motion continuously.
* Bending, reaching, stretching, standing, & walking occasionally.
* Environmental:* Exposure to dust, smoke, fumes, odors, & noise occasionally.
* Exposure to grease, oil, chemicals, & wet conditions occasionally.
* This position may travel to local sites.BenefitsBenefits:* Comprehensive benefit package Medical, Dental, Vision* 401K, Profit Sharing & Match* Employee Assistance Program* Life Insurance* Paid Vacation and Sick Time* Recognition programs* Professional development learningAthens will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and any other applicable state, federal or local laws.
EEO/M/F/disability/veteran
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"Singapore
Permanent
Business Analyst - e-Commerce
#Business Intelligence
Job responsibilities :
Be responsible for the analysis of the client requirements: identification, definition and organization related to client functional requirements
Be responsible for schedule, quality and workload regarding business and functional needs
Create detailed requirement specifications
Provide support for the project team, working closely with the architect
Ensure the quality of the project by developing test scenarios and participating in the tests phase
Realize training materials and trainings to ensure the ramp-up of the client team
Attend in the preparation of proposals, tender responses and client presentation
Requirements :
Knowledge of ecommerce and Omni-channel stakes on the South East Asia markets (O2O, mobile, marketplaces...);
Knowledge of the functionalities and features of the main ecommerce advanced solutions (hybris, Demandware…);
Analytical, communication and organization skills;
Leadership and ability to work in a team.
Print
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst must have Studio Production experience.
The Business Analyst will be responsible as the liaison between the business and technical groups, gathering and documenting business requirements, designing business processes, developing wireframes, developing high level application designs with the technical teams, and financial analysis or modeling.
The Business Analyst will also examine the variables which impact Studio Productions project profitability including production costs, overall budget variances, market box office trends, and related home entertainment products.
NOTE Only if you have strong ""Studio Production"" experience please call me at 310-717-0476.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Req ID: 177704
The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Business Analyst, Support for the Enterprise Technology- IP Licensing & Dist Solutions department.
This position delivers support work in the area of Sales/Avails within the IP Licensing solution sets, including system production support, incident and backlog resolution and client communication.
This role also works closely with the Support Lead, Program Manager and other Business Analysts to help seamlessly integrate new development objects to ensure the continuance of the overall health of the COSMOS solution.
The Daily
Incident Ticket resolution across the IP Licensing Portfolio.
Document work progress of ticket resolution.
Execute automate and validate automated test scripts and execute manual regression testing of new development objects to avoid interruption of the health of the solution.
Liaise with Business Units to understand prioritization of incidents during critical business process windows.
Partners with Program Developers to achieve optimal resolution of incidents to minimize disruption in the system processes.
The Essentials
2+ years of experience in a technology support role, performing ticket resolution for applications across multiple business functions using a variety of technologies.
1-2 years of experience supporting large scale, complex applications (preferably SAP).
Strong knowledge and practical application of the software development life cycle (SDLC), with industry standard best practice methodologies.
Good understanding of enterprise level systems, preferably SAP (including HANA).
Good understanding of Incident Management Tools (preferably Service Now).
Support Management.
Incident/Backlog Management.
Strong customer service mindset.
Ability to actively listen and incorporate feedback to continuously improve.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be service-oriented.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to work flexible hours, including possible overtime, when necessary.
177704
",['hana'],"['regress', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['hana', 'regress', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Job Code: AS20200507-47349
The Electron Devices Division has an opening for a Business Analyst tosupport the development of a data-driven continuous improvement and quality culture throughout the business.
The selected candidate will transform data into insights that will drive business value.
Through the use of data analytics,data visualization and data modeling techniques, you will identify trends that can help managers make informed strategic and tactical business decisions.
You will identify new opportunities for improvement, including building the roadmap and vision for analytics solutions, data and processes.
Assist in preparing executive-level presentations, including monthly Operations reviews and quarterly functional reviews
Review and validate internal and external data as it is collected
Transform data into actionable insights that drive business value
Present analytical findings in reports, summaries, dashboards, graphs, charts and maps to provide users with detailed intelligence about the state of the business
Identify opportunities to improve processes and strategies with technology solutions
Monitor analytics and metrics results
Implement new data analysis methodologies
Review data files to ensure integrity of data collection and utilization
Perform data profiling to identify and understand anomalies
Drive data clean up efforts within MRP system
Drive overall MRP system roadmap to drive system enhancements alongside the users
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Data Analytics, Engineering, Information Systems, Operations Management or related discipline.
4+ years of relevant experience in a data-driven role.
Advanced-level Microsoft Excel proficiency using pivot tables, formulas and macros
Experience with data warehouse, data modeling and data mining
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
Capable of working cross functionally and collaborating effectively with others to ensure that deliverables are completed on time with high quality
Effective listening, communication, interpersonal and presentation skills
Preferred Additional Skills:
Experience working with Tableau, Power BI and data visualization
Working knowledge of SQL, Python and C#
Lean Green Belt preferred.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python', 'c']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'graph', 'anomali', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'c', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'graph', 'anomali', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'visual', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Determine operational objectives by studying business functions; gathering information; evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Improve systems by studying current practices; designing modifications
Recommend controls by identifying problems; writing improved procedures
",[None],"['recommend', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Number: 340246
Position Type: Temporary
Required Skill Set:
Business Analyst, Copy Writing, Graphic Designer
*C2C is not available**
*Only U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. can be considered as W2 candidates.
**
Title: Business Analyst 3
Estimated Assignment End Date: 10/1/2020
Hours
M-F 8-5
Education
Bachelor's Degree
Overview:
Successful candidate will
Successful candidate will create reports and presentations for senior level executives including C-Suite and potentially board level.
• Design and implement UI/UX best practices for apps and reporting
• Design and implement reporting templates and documents
• Help design and implement internal customer apps for work intake and performance measurement
Qualifications:
• Strong data visualization experience using Microsoft Office tools
• Experience creating advanced and attractive infographics
• Experience creating pitch kits/sales packets
• Graphic design and copywriting experience a big plus
• Will need to see portfolio/work examples in the interview
Preferred Qualifications:
• Graphic design experience
• Copywriting experience
","['c', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['c', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"The Business Analyst also provides analysis of financial performance and contributes to commercial business decisions.
The Business Analyst also leverages knowledge of IT and works on multiple systems to understand information flow and data requirements.
The role supports strategic projects from inception to delivery, creates hypothesis, communicates findings, and builds consensus.
Duties include generating sales projections and forecasts; measuring gap analysis by comparing past sales data and sales plan; and leading financial analysis for determining net income within the business budget.
The Business Analyst’s goal is to drive fresh initiatives and develop new models for financial planning and business intelligence systems.
Responsibilities:
Write data extraction code in SQL server and load the raw data in SAP database.
Clean garbage data using SQL queries and NESTED queries.
Analyze data using trend line algorithms and manage information flow with internal teams and external clients.
Develop, create and modify existing stored procedure SQL code in MySQL server and fix errors to enhance system performance.
Develop enhancements in SAP to build FRICEW (forms, reports, interfaces, conversions, extensions, workflows).
Use ERP software to facilitate ERP to integrate with other applications, build procedures, design workflow rules and translate business requirements to ERP solutions.
Analyze financial performance of the business and contribute to business decisions.
Analyze IT requirements and give advice on the use of IT.
Measure gap analysis by comparing past records and plans.
Analyze business processes and sales data using CRM and create ad hoc sales and financial reports.
Decode BRD into actionable insights and generate reports off of it.
Provide product development training to staff and managers on applications such as CRM and ERP program.
Work with cloud based platform such as Revel and build opportunity pipelines.
Liaise with other IT staff and devise ways to add new software to existing system and analyze system requirements.
Leverage knowledge of IT and assist in troubleshooting ad-hoc computer software related issues.
Minimum Requirements:
Requires a minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in finance, computer systems, or a computer-related field (e.g.
information systems).
","['sql', 'mysql', 'net', 'erp', 'cloud']","['hypothesi', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'clean', 'busi', 'forecast', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['sql', 'net', 'erp', 'cloud', 'hypothesi', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'clean', 'busi', 'forecast', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration City Los Angeles State/Province California Zip/Postal Code 90010
Business Analyst Position Summary The Business Analyst (BA) is primarily responsible for developing quality software requirements alongside business stakeholders.
The BA assumes overall performance responsibility for developing and delivering......
https://innovasourcing.com/lwi9
View similar jobs
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"Consultant will work in a fast paced environment to develop reports and dashboards for the Program Management Office (PMO) using a variety of technologies including MS Access, MS Excel, Business Objects Xi, and Crystal Reports.
Consultant must be an exceptional business analyst and report developer, capable of translating business requirements into high quality PMO reports and dashboards.
Consultant will also be responsible for maintaining/enhancing the PMO's project database in MS Access.
10+ years of Access db development and report writing is required.
They will need to have the ability to develop and prepare business analyses and plans and develop and deliver presentations.
The reports produced will be used for program planning, business requirements management, budget execution and program coordination.
Validates resource requirements and develops cost estimate models.
Conducts and coordinates financial, operational, and related research to support strategic and Business/IT planning within the Revenue Cycle Program.
Interprets, evaluates, and interrelates research data, and develops integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision-making.
i.e.
RPM data, Cognos, PMOS, etc..
Needs to be able to present findings of studies to RC Leadership.
Provides consultative, advisory, technical, and staff support, as appropriate.
Knowledge of the principles of strategic business decision-making.
Ability to process computer data and to format and generate reports.
Ability to create, compose, and edit written materials.
Consultative and advisory skills.
Skill in the use of computerized spreadsheet, relational database, and word processing software.
Experience Level:
BA or BS required, plus minimum 5-10years of direct relevant experience.
Knowledge of project management principles, practices, techniques, and tools.
Knowledge and appreciation of Healthcare Industry is required.
Has the ability to support an Access db and report writing.
Ability to develop and prepare business analyses and plans.
Ability to develop and deliver presentations.
Design and implement Project Management reports and dashboards Manage/Enhance Project Management Database Analyze project data and make reporting recommendations Highly analytic, systems thinker Exceptional communicator
Ability to translate business concepts into technical design and implementation Thrives in an iterative environment,
Daily Responsibilities:
1.
BI Solution architecture design
2.
Develop prototypes, design, develop dashboards, reports in Tableau and/or Power BI
3.
Build complex data manipulation workflows using Alteryx/other data manipulation tools
Required Skills:
1.
Data Modeling, BI tool set experience(Tableau, Power BI etc)
2.
Alteryx/Informatica/similar ETL tool design, development experience
3.
Solution oriented consulting
Desired Skills:
1.
Data Science skills, statistical modeling
2.
Python, R, SAS other tools
3.
Predictive analytics
Soft Skills:
1.
Excellent verbal, written communication skills
2.
Collaborate well with distributed team structure
3.
Work well under pressure
","['power bi', 'cogno', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'db', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'etl', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'cogno', 'excel', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'db', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'etl', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role will work with business sponsors as well as IT partners to deliver new technical solutions in Salesforce and beyond, focused on initiatives that support innovative and efficient business processes.
This role will report to the Assistant Vice President, Business Solutions.
What You Will Do:
Customize page layouts, reports, and dashboards to meet business requirements.
Coordinate the evaluation, scope, and completion of new development requests.
Develop low-code solutions within Salesforce and other platforms with the support of the Dev team.
Assist in training of new users and growing the technical skillset across the organization.
Manage monthly sales reporting data and integration with Salesforce.
Collaborate with business stakeholders and IT leadership team to implement development strategy and roadmap solutions in cloud-based systems.
What You Will Need:
Four-year degree from an accredited college or university or equivalent experience.
Computer science degree preferred.
Some coding experience preferred; eagerness to learn technical development skills required.
Salesforce experience and knowledge preferred.
Creative and analytical thinker with strong problem-solving skills.
Basic understanding of the sales process, preferably in the Financial Services industry.
Exemplary communication skills, both written and verbal, and presentation skills.
Looking for a highly motivated individual who is eager to contribute in a dynamic, fast-paced work environment.
Health, dental, and vision insurance
Life insurance
401(K) matching
Paid time off, including annual Employee Volunteer Day
Weekly lunch and quarterly breakfast
These job functions and skills are not intended to be a complete and exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required.
Each is an independent investment adviser separately registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended.
Registration does not imply a certain level of skill or training.
More information about each adviser including the investment strategies, fees and objectives can be found in their ADV Part 2, which is available upon request.
Please read the policy carefully.
Click here to review the new Privacy Policy.
Powered by JazzHR
LKYffDXF2w
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Position SummaryAnalyzes data generated by the billing system to determine productivity and applicable billing to the various governmental agencies and payors.
Analyzes production data and medical encounters at different lower levels within the Agency including providers to determine adherence to established levels of production.
Summarizes resultant periodic statistical information and reports to management and Board of Directors.
Also communicates this information to the various sites management to effect required modifications in procedures if necessary.
Schedule:
Flexible, may require some evening and weekends
Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for filing all financial and statistical reports with regulatory agencies such as FQHC, UDS, FSR, Single Audit; OSHPD; etc.
Coordinates with IT required billing modifications related to new or modified contractual agreements with third parties such as HMOs, PPP, Governmental Agencies, etc.
Ensures the accurate billing for services provided to third parties and follows up on collections and denials.
Contributes and participates in the preparation of the required annual budget.
Prepares special financial reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing account information and trends.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Director/CEO or Finance Director.
Job Requirements:
Minimum Requirements
Microsoft Office/Word/Excel/Outlook.
Proficient in QuickBooks, MAS 90 or equivalent accounting software and practice management system common to healthcare industry
Excellent Communication Skills.
Excellent analytical and reasoning skills
Ability to work as a team player and work independently.
Reliable transportation
Must be able to travel from facility to facility
This position requires 10 % travel outside the local area.
Required Education/Experience and/or Licensure/Certification
Bachelors Degree in Finance/Accounting required
5 years minimum experience
MBA or CPA certification (preferred)
Healthcare experience preferred but not required
Experience in standardized reports (AR, P&P, etc.)
Experience Reporting FQHC, UDS, HRSA, OSHPD, TaxRtns, 990 Filings, Single Financial Audits, Budgets, Proformas, Financial Indicators, Board Presentations, Business Plans, GAAP Compliant Financial Policies and Procedures
Advanced use of Excel
Experience may substitute for education
Valid State Identification
Physical Requirements and Working Conditions
OSHA Category 3 Involves no regular exposure to blood, body fluids, or tissues, and tasks that involve exposure to blood, body fluids, or tissues are not a condition of employment.
The work is majority of the time sedentary in nature.
The employee is regularly required to communicate, frequently required to use repetitive motions, move, remain stationary, regularly push, pull and lift up to 20 pounds and occasionally push, pull and lift up to 40 pounds.
Must possess mobility to work in a standard office/clinic setting (in some cases both settings) and to use standard office/clinic equipment, including a computer, stamina to maintain attention to detail despite interruptions, read printed materials and use a computer, and communicate in person and over the telephone.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Â
Â
Duration: Long Term Contract
Rate: $DOE/hr.
Â
Responsibilities:
Interview client teams and understand their business requirements, challenges, pain points with existing reporting outputs and processes.
Understand retail decisions that clients take based on these reports and recommend enhancements in decision-making based on introducing additional data elements.
Make recommendations to rationalize and consolidate reports into fewer dashboard(s) and work with internal teams to design and socialize wireframes with the client.
Capture business requirements and help translate into technical requirements for the data engineering team.
Provide regular updates on an ongoing basis to clients and help with executive leadership updates.
Â
Qualifications & Experience
Bachelor's degree with 5+ years of consulting experience with retail domain knowledge.
Communicate ideas effectively, both verbally and in writing, to all types of audiences and be able to write narratives, business requirement documents, and other pseudo-technical documentation.
Characteristics of a forward thinker and self-starter that flourishes with new challenges and adapts quickly to learning new knowledge.
Ability to work with a global team of consulting professionals across multiple onsite and offshore locations.
Â
Â
Thanks and look forward to working with you,
Â
Â
Regards,
Vishnu
Direct : +1 (908) 533 â 7359
Mobile: +1 (732) 588 â 7828
Email: vishnus@trovetechs.com
LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/vishnu-hr-trovetechs
Twitter: https://twitter.com/vishnu_hr
Â
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The candidate is to have experience in both IT and Business Administration.
The primary role is to be the liaison between the business departments and IT and 3rd party IT service providers to ensure business initiatives are clearly translated and defined for successful delivery by IT.
The role will also require participation in projects either as a project manager.
Roles & Responsibilities
Become the functional expert in key business processes and systems
Provide top-level business and systems analysis with focus on organizational strategic vision
Act as the primary liaison between IT and the business units
Conduct technically advanced and in-depth level business process analysis, needs assessments, and preliminary cost/benefit analysis in an effort to align IT solutions with business initiatives
Contribute expertise in particular business processes and be responsible for formulating systems/process scope and objectives relative to the organization’s business plan and user requirements
Contribute in business process flow definitions, process mapping and functional specifications
Enhance the quality of IT products and services
Find technological solutions to business requirements
Perform a project manager role
Communicate, translate, and simplify business requirements
Contribute as a project portfolio coordinator to effectively prioritize business requirements across multiple projects
Develop Ad-hoc reports using Query Manager and SQL
Perform necessary amendments on Stored Procedures and Crystal Reports
Manage Users and Authorizations to ensure necessary permissions are in place in line with Job Descriptions.
Optimization of license distribution administration
Perform mass updates using Data Transfer Workbench
Generate periodic financial reports using Excel or other reporting tools
Educational Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in a IT or related discipline.
Experience:
5+ years of experience as IT Business Analyst
3+ years of experience using SAP Business One ERP system
2+ years of experience in an Import and Distributor environment
2+ years of experience using EDI (knowledge of SPS Commerce fulfillment is a plus)
Warehouse Management System experience is a must (knowledge of Produmex is a plus)
Project management experience not required but preferred.
Budget management experience
SQL and BI experience Knowledge / Requirements
Exceptional interpersonal skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Proven ability to operate and multi-task in a dynamic fast paced environment.
Ability to work independently and follow instructions.
Attention to detail
Excellent problem-solving skill
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Confidential (Preferred)
www.aramcoimports.com
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['excel', 'sql', 'erp system', 'bi', 'erp']","['optim', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'erp system', 'powerbi', 'erp', 'optim', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Details:
Job Title : Business Analyst
Employment Type : W2 hourly
Job Duration : 12 months
Integrate new Imaging systems (due to a bank acquisition) with CITs existing Imaging systems.
The PM/Business Analyst will be responsible for overall project management and provide analytical expertise for migration/conversion activities.
Responsibilities:
Perform Requirements gathering and analysis
Review Current state Image Archiving processes and applications
Create Future State processes and work-flows
Coordinate testing efforts with Business and IT partners
Develop and manage a detailed project schedule and work plan
Provide project updates on a consistent basis to various stakeholders about strategy, adjustments, and progress
Utilize industry best practices, techniques, and standards throughout entire project execution
Required skills:
Project Management/ Business Analysis - minimum 7-8 years of experience, preferably within Retail and Consumer Banking
Experience with Imaging platforms Fiserv Nautilus, WebXtender, FIS Vision Content, FIS Vision IP, Kofax preferred
Excellent verbal and written communication skills specifically with all levels of CIT management.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities
The Sr. Business Analyst is responsible for the coordination, delivery, support of Income Reporting and Tax Processes, and a portfolio of financial applications within NBCUniversal.
The scope of work includes coordination of application software, support, and development for enterprise, custom and 'off-the-shelf' technologies.
The Sr. BA will also be responsible for supporting the development and maintenance of tax technology solutions and support current and future processes, ensuring their efficiency, accuracy, and completeness.
Responsibilities:
Coordinate and manage, from start to finish, the income reporting process and partner with multiple business units to achieve this objective
Perform administrative functions for tax technology solutions, such as quarterly SOX reviews and Risk Management Reviews
Assist with various aspects of the tax life cycle including the quarterly financial closes, return-to-provision, tax form corrections, monthly ICR reporting, quarterly state reporting, and annual IRS tax filings for 1099's and other required federal and state tax forms
Perform reconciliations on large data sets and identify variances to resolve imbalances
Stay abreast important IRS tax knowledge and changes at the Federal and State level for 1099's, 1042-S, 3921, ICR, and other required tax forms and reporting
Develop and maintain process and support documentation for tax software applications
Support the development and testing of enhancements for tax software applications
Attain expert knowledge of the financial applications supported by the team
Understand NBCU business processes requirements by engaging with business partners at enterprise and division level
Collaborate with vendors to ensure products, services, and supportability are optimized
Collaborate and communicate with other team members and/or outside consultants on projects
Act as a liaison to both internal and external customers, expected to interface with Business Users for requirements analysis, training, support, etc
Investigate problems that occur in the production environment in a quick and timely manner to get them solved as soon as possible
Ensure effective management of assigned deliveries (operational perspective) via the use of detailed plans and proactive liaison with all affected parties ensuring that any delays, risks or issues are escalated for resolution in a timely and clearly understood manner
Qualifications/Requirements
Knowledge of Income Reporting and other Tax processes
Candidate must be an active learner that is detail oriented and a proven self-starter with the ability to multi-task, prioritize responsibilities, problem solve, work in a fast-paced and time-sensitive environment, and complete work timely and accurately
Ability to communicate at all levels with clarity and precision, both written and verbally, and tailor to audience to achieve desired results
Strong desire to learn and implement technological solutions.
Courage to explore unfamiliar territory.
Demonstrates curiosity to learn.
Self-starter to work independently, with strong organizational and flexibility skills in a team-oriented environment.
Knowledge of Taxport, OneSource, Corptax, and/or SAP a plus
Bachelors or advanced degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Accounting or Business from an accredited institution or equivalent
At least 7 years' experience in managing mid- to large financial applications in different environments and platforms
Extensive knowledge and demonstrated experience with project management processes, SDLC, organizational change management concepts, and business process improvement methods
Experience with coordinating and interfacing between onshore and offshore teams
Strong commitment and drives to achieve results
Demonstrated leadership experience, ability to set direction and drive others to meet objectives
Ability to establish and maintain positive and effective work relationships with co-workers, clients, members, providers and customers
Willingness to work off business hours and weekends as needed in a demanding environment
Proficiency in Microsoft Office, especially Excel (Word, Excel, Visio, Project)
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Responsibility Execute master data changes in ECMS (Enterprise Compliance Management System) SAP GRC solution including creation, updates, and deletion Troubleshooting and issue resolution for ECMS functions Supporting initiatives for data integrity and normalization Requirements 3 years experience with utility regulations, operations, and compliance.
2 years experience with GRC Compliance Management Tool.
2 years of experience managing large datasets High level of attention to detail and accuracy Working Knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (e.g.
Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Teams) Ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of data Experience executing process improvements Ability to engage with clients at all levels in a large enterprise Operating Units Ability to work and collaborate with internal and external teams Works well with project leads to implement highest priorities Strong analytical skills
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['normal', 'data', 'analyz']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'normal', 'data', 'analyz']"
BA,"Support for strategic business planning of each business division in USA
Assist in handling issues regarding new accounts, profit & loss, and all other administrative issues in overall business
Work closely with HQ in Korea and for the Americas with preparing and submitting various global business reports
Prepare and manage monthly CEO report
Assist in developing and managing yearly business plan, budgets and collecting data
Assist to analysis monthly P&L summary and expenses details
Prepare and manage monthly estimated P&L by items, materials, and customers
Follow up with various reports both internal and external requests
Other duties assigned
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree & 3 years of directly related experience, OR
Associate's degree & 6 years of directly related experience, OR
High school diploma / GED & 8 years of directly related experience
Preferred Qualifications
Organized and detail-oriented
Excellent Microsoft Office skills (Excel & PowerPoint)
SAP knowledge preferred
Flexible and adaptable to changes
Bilingual in English/Korean (Verbal/Written)
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
xxJ5F6qhJV
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Business Analyst This position will start remote and has potential for temp to perm.
Uses specialized knowledge and skills obtained through education, experience and/or, specialized training to serve as a liaison between the business community and the IT organization in order to provide solutions to meet user needs.
Resolves or recommends solutions to moderately complex problems.
• Develops conceptual design documents, including project definition, alternative solutions, scope of work, functional specifications, and logical skeletons for new systems.
• Identifies requirements for testing, develops test plans and scripts and coordinates test transmissions, as required.
Tests software.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Key Tasks:
Under general supervision, uses specialized knowledge and skills obtained through education, experience and/or, specialized training to serve as a liaison between the business community and the IT organization in order to provide solutions to meet user needs
Provides business analysis support for moderately complex applications, including analyzing and documenting business processes and translating user requirements to software development teams
May train or lead the work of others
Leads projects of moderate scope and complexity or serves as a technical advisor to project teams
Guidance is provided to perform varied work that is frequently difficult in character requiring some evaluation, originality and ingenuity to make moderately complex decisions
Resolves or recommends solutions to moderately complex
Extensive contact with internal customers is required to identify, research, and resolve problems
Applies a detailed knowledge of business and systems analysis concepts, practices and procedures to determine most effective business system application solution
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires an individual who has the ability to gather and document user requirements and translate the information collected to functional specifications including scoping documents, mock-ups, functional requirements/specifications and technical specifications; Includes data-mapping and interface mapping to databases and multiple internal and external (3rd party) applications
Experience in creating functional specifications for Internet web applications and familiarity with collecting and defining security requirements
Skilled in producing functional specifications documents which include screen mockups and written functional requirements for screen and field functionality, screen flow, and interaction with databases, web services and interface files
Unless otherwise specifically requested, the systems analyst should have some significant experience doing systems analysis work for financial organizations (preferably banks); Ability to create workflow diagrams; Ability to create use cases
Excellent communications skills (verbal and listening); Ability to communicate well with various audiences with and without technical knowledge; This involves working closely with Business Colleagues, and internal User Experience, Development and QA teams
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",['excel'],"['data', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Must have at least 7 years of experience in a Business analyst role and At least 3 years of technical project management expertise
Contribute to solving business problems as part of a project team by framing the problems
determining intended approach / methods and evaluating the solutions to the problems Craft comprehensive requirements
Develops and maintains project plans Cross functional team (Business, Engineering, QA, Deployment etc.)
coordination Work with development and QA teams to test and implement support fixes / PoCs.
Test intended outcomes by developing prototypes, running offline experiments, as well as integrating potential solutions into live test environments
Generate reports, develop presentations, and communicate findings and results
Actively participate in discussions with stakeholders to understand and document business needs Qualifications
Excellent system analysis skill so Familiar with the development methodologies (waterfall) and release management processes Someone who is a quick learner
Nice to have Prior work experience in e-commerce, retail POS systems Agile / Scrum experience
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Plastpro Inc. is looking for business analysts that thrive working in a fast paced organization with interesting business challenges requiring smart solutions.
SUMMARY
The Business Analyst is responsible for the overall planning, organizing and execution of software applications to ensure the development and implementation of cost effective systems and efficient computer operations to meet current and future requirements related to market pricing and inquiries, sales quotes, and data analysis.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
· Plan, coordinate, integrate, implement and audit company-wide flow charts, and SOP projects.
· Plan, coordinate, integrate, and implement system related projects (including price inquiry and price quote applications).
· Work with all related departments to ensure correct prices are delivered and applied.
· Provide analyzed data to related departments for review and for future price changes.
· Communicate and follow up with users on issues to ensure efficient workflow.
· Provide user training and technical support to ensure system is running effectively and efficiently.
· Perform pricing research and analysis and create related reports.
· Communicate and coordinate with MIS team to create applications to support user needs.
· Communicate and coordinatewith Marketing and Sales departments to integrate marketing analysis data, customer feedback and sales history data to support development of market pricing strategy.
· Perform other job-related duties as directed by the department head.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
QUALIFICATIONS
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s Degree in Business or a related field, and 2 to 4 years of analytical experience.
Equivalent work experience may be considered in lieu of a degree.
COMPUTER SKILLS
Possess intermediate to advanced knowledge of MS Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.
LANGUAGE SKILLS
Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating vendor contracts, agreements, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals.
Ability to write routine reports and correspondence.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS
Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference, and volume.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Implement recommendations/solutions along with client team
Requirements:
Prior business experience required, prior consulting experience preferred
Excellent technical skills in Excel, PowerPoint, Word.
Experience with MS Project, Visio, etc.
Lean Six-Sigma experience/knowledge a plus
Experience supporting project management plans
Proven success in contributing to a team-oriented environment
Commitment to gaining exposure to multiple industries
Ability to integrate into client environments seamlessly
Bachelor’s Degree in Industrial Engineering / Equivalent or 3+ years hands-on experience in related field
Master’s Degree preferred
For more information, visit: www.processreopt.com
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['recommend', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'recommend', 'busi']"
BA,"Information Technology Business Analyst
On an as needed basis, the Business Analyst will be assigned the role of Project Manager for CSI initiatives.
Typical duties are comprised of, but are not limited to: project scope definition and development, analysis and documentation of business processes, business requirements, and System Specifications.
In addition, the Business Analyst shall verify that developed or acquired solutions meet the specified business needs, and assist with the user acceptance testing and system implementation.
The ideal candidate will have the following responsibilities:
Understand CSI's Child Care Subsidy (CC3) software application and all software applications used by the Agency.
Understand all funding terms and conditions for all subsidy programs.
Provide user support, diagnosis system problems and perform basic administration tasks in support of CSI's Child Care Subsidy (CC3) software application.
Interact with vendors, external entities and staff to resolve system issues.
Act as internal consultant to functional areas.
Analyze and document business process and workflow, gather user requirements, and define specifications for systems development or acquisition.
Re-engineer business processes to improve efficiency.
Project Manager for assigned initiatives which include the responsibilities to plan, develop specific course of action, timeframes and deliverables; schedule, facilitate and lead meetings required to successfully implement projects, and to implement standardized project methodology.
Prepare and maintain documentation required to capture and communicate pertinent information and produce project deliverables.
Impart in-depth business knowledge to end users and project teams.
Evaluate developed or acquired solutions for optimal efficiency and best match for functional requirements.
Support team members throughout the project lifecycle.
Assist in design and implementation of user training programs.
Keep abreast of child care industry regulations and best practices.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EXPERIENCE, KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS AND ABILITIES YOU SHOULD POSSESS:
Bachelor's degree or minimum two (2) years equivalent work experience.
Project Management certification preferred.
Minimum of one year experience as a project lead implementing software applications as functional area proxy.
Four (4) years experience as a business analyst, preferably within a nonprofit environment
Must have knowledge of business process analysis, including process documentation, requirements gathering and specification definition.
Must be familiar with project management best practices (PMI) and business process re-engineering methodology.
Knowledge of child care services funding and contractual requirements is desired.
Job Posted by ApplicantPro
",[None],"['analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst analyzes business needs, helps solve business problems and supports the design of technical solutions.
This role interfaces and engages directly with all aspects of the business.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
Interface with business leads and functional SMEs, to identify and capture current state process flow and business requirements
Hands-on role in the creation and maintenance of critical project artifacts in particular; business requirements, system specifications, process flows and test/use case scripts
Work with project team to identify future state process flows and requirements to meet project objectives and strategic goals
Facilitate design review meeting and capture outcomes and update solution and requirement documentation
Prepare and present analysis findings to senior stakeholders and steering committees
Support the design and decision-making process with IT and business subject matter experts
Ensure clear communication is maintained across the project team and externally to all stakeholders
Job Requirements
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Finance or similar field
Experience working across, and switching between, multiple projects concurrently
Experience with vendor implementation projects and internal build technology projects
Experience mapping and deigning operational workflow in the investment management industry
Experience creating project artifacts for data-driven initiatives i.e.
data dictionaries, data flow diagrams, and data validation requirements
Comfortable working with and analyzing large and complex data sets and the ability to distill and communicate findings
Proficient in both waterfall and agile methodologies
High degree of financial product literacy
Experience working directly with trading desks and/or portfolio managers
Experience performing detailed business analysis
Knowledge of the SDLC (Software Development Life Cycle) Process and project management methodologies both waterfall and agile
Highly proactive, willing to take ownership of issues and follow through to resolution
Has the ability to be flexible and to adapt to changing circumstances and priorities
Strong teamwork, communication and time management abilities
Organizationally diligent and meticulous with details
Is personable, open, and engaging, with a customer-facing attitude
Experience with the following technologies is preferred: Data Management platforms, (Mastering and ETL), OMS, Market Data, Data Warehouse
",[None],"['data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"The candidate will be supporting PHP's Medi-Cal Network expansion.
Specifically, the candidate will be interacting with the contracting team to solicit updates on their progress to secure provider contracts.
The candidate will maintain the tracking database, populating progress updates, extracting data for reporting, preparing dashboards and performing analyses to focus the team's efforts.
Additionally, the candidate will support management reporting.
Internal/External Groups with which the Candidate will interfacewith:
Contracting Team, Network Analytics, Provider Relations Team, External Consultants, Providers
If so, which ones?
Contracting Team, Network Analytics, Provider Relations Team, Analytics
How does this project impact the line of business or BSC as a whole?
Supports Line of Business Growth
Required Skills (top3 to 5/ non-negotiables):
What you like to see on resumes?
(nice to have)
1.
Healthcare Experience
1.
PowerPoint
2.
Advance Excel Skills
2.
Self-starter
3.
Advance Access/Excel Database Skills
3.
4.
Data Manipulation
4.
5.
Good Communication
5.
Disqualifiersor Dislikes on Resumes:
No Healthcare Experience, No Data Manipulation, Beginner Excel
Education Requirement:
BA
Required Testing:
N/A
Software Skills Required:
Excel, Access, PowerPoint
Required Certifications:
N/A
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'php']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'php', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Business Analyst
Level
Experienced
Signal Hill 110400 - Signal Hill, CA
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Bachelor's Degree
Salary Range
Undisclosed
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Information Technology
Business Analyst
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Role and Responsibilities
Determines and analyzes business needs and user’s strategic information requirements to define optimum systems requirements.
*
Write and maintain use case documents for business requirements.
Conducts tests, monitor results, and insures that the requirements are met.
*
Plans, schedules, and conducts online and batch tests, monitor results, and insures that the documented requirements are met.
*
Write and maintain test cases for difference applications.
Responds to all inquiries from internal and external customers as well as from carrier and vendor partners.
Keeps users current when new data and functionality become available.
Resolves and closes assigned work orders in the IT Department’s Help Desk System.
Helps troubleshoot the issue and provides steps to development team
Other duties as assigned.
qualifications
Qualifications Required:
Bachelor’s degree in Software Engineering field (preferred) four (4) to six (6) years related experience or
equivalent experience.
Preferred Skills
Knowledge of commonly used word processors, spreadsheets and e-mail systems.
Excellent interpersonal skills, with a strong customer focus.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including ability to convey technical details to end-users.
Ability to establish and maintain a high level of customer trust and confidence.
The following Skills will be plus
Knowledge of Internet/Intranet Technologies
Knowledge of basic SQL
Good knowledge on logical and physical Data Modeling.
Good organization skills.
Ability to handle multiple tasks simultaneously and work with manager to get the appropriate priority level assigned to meet strict deadlines.
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Business Analyst
The ideal candidate must possess excellent in IT business Analyst role.
The candidate must possess excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability and collaborate effectively with domain and technical experts in the team.
Requirement
The IT Business Analyst with Strong data domain experience, healthcare experience is preferable and technical knowledge in SSIS SQL.
Responsible for collaborating with the Product Owners and Stakeholders regarding software requirements and effectively translating the requirements to the delivery team.
This role ensures collaborating with the various functioning departments end users, including onshore and offshore data and development QA teams.
Works closely with delivery team members to ensure that the Sprint goals are met and that the requirements are implemented efficiently and effectively.
Analyzes complex end user needs to determine optimal means of meeting those needs
Determines business application requirements to address specific business needs.
Works with programming staff to ensure requirements are incorporated into system design and testing
Must be able to communicate clearly, both written and verbally.
Prefer Agile and JIRA Confluence experience
Project Management and Business Analysis skills are a must.
Must be a self started with an ability to work on teams as well as independently.
This position is based in Cerritos, CA.
","['excel', 'jira', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be responsible as the liaison between the business and technical groups, gathering and documenting business requirements, designing business processes, developing wireframes, developing high level application designs with the technical teams, and financial analysis or modeling.
The Business Analyst will also examine the variables which impact SPT and MPG project profitability including production costs, overall budget variances, market box office trends, and related home entertainment products.
Core Responsibilities The job""s most important functions and responsibilities, and percentage of time spent on each.
Communicate with the business users andor functional teams to develop business requirements and analyze information needs, delivering the follow artifacts as needed Functional Requirements, Business Requirements Documents, Use Cases, Wireframes, Test Cases, and Training Manuals.
Serve as the strategic interface between the users and the vendor andor internal IT groups to resolve problems and fulfill requests for package applications supported by the team.
Develop test scenarios and either test or oversee testing prior to delivery to business users coordinate with internal QA resource pool as needed.
Lead and perform functional testing, includes coordination of QA and UAT tasks.
Work with business users, PM and Senior Business Analysts to re-platform the existing legacy system and expand functionality, reporting and streamline performance in the new system.
Trend analysis helps in forecasting production costs and needs.
Build and maintain automated workflow to obtain approvals and wet signatures for various types of contracts, payments associated with contractual agreements and also cover outstanding commitments.
Participate in team strategic planning, supporting the initial analysis and assessment of proposed projects leading to the development of business cases.
Be proactive in identifying enhancements for existing applications, design user manuals and conduct training.
emsp Experience 3 of years specialty Financial systems , 2 of years entertainment B of years managerial Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Knowledge of String understanding of Agile development methodologies Strong service orientation and focus.
Attention to Detail is required.
Has a good verbal and written communication skill.
Working knowledge of continuous process improvement methodologies and customer satisfaction measurement practices.
Has good to above average problem solving skills and able to implement solutions for moderate to difficult problems.
Basic understanding or exposure to Content Creation Production workflows and industry knowledge either with TV or Features Demonstrates the ability to be flexible and deal with change both internal and external to the organization.
Proficient in Microsoft Office products
",['microsoft'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Focus is on the upcoming client-wide initiative, as well as Prism adoption.
Serve as support structure for Privacy Office initiatives that required Brand Outreach (e.g.
Will take legal and technical requirements and translate them into business and product owner communications and work with communications and training leads to execute against training and communications roadmap.
Will interface with Product owners to take feedback, test , troubleshoot implementations
Will communicate concerns / issues from the Privacy office and recommend solutions
Requirements:
Project Management, Computer Science, Computer Information Systems or related technical field.
Strong computer skills and knowledge of databases
Methodical, accurate and organized with excellent attention to detail
Clear, concise verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently with ability to take initiative and prioritize workloads
Ability to cope in a dynamic & changeable environment in a calm and professional manner
Ability to communicate to all levels of the organization, and with global teams
Ability to identify risks throughout the project and providing mitigation strategy
Strong Business Acumen/Savvy
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"He/She will be able to translate business objectives into practical, end-user specific layouts and functionality, including but not limited to, dashboard set-up, setting up recurring jobs, reporting, and programming logic using Apex coding.
Secondarily, the candidate will support the development and integration of software programs and applications into the organization’s information systems outside of the Salesforce CRM.
He/She will be responsible for developing, testing, and launching application modules and systems under development by in-house software development teams; further, the candidate will identify, address, and amend any software errors in a timely and accurate fashion.
Proven problem solving skills, attention to details, and creativity will be essential to the candidate’s success.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Help optimize workflow between and within departments by establishing workflow rules and follow-up notifications.
• Assist in marketing efforts using Salesforce’s sales functionality such as mass email campaigns
• Establish reports and data summaries that help identify data entry errors, including incorrect format and data types; train end-users to minimize such errors
• Manage set-up and update of new users and provision functionality based on business roles
• Work with vendor and implementation consultants to keep up with upgrades and apps
• Provide training in CRM and seek to establish buy-in from all users through internal marketing of the system
• Help maintain consistent uptime in the integration of Salesforce with other system data done via batch processing
• Analyze technical and business problems, which are of low to high complexity.
Design efficient, effective solutions, which follow Development and Infrastructure standards and meet the business needs.
Develop and maintain a high level of business and technical knowledge of all assigned systems.
Maintain appropriate system documentation such that any team member could effectively perform the duties during one’s absence.
• Establish strong relationships with assigned business departments to understand the needs of the respective areas and be able to suggest appropriate solutions to business problems
• Effectively communicate with peers and management in both verbal and written form.
• Support and test infrastructure changes to ensure continuity of all systems
.
• Occasional on-call, after-hours support for all systems supporting the enterprise.
Requirements:
• 3-5 year’s experience in a similar role.
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or equivalent.
• Direct experience with Salesforce (Apex) or other CRM system, SS&C applications GWP, GWPA or similar portfolio accounting systems.
• Experience translating business user requirements into technical specifications
• Experience working with C# and SQL Server based winforms applications.
• Proven track record of implementing software design and development methods that provide high-value, high-quality products with a short time to implementation.
.• Relevant knowledge of the investment management industry and experience working with various security types including equities, fixed income, mutual funds, and options/futures.
• Strong interpersonal skills, excellent formal and informal communication Skills, innovative problem solving skills, and strong facilitation skills.
Must be a forward-thinker and be able to anticipate downstream effects.
• Ability to work under pressure, adhere to tight deadlines, and multitask.
• Possess strong attention to detail and produce quality results.
• Must demonstrate strong organizational and follow-up skills.
• Experience with Microsoft platforms and development tools.
• Experience with Visual Basic, C#, HTML/aspx.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'c']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'c', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Core Responsibilities
Work hand in hand with product owners to analyze business, marketing and operational processes and drive continual improvement process cycles
Conduct in-depth analysis, present your learnings, hypothesis and key decision points to executive management
Evaluating and selecting technical tools for business analysis functions
Requirements
A degree in business or a related field, an MBA or compelling prior experience in a equivalent role
Comfort working in a fast paced environment with minimal hierarchy in a quickly developing market
Outstanding communication and writing skills - you should be able to produce top grade output at different tiers from a high level powerpoint to a detailed analysis paper
Pluses
Basic finance fundamentals
Experience working with multi-national teams
Experience in the automotive space
A passion for electric vehicles
Relational (SQL) and non-relational databases
Jira and Confluence
Google Analytics
Tableau
","['tableau', 'jira', 'powerpoint', 'sql']","['hypothesi', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",2.5,"['tableau', 'jira', 'powerpoint', 'sql', 'hypothesi', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Operational Assurance Business Analyst III
Job Category:
Administrative, HR, Business Professionals
Department:
Operational Assurance
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Position Type:
Full Time
Requisition ID:
5841
Job Summary
The Operational Assurance Business Analyst III, either individually or collaboratively, researches, elicits, analyzes, communicates, tests, and verifies all requirements applicable to the COO’s organization for all lines of business (Medicaid, Medicare, and Commercial).
Documents the requirements and business decisions, their corresponding authority, and the status of compliance with said requirements in a comprehensive function-based index, stratified by sub-function level requirements for each product line, and will leverage the requirements to monitor and oversee all functions within this positions' purview.
This role establishes Key Performance Indicators (KPIs or Metrics) to systematically assess, track, and trend operational performance with respect to established standards to allow for evidence-based decisions.
This role works independently and collaboratively, responds resourcefully to change and ambiguity, generates and champions ideas and initiatives, and thoughtfully see the connections within the organization to effectively integrate efforts across units and functions to build a cohesive whole out of operational units.
Duties
Under the general guidance of the Senior Manager, the SBA:
Elicits, documents, analyzes, communicates, tests, verifies, and systematically tracks requirements for the operational units reporting to the COO.
Reviews policies and procedures, internal controls, and processes to identify gaps and opportunities for improved performance and for the reporting of related analytics.
Responsible for maintaining documentation to support evidence of compliance with all requirements, for the reporting of performance data.
Oversees all phases of the operational performance, including helping to communicate federal and state regulatory changes to operational areas, performing impact, gap, and risk analyses for Leadership, developing and monitoring metrics to track ongoing fidelity to these requirements, and taking corrective action to remediate issues of non-compliance.
Partners with the functional business leaders to coordinate reviews and prepares for internal and regulatory audits; examines audit findings and responds to citied deficiencies; and, make recommendations for corrective actions and monitor internal and external corrective action plans.
Reports analytical performance metrics on requirements, which may be in the form of visualizations such as graphs, charts and dashboards, detailing the significant results they deduced to inform senior-level business stakeholders, so they may make informed decisions.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Education Required
Bachelor's Degree
In lieu of degree, equivalent education and/or experience may be considered.
Education Preferred
Juris Doctor Degree or Doctor of Law Degree (J.D.)
Experience
Required:
Higher Education may be considered in lieu of the required years of experience.
Skills
Required:
Regulatory search, business writing, Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Outlook.
Demonstration of both qualitative and quantitative analytical skills.
Proven ability to work with a diverse group of people, including external entities, physicians, support staff, coworkers and management.
Demonstrated ability to research issues and bring about resolution either directly or with the assistance of others.
Demonstrated critical thinking and problem solving skills.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Strong elicitation and process documentation skills.
Strong organizational and communication skills to build and foster effective relationships.
Preferred:
Governance, Risk and Compliance (GRC) Systems, Tableau
Licenses/Certifications Required
Licenses/Certifications Preferred
Certified HealthCare Compliance (CHC)
Certified in Healthcare Compliance Fellow (CHC-F)
Certified Compliance & Ethics Professional (CCEP)
Required Training
Additional Information
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Tuition Reimbursement
Retirement Plans
Medical, Dental and Vision
Wellness Program
Volunteer Time Off (VTO)
Nearest Major Market: Los Angeles
Job Segment:
","['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint']","['risk', 'segment', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'risk', 'segment', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'graph', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Analyst Level 1:
Knowledge and skill in applying analytical and evaluative techniques to
identify, consider, and resolve issues or problems of a procedural or factual nature.
Knowledge and skill on the usage of various qualitative or quantitative techniques.
Minimum/General Experience: Associates degree in Business, Finance, Management,
Information Systems or other related discipline.
With at least four years of specialized
experience a degree is not required.
Analyst Level 2:
Provides strategic guidance and influences program direction.
Recommends large scale information system solutions, and assists with business integration
across organizational levels.
Provides program-level guidance within area of expertise and
recommends domain-specific solutions and policies.
Evaluates various business models
including cost-benefit analysis.
Minimum/General Experience: A Bachelor's degree in a related discipline.
With at least six
years of specialized experience, a degree is not required.
Specialist Level 1:
Expert in a specific domain with general knowledge of other
domains.
Provide support for all phases of defined program/project implementation and
transition subsequent knowledge/tasks to the ongoing delivery team/process.
Review data
and develop and document process flows ensuring continuous process/productivity
improvement.
Must follow quality-control standards and develop and document business
requirements.
Review business requirements and systems specifications to ensure plan
milestones and requirements are met.
Must be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong
organizational skills and the ability to work in a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline
environment.
Minimum/General Experience: A Bachelor's degree in a related discipline with 2 years of
experience.
With at least eight years of specialized experience, a degree is not required.
Specialist Level 2:
Works as a team member with expertise in a specific domain and
advanced, comprehensive knowledge of methodologies, principles and practices related to
business or financial management disciplines.
Provide support and completes research and
analysis, gathers analyzes and synthesizes information using evaluation and critical thinking
skills.
Ability to organize, analyze, interpret, and evaluate financial and management data in
the solution of financial management and accounting problems.
Develop and document
process flows ensuring continuous process/productivity improvement and compliance with
standards throughout a project.
Operates with considerable latitude for actions and decisions.
Must have demonstrated ability to work independently or under only minimal direction.
Must
be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong organizational skills and the ability to work in
a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline environment.
This position also requires
demonstrated proficiency using commercial automated word processing and other systems.
Good written and oral communication skills are required.
Minimum/General Experience: Bachelor's degree in business, finance or a related field with
four years of experience.
With at least 10 years of specialized experience, a degree is not
required.
Job Posted by ApplicantPro
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Req ID: 177636
The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Business Analyst, Sales and Avails for the Enterprise Technology- IP Licensing & Dist Solutions department.
This position delivers work products in the area of Sales/Avails within the IP Licensing solution sets, including consulting with system production support, project requirement gathering, business analysis, functional specification, some system configuration and testing.
This position supports solutions in the COSMOS portfolio.
The Daily
Partners with Business Technology & Workplace Solutions to ensure appropriate levels of end user support.
Contributes to advancing the health of the COSMOS portfolio, including advising management regarding new capabilities available in the market helping to ensure alignment to WBs strategic goals and initiatives.
Delivers support and enhancements within the IP Licensing applications by working directly with external resources and delivering their own work products.
Fulfills compliance activities such as reporting.
Participates in project delivery for the IP Licensing solutions.
The Essentials
Undergraduate degree required.
2+ years of experience in a technology role, contributing to the support of or design of complex applications across multiple business functions, with a focus on application development and maintenance.
2+ years of experience implementing/ supporting complex applications (preferably SAP).
2+ years of experience with Sales/Avails applications, preferably in the entertainment industry.
Strong knowledge and practical application of the software development life cycle (SDLC), with industry standard best practice methodologies.
General knowledge of SOX controls and processes.
Experience with presentations to business users and their management.
General understanding of enterprise level systems, preferably SAP (including HANA).
Avails processing and License sales business.
Contract Administration business process.
Data Management
Reporting Solutions
Strong customer service mindset.
Ability to actively listen and incorporate feedback to continuously improve.
Ability to work with third party service providers, preferably in a managed services environment with a very structured approach to delivery oversight and quality.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be service-oriented.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to work flexible hours, including possible overtime, when necessary.
177636
",['hana'],"['end user', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['hana', 'end user', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities will include:
Providing recommendations for architecture.Analyzing and communicating in sometimes difficult data gathering sessions with project team and all levels of project stakeholders and management.Define, design, and document business flows and processes on various sized projects.Define and articulate business rules required for data accuracy and consistency.Identify and resolve data quality issues.Act as the primary contact for the data management process between IT developers and the business.Identify, analyze, propose and document appropriate solutions for problems and issues that may impact the project.
Disseminate information in a timely manner within the team and across functions or teams.Provide cross-functional and business knowledge to develop business system and process alternatives.Train others as appropriate on specific area of business or systems expertise.Qualifications
Ability to translate requirements from business processes.Solid knowledge of the application development process.Strong communication skills (verbal/written/listening).Sense of urgency with strong follow-up skills.Detailed oriented and able to work within a team setting.Education & Certification Requirements
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Project Manager / Business Analyst
Duties:
Develop detailed project plans that can be effectively tracked and reported.
Manage changes to projects’ scope, timelines, and budget while keeping business objectives in mind.
Analyze reports and serve as a liaison between management and technical teams.
Gather and elicit Business Requirements by interviewing customers, stakeholders, reviewing existing business documentation, and documenting existing processes and systems.
Measure project performance and perform risk management using appropriate tools and techniques.
Influence/manage technical teams.
Report on projects’ status and escalate to management as needed.
Requirements
Minimum 3-5 years in project management and business analysis experience with software development projects in a cross-functional environment.
Ability to manage multiple projects/teams simultaneously.
Experience in dealing directly with Business Stakeholders.
Experience in managing projects following both Waterfall and Agile methodologies.
Business analysis understanding of SQL Server reporting services.
Knowledge of Object-Oriented Analysis and Design (OOAD) guidelines.
TFS expertise a plus.
•MS Project and other PM tools skills.
PMP/CSM certifications.
Must be a team player with a positive attitude.
Very good verbal and written communication skills.
Additional Information
Job-Type: Full-Time
Education-level: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Industrial Engineering, or related field preferred.
Salary: Above Market + Full Benefits + Bonus
No subcontractors, offshore development teams or agency resumes.
Attn: HR Depart.
13079 Artesia Blvd Unit B260, Cerritos, CA 90703
Close
","['tf', 'sql']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['tf', 'sql', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.?
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.?
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.Manage and motivate teams of professionals with diverse skills and backgrounds.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Maintain long-term client relationships and networks.
Cultivate business development opportunities.Full time employment, Monday - Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am - 5:30 pm.MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Experience in both information technology and business administration
Coordinated deliverables and shipping logistics by incorporating and controlling business processes and guidelines.
Compile and distribute reports on application development and deployment
Elicit, analyze, document, validate, and provide user acceptance of requirements and business processes
Create artifacts including business cases, business requirement documentation, process modeling, data flows, workflows, impact analysis, and gap analysis leveraging corporate standards, procedures, and processes
Participate in documenting and evaluating work processes and business re-engineering opportunities using a variety of approved techniques
Support of JD Edwards and Sage financial applications
Conduct Usability testing with end users including prototyping potential solutions.
Qualifications
Minimum of 7 years of Information Technology and Business Administration
At least 4 years in managing an IT Team and leading projects
Bachelor’s Degree or Master's Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business Analysis and/or Computer Engineering or a related field from an accredited institution whose accreditation is recognized by the U.S. Department of Education or the Council for Higher Education Accreditation
Prior experience working and/or supporting ERP (manufacturing), SAGE, CRM, Business Intelligence, and/or HCM systems; Working knowledge of SQL  Advanced level skills in MS Office (Project, Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Outlo
www.peaktechnical.com
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp']","['data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'end user', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'end user', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Under the direction of the Information Technology Manager, the IT Business Analyst will work with the different departments throughout the organization to evaluate data needs for various business processes, as well as using query tools to provide reports and other data extracts to support business needs and regulatory reporting requirements.
This position will consult with users to identify current operating procedures and to clarify program objectives, take charge of a project and deliver results.
JOB DUTIES:
Responsible for a variety of tasks and duties, which may include, but would not be limited to, the following:
Analyze data contained in the corporate database and identify data integrity issues with existing and proposed systems and implement solutions.
Defines project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases, and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget and Monitor project progression.
Determine operational objectives by studying business functions; gathering information; evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Improve systems by studying current ending actions.
Troubleshoot technical issues and identify modifications needed in existing applications to meet changing user requirements
Assist in systems analysis tasks, including creating and maintaining technical procedures and documentation for the applications including operations, user guide, etc
Assist in the creation of the system design and functional specifications for all new development projects
Assist with routine Data Processing department tasks relating to customer billing.
Other tasks and duties as required
SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS:
Skills, knowledge, and physical requirements include, but are not limited to the following:
Proficient knowledge of business applications in the following areas: Human Resources, Payroll, Finance, Procurement, Accounts Payable, Purchase Orders, Vehicle Maintenance, Material Control, OPS, Customer Service, Paratransit and Service Planning.
Experience with Infor or Lawson business applications
Experience designing and implementing IT and business process
Proficient in data analytics with a proven track record of delivering results
Should have a minimum of 5 years of technology experience with at least 3 years hands-on technical roles in the field and relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Strong awareness of software Integration points and the technology and/or systems used in the organization.
Previous experience in managing large data sets, query tools, etc.
creatin simple reports from database repositories.
Data Base support and design in Microsoft SQL with DB2 and Access experience a plus.
Background in Microsoft .NET, Visual Basic, and HTML is desirable.
Good working knowledge skills with Microsoft Office Products, Microsoft Visio, and Microsoft Project.
Strong project management skills with effective results focus within an information systems environment.
Experience in the development and implementation of standards, procedures and guidelines to support operational processes.
Strong written and verbal communication skills, including technical writing skills
Self-motivated with the ability to prioritize, meet deadlines, and manage changing priorities;
Proven ability to be flexible and work hard, both independently and in a team environment, in a high pressure on-call environment with changing priorities.
Willingness to work occasionally outside of normal business hours.
Excellent English oral and written communication skills.
Any knowledge or RPG, RPG ILE, RPG Free and CL programming helpful.
Ability to perform repetitive physical activities using feet, legs, hands, and arms, and which include use of keyboard, walk, sit, stand, bend, stoop, climb stairs, lift up to 35 lbs., reach, grasp, push, and pull
EDUCATION, TRAINING AND EXPERIENCE
The following are required:
High school diploma is required.
Undergraduate degree in technical and/or business, or minimum 7 years of equivalent work experience
SQL database management and maintenance skills
Expertise in current computer hardware and software, including a practical application ability with Microsoft Office and Visio
Experience with installation, operation, troubleshooting and problem resolution of complex business systems
Valid California driver’s license and acceptable driving record.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Business Analyst II
Job Category:
Information Technology
Department:
Provider Data Management
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Position Type:
Full Time
Requisition ID:
5894
Job Summary
The Business Analyst II works closely with business units to gain in-depth business understanding of customer’s business strategy processes, services, roadmaps and the content in which the business operates.
The Business Analyst is focus-driven, focusing on strategy, collaboration, prioritization based on value off internal and external customers.
The position will consult and collaborate with internal and external customers to address any issues that are contributing to inaccurate or inefficient procedures/ processes within the Department.
This position will be key to understanding the documenting capabilities needed to address business challenges.
It is responsible for reviewing end-to-end business processes to identify, address, and remediate operational and functional risks.
This position conducts a strengths, weaknesses, opportunities, and threats (SWOT) analysis to identify opportunities to improve operational efficiency.
It is responsible for a full range of activities leading small to large size projects, assist project managers on complex projects related to operational business functions affecting internal departments and external customers at market level.
Duties
Participate and contribute in multiple projects by completing and updating project documentation; managing project scope; adjusting schedules when necessary; determining daily priorities; ensuring efficient and on-time delivery of project tasks and milestones; follow escalation process; and managing customer relationships.
Ensure data is valid and reliable; develop business process improvement; monitor and update software as needed; partner with internal and external customers to accomplish long-term business strategies and goals.
Identify, create, and facilitate process design changes by conducting business and systems process analysis and design at a complex level; focusing on quality improvement and data management.
Identify improvement opportunities (proactive and reactive).
Oversee customer relationships and expectations through communication process; updating others through project paths.
Support and align efforts to meet business and customer needs.
Facilitate meetings, projects, and presentations to diverse audiences.
Provide leadership to team members and peers, collaborating cross-functionally with others; articulate ideas and viewpoints to Senior Management, peers, and others; identify and initiate projects; manage resources; implement resolutions; and hold self-accountable for completing tasks and results.
Provide a strategic asset to decompose strategy into value change initiatives.
Maintain an up-to date knowledge of Information Systems to develop, execute, and improve corrective action plans by providing subject matter expertise and guidance to best business practices.
Stay current with customer needs and strategies; utilize formal and informal written communication methods (BRDs, emails, PowerPoint presentations, Visio workflows, executive summaries, and project logs).
Provide and support business solutions; build relationships with internal/external customers and key stakeholders; monitor project progress and results; provide project analysis and root-cause of operational issues.
Demonstrate leadership and interpersonal communication skills by working collaboratively and effectively with peers, superiors and subordinates to accomplish objectives.
Able to concisely, clearly and formally communicate complex concepts and formulate process solutions.
Develop and execute test plans.
Monitor all solutions through to resolution.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Education Required
Bachelor's Degree
In lieu of degree, equivalent education and/or experience may be considered.
Education Preferred
Master's Degree
Experience
Required:
Skills
Required:
Proven ability to significantly impact process improvement and process management.
Ability to document scope, project tasks in a clear and concise manner.
Thorough understanding of relevant industry practices, techniques and standards.
Must have a comprehensive understanding of business process/ life cycle management principles, theories and concepts.
Strong problem-solving/ analysis skills.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office applications, database management.
Articulates relevant information and directions in an organized and concise manner.
Strong interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills; Understanding of effective communication concepts tools and techniques.
Can conform to shifting priorities, demands, and timelines through analytical and problem-solving capabilities.
Licenses/Certifications Required
Licenses/Certifications Preferred
Required Training
Additional Information
Paid Time Off (PTO)
Tuition Reimbursement
Retirement Plans
Medical, Dental and Vision
Wellness Program
Volunteer Time Off (VTO)
Nearest Major Market: Los Angeles
Job Segment:
Business Analyst, Medical, Finance, Healthcare
","['powerpoint', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'segment', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'segment', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Thursday, July 2, 2020
You will develop and maintain User Scenarios, Navigation Flows, Wire Frames, Mock-ups, and functional requirements.
For consideration, qualified candidates only, submit letter of interest with salary requirements and resume.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree or 4-6 years related experience
5-8+ years of experience eliciting, documenting, and maintaining business requirements
Experience developing and maintaining User Cases, Requirements Traceability Matrix, and User Stories
Experience with Visio
Excellent communication skills
The ability to work overtime/extended hours as needed
Your responsibilities would include:
Develop wireframes, mock- ups, navigation diagrams, use cases, flow charts, functional diagrams and descriptions to communicate application design or integration specifications
Identifies, assesses, and documents business and technical requirements, understanding business priorities and advising business on options, risks and costs versus benefits of various solutions
Facilitates requirements gathering sessions; obtains appropriate business and IT signoff
Conducts research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within or outside the business, and if not, assist with determining whether new solutions are feasible
Accountable for the delivery of business and technical requirements documentation
Works closely with Application Designers and Developers to ensure understanding of requirements that will be used for creating application architecture and design specifications
Work with the development team to ensure that specifications are understood
MPI does not file visa petitions or sponsor applicants for work visas in this job classification.
Submissions will be reviewed; only candidates most closely matching the requirements of the position will be contacted.
About MPI
Recognized as an Employer of Choice for its employee-focused work environment, competitive compensation and benefits, MPI is a recipient of the World at Work Seal of Distinction.
Equal Opportunity Employer
Other details
Pay Type
Hourly
",['excel'],"['risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Help analyze business needs, helps solve business problems and supports the design of technical solutions
Work with project team to identify future state process flows and requirements to meet project objectives and strategic goals
Prepare and design review meeting and capture outcomes and update solution and requirement documentation
Prepare and present analysis findings to senior stakeholders and steering committees
Assist the design and decision-making process
Requirements:
Proficient with the Microsoft Office Suite, including strong Excel skills
Strong analytical, problem-solving and organization skills
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills
Able to communicate with professionals at all levels
Able to work independently and take initiative
Able to adapt to changing priorities
Able to work on multiple projects with accuracy and efficiency, while keeping to deadlines
Detail-oriented
A team player
Strong work ethic
Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, finance or related field and a minimum of 8 years' relevant experience
REF # 35577
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration City Los Angeles State/Province California Zip/Postal Code 90010
Are you a skilled and experienced Business Analyst with a valid Scrum Master certification?
Are you searching for a long-term, permanent position with an innovative organization?
This......
https://innovasourcing.com/wo2x
View similar jobs
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"The candidate is to have experience in both IT and Business Administration.
The primary role is to be the liaison between IT and the business branches including the Executive branch to ensure business initiatives are clearly translated and defined for successful delivery by IT.
The role will also require participation in projects either as an actor or a project manager.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Become the functional expert in key business processes and systems
Provide top-level business and systems analysis with focus on organizational strategic vision
Act as the primary liaison between IT and the business units
Conduct technically advanced and in-depth level business process analysis, needs assessments, and preliminary cost/benefit analysis in an effort to align IT solutions with business initiatives
Contribute expertise in particular business processes and be responsible for formulating systems/process scope and objectives relative to the organizations business plan and user requirements
Contribute in business process flow definitions, process mapping and functional specifications
Enhance the quality of IT products and services
Find technological solutions to business requirements
Perform a project manager role
Communicate, translate, and simplify business requirements
Contribute as a project portfolio coordinator to effectively prioritize business requirements across multiple projects
Job Requirements:
Education:
Bachelors Degree in a IT or related discipline.
Experience:
5+ years of experience as IT Business Analyst
2+ years of experience in a retail environment, preferably in Grocery industry.
Project management experience not required but preferred.
Budget management experience
SQL and BI experience
Knowledge / Requirements:
Exceptional interpersonal skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Proven ability to operate and multi-task in a dynamic fast paced environment.
Ability to work independently and follow instructions.
Attention to detail
Excellent problem-solving skill
APPLICANT NOTICE ABOUT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
1.
Overview
2. Who This Notice Applies To
3.
Personal Information does not include publicly available information from government records, deidentified information, or aggregated information.
Recruiting and Hiring
• Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law
• Education Information
• Health insurance data
• Inferences drawn from the personal information collected
• Personal Identifiers
• Professional or employment-related information
Government Reporting
• Characteristics of protected classifications under California or federal law
• Personal Identifiers
4.
Please contact the third parties for questions regarding their privacy practices, as well as to exercise your rights.
5.
6.
What Rights You Have to Request Your Personal Information
You do not have rights to make requests under CCPA until January 1, 2021.
7.
8.
How You Are Protected Against Discrimination and Retaliation
Anyone found to be engaging in unlawful discrimination will be subject to disciplinary action, up to and including termination of employment.
If you have questions or concerns about any type of discrimination or retaliation, please contact the Human Resources Department.
9.
Disclaimer
· Comply with federal, state, or local laws;
· Comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, or local
· authorities;
· Cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that the business, service provider, or third party reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or local law; or
· Exercise or defend legal claims.
10.
Changes to this Notice
The effective date of each version of this Notice is identified here.
Effective February 7, 2020
11.
If you have questions or concerns regarding this Notice or the handling of your Personal Information, please contact humanresources@supercenterconcepts.onmicrosoft.com or call 562-345-9000 and press 0 for operator.
AVISO SOBRE LA INFORMACIÓN PERSONAL DE LOS POSTULANTES
1.
Descripción general
2.
A quién se aplica este aviso
3.
Qué información recopilamos y por qué
Como se describe con más detalle en la tabla que aparece a continuación, la empresa recopila información que identifica, está relacionada o describe a los postulantes, o que podría asociarse o vincularse razonablemente con ellos, de forma directa o indirecta (Información personal).
La información personal no incluye información anonimizada, agrupada o disponible públicamente a partir de registros gubernamentales.
La siguiente tabla detalla los fines para los cuales recopilamos información personal en los últimos trece (13) meses y las categorías de información que recopilamos para cada fin.
No recopilaremos otras categorías de información personal ni utilizaremos la información personal que recopilamos para fines considerablemente diferentes sin antes notificar a los postulantes.
Reclutamiento y contratación
• Características de las clasificaciones protegidas conforme a las leyes federales o de California
• Información sobre formación académica
• Datos del seguro médico
• Deducciones realizadas a partir de información personal recopilada
• Identificadores personales
• Información profesional o relacionada con el empleo
Informes gubernamentales
• Características de las clasificaciones protegidas conforme a las leyes federales o de California
• Identificadores personales
4.
Dónde obtenemos su información personal
Recopilamos su información personal de las siguientes fuentes:
• Usted: Fundamentalmente, recopilamos información personal directamente de usted en el proceso de solicitud.
• Terceros: Cuando obtenemos su información personal a partir de terceros, como sitios web para la búsqueda de empleo, es porque usted nos dio su consentimiento o se lo dio a dichos terceros.
Cuando utilice sitios web de terceros, esos sitios pueden regirse por sus propias condiciones de uso y políticas de privacidad, las cuales no están bajo nuestro control y no están sujetas a este aviso.
Póngase en contacto con esos terceros si tiene preguntas sobre sus prácticas de privacidad y para ejercer sus derechos.
1 Código Civil de California § 1798.100 y siguiente
5.
Cuándo compartimos su información personal
6.
Qué derechos tiene para solicitar su información personal
CCPA no le otorga el derecho a realizar solicitudes hasta el 1 de enero del 2021.
7.
Cómo conservamos su información personal
8.
Su protección contra discriminación y represalias
Toda persona que participe en un acto de discriminación ilegal recibirá sanciones disciplinarias, las cuales pueden incluir el despido.
Si tiene preguntas o inquietudes sobre algún tipo de discriminación o represalia, comuníquese con el Departamento de Recursos Humanos.
9.
Aviso legal
• Cumplir con las leyes locales, estatales o federales;
• Cumplir con una pesquisa, investigación o citación civil, penal o reguladora llevada a cabo por autoridades locales, estatales o federales;
• Cooperar con agencias del orden público con respecto a una conducta o actividad que la empresa, un proveedor de servicios o un
un tercero crea razonablemente y de buena fe que puede violar las leyes locales, estatales o federales; o
• Ejercer demandas legales o defenderse ante ellas.
10.
Cambios a este aviso
Este aviso se revisa y actualiza anualmente para garantizar que refleje con precisión nuestras prácticas y procedimientos.
La fecha de entrada en vigor de cada versión de este aviso figura aquí.
Entrada en vigor el 7 de febrero del 2020
11.
Resolución de inquietudes y cómo contactarnos
Si tiene preguntas o inquietudes con respecto a este aviso o al manejo de su información personal, comuníquese con humanresources@supercenterconcepts.onmicrosoft.com o llame al 562-345-9000 y presione 0 para hablar con un operador.
[1] Cal.
Civ.
Code § 1798.100 et seq.
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi']","['classif', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'classif', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst / Consultant
As a Salesforce Consultant you will leverage your business and technical skills to uncover pain points within the client's current technology and processes.
This is the ideal position for someone with experience as a Salesforce Admin, Business Analyst, or Salesforce Consultant looking for a role working on a full-scale Salesforce implementation from start to finish.
*This project could be delayed due to market uncertainty.
If interested in other roles, please join the Talent Network for consideration: https://www.pinkuspartners.com/salesforce-talent-network/
Facilitate requirements development sessions in order to gain an understanding of the customer’s current state.
Present implementation needs and options confidently to technical teams as well as a C-Level audience.
Strong attention to detail is required.
Elevate the client experience as a knowledgeable liaison between technical teams, testing teams, and business stakeholders during the implementation phase.
Lead discovery workshops which may include large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations
Execute rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Perform business process modeling, user experience modeling, and basic technical architecture diagramming.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities)
Requirements:
Strong attention to detail
5+ years of experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Salesforce Admin Certification Required, additional certifications preferred
You have a strong understanding of Salesforce functionality and can clearly communicate its capabilities and limitations to customers.
Ability to build and demonstrate prototypes in Salesforce.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
You have experience with Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Community Cloud functionality.
You are a highly motivated individual with a desire to learn and contribute.
You have strong presentation and communication skills.
Hands on experience working with companies implementing Salesforce.com functionality in some of the following areas is preferred:
System Implementation & Adoption
Salesforce.com Service Cloud
Salesforce.com Community Cloud
Salesforce.com Sales Cloud
Experience with data migration tools is a plus.
Quickly scale your business with experienced and pre-vetted Salesforce Talent.
Job Type: Contract
License:
Salesforce (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Interpret, analyze and document business requirements with the appropriate business leaders and stakeholders
Create Business Requirements Documents (BRD), Functional Specifications Documents (FSD), Nonfunctional Requirement Documents
Lead project team through the SDLC process
Develop and deliver progress reports, proposals, documentation, and presentations for project stakeholders
Develop and direct software system testing and validation procedures including test scripts and QA
Identify complex requirement gaps and root issues
Serve as a training resource for junior analysts
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree;
CBAP or similar Business Analyst Certification preferred
8 years of information technology experience
10 years of business analysis experience
3 years’ Agile, SCRUM or waterfall/agile hybrid experience
SCRUM Master (CSM) certification
At least 3 years of management experience
At least 3 years’ of executive level engagement experience
At least 5 years’ of experience in a professional services(accounting, legal, etc)
Expert knowledge of project management best practices
Advanced knowledge of software development procedures and tools
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite applications
Advanced proficiency in Atlassian tools such as Confluence, Jira, Portfolio and Service Desk
","['jira', 'microsoft']","['information technology', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['jira', 'microsoft', 'information technology', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"SharePoint Business Analyst
Long Beach, CA
Full Time
Work with users to finalize business requirements and be able to create a functional requirments document.
The Business Analyst must be able to analyze, define and document requirements for data, workflows, and business processes.
The Business Analyst will be responsibile for conveying business requirements to development teams and ensuring all requirements have been met.
The Business Analyst must have a basic understanding of project management processes and procedures, including experience working in waterfalland agile or agile hybrid environments.
The Business Analyst will also be responsible for keeping the business and managment updated with current project status.
Must be able to train users on how to use SharePoint sites, Worlflows, lists and libraries.
Understand the difference between collaboration sites, team sites and publishing sites.
If you are interested kindly reach me at sathish.r@itresonance.com / 630-345-5252.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary of Job Scope and Expectations:
The Business Analyst position is responsible for gathering
business requirements and translates them into project
documentation.
This position creates diagrams and process flows
to support project documentation.
The Business Analyst
participates in QA, user testing, and technical training.
This
position understands both end-user systems and job functions in
order to improve both.
Essential functions:
all-inclusive of this jobs duties and responsibilities.
Reliable
and dependable attendance is required.
Descriptions
· Gathers business requirements and translates them into
project documentation.
· Creates diagrams and process flows to support project
documentation.
· Participates in QA, user testing, and technical
training.
· Records issues found during testing; ensures a timely
resolution, working with the development team and DBA.
· Begins to understand existing system design and
functionality.
· Acts as liaison between IS, business and vendors to
resolve issues.
JOB REQUIREMENTS:
· Bachelors degree in Business, IS or related field
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES:
· Knowledge of basic accounting, P&L, B/S, COGS
· Understanding of use case concepts
· Strong computer/technology skills and proficient in
Microsoft Office Suite and Visio
· Communication (oral and written), presentation and
facilitation skills
· Financial and project management and analysis skills
· Critical thinking and analysis skills and demonstrates
proactive behavior
· Time management, prioritization, and organizational
skills
· Ability to solve problems independently
· Ability to work positively with other departments and
Operations (win/win)
· Ability to talk and share before a group
· Ability to embrace change and continuous learning
96
800x600
Normal
0
false
false
false
EN-US
X-NONE
X-NONE
/* Style Definitions */
table.MsoNormalTable
{mso-style-name:""Table Normal"";
mso-tstyle-rowband-size:0;
mso-tstyle-colband-size:0;
mso-style-noshow:yes;
mso-style-priority:99;
mso-style-parent:"""";
mso-padding-alt:0in 5.4pt 0in 5.4pt;
mso-para-margin:0in;
mso-para-margin-bottom:.0001pt;
mso-pagination:widow-orphan;
font-size:10.0pt;
font-family:""Times New Roman"";}
",['microsoft'],"['commun', 'account', 'normal', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'commun', 'account', 'normal', 'busi']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
Ql3kfv47tu
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst (Media)
Please share profile only with experience in Media & Entertainment industry is mandatory
Note- Due to COVID-19, Client will provide remote option initially after that you have to be on-site.
Job Details
· 5-7+ years of professional work experience
· Prior experience in Media & Entertainment industry is mandatory
· Prior experience as an Business Analyst with strong customer facing skills
· Be part of and execute discovery, requirement gathering workshop with client
· Exposure and knowledge on contract lifecycle management process is preferred
· Creation and review closure of wire frames and design documents
· Creation of business requirement document
· Coordinate and lead the UAT execution
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"The Senior BA role serves as the conduit to the business users with the primary goal of understanding the business processes, workflows, and information requirements of the users.
The role is also expected to interact with stakeholders from various business units, including CMDG, Finance, Information Security and Procurement in support of current and future applications.
The Senior Business Analyst will perform requirements analysis, create functional design specifications, document workflows and ensure testing for enhancements and projects are completed successfully.
The candidate will also manage support requests, incidents and outages for their applications to avoid interruptions of day-to-day business operations and processes.
The Senior Business Analyst should have experience specifically working with cross-functional teams using the Agile project management methodology.
The candidate must be hands on and detailed-oriented.
Strong communication and listening skills are essential as well as the ability to communicate and interact with all levels of business users globally.
Candidates must be self-starters with the ability to multi-task effectively.
The ideal candidate should have several years of experience performing similar a role.
Some technical development skills would also be beneficial but not required.
The Senior Business Analyst should have the ability to assist in driving projects and be hands-on in all aspects of the system development lifecycle including project planningscoping, requirements gathering, system design and system testing.
The ideal candidate must also have a proven track record of supporting multiple business units utilizing one application for various and disparate business processes.
Job Requirements Collect, review, analyze, prioritize, and manage system and user requirements from key stakeholders across disparate locations and time-zones.
Ensure that all demand enters the IT pipeline appropriately.
Create detailed proposals, business functional data requirements, process flows, use cases, and test scenarios.
Obtain functional design specification approvals.
Work with the business technical teams to clarify functional requirements.
Serve as a liaison to other teams in planning, coordination, development and deployment of multi-team enhancements or projects.
Leverage IT organization, infrastructure and technology capabilities to help deliver maximum business value.
Ensure delivered projects and enhancements meet the requirements defined by the business customer.
Create test scripts to test new enhancements and functionality, as needed.
Define training needs and make sure that they are met for new or existing functionality.
Create user guides and training documentation, as appropriate.
Manage the UAT process by performing smoke testing, test case validation, and obtaining business approvals on UAT for scheduled deployments.
Demonstrate functionality and coordinate UAT sessions with SMEs when appropriate.
Respond quickly to vulnerability tests and internal and external audits.
Manage incidents on a daily basis and follow up on critical issues.
Establish and maintain clear escalation procedures so that problems and issues encountered are addressed in a timely manner.
Facilitate the resolution of any issues which might arise.
Provide VIP support in conjunction with and on behalf of the Global Service (Help) Desk.
Seek opportunities to drive efficiency within the team including optimizing internal procedures, workflows andor streamlining communicationhand offs between team members Operate with trust, integrity and compassion for others Have the courage to ask difficult questions, providereceive constructive feedback in spirit of continuous improvement Experience Required Minimum 5 years of experience in IT or related technical professions Preferred Skills Previous Entertainment Industry work experience Familiarity of the Agile methodology Ability to facilitate business requirements and design review sessions with customers Strong communication skills verbal, written, listening and presentation Strong organizational and workload prioritization skills Strong program or project management experience Strong interpersonal, negotiation, and relationship management skills Strong critical thinking, analytical and problem-solving skills Strong process flow and diagramming skills (Visio application) Knowledge of JIRA and ServiceNow Ability to build basic queriesreports to support business requirements gathering Education Bachelor""s degree or related professional experience required Computer Science or related Information Technology degree preferred
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Analyzes business partners operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation
Works with business partners within one business function to align technology solutions with business strategies
Supports several moderately complex business processes
Assists Project Managers in development of project plans and use associated project planning tools as needed
Assumes the Project Manager responsibilities in preparing and facilitating the project plan for smaller projects
Conducts feasibility studies to assess cost/benefit, efficiency and technical viability of solutions to business problems
Provides products and services that meet or exceed the needs and requirements of internal and external customers
Required Skills and Experience:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration preferred, or other related field or equivalent work experience
4 to 6 years of relevant technical or business work experience
Strong ability to gather/refine complex technical business requirements, recommend or make decisions on business requirements/interdependencies
Strong ability to develop complex business cases
Strong ability to present and defend complex positions and strategies for business decisions processes and plans
Customer Focus: Focuses on discovering and meeting the needs of internal and external customers and ensures the needs of the customer are embedded in all activities
Planning: Pictures the ideal state, establishes detailed steps and timetables for achieving needed results and determines required resources.
Monitors progress of plan, identifying deviations and resolves problems and/or adapts plan to achieve goal.
Considers impact of the plan on others beyond ones area.
Innovation: Develops, encourages, sponsors and/or supports the introduction of entirely new methods, procedures and/or technologies and creates and environment where such ideas are developed, shared and implemented.
Focus on Improvement: Consistently pursues the highest quality standards and strives for continuous improvement through leveraging and improving systems and processes.
Collaboration and Cooperation: Proactively looks for new opportunities to work together and contributes to a cooperative environment within the team and between teams, regardless of formal structure.
(e.g.
cross-functionality)
Basic knowledge of business requirement and corporate priorities
Basic ability to create impact analysis to make recommendations
Basic knowledge of compliance, governance structures and audit principles
A good understanding of the business architecture and its relationship to other architectures
Basic ability to assess corporate impacts of changes and recommend strategies to senior management
Preferred Skills and Experience:
Act as subject matter expert of core systems and the entire ecosystem and support operations, quality and product delivery to ensure comprehensive solutions are implemented
Keywords: business analyst
Job Requirements:
• Translate business requirements into business process and business requirement documents
• Learn business processes and identify business analysis opportunities
• Support business analyst during user acceptance testing
• Analyzing business requirements and process analysis
• Analyze existing business process requirements
• Translate business requirements into system solutions
• Understand business objective and business requirements
• Translate business requirements into functional specifications
• Translate business requests/issues into technical and business process requirements
• Developing business requirements and related business rules based on business group
• Prioritize requirements from business stakeholders
• Translate business requirements into technology solutions
• Writing business requirements for technology/software requirements
• Gather business requirements and analyze data
• Determine business requirements and specify effective business processes
• Support business user reporting needs
• Conduct business process analysis to align information technology solutions with business initiatives in multiple business areas
• Understand business process management and customers' business requirements
• Improve business processes and support future business needs
• Defining business reporting requirements from end users
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Workflows.
Data Management.
Process Builder.
Visual Force Pages.
Apex coding.
Are you a Salesforce Trailhead Ranger?
Do you consider Salesforce your canvas, on which you paint user experiences via everything from Lightning Components to custom formula fields?
Are you fully vested into growing the next org you work on to be a true work of art?
Well, lucky for you, the opportunity to take over your very own Salesforce org is knocking.
Would you describe yourself as highly adept at database management with the ability to hit the keyboard typing on Salesforce development?
Would others describe you as a doer who can bring internal and external resources together and seamlessly project manage tasks to completion?
Who You Are:
You have 3 or more years’ experience in development of the platform and project management of a team
You have analyzed databases and know how to make sure that your data is clean, you are a whiz with the Data Loader and Salesforce sandboxes
Self-starter that can manage projects to achieve results- including team member deliverables
You’ve been an admin on Salesforce and know how to manage user permissions, settings and user experience
You have developed on the platform and can handle more complex processes and untangle challenges from a backend perspective
Your love of all things data means you know your way around Excel and Access- pivot tables are your bread and butter
What You’ll Do:
Take ownership of the CRM – this includes project management, custom development and light admin for a small user group
Go into code and dive into the backend to create and refine complex processes
Manage and create workflow rules, reports, dashboards, trigger automations to further automate existing processes
Assume ownership of the performance, capabilities, strategy co-creation, and implementation of the platform
*This is an in-house role without an option for remote work*
Like unlimited breakfast and snacks, for example.
But it doesn’t stop there.
ElementsRE, FAIR Program, CreateRE,
Still reading?
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'visual']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'visual']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
M37bud6IYD
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst analyzes business needs, helps solve
business problems and supports the design of technical solutions.
This role interfaces and engages directly with all aspects of the
business.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES* Interface with business leads and
functional SMEs, to identify and capture current state process
flow and business requirements
Hands-on role in the creation and maintenance of critical
project artifacts in particular; business requirements, system
specifications, process flows and test/use case scripts
Work with project team to identify future state process flows
and requirements to meet project objectives and strategic goals
Facilitate design review meeting and capture outcomes and
update solution and requirement documentation
Prepare and present analysis findings to senior stakeholders
and steering committees
Support the design and decision-making process with IT and
business subject matter experts
Ensure clear communication is maintained across the project
team and externally to all stakeholders
Job Requirements* Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science,
Mathematics, Finance or similar field
8+ years of business analysis experience, ideally for an asset
accounting functions
Experience working across, and switching between, multiple
projects concurrently
Experience with vendor implementation projects and internal
build technology projects
Experience mapping and deigning operational workflow in the
investment management industry
Experience creating project artifacts for data-driven
initiatives i.e.
data dictionaries, data flow diagrams, and data
validation requirements
Comfortable working with and analyzing large and complex data
sets and the ability to distill and communicate findings
Proficient in both waterfall and agile methodologies
High degree of financial product literacy
Experience working directly with trading desks and/or portfolio
managers
Experience performing detailed business analysis
Knowledge of the SDLC (Software Development Life Cycle) Process
and project management methodologies both waterfall and agile
Highly proactive, willing to take ownership of issues and
follow through to resolution
Has the ability to be flexible and to adapt to changing
circumstances and priorities
Strong teamwork, communication and time management abilities
Organizationally diligent and meticulous with details
Is personable, open, and engaging, with a customer-facing
attitude
Experience with the following technologies is preferred: Data
Management platforms, (Mastering and ETL), OMS, Market Data, Data
Warehouse
",[None],"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst This position will start remote and has potential for temp to perm.
Uses specialized knowledge and skills obtained through education, experience and/or, specialized training to serve as a liaison between the business community and the IT organization in order to provide solutions to meet user needs.
Resolves or recommends solutions to moderately complex problems.?
Develops conceptual design documents, including project definition, alternative solutions, scope of work, functional specifications, and logical skeletons for new systems.?
Identifies requirements for testing, develops test plans and scripts and coordinates test transmissions, as required.
Tests software.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Volunteer)
*Note: The following is an opportunity for flexible, part-time, volunteer work.
* This is a remote-from-home position.
Are you a person with strong business acumen and exceptional critical thinking that you employ to turn data insights into strategic action?
Are you interested in learning the ins and outs of a nonprofit organization in a challenging and rewarding environment?
Do you constantly ask questions about how to use analytics to improve the business?
Check out WhoWhatWhy.org.
Youâll quickly see that weâre a credible solution to the raging debate over whether the news is âœfakeâ or not,â with agenda-free research and publishing bracingly fresh analysis.
Not left-wing, not right-wing, not consensus-seeking.
(2) Ideologically driven outfits catering to a specific mindset and not daring to reveal things that would upset their readers â or force them to reconsider their values.
Yes, weâre a nonprofit that wasnât funded by a zillionaire.
This position requires a high level of leadership, analysis, relationship management, and multi-tasking.
The analyst will also help to build out an analytics platform and to model critical aspects of the business like creating awareness, acquiring customers, engagement, and retention.
Responsibilities
Develop analytical frameworks and models to optimize performance and process efficiency.
Build and manage reports showing the health of key business metrics across platforms.
Manages end to end analytical projects â to conduct analysis, research customer and industry reports to recommend new strategies and then to lead the initiative and monitor its impact.
To build reports in Google Sheets and Microsoft Excel as well as using dashboard technologies to represent data visually.
Collaborate with the editorial staff to help drive media for growth, develop new strategies and communicate results, and provide marketing and editorial with data-driven insights around the types of stories and content that resonate with users
Assist the team with optimization projects related to subscriber engagement, email marketing, website conversion, subscriber retention
Manage projects for core functional areas by preparing and maintaining implementation plans, managing project issues, and ensuring project tasks are completed.
Qualifications
3-5 years of experience in Business Analysis
Proficient with analytical tools and languages supporting data analysis, reporting, and visualization - Excel, Microsoft Office, Google Collaborative Apps (Docs, Sheets, Slides), Tableau, R, Python.
Exceptional communicator across all levels of the organization; able to effectively tell stories with data and present findings to a non-technical audience.
Ability to work with minimum supervision and self-motivated to drive projects to the finish line
Strong organizational and project management experience, including problem-solving skills and the ability to multi-task, handling multiple projects simultaneously.
Demonstrate a collaborative spirit and ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Three years of industry or non-profit experience (media experience preferred)
Perks
Channel your passion in a stimulating environment
Learn the nuts and bolts of nonprofit operations in an up-and-coming organization
Develop new skills and gain valuable experience that can enhance your professional trajectory
Do amazing work on a flexible, part-time basis
Have fun while you make a difference
Your work will be seen!
Expectations
(Though doing more is not discouraged!)
If you possess a high level of self-motivation, work well independently but also have strong collaboration skills and enjoy the opportunity to partner with like-minded individuals, and can commit quality time per week on a regular basis to help achieve team goals, weâd like to hear from you.
If there is no option to attach a cover letter, please send a cover letter to hr@whowhatwhy.org.
You should confirm your understanding that this is, initially, a volunteer position.
Thanks!
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Space Division Business Analyst
El Segundo, CA
Job Code
6061
# of openings
1
Space Division Business Analyst
Descriptions of Duties
Assist in capture activities for space related programs specifically within classified programs supporting the Space and Missile Systems Center (SMC)
Meet with customer and potential customers to understand requirements, hot buttons and assist in developing solutions for requirements
Provide updated technical, managerial and contractual inputs
Assist in developing winning teams for upcoming requirements
Facilitate/participate in bid decisions
Assist in providing oversight and leadership of Space programs
Assist in providing oversight for programs including priority, planning, and managing technical performance to ensure quality, schedule, and cost objectives are attained
Oversee preparation and tracking of program budgets.
Assist with review and submission of Monthly Status Reports (MSRs)
Assist in the preparation of proposals
Represent the organization in relations with the customers
Development of new business opportunities and the expansion of existing business opportunities.
Perform other duties as assigned or required.
Minimum Qualifications
10+ Years supporting the Space Community specifically with Space and Missile Systems Center (SMC)
10+ years supporting Space Superiority and classified programs at SMC
Active Top Secret/SCI
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience required.
EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age or any other characteristic protected by law.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"SUMMARY:
regulatory compliance domain.
compliance procedures.
scoring models.
identifies emerging model-risk issues.
effectiveness of the model validation process.
QUALIFICATIONS:
institutions.
• Bachelor's and/or advanced degree with a concentration in Computer Science, Management Information
Systems, Business, Statistics/Mathematics, or the equivalent of 5 years’ experience in similar fields .
• 2 to 4 years of experience within the financial services industry.
• Experience with BSA/AML, Sanctions, and/or regulatory compliance would be preferred.
• Experience with data integration/business intelligence projects within the financial services/banking
sector.
",[None],"['risk', 'statist', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Must Have to work at NONProfit 4 year Degree No visible Tattoos or facial piercing CA DL and Vehicle Insurance - 2+ years recent BA experience - Microsoft Office Suite, Visio, Jira and MS Project - Knowledge of SQL and Web technologies including JavaScript, CSS and HTML - Knowledge of networking and security related to network technologies - Client-server and web application development concepts - Test scripts for validation testing purposes
","['javascript', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'jira']",[None],1.0,"['javascript', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'jira']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
lJyLse0YjI
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"The position will start off remote and it will be on-site position once the office is open.
The Mid-level Business Analyst should have at least 3 years of experience as a Business Analysis and have some exposure to SAP or different ERP system.
The day to day responsibilities for the Mid-level Business Analyst position includes identifying business requirements to help support the new SAP system, collaborating with engineers to assist with the migration, and writing reports on the progress of the migration phase to SAP.
This is a great opportunity for a Mid-level Business Analyst to gain more experience with SAP and learn new technical skills on the job.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer MFDisabilityVeterans.
","['erp', 'erp system']",['busi'],999.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'busi']"
BA,"ISM Business Analyst/Developer
If you are a Infor Service Management (ISM) Business Analyst/Developer with experience, please read on!
You will have the opportunity to grow this specialty literally leading the development/DevOps for this product.
You will be the cornerstone and as the team grows you will become the leader!
This is a hands on techno/functional role where you will wear all the hats to support this product.
ISM was implemented one year ago and you will take over as the first full time individual, eventually growing a team!
Alternatively if you have Infor Mongoose development platform and SQL and would like to learn ISM, that could work too!
What You Will Be Doing
- Analyze business problems, gather requirements, and propose information technology solutions to support business goals; leveraging ISM, Birst, and the rest of
-Communicate with internal clients at branch locations, regional leaders, and headquarters locations regarding proposed solutions, timelines, issues, etc
-Configure, develop, and test application solutions as designed and approved
-Create and modify integrations with other systems
-Build custom views and ad-hoc reports based on functional designs
-Configure IDM document types and relationships to ISM master data and transactions
-Provide support for ISM and enterprise applications as part of the IT enterprise applications team
-Provide suggestions to enhance current applications to meet future business needs
-Establish procedures and recommend policies for ongoing operations of business applications
What You Need for this Position
- Bachelor s degree or equivalent combination of education and related work experience
-MUST HAVE Experience with Infor Service Management (ISM), alternatively if you have Infor Mongoose and SQL and would like to learn ISM, that would work too!
-5+ years of experience as a business analyst for an ERP platform
-2-5 years of experience as a developer on an ERP or similar cloud platform
-MUST HAVE Experience with Infor Service Management (ISM), alternatively if you have Infor Mongoose and SQL and would like to learn ISM, that would work too!
-Strong analytical skills, applied to both business processes design and information technology applications
-Proficient using APIs
-Proficient using MS SQL
-Proficient in designing and building integrations between systems, machine interfaces, etc
-Willingness to dig in, figure things out, and make things happen
-Ability and desire to take on new challenges and additional responsibilities
-Ability to work in a team environment and navigate with multiple stakeholders
-Effective written and verbal communications skills, with the ability to present solutions clearly and concisely to various levels of the organization; able to adapt
communication style to suit different audiences
What's In It for You
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['erp', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['erp', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including supply chain carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.?
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.?
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.Full time employment, Monday - Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am - 5:30 pm.MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst / ERP Business Analyst
Los Angeles, CA
4 position
6 month Contract to Hire
Requirements
Business Analyst will need to be able to design, test, and support system users in the human resources industry.
Ultimately, the business analyst will collaborate with the client on technology and business process related efforts that include gathering functional business requirements, designing new system functionality, testing software code, setting up security and workflow, and supporting end users.
ERP Business Analyst will need to be able to design, configure, test, and implement the Advantage ERP software for clients.
Ultimately, the business analyst will collaborate with the client on technology and business process related efforts for the implementation of the HR system, which include gathering functional business requirements, designing/configuring new system functionality, testing software code, and supporting end users.
Required qualifications to be successful in this roles
Experience working with human resources system applications (i.e.
Advantage, SAP, etc..)
Experience in all facets of the project life-cycle
Experience in system analysis, design, and testing
Ability to prioritize effectively, multitask, and manage time appropriately
Strong interpersonal skills and clear communication skills
High level of interpersonal skills and customer service oriented experience and proficiency
Perform system testing using test scripts to ensure requirements are met
Execute regression testing scripts
Benefits
",['erp'],"['regress', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['erp', 'regress', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
5R2cLcOS2r
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Req ID: 177703
The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Sr. Business Analyst, Finance- IP Licensing for the Enterprise Technology- Finance & Planning department.
This position delivers work products in the area of Finance within the IP Licensing solution sets, including, project requirement gathering, business analysis, functional specification, some system configuration, testing and business process support in the application.
This position also supports solutions in the COSMOS portfolio, partners with Business Technology & Workplace Solutions to ensure appropriate usage of technology solutions while ensuring WB operates high quality and low cost solutions within their application portfolio.
The Daily
Partners with Business Unit Finance Teams as well as Enterprise Financial Services to ensure appropriate usage of technology solutions.
Support the health of the COSMOS Finance Solution including the development of application to meet new business requirements in alignment to WBs strategic goals and initiatives.
Analyze Business Unit requirements and prepare Finance related enhancement requests within the IP Licensing applications.
Work closely with Finance Development Resource and extended team on completion of Enhancement including Functional Acceptance, Integration and User Acceptance Testing and subsequent support.
Monitor technical solutions activity for monthly and quarterly Financial Close Processes.
The Essentials
Bachelors degree and/or equivalent work experience.
7-10 years of experience in Finance and Accounting, preferably including a technology role, supporting portfolio of complex applications across multiple business functions using a variety of technologies, with a focus on application development and maintenance.
3-+ years of experience participating in implementing and operating large scale, complex applications (preferably SAP).
2-5 years of experience with Finance applications, preferably in the entertainment industry.
Strong knowledge and practical application of the software development life cycle (SDLC), with industry standard best practice methodologies.
General knowledge of SOX controls and processes.
Experience with business process reengineering preferred.
Broad understanding of enterprise level systems, preferably SAP (including HANA).
Finance & Accounting Processes preferably in Entertainment.
Television Sales.
Data Management.
Reporting Solutions.
Strong customer service mindset.
Ability to actively listen and incorporate feedback to continuously improve.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be service-oriented.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to work flexible hours, including possible overtime, when necessary.
177703
",['hana'],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['hana', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"As a Business Analyst you will perform requirement gathering and analysis, data analysis, data mapping, functional design, quality assurance/Testing and documentation for ETL related projects.
The individual will be working closely with ETL Leads, Solution Consultants and testing team.
Responsibilities: Primary responsibilities include:
Perform requirement gathering and analysis of applications and their business processes.
Performs analysis that is diverse and very complex and works independently under general direction (i.e.
writing queries).
Perform Data Analysis, develop Data Mapping and Functional Solution Design documents for ETL projects.
Works with Development Team to ensure feasibility of design and clarify user requirements.
Capture business rules and build physical design document to meet user requirements.
?
Work with Data Modelers and DBA to create/update table structures.
Understand and Interpret Logical design document and Data Model diagrams to understand requirements to build physical design document.
Effectively communicate the functional design to developers and confirm the same with solution design team.
Develops test scenarios and scripts that match the business user's objectives to confirm system functions are met.
Work with Development and Testing team to support testing activities.
Qualifications:
Typically requires a minimum of 3-5 years of related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Strong knowledge and experience in Foundation Systems (Membership System for CA regions)
Candidate must have hands on experience in Mainframe and Oracle technologies
Candidate must have strong knowledge and experience in interpreting user requirements and building Physical Solution Design Document.
Candidate must have good knowledge and experience in understanding logical mapping and data model to build Physical Design document.
Strong knowledge and experience in Data Warehousing (ETL, Data Analysis, etc) concepts.
Strong intuitive and analytical problem solving skills.
Good understanding on testing principles, concepts and tools.
Advanced working knowledge of Testing, Business Analysis techniques and tools.
Should have ability to write and execute complex SQL Statements especially in Oracle Environments.
Expertise with Defect Management Tools preferably Mercury Tools preferred.
Good understanding and experience in writing test cases/plans, executing test cases & identifying defects.
Technical Qualifications: Sound knowledge and experience in Oracle, and Mainframe systems.
Daily Responsibilities:
1.
Documenting design and data mapping for dashboards and reports 2.
Building prototype dashboards in Tableau/Power BI/Excel 3.
Document and create data summarization and or transformation tasks in Alteryx/Excel as needed for design
Required Skills:
1.
MS office suite, data mapping, business rule definition 2.
Dashboard creation in in Tableau, Power BI or other tools 3.
MS Visio, MS project plan
Desired Skills:
1.
Data Science skills, statistical modeling 2.
PM in agile methodology 3.
Predictive analytics
Soft Skills:
1.
Good verbal, written communication skills 2.
Collaborate well with distributed team structure 3.
Work well under pressure
","['ms office', 'power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'oracl']","['etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'oracl', 'etl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Are you passionate about work?
Advises and recommends areas of program planning, business management, budget execution and program coordination.
Prepares needs assessment.
Validates resource requirements and develops cost estimate models.
Conducts and coordinates financial, product, market, operational, and related research to support strategic and business planning within the various departments and programs of the client group.
Interprets, evaluates, and interrelates research data, and develops integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision-making.
Plans and coordinates the development of primary and secondary market research studies in support of strategic planning and specific marketing initiatives, as required, and presents findings of studies to client committees.
Provides consultative, technical, and staff support, as appropriate.
Responsibilities:
Experience Level: 10+ Years.
Knowledge of project management principles, practices, techniques, and tools.
Knowledge and appreciation of business concepts and requirements as applicable to a large academic, research, and/or health care facility.
Knowledge and understanding of business research principles, processes, and techniques.
Ability to develop and prepare business analyses and plans.
Ability to develop and deliver presentations.
Knowledge of the principles of strategic business decision-making.
Ability to process computer data and to format and generate reports.
Ability to create, compose, and edit written materials.
Consultative and advisory skills.
Skill in the use of survey and market research methodologies, systems, and techniques.
Skill in the use of computerized spreadsheet, relational database, and word processing software.
Required Skills:
Data Consultant that provides Clarity development and Production Support of Clarity Reports for the Revenue Cycle Department.
This position includes report development in Teradata, providing product support to Business partners including:- issue resolution, root cause analysis, ensuring reports process timely and accurately
Bachelor degree OR 4 years of relevant experience
10+ years providing support in a technical environment, prefer reporting support environment.
3 years' experience with Epic/Clarity
5+ years' experience with writing reports from relational databases
5+ years' experience with report development utilizing reporting tools
Preferred skills:
T-SQL, Teradata, MS Access, Visual Basic.)
Knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Visio).
Must have experience with MS SQL Stack (SSMS, SSIS, SSAS).
Knowledge of Healthcare systems for Clinical Care, Practice Management.
Experience with developing web content.
Experience working in large corporations.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'healthcar']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
vqHMDfK2HV
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Please email updated resumes to Alaina at achristensenJudge.com.
impact of macro-level events).
Establish business goals in alignment with business case and implement reporting to monitor progress to goal.
Facilitate meetings and presentations to effectively communicate unique project goals for each client.
Serve as a liaison between senior stakeholders, clients and product team.
Develop high impact Sales Enablement and Support tools Create off-the-shelf and custom pitch materials to support Relationship Managers in clientprospect engagement.
Assist in development of client engagement playbook to support sales team.
Buildsupport strategy for participant engagement at benefits fairs.
Qualifications Requirements MBA preferred.
Minimum of 5 years of experience in business analysis.
Experience in strategic marketing or project management field a plus.
Experience working in financeinvestment management industry a plus.
Exceptional data, analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
Ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine needs and solutions.
Experience creating detailed reports, delivering presentations to senior executives, and driving stakeholder alignment.
Highly competent in Microsoft applications including PowerPoint, Word, Excel, and Outlook.
Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
Experience leading andor contributing to high performing, cross-functional teams.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'busi']",2.5,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"THE TEAM
The ITS vision aligns strategy, business, and services; affirms ITS cultural values; empowers cross-functional teamwork; embraces world-class best practices; and promotes innovation, excellence, agility, and efficiency.
ITS CULTURE
ITS values accountability, excellence, and commitment to exceptional customer experience.
ABOUT USC
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Expertise in ERP solutions that support human resources, recruiting, payroll, and financial business processes.
Ability to provide strategies and recommendations based on design and development methodologies.
Experience leading requirement gathering interviews or sessions.
Experience developing test strategies and plans using widely accepted test methodologies or frameworks.
Experience operating with Lean and/or Agile methodologies.
Experience utilizing analytics tools to measure success, present opportunities, and support decision-making.
Experience presenting technical topics in a business-oriented fashion to non-technical audiences.
Proven ability to make efficient, logical decisions in a rapidly changing environment.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including demonstrated effective functional documentation skills.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent time management and prioritization abilities.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office tools and applications.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor's degree in a relevant field such as business administration, computer science, computer information systems, etc.
Experience with Workday ERP implementation.
Experience with Kuali ERP maintenance and upgrades.
THE WORK YOU WILL DO
Job Accountabilities
The Senior Business Analyst (ERP):
Configures best-in-class application functions for enterprise resource planning tools that are aligned with business objectives.
Configures application functions independently or in a team environment.
Communicates and presents recommended business process improvements and solutions and decision-making rationale in team and client meetings.
Works collaboratively with others across the organization, including user experience researchers, product managers, designers, developers, and analysts, to deliver engaging experiences that balance customer needs, business goals, and technical realities.
Engages in standard business analysis methodologies by outlining problems, opportunities, and solutions.
Builds and delivers design solutions that meet customer needs and expectations.
Drives innovation and continuous improvement by leveraging the latest industry knowledge.
Continually develops skills, knowledge, and abilities by maintaining currency on emerging technologies and approaches.
Seeks opportunities to innovate and maximize system functionality.
Actively mitigates risk by owning tasks, resources, and changes.
Enables the release management process by anticipating risks and providing strategic recommendations for releases.
Delivers high-quality project analysis documentation such as business requirements, scope matrices, use cases, future state proposals, UAT plans, etc.
Prioritizes, analyzes, and articulates problems.
Evaluates and documents problem alternatives.
Manages constraints and suggests interim and long-term solutions.
Utilizes leading practices to effectively anticipate or solve problems.
Engages appropriate stakeholders to productively and comprehensively solve problems.
Contributes to an inclusive environment that values differences by building and maintaining collaborative relationships with team members, peers, and ITS leaders.
Actively embodies ITS values and behaviors including accountability, ethics, and best-in-class customer service.
Supports the vision for Product Strategy and Design.
Works closely with team members and management to implement and support effective solutions for enterprise resource planning.
Maintains currency with technology, standards, and best practices.
Supports process improvement efforts within the team and across ITS.
Performs other related duties as assigned or requested.
Minimum Education: Bachelor's degree, Combined experience/education as substitute for minimum education
Minimum Experience: 5 years
USC is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability, or any other characteristic protected by law or USC policy.
Inquiries will be treated as confidential to the extent permitted by law.
Read USC's Clery Act Annual Security Report
Required Legal Notices
Certain positions are subject to background screening
https://wd5.myworkday.com/usc/d/inst/1$9925/9925$43729.htmld
","['erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['risk', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Summary:
The IT department is seeking a Business Analyst to assist with IT project work, which may include system updates, process changes, reporting, testing.
Duties and Responsibilities:
1.
Determines operational objectives by studying business functions; gathering information; evaluating output requirements and formats.
2.
Provides designs and mockups for new computer programs; constructs workflow charts and diagrams; writes specifications
3.
Defines project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases, and elements.
4.
Coordinates with project stakeholders for deliverable reviews and approvals
5.
Monitors project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
6.
Maintains system protocols by writing and updating procedures
7.
Provides user documentation, training, and support for users.
8.
Prepares technical reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.
9.
Performs QA testing and defect tracking.
10.
Provides handover for User Acceptance Testing and supports users for testing.
11.
Additional IT Business Analyst tasks as directed
Qualifications:
· High school graduate or GED equivalent
· Minimum of two years’ experience analyzing system requirements and providing documentation (sample may be requested)
· Understanding of Managed Healthcare
· EZ-CAP experience is a plus.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required:
· Effective verbal and written communication skills
· Excellent interpersonal skills
· Excellent presentation skills
· Ability to multitask in a busy department
· Excellent organizational skills
· Moderate knowledge of managed healthcare operations and systems.
· Skilled in Microsoft Office applications
· Experience with Smart Sheet or MS Project
· T-SQL knowledge is a plus
· EDI knowledge is a plus
· EZ-CAP® knowledge a plus
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Position: Solution Design/Business/System analyst
Openings: 2
Duration: Full-Time
Tax Terms: W2
Interview: Telephonic + F2F
5+ years working in logistics, transportation or warehousing environment in a business/system analyst role, or experience with implementation, execution and support of warehouse management systems (WMS) or Transportation Management systems (TMS).
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite of applications.
Experience using, configuring, testing ERP, visibility / reporting tools and other business planning and execution type of supply chain applications
Experienced in data integration products and solutions such as X12, XML, CSV, and communication protocols like FT2, AS2 and VAN services
Comfortable in communicating (listening and speaking) to deliver quality collaboration in requirements scoping and knowledge transfer to other teams.
","['erp', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'commun', 'logist', 'data']",999.0,"['erp', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'commun', 'logist', 'data']"
BA,"Network Rail Consulting, Inc. is hiring!
Network Rail Consulting, Inc. is an international rail consultancy offering unrivalled expertise in railway infrastructure.
This is an exciting unique opportunity to join an established and rapidly growing global rail consultancy business.
Business Analyst – Asset Data Management
Working as part of a systems integration project team tasked with implementing an Enterprise Asset Management System, you will work closely with the Business and Solution Architects within the project to align technical solutions with business needs.
Key Accountabilities:
Assist the PM in the completion of EAM Information Architecture for this project;
Develop functional design documents;
Complete tasks within the project and develop solutions to a timeline within budget; and
Collaborate with the PM to ensure the needs of the client have been met.
Essential Job Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Business Administration, Information Technology, or a related field.
Minimum of 5 years transit experience with a least 5 years in EAM tools.
Demonstrates high level of oral and written communication skills.
Self-starter needing minimum supervision and demonstrated ability to take initiative.
High proficiency in Microsoft Business Suite (specifically Word, Excel, and PowerPoint) or related software program.
Sound understanding of asset management and experience with asset management information systems.
Experienced in developing, implementing and managing systems and processes resulting in the safe, effective and efficient infrastructure operation.
Significant experience and knowledge of transit assets and approaches to Asset Management and Maintenance, with deep knowledge in at least one asset class.
Experience in the design and construction of railway renewals and enhancement projects nationally and/or internationally.
Possess broad functional knowledge of EAM software and have experience in developing functional requirements for complex EAM systems.
Maintains current understanding of industry standards, trends, and best practices through industry and other professional networks.
https://isw.changeworknow.co.uk/network_rail_consulting/vms/e/careers/positions/dVlm74PJ9eVyFrN0YhG9Oh
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"SharePoint Migration Business Analyst
Will work on SharePoint on-premise to SharePoint Online/Office 365 migration effort
Duties:
• Collaborate with business partners to analyze and understand business problem/need required for enhancements.
• Facilitate business requirements gathering sessions.
• Elicit business and user requirements from business partners.
• Translate the business and user requirements into system requirements.
• Document, categorize and prioritize business, user and system requirements.
• Validate requirements for quality attributes, such as clarity, conciseness, correctness, completeness, testability, and traceability.
• Analyze impacts to application and upstream and downstream interfacing systems.
•Create and document functional specifications, use cases, process flows and designs.
• Review and approve project documentation
QUALIFICATIONS
Prior experience with Enterprise Content Management systems required.
Knowledge of SharePoint, Office 365, and enterprise content management required
Knowledge of Agile methodology and frameworks like Scrum, Kanban, XP, etc
Strong task management, customer contact, and task prioritization skills are required.
Knowledge of best practices and industry trends in enterprise content management and information architecture is preferred.
The ability to manage multiple priorities with a high incidence of changing requirements, analyze and clarify ambiguous requests/instructions, meet very aggressive deadlines and demanding work schedules, and manage large workloads.
Bachelor's degree REQUIRED
Big-X consulting experience is a plus
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst role analyzes business needs, helps solve business problems and supports the design of technical solutions.This role interfaces and engages directly with the Front Office Portfolio, Risk, and Operational managers.
The ideal candidate enjoys a challenge and has the ability to frame and communicate complex issues in a way that everyone can understand.
Primary Responsibilities
Interface with business leads and senior executives to identify and capture current state process flow and business requirements
Hands-on role in the creation and maintenance of critical project artifacts in particular; business requirements, system specifications, process flows and test/use case scripts
Work with project team to identify future state process flows and requirements to meet project objectives and strategic goals
Facilitate design review meeting and capture outcomes and update solution and requirement documentation
Prepare and present analysis findings to senior stakeholders and steering committees
Support the design and decision-making process with IT and business subject matter experts
Ensure clear communication is maintained across the project team and externally to all stakeholders
Qualifications & Experience
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Finance or similar field
Experience working across, and switching between, multiple projects concurrently
Experience with vendor implementation projects and internal build technology projects
Experience mapping and deigning operational workflow in the investment management industry
Experience creating project artifacts for data driven initiatives i.e.
data dictionaries, data flow diagrams and data validation requirements
Comfortable working with and analyzing large and complex data sets and the ability to distill and communicate findings
Proficient in both waterfall and agile methodologies
High degree of financial product literacy
Experience working directly with trading desks and/or portfolio managers
Experience performing detailed business analysis
Knowledge of the SDLC (Software Development Life Cycle) Process and project management methodologies – both waterfall and agile
Highly proactive, willing to take ownership of issues and follow through to resolution
Has the ability to be flexible and to adapt to changing circumstances and priorities
Strong teamwork, communication and time management abilities
Organizationally diligent and meticulous with details
Is personable, open, and engaging, with a customer-facing attitude
Experience with the following technologies is preferred: Data Management platforms, (Mastering and ETL), OMS, Market Data, Data Warehouse
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"This position will start off remote and it will be on-site once the office is open.
The Senior Business Analyst should have experience in the TV industry and Financial industry.
The day to day responsibilities for the Senior Business Analyst position includes writing business requirements to help support applications for the financial department, creating test plans for the applications that support the TV services, and working with vendor to confirm the enhancements of the internal applications are working correctly.
This is a great opportunity to work for the leaders in the media industry and learn new technical skills on the job.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer MFDisabilityVeterans.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Requisition Number:
WH5061
Job Title:
Sr.
IT Business Analyst, Supply Chain
Full Time:
Full Time - Regular
Shift:
1st Shift
Area of Interest:
ITS
West Hills-WH
Sr.
IT Business Analyst, Supply Chain
West Hills, CA
With a focus on complete nutrition for all, each endeavor is urgent and every day counts.
You'll have the opportunity to work on the #1 selling national vitamin and supplement brand, Nature Made, as well as an exciting portfolio of other products that are shaping the future of the healthy living industry.
The Sr.
IT Business Analyst, Supply Chain will be a strategic advisor that drives engagement across the organization to implement, maintain and maximize the value of IT technology investments.
Working collaboratively with the business partners to understand their needs and with other IT partners to define, develop and deliver cost effective and efficient solutions.
The Sr.
IT Business Analyst, Supply Chain reports to Sr.
Manager, Enterprise Solutions.
With this great responsibility comes the satisfaction that your contribution makes a real and significant difference.
Critical contributions this role is counted on to deliver include:
Build strong working relationships to facilitate cross functional collaboration.
Transform requirements into technical solutions that add value while maintaining current systems.
Execute priorities to align with strategies.
Maintain good functional and technical change management practices.
The ideal candidate will be recognized as a key contributor to the Supply Chain Planning and IT teams as well as the larger Operations organization.
You are people, process and systems oriented and love identifying and delivering quality solutions that drive business transformation, while executing and maintaining the highest standards for technical solutions & support.
You also enjoy working with and motivating others to success -- regardless of reporting lines and are comfortable operating with any staff/management level in the organization.
You'll be most successful in this role if you have:
A demonstrated deep understanding of Supply Chain Planning processes & technology with a track record of successfully delivering technical solutions to meet business requirements.
The ability to foster collaboration by building strong relationships and seamlessly working cross functionally on solutions that transform and add value.
A proven ability to act as both a functional and technical consultant to provide independent perspective with courage to challenge partners to think outside the box and drive appropriate solutions.
Project Management expertise with a delivery mindset.
The ability to prioritize the roadmap based on strategy and value while defining & executing actionable plans.
In order to take on these challenges, you'll need to have:
Supply Chain Planning functional Subject Matter Expertise.
Functional & technical subject matter expertise in Oracle ASCP, Demantra and JD Edwards.
Strong business process analysis & facilitation skills.
Systems analysis, design, testing, training, change control & implementation expertise.
Proven systems support & troubleshooting.
7 years' experience as an Information Technology Business Solutions Analyst involved directly with supporting the business teams.
Here, career paths aren't predefined and bureaucratic limitations don't exist -- you have the opportunity to grow, learn from industry pioneers, and develop the way you want to.
All employment is decided based on qualifications, merit, and business need.
Disclaimer
",['oracl'],"['busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['oracl', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
BQViogz4oE
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"This is an super urgent requirement.
Closely work with Business users, IT Business partners, to evaluate business problem statement, analyze, articulate and lead in end to end solution build.
Experience in Oracle EBS R12 modules such as SCM ,Process Manufacturing functionality.
Good knowledge and experience on integration of Planning function with Manufacturing, Quality, Materials Management, Sales and Distribution, Sourcing, Logistics and Costing functions.
Excellent communication skills and interpersonal skills to work in global environment.
Please call Shubham Gaur at 312.967.2511 x 102 or email at shubham.gauraccliveinc.com.
","['excel', 'oracl']","['commun', 'logist', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'commun', 'logist', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"NO Third Parties !!!
NO Visa Sponsorship !!!
Position Overview: The Kinaxis Rapid Response Analyst will provide techno-functional expertise required to effectively implement integrated planning and Supply Chain solutions that that meet client's business needs.
Responsibilities
· Work with other Demand Planning, Order Management and Supply Chain team members and business users to test and assist in implementing integrated solutions
· Provide techno-functional expertise and leadership on projects and initiatives involving Kinaxis Rapid Response as well as its integration with other boundary applications
· Build test plans, scenarios, test cases and data to enable testing
· Resolve issues surfaced by testing
· Validate data consistency and integrity within Kinaxis Rapid Response processes and reporting
· Validate departmental policies and procedures with Demand Planning system processes, policies and procedures in the solution implementation
· Assist in design to meet business requirements based on nuances of Kinaxis Rapid Response
· Assist in requirements definition, design, testing and implementation
· Identify and adopt best practices as well as process improvements into the Demand Planning design
· Assist in integrating requirements from multiple design sessions and teams into the solution design
JOB QUALIFICATIONS / REQUIRED SKILLS:
· 5+ years' experience as Business or Functional Analyst
· 3+ years' working experience with Kinaxis Rapid Response as an Analyst of Functional Consultant
· Thorough understanding of operational Demand Planning and supply chain or Order Management processes
· Experience gathering requirements, designing and implementing Demand Planning, Demand Management, Purchasing and Inventory Management solutions
· Experience developing and executing Test Plans, Scenarios and Cases
· Experience with integrating Kinaxis Rapid Response with Oracle external boundary applications
· Industry experience (preferred): Pharmaceutical, Food & Beverage, Chemical, and general process manufacturing industries
· Experience with flexible, innovative and fast paced work environment
· Onsite working with client
· Bachelor's Degree
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $180,000.00 /year
Experience:
Business Analysis: 5 years (Required)
Kinaxis RapidResponse: 3 years (Required)
Demand Planning and supply chain: 1 year (Required)
",['oracl'],"['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['oracl', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Work with developersvendor to ensure that development is in accordance with requirements.
Report back to user community with regular status updates Assist in coordinating user acceptance testing, change management, and user training Design data migration plan and prepare data mapping.
May be asked to perform lite Project Management duties so experience in this area is important.
Creating schedules, managing critical path, providing meeting summaries and action item tracking Requirements Minimum 5+ years experience as a Business Analyst At least 1 experience with a financial system implementation or migration (i.e.
ERP billing module) Must possess excellent communication and people skills Must be able to filter and assess actual business need versus perceived need Must know how to ask perceptive questions that result in uncovering business pain points and goals Demonstrated analytical skills and comfort with data, metrics and statistical methods Comfortable working with ambiguity Minimum 5 years experience creating workflows with Lucid Chart or similar Minimum 5 years of experience documenting requirements in the form of user stories in a software like JIRA or similar Nice to Have Experience with Billing, Invoicing, Cash Accruals, Collections, GL Codes, etc.
Experience with JIRA Experience with Salesforce
","['erp', 'jira', 'salesforc', 'excel']","['statist', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['erp', 'jira', 'salesforc', 'excel', 'statist', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Overview:
As
part of the roll out of a common enterprise solution, aiming to fulfill financial
The solution is already up and running in Europe and will
The software is SAP BPC running on BW, with a
HANA Backend.
Position:
Based
be confirmed
According
position is being created to support business departments.
You
will collaborate with the Corporate European team where the software solution
During
the design phase, you will spend time in Paris with the SAP team, in order to
have the proper learning curve and become autonomous
You
the point of contact regarding support and future enhancements locally
Strong
technical and functionals skill around the BPC solution are required
You
will be in charge of gathering functional requirements from multiple business
teams and leads
As
a business analyst, you will assess requirements, related impacts, and proposed
options and/or alternatives to expand on the existing solution
You
will be working in close collaboration with European team in charge of the Core
solution, where significant developments will be centralized.
You
in charge of the unit / non regression testing phases when the enhanced
solution will be tested in advance of delivery
During
budgeting phases for the organization, you will remain fully dedicated to the business
departments and teams involved in the process, and will have meetings on
regular basis with European IT teams
Required
skills :
Minimum 2-3 years
with the SAP technology/experience.
Prior
experience in business applications roll outs, especially in SAP environment
(SAP ERP, BW, BPC…) ideally in a global organization
Experience
must be across all areas of solution delivery, from requirements analysis,
design, development, to production implementation.
Familiar
with project management and related methodology (planning, detailed design,
UAT, follow-up…)
Willing
to work on new technologies where several technical stacks might be requested
Comfortable
on functional design processes, procedures, templates
Ability
to absorb business concepts and understand their relationship to the business
application inventory
Able
to lead discussions with business partners and follow up with necessary notes,
action items
Self-starter
mindset, with strong problem-solving capabilities
Demonstrates
basic testing skills, identifying and documenting test cases to prove the
report satisfies business and technical requirements
Ability
to resolve time sensitive issues in a fast-paced production environment while
maintaining strong internal and external customer relationships
Unibail-Rodamco-Westfield
backgrounds, perspectives, experience, and skills.
innovative, achievement-focused culture with unique opportunities for growth in
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin,
disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.
#LI-MF1
","['erp', 'hana']","['regress', 'busi']",999.0,"['erp', 'hana', 'regress', 'busi']"
BA,"Communicate with the business users and/or functional teams to develop business requirements and analyze information needs, delivering the follow artifacts as needed: Functional Requirements, Business Requirements Documents, Use Cases, Wireframes, Test Cases, and Training Manuals.
Serve as the strategic interface between the users and the vendor and/or internal IT groups to resolve problems and fulfill requests for package applications supported by the team.
Develop test scenarios and either test or oversee testing prior to delivery to business users; coordinate with internal QA resource pool as needed.
Lead and perform functional testing, includes coordination of QA and UAT tasks.
Work with business users, PM and Senior Business Analysts to re-platform the existing legacy system and expand functionality, reporting and streamline performance in the new system.
Trend analysis helps in forecasting production costs and needs.
Build and maintain automated workflow to obtain approvals and wet signatures for various types of contracts, payments associated with contractual agreements and also cover outstanding commitments.
Participate in team strategic planning, supporting the initial analysis and assessment of proposed projects leading to the development of business cases.
Be proactive in identifying enhancements for existing applications, design user manuals and conduct training.
Must have knowledge of:
String understanding of Agile development methodologies
Strong service orientation and focus.
Attention to Detail is required.
Has a good verbal and written communication skill.
Working knowledge of continuous process improvement methodologies and customer satisfaction measurement practices.
Has good to above average problem solving skills and able to implement solutions for moderate to difficult problems.
Basic understanding or exposure to Content Creation Production workflows and industry knowledge either with TV or Features
Demonstrates the ability to be flexible and deal with change both internal and external to the organization.
Proficient in Microsoft Office products
",['microsoft'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Strong understanding of the Salesforce platform
Ability to work in a cross-company manner
Experience gathering business requirements and processes, and the ability to execute solutions
Lead Business Analyst for development projects
Experience with large, functionally diverse, and informed user base that demands high-quality applications
Experience with business process engineering, organizational change management, performing cost-benefit analyses, data modeling, normalization, and SQL queries are all desirable
Demonstrated experience with iterative or agile project methodologies
Demonstrated ability to manage different and often conflicting objectives/activities at one time
Ability to execute and work on Salesforce Administrative tasks
Solicit and collect feedback from internal stakeholders and clients to help define business requirements for new project releases
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal)
Having experience working in the media industry
Proven ability to articulate application requirements and functionality to IT peers
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['data', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'data', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Role: BIDW Business Analyst
Duration: 6 + months
As a Business Analyst you will perform requirement gathering and analysis, data analysis, data mapping, functional design, quality assurance/Testing and documentation for ETL related projects.
The individual will be working closely with ETL Leads, Solution Consultants and testing team.
Responsibilities:
Perform requirement gathering and analysis of applications and their business processes.
Performs analysis that is diverse and very complex and works independently under general direction (i.e.
writing queries).
Perform Data Analysis, develop Data Mapping and Functional Solution Design documents for ETL projects.
Works with Development Team to ensure feasibility of design and clarify user requirements.
Capture business rules and build physical design document to meet user requirements.
Work with Data Modelers and DBA to create/update table structures.
Understand and Interpret Logical design document and Data Model diagrams to understand requirements to build physical design document.
Effectively communicate the functional design to developers and confirm the same with solution design team.
Develops test scenarios and scripts that match the business user's objectives to confirm system functions are met.
Work with Development and Testing team to support testing activities.
Qualifications:
Typically requires a minimum of 3-5 years of related experience or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Strong knowledge and experience in Foundation Systems (Membership System for CA regions)
Candidate must have hands on experience in Mainframe and Oracle technologies
Candidate must have strong knowledge and experience in interpreting user requirements and building Physical Solution Design Document.
Candidate must have good knowledge and experience in understanding logical mapping and data model to build Physical Design document.
Strong knowledge and experience in Data Warehousing (ETL, Data Analysis, etc) concepts.
Strong intuitive and analytical problem solving skills.
Good understanding on testing principles, concepts and tools.
Advanced working knowledge of Testing, Business Analysis techniques and tools.
Should have ability to write and execute complex SQL Statements especially in Oracle Environments.
Expertise with Defect Management Tools preferably Mercury Tools preferred.
Good understanding and experience in writing test cases/plans, executing test cases & identifying defects.
Technical Qualifications: Sound knowledge and experience in Oracle, and Mainframe systems.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $60.00 - $65.00 per hour
Experience:
Business Analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
healthcare: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['oracl', 'sql']","['data warehousing', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['oracl', 'sql', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Business Analyst, Support for the Enterprise Technology- IP Licensing & Dist Solutions department.
This position delivers support work in the area of Sales/Avails within the IP Licensing solution sets, including system production support, incident and backlog resolution and client communication.
This role also works closely with the Support Lead, Program Manager and other Business Analysts to help seamlessly integrate new development objects to ensure the continuance of the overall health of the COSMOS solution.
The Daily
Incident Ticket resolution across the IP Licensing Portfolio.
Document work progress of ticket resolution.
Execute automate and validate automated test scripts and execute manual regression testing of new development objects to avoid interruption of the health of the solution.
Liaise with Business Units to understand prioritization of incidents during critical business process windows.
Partners with Program Developers to achieve optimal resolution of incidents to minimize disruption in the system processes.
The Essentials
1-2 years of experience supporting large scale, complex applications (preferably SAP).
Strong knowledge and practical application of the software development life cycle (SDLC), with industry standard best practice methodologies.
Good understanding of enterprise level systems, preferably SAP (including HANA).
Good understanding of Incident Management Tools (preferably Service Now).
Support Management.
Incident/Backlog Management.
Strong customer service mindset.
Ability to actively listen and incorporate feedback to continuously improve.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be service-oriented.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to work flexible hours, including possible overtime, when necessary.
Requisition #
177704BR
Area of Interest
Industry
Film Production and Distribution
United States - California - Burbank
Position Type
Full Time
Business Unit
Business Unit Overview
WBT manages the Studio’s enterprise systems and solutions, emerging platforms, information security, consumer intelligence, content mastering and delivery, and more.
Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers.
Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
",['hana'],"['regress', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['hana', 'regress', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Primarily for ECC with strong background in SAP finance
The supporting team will be a combination of part-time cap team (2-3) from areas for Finance, P2P, Accounting, banking, tax and reporting.
Work with the onshore Tech Teams to define design/solution and organize the work create a workplan and manage end-to-end including status reporting and issue management
",[None],"['financ', 'account']",999.0,"['financ', 'account']"
BA,"Rapid Response Kinaxis Business Analyst
Rapid response is a planning tool.
Historical Demand -- Closed Sales order information
Independent Demand -- Open Sales order information
On-hand information -- current on-hand information
Part information -- items(Parts) information
Part Source information -- sourcing rules information
UOM Extract -- unit of measure information
Currency conversion -- currency conversion information
Currency conversion forecast
Customer information
Purchase order receive
Material Transaction
Supplier
Bill of material
Allocation information for pending and Wip batches
",[None],"['busi', 'forecast']",999.0,"['busi', 'forecast']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
dajD2d7GDL
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"5 + years of experience designing, implementing and supporting Sterling OMS solutions (IBM Commerce on Cloud) into existing environments.
Familiarity of WebSphere or Salesforce Commerce Cloud
3 + years of experience working on Cognos and SQL
Ability to collaborate with other technical experts and develop solution and functional design documents to support development of final solutions.
Configuration/Administrator level knowledge using Sterling Order Management components (Commerce on Cloud), API's, related interfaces and configuration.
Design of business workflows to ensure proper application mapping/flow.
Proven ability to partner with quality assurance teams to develop and execute automated testing scenarios to support end-user and performance-based testing.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with proven ability to partner with stakeholders inside and outside
Ability to work independently with minimal direction, is a self-starter with strong initiative, and ability to manage/execute workload to deliver high quality results.
","['cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['cogno', 'excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
9ekdLctAze
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
NFw02aAPSG
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
xMOokSsOXa
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job ID
763104BR
Glendale, California, United States
Business
Date posted
Jul.
13, 2020
Job Summary:
Position Summary:
He or she will identify current and future business needs and determine how best to meet those needs.
Responsibilities:
Liaise business requirements from stakeholders to all necessary parties
Define, groom and accept user stories in Rally/Jira based on stakeholder requests
Provide business with data
Define and measure KPIs that support project business case(s) and recurring spend
Communicate all successes, opportunities and risks in formal communications
Basic Qualifications:
To be successful in this role, an ideal candidate will have experience managing a diverse portfolio of applications that are heterogeneous in nature, for example: 3rd party vendor apps, in-house apps, workflow management software, reporting platforms, and proof of concepts as well as mature applications.
4+ years of experience performing business analysis within a large enterprise covering both business and information technology domains
4+ years of Product Management experience
4+ years of experience using Agile SCRUM methodology
Business Model development and Forecasting abilities
A BA/BS degree required, MBA a Plus
SQL programming skills required
Expert user of Microsoft Office (Work, Excel, and PowerPoint) as well as Visio in order to prepare all documents, presentations, tables, and worksheets
Extensive knowledge of Jira, Rally and Confluence a must
Strong written & verbal communication skills
Strong problem-solving skills
Knowledge of Film production and associated processes (Studio and/or on-set) preferred
Certified Agile Product Owner a plus
Required Education
A BA/BS degree required, MBA a Plus
Ours is a culture of innovation, inspiration and collaboration that brings together visionary artists, gifted technologists and savvy business minds to conjure up magical entertainment experiences for a global audience.
Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira']","['risk', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira', 'risk', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Minimum 3-7 years in the Information technology area with minimum 8 years direct SAP experience designing and implementing SAP MM IM PP solutions.
Full Lifecycle SAP Implementations with expertise in MM/IM/PP.
Knowledge/Familiarity with EDI specification documents.
Working knowledge of SD and APO is a plus.
Strong leadership skills.
Expert analytical and problem-solving skills.
Strong capability to execute tasks with quality.
Strong decision-making skills.
Participating and collaborating with business stakeholders; gathering and understanding their requirements, lead implementation (design, configuration, testing), training and supporting the change.
Participation in design activities and gap analysis.
The assessment, analysis and solution of client business problems.
Leading analysis and design sessions to create requirements to develop right client solution.
Participating in gathering requirements, including leading, designing and providing guidance on recommendations.
Collaborating with the key business stakeholders on current processes and proposing solutions to enhance current processes, including advising on system options, risk, cost vs. benefits and impacts.
Communicating technical and business issues/solutions to all levels of individuals, including managers, directors, and executives.
Proven success in contributing to a team-oriented environment.
Proven ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment.
Excellent leadership, communication (written and oral) and interpersonal skills
",['excel'],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",999.0,"['excel', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
tIidUUQpx4
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Assisting with the
business case
Planning and monitoring
Eliciting requirements
Requirements organization
Translating and simplifying requirements
Requirements management and communication
Requirements analysis
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Business case development
Min of 3 years of
experience.
Business Analyst is going to closely work with the Business for
requirements gathering and understand and document the Business process and
identify repetitive,
redundant process and help assist in streamlining the
business process using RPA and or Automation.
mso-fareast-font-family:Calibri;mso-fareast-theme-font:minor-latin;mso-ansi-language:
EN-US;mso-fareast-language:EN-US;mso-bidi-language:AR-SA'>
",['sa'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['sa', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"PRACTICE OVERVIEW
POSITION SUMMARY
In addition, this teammate will be responsible for providing analytical support to various ongoing special projects.
As a senior member of the Revenue Cycle Management team, you will also have the opportunity to lead individual projects and mentor other team members.
POSITION DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Design, prepare, modify, and develop selected recurring and ad-hoc revenue cycle reports
Review, process, and analyze large amounts of information related to claims submission and revenue
Design queries and manipulate large volumes of data to create reporting to identify and interpret revenue trends
Analyze detailed datasets, transforming it into meaningful financial information in preparation for revenue review
Communicate across teams, providing analytical overviews on key metrics
Conduct research and ad-hoc analysis to support revenue cycle goals
Support the development of pricing models, risk contracting and strategies to ensure contract optimization
Review and understand marketplace dynamics, industry trends, and the competitive landscape in the industry; analyze changes and develop strategies to ensure contract optimization; prepare and present findings to leadership
DESIRED PROFESSIONAL SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s degree with emphasis in business, healthcare, and/or accounting preferred
4+ years of experience in healthcare billing, healthcare reimbursement and healthcare revenue cycle management preferred
5+ years of professional experience working in an analytical role, preferably within healthcare
Comprehensive knowledge of all Microsoft Office applications, including Word, Excel and PowerPoint
SQL, Tableau experience preferred
Strong research, problem-solving, and analytical skills; understanding of business intelligence tools
Strong ability to independently drive results and meet deadlines
Highly analytical with proven ability to extract, manipulate, and interpret data strongly preferred
Understanding of (or desire and ability to learn) healthcare claim data and payor contracts
Ability to communicate effectively with internal and external stakeholders at various cohort levels
Flexibility and willingness to take on new tasks and challenges
Must possess excellent time management and organizational skills
CCPA Notice: When you submit a job application or resume, you are providing the Practice with the following categories of personal information that the Practice will use for the purpose of evaluating your candidacy for employment: (1) Personal Identifiers; and (2) Education and Employment History.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analyst: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Transaction Advisory Services (Operational Transaction Services - Supply Chain) (Manager) (Multiple Positions), Ernst & Young U.S. LLP, Los Angeles, CA.
Serve as an Operational Transaction Services professional to prepare and execute mergers and acquisition plans to maximize synergies and financial benefits from supply chain integration or separation of client operations as part of transactions.
Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including supply chain carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.
Full time employment, Monday – Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am – 5:30 pm.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
Alternatively, will accept a Master’s degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or related field and 4 years of work experience.
Must have 2 years of experience in business integrations, divestitures, or carve-outs including experience with quantitative and qualitative analysis.
Must have 3 years of experience in conducting assessments of supply chain infrastructure.
Must have 18 months of experience in the supply chain integration or separation of client operations.
Must have 1 year of experience in synthesizing approaches in complex integration or divestiture conflicts.
Requires domestic and international travel up to 80% to serve client needs.
Employer will accept any suitable combination of education, training or experience.
This particular position at Ernst & Young in the United States requires the qualified candidate to be a ""United States worker"" as defined by the U.S. Department of Labor regulations at 20 CFR 656.3.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"New businesses are making their way into the market rapidly and this in turn is increasing the competition.
With growing competition and hunger to be the best in industry, there is a need for consistent performance and perseverance to achieve the success in business.
Business Analyst jobs are for those individuals who can play a major role in making things right for the business.
Responsibilities :
Evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Improve systems by studying current practices; designing modifications
Recommend controls by identifying problems; writing improved procedures
Define project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget
Monitor project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
Maintain user confidence and protect operations by keeping information confidential
Required Skills :
Work Well Under Pressure
Communication
Problem Solving
Critical Thinking
Relationship Building
Masters in Computer science/IT
0-3 years of experience
Powered by JazzHR
4OMgzVmLQF
",[None],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Translates business needs into system/ application requirements and project components to help determine solutions to business problems.
Assists team members in producing functional requirements for tool development.
Effectively manages client’s expectations.
Applies industry and information technology expertise to support proposals, feasibility studies, implementations and new business development.
Responsibilities:
Participate in the elicitation, documentation, analysis and validation of business processes, systems, and solution requirements.
Research components of solutions to problems.
Produce visualization, user experience and configuration elements of solution design.
Document requirements specifications using high-maturity methods, processes and tools.
Support requirements management and change management processes.
Support aspects of the business cycle, including proposals, feasibility studies, and implementations.
Knowledge and Skills:
May include highly experienced individuals performing entry-level equivalent work who are non- degreed or degreed in an unrelated field.
Understanding of IT terminology and systems.
Requirements workshop facilitation experience.
Ability to develop and foster strong relationships with business and IT teams.
Excellent communication skills and ability to articulate ideas and concepts.
Ability to define current/future business processes and influence the interconnections between the business processes, technology, data and people.
Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals.
Ability to define problems collects data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions.
Powered by JazzHR
aFh79TDbwd
",['excel'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"A successful candidate will be someone who loves working with data and will go one layer deep to uncover insights and drive action.In this role you will:* Use technical skills to perform EDA to uncover trends and insights on robust volumes of data.
* Provide recommendations to the business and share analysis with multi-functional teams ranging from executives to analysts* Build dashboards for both technical and nontechnical users to measure the impact and efficiency of the business* Design, develop, and maintain ongoing metrics, reports, analyses, dashboards, etc.
to drive key business decisionsThe ideal candidate will possess:* Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Finance, related technical field, or equivalent work experience.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Overview:
You will be responsible for maintaining all tasks associated with an implementation, managing the project to meet deadlines and stay within contract budgets to deliver a working application to the customer in a timely manner.
Having well-developed organizational skills and strong attention to detail is critical to success in this role.
You will create training materials and presentations, conducting training sessions with new users, helping them learn the application and how to use it.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for coordinating the completion of client implementations, maintaining project schedules and organizing all of the tasks associated with implementation.
Manage project execution to ensure adherence to budget, schedule and scope; monitoring and tracking project milestones and deliverables
Prepare project status reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information and trends
Build relationships with customers, conducting needs assessments to identify organizational EMR management requirements
Confer with customers regarding software needs and develop creative solutions to customer user requirements and problems.
Coordinate with the customer and staff for updates to the customer environment, responsible for testing the application environments, ensuring that the environment is functioning.
Develop, document and revise new application design procedures, test procedures, and quality standards, including testing of new build designs.
Create training materials, prepare and compile training presentations to facilitate learning and conduct training sessions with new users, helping them learn the application.
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in a business related field preferred, but not required
History of academic and professional success
Highly motivated, organized, and proactive in managing projects from end-to-end
Results driven, and able to prioritize multiple tasks in a fast paced, deadline driven environment
Strong analytical skills, problem solving abilities and sharp attention to detail
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Strong presentation abilities and interpersonal skills
Can work independently and be self-directed
Confidence in dealing with and serving customers
Experience with Microsoft Office suite and Google Apps
Willingness to travel up to 30%
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"POSITION IS LOCATED IN TORRANCE, CA
Analyzes business partners operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions
Assists in the business process design or redesign and documentation as needed
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications and manages changes to such specifications
Facilitates communication and gains commitment between business units to align solutions with business strategies
Develops complex business cases
Works on multiple projects as a project team member, at times as a project leader
May coach and mentor less experienced staff
Assists with facilitating project governance and corporate priorities
In?depth knowledge of business requirement and corporate priorities
Advanced ability to gather/refine complex business requirements, recommend or make decisions on business requirements/interdependencies
Advanced ability to develop complex business cases
Advanced ability to create impact analyses to make recommendations
Advanced ability to present complex positions and strategies for business decisions, processes and plans
In?depth knowledge of compliance principles
In?depth understanding of the business architecture and its relationship to other architectures
Advanced ability to assess corporate impacts of changes and recommend strategies to senior management
Interpersonal style that reflects the Honda culture- consensus decision making, respect for the individual
High level of Integrity
Exhibit excellent oral and written communication skills
High level of skill in diplomacy/negotiating/teamwork/collaboration
5 to 7 years of relevant technical or business work experience
A minimum of 5 years Automotive Finance experience, with expertise in PeopleSoft Financials and other associated financial applications
Daily Tasks Performed:Deliver excellent production support and regulatory enhancements
Respond quickly and prioritize daily support incidents as well as
Managing the delivery of enhancements to improve or modify application functionality & correct data variances.
The applications include PeopleSoft Financials, OpenText, Hyperion, Lewtan ABS, Savid, g-Treasury and BancWare
Manage and monitor to deliver key projects, such as PeopleSoft Image update, Purchase To Pay, Thru-bill, etc
Manage Outsourced Support services (AMS) to provide financial applications support
Optimize and modernize critical IT application assets
Adhere to data privacy and compliance
Manage budget and report on variance/forecast/planning
Build and strengthen relationships with key customers (external and internal), and collaborate to translate detailed customer requirements into system requirements and interfaces, assesses available technologies and develops and presents solutions
Wants:Adhere to production support SLA
Adhere to ISD Project Methodology for all projects
Analyze and maintain budget variance guideline
Have AMS support management experience
Recognize gaps and take steps to resolve those gaps, promote the teams successes
Protect confidential or sensitive data
Remediate all sox deficiencies, if any
Meet with key customers/partners on a regular basis to gain feedback, optimize operations and resolve risks and issues.
Foresee organizational impacts and understand the procedures associated with introducing new information technologies, while seeking ways to collaborate with other IT members
Unique Skill Sets Desired:Requirements gathering/documenting, SQL, facilitate meetings
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Requirements:
Collect, review, analyze, prioritize, and manage system and user requirements from key stakeholders across disparate locations and time-zones.
Ensure that all demand enters the IT pipeline appropriately.
Obtain functional design specification approvals.
Work with the business & technical teams to clarify functional requirements.
Serve as a liaison to other teams in planning, coordination, development and deployment of multi-team enhancements or projects.
Leverage SPE's IT organization, infrastructure and technology capabilities to help deliver maximum business value.
Ensure delivered projects and enhancements meet the requirements defined by the business customer.
Create test scripts to test new enhancements and functionality, as needed.
Define training needs and make sure that they are met for new or existing functionality.
Create user guides and training documentation, as appropriate.
Manage the UAT process by performing smoke testing, test case validation, and obtaining business approvals on UAT for scheduled deployments.
Demonstrate functionality and coordinate UAT sessions with SMEs when appropriate.
Respond quickly to vulnerability tests and internal and external audits.
Manage incidents on a daily basis and follow up on critical issues.
Establish and maintain clear escalation procedures so that problems and issues encountered are addressed in a timely manner.
Facilitate the resolution of any issues which might arise.
Provide VIP support in conjunction with and on behalf of the Global Service (Help) Desk.
Seek opportunities to drive efficiency within the team including optimizing internal procedures, workflows and/or streamlining communication/hand offs between team members
Operate with trust, integrity and compassion for others
Have the courage to ask difficult questions, provide/receive constructive feedback in spirit of continuous improvement
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Experience:
Business Analyst: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Culver City, CA (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",[None],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'pipelin']"
BA,"The Job
Warner Bros. Entertainment Inc. seeks a Business Analyst, Sales and Avails for the Enterprise Technology- IP Licensing & Dist Solutions department.
This position delivers work products in the area of Sales/Avails within the IP Licensing solution sets, including consulting with system production support, project requirement gathering, business analysis, functional specification, some system configuration and testing.
This position supports solutions in the COSMOS portfolio.
The Daily
Delivers support and enhancements within the IP Licensing applications by working directly with external resources and delivering their own work products.
Fulfills compliance activities such as reporting.
Participates in project delivery for the IP Licensing solutions.
The Essentials
Undergraduate degree required.
2+ years of experience implementing/ supporting complex applications (preferably SAP).
2+ years of experience with Sales/Avails applications, preferably in the entertainment industry.
Strong knowledge and practical application of the software development life cycle (SDLC), with industry standard best practice methodologies.
General knowledge of SOX controls and processes.
Experience with presentations to business users and their management.
General understanding of enterprise level systems, preferably SAP (including HANA).
Avails processing and License sales business.
Contract Administration business process.
Data Management
Reporting Solutions
Strong customer service mindset.
Ability to actively listen and incorporate feedback to continuously improve.
Ability to work with third party service providers, preferably in a managed services environment with a very structured approach to delivery oversight and quality.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be able to communicate effectively and tactfully with all levels of personnel, both in person and on the telephone.
Must be able to organize and schedule work effectively.
Must be service-oriented.
Must be able to work independently.
Must be able to work flexible hours, including possible overtime, when necessary.
Requisition #
177636BR
Area of Interest
Industry
Film Production and Distribution
United States - California - Burbank
Position Type
Full Time
Business Unit
Business Unit Overview
WBT manages the Studio’s enterprise systems and solutions, emerging platforms, information security, consumer intelligence, content mastering and delivery, and more.
Warner Media, LLC and its subsidiaries are equal opportunity employers.
Qualified candidates will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, mental or physical disability, and genetic information, marital status, citizenship status, military status, protected veteran status or any other category protected by law.
",['hana'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['hana', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Identify ServiceNow business scopes and requirements & drive business solutions from inception through solution implementation
Understand business strategy and priorities and drive implementation planning
Partner with ServiceNow Process Owners to understand and capture functional and data requirements/stories in Service Now SDLC
Work with technical teams to define non-functional and technical requirements
Document detailed process flows and use-cases
Help identify solutions that are scalable, customer-centric and consistent with platform architecture
Develop and document functional and non-functional requirements to meet business requirements
Support the ServiceNow governance strategies and implementation standards
Support the strategic focus on availability, process efficiency, and automation
Support the use of data analytics to identify platform improvement needs and requirements
Manage the UAT process and participate in various test phases to validate the solutionsÂ
Serve as a liaison to other teams in the planning, coordination, and implementation of cross-team initiatives
Work with Product Owners and stakeholders to help ensure training and communication needs are met for new or enhanced solutions
Organize various scrum ceremonies (daily standups, sprint planning, sprint review, retrospectives, etc.)
using agile methodology
Addressing roadblocks or issues that prevent successful development and testing of approved requirements
Daily and Weekly reporting
Â
Â
Qualification/Experience
Â
Minimum of 10+ years' experience working as a Business Analyst
Minimum of 5+ years' Scrum Master experience
Minimum of 5+ years' ServiceNow experience
ServiceNow Admin Certification is preferred
Scrum certification is mandatory
Â
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Senior Business Analyst - Business Relationship Management
Duration: 3-6 Months Contract (might go PERM eventually)
Client is looking for a Senior Business Analyst to join IT team supporting Content Mastering and Delivery Group.
This position requires a combination of strong technical background and business acumen to effectively manage relationships between Business and IT, as well as support day-to-day operations and delivery of IT services.
The Senior BA role serves as conduit to business users with primary goal of understanding business processes, workflows and information requirements of users.
The role is also expected to interact with stakeholders from various business units, including CMDG, Finance, Information Security and Procurement in support of current and future applications.
The Senior Business Analyst will perform requirements analysis, create functional design specifications, document workflows and ensure testing for enhancements and projects are completed successfully.
The candidate will also manage support requests, incidents and outages for their applications to avoid interruptions of day-to-day business operations and processes.
The Senior Business Analyst should have experience specifically working with cross-functional teams using the Agile project management methodology.
The candidate must be hands on and detailed-oriented.
Strong communication and listening skills are essential as well as ability to communicate and interact with all levels of business users globally.
Candidates must be self-starters with ability to multi-task effectively.
The ideal candidate should have several years of experience performing similar a role.
Some technical development skills would also be beneficial but not required.
The Senior Business Analyst should have the ability to assist in driving projects and be hands-on in all aspects of system development lifecycle including project planning/scoping, requirements gathering, system design and system testing.
The ideal candidate must also have a proven track record of supporting multiple business units utilizing one application for various and disparate business processes.
Job Requirements:
Collect, review, analyze, prioritize, and manage system and user requirements from key stakeholders across disparate locations and time-zones.
Ensure that all demand enters the IT pipeline appropriately.
Create detailed proposals, business functional & data requirements, process flows, use cases, and test scenarios.
Obtain functional design specification approvals.
Work with the business & technical teams to clarify functional requirements.
Serve as a liaison to other teams in planning, coordination, development and deployment of multi-team enhancements or projects.
Leverage client's IT organization, infrastructure and technology capabilities to help deliver maximum business value.
Ensure delivered projects and enhancements meet the requirements defined by the business customer.
Create test scripts to test new enhancements and functionality, as needed.
Define training needs and make sure that they are met for new or existing functionality.
Create user guides and training documentation, as appropriate.
Manage UAT process by performing smoke testing, test case validation, and obtaining business approvals on UAT for scheduled deployments.
Demonstrate functionality and coordinate UAT sessions with SMEs when appropriate.
Respond quickly to vulnerability tests and internal and external audits.
Manage incidents on a daily basis and follow up on critical issues.
Establish and maintain clear escalation procedures so that problems and issues encountered are addressed in a timely manner.
Facilitate resolution of any issues which might arise.
Provide VIP support in conjunction with and on behalf of the Global Service (Help) Desk.
Seek opportunities to drive efficiency within team including optimizing internal procedures, workflows and/or streamlining communication/hand offs between team members
Operate with trust, integrity and compassion for others
Have courage to ask difficult questions, provide/receive constructive feedback in spirit of continuous improvement
Experience Required:
Minimum 5 years of experience in IT or related technical professions
Preferred Skills:
Previous Entertainment Industry work experience
Familiarity of the Agile methodology
Ability to facilitate business requirements and design review sessions with customers
Strong communication skills: verbal, written, listening and presentation
Strong organizational and workload prioritization skills
Strong program or project management experience
Strong interpersonal, negotiation and relationship management skills
Strong critical thinking, analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong process flow and diagramming skills (Visio application)
Knowledge of JIRA and ServiceNow
Ability to build basic queries/reports to support business requirements gathering
Education:
Bachelor's degree or related professional experience required
Computer Science or related Information Technology degree preferred
",['jira'],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
fbkEYmYqf4
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"People who are comfortable speaking up, sharing ideas and driving change
Energetic and passionate teammates looking for more than just a job to pay the bills
Hard-working individuals who habitually do more than asked
1-3 years of experience writing Business Requirements for Software development or configuration
Performing requirements analysis with internal teams on various business functions
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts
Effective communication of your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and product managers
Experience working with an Asset Manager in a Front or Middle office role with an understanding of accounting, analytics, and compliance data is a plus
Excellent problem solving abilities
Great teamwork skills
Well-rounded personality
Enthusiasm for technology and finance
A degree from a 4 year university
Exceptional communication skills (written & verbal) and be adept at listening and soliciting feedback
Detail-oriented & strong work ethic
Someone who thrives in a fast-moving environment and can successfully manage multiple competing priorities
YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop Business Requirements around front office OMS, credit research, and portfolio management software enhancements, including liaising with implementation and client contacts.
Configure system settings and options, and execute unit/integration/acceptance testing
Assist in training and best practices for test modeling and data analysis.
Test product-level functionality and new releases.
Identify and communicate areas for improvement
Some travel required
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Constantly evolving, cutting edge technology
The ability to make a significant impact immediately upon jumping in
An opportunity to work with some of the best firms and the best people in the financial industry
Numerous team building activities to promote collaboration
Unlimited PTO
",['excel'],"['data', 'financ', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"analyst who is a team player with solid knowledge of Scrum and Agile, who can
create a development-ready product backlog and who can help out wherever
necessary in order to hit project deadlines.
Americaneagle.com was recently named by Built in Chicago as one of the best places to work and to Inc.com's list of 5000 fastest-growing private companies for the past six years.
Responsibilities:
Support the
development of custom web solutions by owning the product backlog, ensuring all
user stories are fully elaborated, prioritized and estimated
Research, gather, analyze, document, develop and validate functional requirements for web solutions with project stakeholders
Translate user requirements into system requirements, process flows, wireframes, mockups, etc.
Facilitate requirement review and approval with stakeholders
Act as a liaison between business experts and development teams
Understand the needs of multiple stakeholders
Understand current and desired state business processes
Analytical thinking and project issue resolution
Build structured approaches for decision making
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering or related field
Strong organizational skills
Strong spoken and written communication skills
Experience with software development projects
Must thrive in a team environment
Desire to learn new technologies
Ability to clearly document, test, and validate requirements
Able to manage own workload, take initiative, and assume responsibility for tasks
Ability to multi-task and work on multiple projects
Ability to meet internal and client deadlines
Experience with user interface designs and mockups
A range of previous experience as a business analyst in a client facing position
Experience working with government clients is a plus
Experience working in an Agile environment and with Agile User Stories
Experience with Web Content Management Systems
Preferred experience with JIRA, Smartsheet, or other project management software
",['jira'],"['research', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['jira', 'research', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Responsible for understanding and gathering business and technical requirements to serve as a conduit between product and technology teams.
Responsible for growing and refining the product backlog by prioritizing against short and long-term business solutions.
Collaborate with development, business, and other team members to manage the on-going development, projects and associated deliverables throughout the phase of solution definition and product delivery.
Facilitate Agile and scrum ceremonies, help identify/eliminate impediments along the way, and guide teams on Agile principles to ensure agreed upon commitments are understood and adhered.
Possess an intimate understanding of business and technical requirements and translate, write them into epics, features, user stories, acceptance criteria, activity diagrams, and use cases.
Make and own the hard decisions, and trade-offs that emerge during the project delivery phase when things don’t go exactly as planned.
Facilitate and drive methodology change to design-first, API-first, and API as a product with internal product teams.
Works as a technical writer to document APIs and technical training materials.
Track work stream and project level risks related to timeline, scope, and quality in order to meet project goals and deadlines.
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a related field or foreign equivalent.
· 5 years of Business Analysis experience
· 3 years of experience working across disparate teams to facilitate strategic discussions with IT, product teams, and program stakeholders on the development of central platforms and standards, including API as a product and API-first development.
· 2 years of experience in technical writing including experience using REST API documentation and Swagger/Open API specification
· 5 years of experience using Agile methodology framework
· 3 years of experience grooming and refining the product backlog, ensuring stories are closed as per the definition of done, reporting sprint/user story success, and escalating risks/delays, and supporting project delivery efforts and timelines
· 3 years of experience working with complex and highly scalable cloud applications built using Amazon Web Services (AWS) offerings.
","['aw', 'amazon web services', 'cloud']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['aw', 'cloud', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"You will participate in planning, design sessions, and provide clarification on product requirements.
Manage the request process by collaborating with the Product Owner/Manager to define and justify new product developments/projects.
You must be able to work at a detailed level while maintaining the big picture of overall product goals and the supporting system design.Responsibilities:* Work with end-users, product management, and development resources to gather and document user requirements, translating them into user stories.
* Develop and maintain product backlog(s) with oversight from the business relations manager or other mentor.
* Observe or participate in interviews with business owners and stakeholders.
* Collaborates with development team to ensure design meets customer requirements.
* Participate in Agile ceremonies, helps to drive the discussion during sprint planning and user story grooming.
* Support project team during design, development, and QA testing by clarifying requirements questions.
* Assist stakeholders/end users with UAT.Qualifications:* Relevant degree preferred.
* Knowledge of Agile and Scrum methodologies.
* No prior work experience required.
",[None],"['end user', 'busi']",1.0,"['end user', 'busi']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
Uncover your full potential in a collaborative environment where you'll design, develop and deliver custom solutions to big challenges.
And you'll be doing it for a proven industry leader that runs one of the largest e-commerce sites in the U.S.
All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.
Position Responsibilities
Work closely with the business to understand problems and identify the work needed to implement future state solutions.
Document and analyze current state business processes and the underlying systems and applications.
Conduct meetings with stakeholders to gather user requirements.
Write user stories and lead backlog grooming/refinement sessions.
Analyze existing and new software solutions to find the most effective way to meet business needs.
Validate business, functional and technical requirements.
Create product/project backlogs consisting of Epics, Features, User Stories and Tasks.
Produce timely and high-quality work products, including specifications, process flows, mock-ups and wireframes.
Plan and execute System/Functional Testing and User Acceptance Testing.
Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
4+ years of experience in a Business Analyst or related role.
6+ years of overall IT experience with significant involvement in software development.
Significant experience with both traditional Waterfall SDLC and Agile/Lean methodologies.
Experience with Atlassian/Jira/Confluence and Microsoft TFS a plus.
Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.
EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled
#LI-SR1
#CORP
","['tf', 'jira', 'microsoft']","['account', 'busi']",1.0,"['tf', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid.
The Business Analyst will also assist in the monthly gateway billing and losses reporting processes, and test new product features.
Lastly, the Analyst will be responsible for assisting the Accounting team with answering questions related to their month end close process.II.
SPECIFIC DUTIES* Work cross functionally with FinOps, Sox, Compliance, and Product teams to constantly refine and optimize controls - including looking for ways to make them automated and preventative.
* Assist in the management of day-to-day team operations and problem solving in the process of merchant funding.
Implement bank account updates, pricing changes, risk hold removals and releases.
Perform reconciliation analysis and research daily variances between bank data and internal data* Utilize internal pricing models to evaluate pricing changes for merchants.
Analyze pricing structure, merchant processing history, and processor pricing policy.
Make pricing recommendations to Account Manager and assist with ongoing merchant pricing discussions.
* Provide support of the manual billing process for all gateway merchants.
Ensure accurate calculations of merchants on tiered billing pricing structures, debit merchants accordingly and report gateway-only billing revenue to Finance.
Review merchant pricing across multiple banking platforms and with different structures.
Compare pricing to signed merchant contracts, identify, and quantify discrepancies.
Assist development with new product launches and market expansions that impact merchant funding processes.
Answer questions from PayPal pricing committees, compliance, and management.
* Assist Accounting team with managing and coordinating the month end close process.
Support preparation of monthly reporting packages for department managers.
* Engage with business partners to send wire and debit payments to merchants.
* Work with a high degree of initiative to identify and recommend process improvement opportunities in the areas of pricing, accounting, reconciliation and reporting.III.
REQUIRED PERFORMANCE* Perform at a Meets or Exceeds expectations level for all specific duties outlined above.
Understand the funding implications from the transaction level, to the reconciliation level and then up to the general ledger of various money movement accounts.
* Demonstrate a high level of job discretion.
Performance is evaluated against the ability to adhere to the PayPal values and behaviors including exercising good judgment, demonstrating a desire and ability to make good decisions, displaying a heightened level of accountability, demonstrating a sense of responsibility, confidentiality and professionalism.
* Maintain a high level of commitment, which includes more than just performing accountabilities, as assigned.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Hi All,
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Join the PMO team for the Customer Relations and
to be secure and support approximately $4 trillion/ day in payments
transactions.
Job Summary
strategic plans.
Channel product and business opportunities.
Responsibilities
Coordinate with CRSO, System and District groups
Develop metrics to track performance to plans
and multi-year forecasts
Be a senior business analyst for CRSO related
channel, channel products or access to the channel products
May manage small to medium sized projects to
bring product or component enhancements to the electronic access channels
performance, operational and statistical data
Identify customer and product research goals,
conduct analysis, summarize results, present findings and make recommendations
on findings
Prepare channel communications for customers or
customer-facing groups and prepare written memos and reports on special
projects; and provide editorial consultations
Review system capabilities, workflow, and
scheduling limitations to determine if requested program or program change is
possible within existing system
effects on the channel and channel products, strategic issues including
entrance and exit strategies
record: SharePoint, JIRA, Confluence, FedPPM
Your Background
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience as
noted below
Coursework in Computer Science or Management
Information Systems
Experience in project management methodologies
Experience working within Agile software
delivery processes (SAFe)
Experience performing specialized business
analysis using business analytics software, e.g.
Tableau
Experience using process mapping and
re-engineering methodologies and tools
Experience communicating at all levels,
including, executives, technologists and business management
Comprehensive benefits package include medical,
dental, vision, prescription drug coverage, 401k savings plan, retirement plan,
paid time off, transit benefit, onsite gym and subsidized cafeteria
Requirements
Applicants must be currently authorized to work
in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the
future.
This position has additional screening
requirements due to the information accessed while performing the job.
These
can take approximately two months to be completed.
The screening covers areas
such as education/employment verification, criminal history, credit history,
and reaches out to your references and people that know you well.
holding companies.
If you or your spouse/domestic partner or minor child own
such securities, and would not be willing or able to divest them if you
ethics official if necessary.
sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, marital status, disability,
gender, gender identity or expression, or veteran status.
","['tableau', 'jira']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'jira', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"As a Business Analyst in IT Gathering Business Requirements from the client/Customer Interact with clients to understand and capture their functional and technical requirements.
Middle level project based business knowledge.
Ability to diagnose issues and resolve simple to moderately Preparation of presentations with the inclusion of feasibility study as well as proof of concept delivery.
Preparing (Functional Specification Documents)/Business Documents.
Good Organizational, analytical, Problem-solving,
verbal and written communication skills.
Interprets business needs and translates them into system requirements.
Writes business specifications and forwards to technical staff for system development.
Interprets systems specifications to develop, maintain and support automated business processes.
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"ResponsibilitiesPerforms and coordinates the analysis and design of business systems.
Develops and maintains a thorough understanding of the needs of the assigned customer group from the business and technical perspective.
Works closely with clients and with other system groups to capture business requirements and see them through implementation.
Develops and executes systems testing.
Acts as a liaison between the business user groups and the technical systems groups.
Extensive F&O industry knowledge (Ideally minimum 2 years experience)
Experience in handling a client base consisting of Banks, Hedge Funds, Pension Funds, Insurance Companies, Asset Managers, Commodity Trading Advisors, Corporates, Utility Companies, Oil Companies & Food Companies
.
* Comprehensive understanding of physical delivery process for key Fixed Income, Currency, Equity & Commodity F&O products
Excellent interpersonal skills and be able to communicate across multiple aspects of the organization at various levels
Be a dynamic & proactive team player
Ability to identify process improvements that drive capacity, efficiency and control
Strong written and verbal communication skills* Ability to work accurately and effectively under pressure
Strong time management skills required to meet critical deadlines and prioritize* Strong PC & Industry application skills (e.g.
GMI, Microsoft Office)
Qualifications
Microsoft Excel(pivot tables,Vlookups)
Bachelors degree in Related Study
2-4 years experience of financial related analytical experience
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analysts roles are targeted at graduate entry level candidates and are the first step into management consulting.
Working under the guidance of an experienced consultant, their key role is to collect, analyse and synthesise data from a variety of sources.
The insights and understandings from their analysis provide important inputs to the project team's recommendations and solutions.
BAs also provide input to client presentations, and work with other team members on day-to-day delivery of projects - for example, they may assist with developing and issuing RFPs and evaluating proposals from suppliers.
They interact with clients and their suppliers as needed.
BAs are typically involved in client facing projects at client sites from day one, so they need to be able to learn fast and get up to speed quickly and work effectively under pressure.
They must be able to work independently, while also being team players who are willing to contribute wherever needed to ensure the success of the project.
The ability to prioritise their work effectively in the face of sometimes competing demands is also essential.
BAs are expected to challenge existing ways of doing things and suggest new ideas.
However, they are also expected to be able to justify their conclusions and recommendations with relevant experience and rigorous, fact-based analysis.
Essential Requirements An exemplary academic background; preferably with a top degree in Engineering, Science, Business, or Economics
• Must have the right to work in the USA
Desirable Requirements Strong analytical skills and problem solving ability
• Ability to isolate key issues and draw sound conclusions
• Proficiency in the use of Excel and PowerPoint
• Proactive, inquiring approach
• Strong communicator with the ability to influence stakeholders
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Position
The Senior Business Analyst will help assess the needs of the business and look for opportunities to develop and grow the business through effective use of technology.
The Senior Business Analyst will collect, analyze, review, document and communicate business needs and requirements.
Based on the breadth and depth of understanding of business needs and processes, they collaborate with other teams to determine if solutions currently exist (internally or externally) or whether new solutions are needed.
This person works with Users, Architects, Developers, QA Analysts and others in the IT organization throughout the life cycle to deliver quality, standards-compliant software specifications and design.
This position reports to the Senior IT Manager - Business Analysis and Quality Assurance.
This position represents a unique opportunity for a successful candidate to join a team integrating and building new systems that are the foundation to the long-term strategy of the business.
Specific Responsibilities
Serve as knowledgeable resource to stakeholders and IT regarding product capabilities, business processes, change impacts and integration with other systems.
Understand and capture current and future-state business processes, provide gap analysis, and propose value-added improvements.
Prepare detailed project artifacts, including: business scope and requirements, user stories/user scenarios, UI/UX/screen designs, process maps, screen flow diagrams, business rules, business data models, user security needs, test plans, and project plans.
Use a variety of techniques for capturing requirements including interviews, backlog grooming sessions, and use case and development
Manage project backlogs, issues, risks, dependencies, scope, communications, and status.
Coordinate and manage UAT with the business
Responsible for proactively identifying technology opportunities that impact business strategies and performance
Help with testing as needed.
Train users.
The Person
Required Skills:
Bachelor's degree required, preferably in Business Administration, Management Information System, Computer Science, Communications, or related discipline
7-10 years of experience working with large, complex, or enterprise IT projects
Demonstrated experience in promoting usability
User Interface and report design
Experience with wireframing tools (i.e.
InVision, Balsamiq, Visio, etc.)
Experience with web applications (in-house or outsourced custom developed applications, software packages, or SaaS applications)
Well-versed in Agile methodology
Experience facilitating, modelling, and analyzing business capabilities and requirements
Experience with quality assurance methods and automated testing tools
Knowledge of IT industry trends and technologies
Capable of working both on-site and virtually
Hands-on fluency in Microsoft Office Suite including, PowerPoint, Excel, Word
Desired Skills:
Salesforce.com administrator certification
Experience with Salesforce.com platform (i.e.
Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Heroku, Apex, data loads, Lightning, AppExchange products)
Consulting experience
Experience training users
Familiarity with IT SOX compliance
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Combines business acumen with creativity
Adapts terminology according to the audience
Prioritizes effectively
Takes independent action beyond the initial directive
Excellent attention to detail
Accommodates last minute changes and requests
Maintains attention to detail across multiple tasks
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, age, sex, national origin, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, disability, marital status, veteran or military status, or citizenship status.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"What You Will Do:
The Business Analyst thrives as both an individual contributor and in collaborative settings by defining the vision for a product implementation so that the technical team can execute.
Responsibilities:
Write user stories and develop acceptance criteria
Prepare delivery team backlogs, groom stories with the team, and plan upcoming sprints
Create, test, and accept user stories to ensure they satisfy acceptance criteria and business requirements
Participate in relevant customer working team meetings to document customer requirements and ensure delivered product meets expectations
Work closely with delivery team to implement user stories and resolve issues
Help manage and prioritize customer feedback
Articulate value and prioritization rationale across the organization
Document and track dependencies and bugs requiring enablement or tooling team development
Ninja Skills:
Bachelor's Degree in Economics, Business, Computer Science, or similar.
Experience working with Agile methodology and using Atlassian (Jira and Confluence) technologies
Execution oriented, comfortable working in a fast-paced, loosely structured environment
Strong analytical, problem solving, communication, and project management skills
Ability to make real-time autonomous decisions when conditions change, based on understanding of the user context, business objectives, and client needs
Accommodations are available upon request for candidates taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
",['jira'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'econom']",1.0,"['jira', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'econom']"
BA,"If you want to be a part of something bigger than you can imagine, you've come to the right place.
You are a self-motivated person with a passion for accuracy, attention to detail, timeliness and problem solving.
You will actively participate within team and development meetings and ceremonies, and are required to collaborate with cross-functional teams.
* Bachelor's degree in business, marketing, technology* Minimum 1-3 years in a BA or similar role* Solid technical background, specifically with ecommerce, mobile app and website technologies* Demonstrated technical knowledge and proficiency; is effective in translating technical knowledge into business language as needed* Ability to juggle multiple priorities and make things happen in a fast-paced, dynamic environment* Bias for action and willingness to roll up one's sleeves to get the job done* Ability to effectively manage time and priorities while maintaining a positive attitude in a high pace environment* Collaborative spirit, and relationship-builder both internally and externally* Proven ability to work on cross functional teams in a matrix organization* Knowledge of agile methodology and scrum* Experience using JIRA, Confluence and Sharepoint* Excellent communication skills (verbal and written) to clearly, concisely, accurately, unambiguously and tactfully present information to an audience* Applies a business professional communication style with written documentation containing the appropriate grammar, punctuation and language
","['excel', 'jira']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst role is responsible for facilitating the successful delivery of eCommerce consulting engagements.
Business Analysts work closely with client stakeholders and business users and cross-functional delivery teams over the lifecycle of a project to gather and document solution requirements; document solution design; model and configure eCommerce data structures and business processes; collect, manipulate and load product data, define test scripts and acceptance criteria, manage & communicate requirement, design and priority changes and facilitate and manage defect tracking and prioritization.
Responsibilities:
Conduct one-on-one or small group interview sessions to gather required use cases, functional and technical requirements in order to develop requirement documentation.
Provide analytical expertise in identifying, evaluating, and documenting eCommerce system requirements and procedures that are cost effective and meet business objectives and user needs.
Develop user requirements, functional specifications, technical specifications, data models, and process flow diagrams to communicate engagement scope to client and delivery team members.
Serve as an expert in the functional use of hybris, it’s various administrative cockpits and the b2b and b2c accelerators.
Accountable to complete assigned work within time specified and communicate status if task delivery dates are at risk.
Work with other project delivery team members towards the resolution of business or systems issues.
Configure and manage project team collaboration space (Confluence) and issue/task management system (Jira).
Understand hybris data structures, collect product catalog data from client business users, manipulate data for import into the Hybris PCM.
Provide system demonstrations and training to client business users.
Act as a bridge between the client, technical and creative teams by collecting initial design and UX requirements; providing creative team with example promotions, product info and images; facilitating internal, technical and client design reviews; and ensuring that delivered application remains true to the creative design.
Develop test plans, write manual/automated test scripts, and define acceptance criteria to ensure high-quality project deliverables.
Requirements:
2+ years experience in eCommerce business analysis or 3+ years experience in general IT business analysis
Ideally Hybris Certification or Project Experience in IBM Websphere or Oracle ATG
Bachelor’s degree in Business or Computer Science or related field.
Send your resume and cover letter to careers@loopintegration.com.
Please include an overview of why this job sounds like a good fit for you.
You must be authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
","['jira', 'oracl']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['jira', 'oracl', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"A candidate must have strong communication skills and fluidly work with clients, management and technical staff.
What you’ll be doing:
Requirements gathering, including written and visual documentation diagrams
User experience and wireframe design
Database architecture, design, and SQL
Deliver and explain requirements to developers
Perform QA testing
Work with clients and development teams to successfully complete software development projects
Ongoing enhancements following launch
B.S.
or B.A.
degree in computer science, related field, or relevant experience
Create and running SQL queries
Possesses a strong understanding of web-based applications, including web design, user interface and programmatic/engineering concepts, and databases.
Three years of experience in a web or software development environment
Understands complex relationships between technical software components
Ability to grasp technical detail and translate to non-technical clients and staff
Ability to adjust and set priorities to meet deadlines and budgets
Ability to work both independently as well as collaboratively
Strong written and verbal communication skills, including presentation skills
Experience estimating project costs
Self-motivated, and ability to work independently
Ability to juggle multiple projects/clients
Attention to detail
The ideal candidate for this position won't mind getting his or her hands a bit dirty from time to time.
Full-time, on-site only.
",['sql'],"['commun', 'visual']",1.0,"['sql', 'commun', 'visual']"
BA,"Interested in getting trained as business analyst.
Knowledge Experience of BA Process is a plus Ability to work under pressure and in fast pace environment.
Knowledge of Databases like Oracle and MS SQL Server is a Plus.
Technical skills in Java, .NET, SQL are plus Strong verbal and written communication skills Have a positive attitude Must have Bachelors degree Masters Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or similar field a plus.
Responsibilities Include Planning Eliciting requirements Requirements organization Translating and simplifying requirements Requirements management and communication Requirements analysis Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills Understanding of SDLC concepts Modeling techniques and methods Leadership Qualities.
For more details reach venkateshamericanlabzmail.com
","['oracl', 'sql', 'java']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['oracl', 'sql', 'java', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary:
This position will be the primary contact for user support and enhancements.
The BA will work collaboratively with the applications' users, project manager, functional analysts, and technical developers to support the client applications.
Key Responsibilities:
The Business Analyst will be responsible for providing support including, but not limited to the following
Capture business objectives and document business processes
Gather and document business requirements and specifications for development of end-user programs, reports, operational procedures, and system support
Create documentation and training materials for applications, support processes, and business processes to aid end users
Perform quality assurance activities (e.g., develop and execute test cases, etc.)
Perform research and fact finding to determine IT trends and best practices and communicate knowledge to the business
Perform analysis on common sources of technical issues or questions and make recommendations to the client and support team
Document and track known application issues and associated workarounds
Qualifications and Requirements:
2-3 years of experience in a business analyst role: gathering, developing, and documenting functional and system requirements
Experience documenting process flow documentation including ""As-Is "" and ""To-Be "" environments
Experience with executing quality assurance activities including application testing
Experience developing and test scripts and release test plans
Experience with the SDLC process
Experience performing the activities outlined above for web-based workflow applications
Exceptional written and verbal communication skills
Strong ability to assimilate business functions and processes, and the technical strategies used to improve them
Excellent analytical skills and time management capabilities
Possess strong technical writing skills and ability to document business processes and flows
Ability to elicit comprehensive requirements from end users and communicate these requirements to application developers
Ability to anticipate and proactively handle issues
Ability to work without close supervision, keeping focused on short and long-term objectives
Ability to work well with both technical and non-technical resources
Ability to successfully facilitate collaboration across multiple functions, IT teams, departments and levels
Unwavering work ethic, honesty, and integrity
Physical Demands:
Ability to safely and successfully perform the essential job functions consistent with the ADA and other federal, state and local standards
Sedentary work that involves sitting or remaining stationary most of the time with occasional need to move around the office to attend meetings, etc.
Ability to conduct repetitive tasks on a computer, utilizing a mouse, keyboard and monitor
Powered by JazzHR
",['excel'],"['end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Other responsibilities include savings forecasting and reporting, supplier scorecard development, and general RFX support, including baselining and bid analysis
Essential Functions:
Identify areas of opportunity with regards to cost reduction& negotiations
Drive for“best practice” Procurement processes
QUALIFICATIONS
Education: Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Supply Chain, Engineering or related field required.
Additional Qualifications:
Ability to research data utilizing internal and external sources.
Strong project management& organizational skills– ability to manage multiple projects
Strong communication skills (both written& verbal)
Results-oriented; attitude with drive to learn
Advanced Excel and PowerPoint, MS Office Proficiency, MRP, JDE.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Busines Analyst
Contract: W2
Strong Domain knowledge on Insurance/Banking business lines
Working experience as ""Business Analyst for a large insurance/Banking domain
Working Experience in the treasury, financial operations functions
Working experience in process related to credit-control & receivables
Ability to challenge business stakeholders based on the industry domain experience to align to customer global financial operations and keep the variations only as required
Good communication skills and coordination across internal & external teams
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 8+ Months Contracts
Interview Process: Phone & Skype
Must-Have
Business Analyst with experience with BI projects (OBIEE or Tableau)
Detailed Experience and Skills Requirements:
Strong Business Analysis experience with excellent communication, interpersonal and organization skills.
Basic knowledge of systems development cycles, methodologies, and workflow diagramming
Excellent analytical, problem-solving skills
Proficient in the elicitation of requirements through workshops, interviews, etc.
Ability to work with various levels of business users.
Experience in modeling and analyzing business processes and requirements.
Understanding of metrics, dashboard design and drivers of business analysis
Properly documenting the business and functional requirements and getting sign-off.
Experience in preparing high-level data dictionaries , data mapping documents
Experience in mock-ups and wireframes for reports, dashboards, forms, etc.
based on the requirements
Experience in use case development.
Assisting in the functional testing process
Ability to perform analysis on data via ad-hoc reports or freehand SQL queries to support the requirements process
Understanding of Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing, Data Integration fundamentals to gather complete requirements
Ability take ownership of BA activities in the project when needed and/or take direction from Project Management/Lead BA
Experience in BI Products such as OBIEE 11g, Tableau to design solutions appropriate for business users and within best practices.
Support developers and ensure that the solution is built according to specifications
Experience in Order to Cash with a specific focus on invoice/sales reporting
Thanks & Regards!
Andy
Sr. Technical Recruiter
D: (848) 207 3346 | www.eateam.com
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Requisition ID: 12322
A Career in Beer:
The Headlines:
The Responsibilities:
Develop hypotheses, analyses, and recommendations around difficult and ambiguous business problems, and gaining agreement and facilitating the implementation of these projects
Conduct situational assessment of current industry dynamics and emerging trends
Support the cadence of the strategic planning process for craft, brewery, and Leinenkugel’s partners
Act as a key craft expert within the Molson Coors organization, and connect business strategy to ensure knowledge sharing and long-range plan alignment
The Qualification
You have a 4-year degree in Finance, Business, or a related field
You have 5+ years of relevant work experience, beer industry experience preferred
You have demonstrated ability and knowledge of financial models, P&L, and scenario modeling
Demonstrated executive presence and influence, and are a strategic thinker with a track record or producing actionable solutions
You are an excellent communicator at all level and can maintain positive interpersonal relationships with all team members
You have strong analytical ability to conduct research, data analysis, and resolve complex problems
Work Perks that You Need to Know About:
Flexible work programs that support work life balance all year – including paid time off (holiday/vacation/sick time) and Employee Resource Groups
Differing perspectives lead to challenging the expected, which keeps new ideas bubbling up.
Nearest Major Market: Chicago
",['excel'],"['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Demonstrated interest in financial services, capital markets, or portfolio management is preferred, but not required.
On-the-job training is provided!
This role will open up within the next 1-2 months.
Overview
You should be motivated to learn and achieve, and will be working directly with managers and senior advisors on managing client portfolios.
The Business Analyst will be responsible for delivering ad hoc projects to support leadership, working with the solutions team leads on strategic initiatives which will include the assessment of business strategy, actionable metrics and process improvements.
Successfully navigating the client services organization and building strong working relationships with clients and partners is important for this role.
Responsibilities
Work on presentations, proposals and various ad-hoc projects
Conduct market and portfolio analysis
Work closely with management team to drive strategic priorities
Help senior managers activate and maintain key client relationships
Promote process improvement and optimized efficiency, help design and develop process improvements
Build strong working relationships with a variety of business partners and clients
Assist with operational tasks, and maintain a high level of organization
Conduct market research and perform financial analysis
Qualifications
Ability to execute within a fast-paced and demanding environment, while managing multiple concurrent projects
Strong proficiency with PowerPoint, Excel, and Word
Highly energetic, self-motivated , agile team player with the ability to work with diverse working styles
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with ability to articulate complex concepts in a clear and concise manner
Confidence and skill to think strategically, develop solutions, and present recommendations to business leaders or clients
Strong skills in problem solving, business processes and attention to detail
Quick learner; proven ability to quickly learn business processes and adapt to ever changing priorities
Superior judgment and discretion working with both confidential and sensitive information
Strong people and relationship building skills
A strong interest in capital markets, portfolio management, and asset management
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Must be open to travel up to 100% of the time if required.
Required Experience/Skills:
2+ years of experience working in risk management or related fields including (but not limited to) Compliance, Internal Audit, Enterprise Risk, Third Pary Risk, Cybersecurity, etc.
Experience working in and/or leading small teams with minimal oversight
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite (e.g., Microsoft Word, Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint)
Heavy emphasis on strong written, verbal, presentation and consultative skills
Exceptional problem solving and analytical skills
Nice to Have:
Experience with one or more risk management technologies such as SAI Global, BWise, Riskonnect, LogicGate, RSA Archer
Experience writing business requirements and building process flows
Powered by JazzHR
3yjfZp9zSC
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'problem solving', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"If you have an entrepreneurial spirit, continually seek process improvements and a strong sense of customer service, then this is the right type of environment for you.
Summary:
The Business Analyst will be responsible for reviewing, analyzing, and evaluating business systems in alignment with functional department and manufacturing needs.
This position involves the documentation of requirements, as well as defining scope and objectives and formulating systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
• Determine operational objectives by studying business functions; gathering information; evaluating output requirements and formats
• Creating detailed business analysis, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for a business
• Construct process flows, charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
• Define project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget.
Experience with requirement gathering for the following process is a plus: Order to Cash, Procure to Pay, Record to Report, Advanced Manufacturing & Warehousing
• Project Management: Monitor progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports and KPIs; recommending actions
• Improve systems by studying current practices/processes; developing process maps, designing modifications
• Prepare technical reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information and trends
• Validate resource requirements and develop cost estimates
• Interpret, evaluate and interrelate research data and develop integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision-making
• Perform daily, weekly and monthly reviews and analyses of current processes using operational metrics and reports
• Review a variety of areas including operations, purchasing, inventory, warehousing and facilities
• Understand and communicate the financial and operational impact of any changes
• Suggest changes to senior management using analytics to support your recommendations.
Actively participate in the implementation of approved changes
• Create informative, actionable and repeatable reporting that highlights relevant business trends and opportunities for improvement
• Recommend controls by identifying problems; writing improved procedures
The position responsibilities outlined above are not to be construed as all encompassing.
Other duties and responsibilities may be required and/or assigned as necessary.
Knowledge and Skill Requirements
• Bachelor's degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience
• Inquisitive and detail oriented, great analytical, critical thinking, and problem- solving abilities
• Strong customer relationship skills
• Process mapping and good documentation skills
• Strong adaptability and capacity to work in fast-paced environment
• Extremely organized with strong time-management, project management, and communication skills
• Experience with any of the following systems is a plus: NetSuite, Power BI, Boomi, RF Smart, Optiva, DemandCaster, Blacksmith, Tracegains, Safety Chain and Microsoft tools.
• Ability to impact operations and effect change in a positive, collaborative manner
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
","['microsoft', 'power bi', 'bi']","['data', 'kpi', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'data', 'kpi', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Roles & Responsibilities
They will serve as a liaison between designers, developers, and the client, and recommend decisions based on the insights gained from intensive research.
Candidates must possess a mastery of organization, planning, and project management.
Other responsibilities include:
Conducting analysis of business and user needs, documentation of requirements, and translation into functional system requirements.
Performing market, data, technical, and technology option analysis and recommendations.
Creating relevant documentation, including but not limited to, user stories/use cases, wireframes, screen mockups, process flow documents, and data flow diagrams.
Interfacing with stakeholders to ensure the functional and user design of the systems before and during development.
Developing, defining & building technology business cases that advance a companys goals and digital presence
Evaluating research and recommending technology solutions/processes to improve business decision-making, with a focus on the firms core systems, technology strategies and standards.
Coordinating with Application Development team members, vendors and Project Managers, as appropriate, to review the proposed solution and design to ensure that the requirements are met.
Working with the QA group to review test plans and ensure requirements are covered.
Evaluating solutions to ensure they have high scores on usability and user experience design.
Requirements / Must Haves
Bachelors Degree in Business, Computer Science, Information Systems, or related field
3+ years of verifiable experience in business analysis/requirements management for a product or system
Proficiency in mapping business processes to user and functional needs
Familiarity with software development lifecycle
Working knowledge of business processes, system development, process improvements and change management.
Excellent written / verbal communication skills
Ability to operate in dynamic, fast-paced environment
Powered by JazzHR
",['excel'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job brief:
The project:
The product is aimed at automation of the full cycle of patient-clinic-doctor relations.
The project is in the active development phase (the product is used on the market).
Duties and Responsibilities:
Closely communicate with the client (product owner and CIO) and fully manage client’s expectations from a programming perspective through all SDLC stages (in mind both – speed & quality)
Continuously explore internal business processes and flows on the client’s end “as is” with the aim to provide an eligible and constant connection between business and programming
Become an expert in anything related to the client’s domain and infrastructure (legal, financial, medical requirements and flows, custom medical software solutions)
Become a main contact for the client providing an outstanding connection between product and development team (mostly and preferably in written)
Gather, compose, complete, clarify and validate with the customer all requirements details against business needs end to end
Explore additional opportunities to drive future business through quality results from a programming perspective
Manage development schedule (tasks’ creation, assigning, fulfillment follow-up) and deliverables
Set up releases priority sequence for greater coordination with the client
Work closely with teams and step in to provide hands-on support, play team lead role
Lead and supervise the delivery from multiple project teams in a quiet rush environment, within a tough timeline, under stress and continuous change to the project scope
Requirements:
3+ years of experience in the IT-sphere
1+ year of experience in leadership or managerial position (BA Team Lead, Product Owner, Project Manager, Account Manager, Client Partner)
Advanced BA and Technical project management skills
Strong people management and client relationship skills
Excellent communication skills
100, American Business, Deloitte Technology Fast 50, European IT Excellence, Best European BPO, Clutch, and ACQ5 Awards, and inclusion into IAOP’s Best Global Outsourcing 100 list.
You can find more details at Intetics.com.
Job Type: Full-time
Experience:
business analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefits:
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
https://intetics.com/
https://www.facebook.com/Intetics/
Work Remotely:
No
",['excel'],"['sequenc', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sequenc', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Local candidates are only being considered at this time.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with the Business to define needs and teams to recommend solutions.
Collect and document business requirements from various business teams and provides written functional requirements for various technology teams.
Serve as the liaison between business teams and technology teams.
Work with stakeholders to understand business and technical requirements, building and managing the product backlog, and successfully leading agile projects through their respective life-cycles.
Manage and drive the requirements-gathering phase of technology projects.
Sometimes provide second-tier technology applications support and application reporting.
Work with the Business to identify requirements and think critically about what will make it successful; write user stories that effectively communicate the Business’ requirements and that are easily consumed by software development teams.
Attend and lead Business stakeholder meetings; provide project status reporting to management; assist with testing scenarios and validate results.
Create deliverables such as process flows, wireframes, mockups and functional prototypes to effectively communicate design strategies and detailed interaction behaviors.
Prepare and deliver client presentations.
Advocate on behalf of Business to IT, and advocate on behalf of IT to Business.
Become a Subject Matter Expert on a variety of packages and custom business applications including User Experience best practices.
Go beyond just reading and understanding information, to making sense of it, and finding patterns for improvement.
Support business applications.
Troubleshoot and resolve applications issues.
QUALIFICATIONS:
7+ years of prior experience as a Business Analyst or other IT role, such as support or development.
BA / BS in IT, statistics, computer science, mathematics, information management, business or a related field or equivalent experience.
Strong investigative, analytical skills.
Interpersonal communication skills with the ability to work independently or as part of a team with both the Business and technology staff.
Skilled at defining and documenting business and functional requirements for ongoing system enhancement initiatives in agile software development environments.
Experience writing clear acceptance criteria to a testable level.
Experience leading or participating in all Agile meetings including: sprint planning, sprint grooming, review, demo, stand-up, and retrospective sessions.
Experience in all phases of product, software, and testing lifecycles.
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills.
Curious, self-motivated, independent.
Microsoft Office experience: Word for documentation, Excel for data handling, Visio for process explanation, PowerPoint for presentation and Outlook for email.
Beginner to moderate SQL knowledge.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
3+ years of experience on a business team interfacing with IT.
3+ years of experience in healthcare.
Ability to become a Subject Matter Expert on various healthcare, insurance, pension, and/or payroll technology systems.
Experience working on different project types, such as off-the-shelf, new development, enhancements projects.
General knowledge of databases, applications, system interfaces, and operating systems.
Experience creating reports for business users, especially via SSRS or similar tools.
Knowledgeable in SDLC, Agile and/or Waterfall methodologies.
#IND123
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr']","['data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"People who are comfortable speaking up, sharing ideas and driving change
Energetic and passionate teammates looking for more than just a job to pay the bills
Hard-working individuals who habitually do more than asked
5-10 years of experience writing Business Requirements for Software development or configuration OR Experience working with a Portfolio Testing / Pre and Post Trade Compliance system such as WSO Compliance, CDO Suite / Solvas, Eze Castle Compliance, or CRD
Working knowledge of CLO 2.0, 40 Act, UCITS, Hedge Fund, and Separately Managed Account rules is a plus
Experience working with an Asset Manager in a Front or Middle office role with an understanding of accounting, analytics, and compliance data is a plus
Ability to analyze and define requirements from Investment Management Agreement's, CLO Indentures, Collateral Management and Administration Agreements, and other similar documents outlining specific test models and calculations
Performing requirements analysis with internal teams on various business functions
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts
Effective communication of your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and product managers
Excellent problem solving abilities
Great teamwork skills
Well-rounded personality
Enthusiasm for technology and finance
A degree from a 4 year university
Exceptional communication skills (written & verbal) and be adept at listening and soliciting feedback
Detail-oriented & strong work ethic
Someone who thrives in a fast-moving environment and can successfully manage multiple competing priorities
YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Evaluate client fund structures and rules requirements to develop a comprehensive solution that models all necessary internal, investor, and legal requirements.
Evaluate clients' existing business processes to handle pre and post trade compliance, exceptions management, hypothetical analysis, and historical compliance
Develop Business Requirements around compliance, portfolio modeling, and portfolio management software enhancements, including liaison with implementation and client contacts to assist in product development.
Assist in training and best practices for test modeling and data analysis.
Work with client project teams internally to ensure all data necessary for calculations are available, including security master, positions, and other information
Configure system settings and options, and execute unit/integration/acceptance testing
Test product-level functionality and new releases.
Identify and communicate areas for improvement
End-user training
Some travel required
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Constantly evolving, cutting edge technology
The ability to make a significant impact immediately upon jumping in
An opportunity to work with some of the best firms and the best people in the financial industry
Numerous team building activities to promote collaboration
Unlimited PTO
",['excel'],"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Â
Hello Associates,
Â
Position:ÂBusiness Analyst
Duration:ÂLong Term
Â
The position will support internal Agile teams in the capacity of Product Owner and vendor-led teams using the ""waterfall"" methodology.Â
The position will report directly to the Front Office Product Manager.
Within the Agile teams, position will be responsible for working with Front Office team members in analyzing and defining essential capabilities; developing accurate, thorough stories; capturing critical attributes and ensuring the team's understanding.Â
The position is highly analytic, continually assessing the minimum viable product, the technical design to achieve the end result as well as scanning the project for issues, escalating early and developing strategies for remediation.Â
The position will be responsible for creating all the required documentation and ensuring effective vetting and communication with partners and teams.Â
Position may support multiple teams concurrently.
Attention to detail, follow-through, the ability to self-manage and nurture teams is essential.
Qualification:
5+ years in global capital/securities markets with preference given to FX experience or other trading/sales functions.Â
Experience with business process design in these areas particularly.Â
5+ years as an Agile product manager or senior business analyst, particularly with demonstrated large scale conversion experience.
Demonstrated mature analytic abilities to continually assess the minimum viable product against critical attributes, identifying required decisions and assessing the technical design.
Delivers consistently on deadlines.
Works with a sense of urgency, always looking to advance progress and follow-up on tasks.
Excellent communication skills, both verbal and written.
Able to create artifacts that will support extensive audit and regulatory examination.
Able to manage ambiguity and conflict in a highly dynamic and decentralized environment.
Enjoys coaching and supporting a work team through challenging circumstances.
Proficient in Version1, MS Office tools (Excel, PowerPoint, Word).
Experience with SharePoint, Visio.Â
Thanks and Regards,
Â
Nikhilesh
6750 Poplar Ave # 711, Memphis, TN.Â
Direct: 214 247 7116
Email:Ânikhilesh@conchtech.com
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"the gig
You love being in the middle and consider yourself a harmonizer.
You work closely with the business units to capture, consolidate, and communicate project-related information.
You are crticial in ensuring that the business requirements are appropriately defined, prioritized, and communicated to the Business Architecture (BA) team.
You also ensure that technical and operational performance, data integrity, and that operational business needs are met.
what youll do
Contribute to the tactical and strategic approach of the business analysis function across all enterprise BA projects
Act as liaison between the business units to ensure a common understanding of the business requirements and solution(s)
Lead the process of identifying business requirements, leveraging interviews, discoveries, and other activities to help facilitate the process
Translate business objectives and desired outcomes into high-quality project documentation (e.g., use cases, specifications, system designs, epics and user stories, test criteria, launch plans, etc.)
Analyze, resolve and document system changes needed as a result of defects, enhancements, incidents, missing requirements or other root causes
Guide business users in formulating new sound business and related technical processes as well as analyzing/optimizing current processes
Develop future state with recommended improvement areas and required progress steps to senior level management to improve efficiency
Maintain a thorough understanding of process mapping, data collection, data analysis, procedure writing, and documentation
Create and implement improvement initiatives, to-be business process design, and gap analysis
Evaluate business requests to determine feasibility, research and identify options and recommend solutions that best serve business needs
Present information and track and respond to questions related to business standards
Lead with a user-centric, quality-first mindset
Perform additional related job duties as needed and assigned
what youll bring to succeed
Bachelors degree in business, IT or related field strongly preferred
7+ years of Business Analysis and Process and Systems Implementation experience
Familiarity with the telecommunications industry
Familiarity with CRM concepts (opportunity, account, contact, quote, etc.)
Experience using one of the major CRM systems (Salesforce preferred)
Familiarity with quote-to-cash process and its elements (quotes, orders, work orders, line items, etc.)
Experience designing solutions for CRM systems
Familiarity with JIRA or other agile software management systems
Demonstrated success developing and presenting solutions to complex business situations
Good knowledge of business modeling terminology
Experience in business process designs and facilitation
Good analytical, evaluation and critical thinking skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Amazing organization skills
Excellent documentation skills (promptness, accuracy, thoroughness, legibility)
Ability to translate problems problem into high level requirements that can be consumed by developers
Ability to collaborate, partner and negotiate
Customer-centric approach; you have empathy for how external and internal customers are affected
Love the Customer
Challenge the Status Quo
Dream Big
Lead, Learn & Develop
Think Like an Owner
Get It Done
","['excel', 'jira', 'salesforc']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Project Delivery Specialist- Business Analyst Are you an experienced, passionate about business ndash a roll-up-your-sleeves business analysts who wants helping businesses implement technology solutions in a cost-effective way by determining the requirements of a project or program, and communicating them clearly to stakeholders, facilitators and partners- without the extensive demands of travel?
If so, consider an opportunity in Chicago, IL.
Systems Engineering professionals focus on key client issues that impact the core business by maximizing operational value, driving down the cost of quality, and enhancing technology innovation.
Qualifications Required bull Bachelor's degree, preferably in Computer Science, Information Technology, Computer Engineering, or related IT discipline or equivalent experience bull Must have Strong technology, analytical and communication skills bull Ability to impact operations and effect change without being confrontational bull Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive bull Ability to work independently and with others bull Minimum 5 years professional experience bull Extremely organized with strong time-management skills bull Advanced Excel skills bull or bull Must be willing to live and work in the Chicago, IL area Preferred bull SQL experience strongly preferred Benefits Broad range of benefits.
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"General Statement
Under direction, serves as project team member for information technology projects related to business systems and functions.
Prepares project status reports for management.
Essential Job Functions
Essential job functions are fundamental, core functions common to positions in a classification.
May serve as project lead for smaller projects.
Prepares project status reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information.
Confers with project personnel to identify and resolve problems.
Documents and revises system design procedures, test procedures, and quality standards.
Other Job Functions
Performs other duties as assigned.
Environmental Conditions
Desirable Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Skill in determining how a system should work and how changes in conditions, operations and the environment will affect outcomes.
Skill in encouraging and building mutual trust, respect, and cooperation among team members.
Ability to listen actively, providing full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Ability to communicate effectively, orally and in writing.
Minimum Qualification Requirements
Substitution
Graduate study in the designated fields may be substituted for experience on a year-for-year basis.
Promotional Requirement
",[None],"['classif', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['classif', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Department Overview
Create, clarify and refine requirements and specifications.
capture detailed requirements as needed.
Participate in integration and other design reviews together with User
Experience Teams and application architects/developers.
Develop aspects of the Customer Acceptance testing
process associated to software development deployments.
Review communication and deployment plans to
ensure flawless releases.
Suggest creative integration and technology ideas, documented diligently in
requirements documentation and if required technical specifications.
Partner and work closely with the business
and IT organization to implement best practices across projects.
Basic Requirements
Bachelor's and 5 years of experience
Degree Field: IT, Computer Engineering , Business, or related
Travel Requirements
Under 10%
None
Position Type
Experienced
Referral Payment Plan
No
EEO Statement
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"JOB DETAILS
Department: Product
Job Title: Business Analyst
Hours of Work: Mon - Fri
Line Management Responsibility: No
What You’ll Do:
· Proactively analyze current production coverage, outputs, and human-generated solutions to help make strategic decisions on product strategy and planning
· Provide relevant insights to the Chief Product Officer to drive business planning
· Partner w/ Revenue, Customer Success, and Professional Services on market analysis and viability of solutions
· Assist in creating business cases for new product launches
· Manage projects against established timelines and facilitate productive communication between different teams- Product, Marketing, Innovation, Design and Engineering
What You’ll Need:
· Bachelor's degree or equivalent in a technical discipline (Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or similar field), economics or business required.
· Demonstrated success in ability to think strategically, analyze opportunities analytically and technical depth to develop detailed product requirements
· Strong analytical skills and abilities, having worked with Excel and other reporting tools to evaluate large data sets
· Ability to effectively communicate with different stakeholders and teams
· Ability to work with potential customers in a consultative capacity to help appreciate potential benefits from new products and applications
· Exceptional organizational, problem-solving and time-management skills
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"""Business Analyst
The ideal candidate must possess excellent background on Front end and backend development technologies.
The candidate must possess excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability and collaborate effectively with domain and technical experts in the team.
Responsibilities
.
1.
Possess strong analytical and project management skills, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements*
2.
Possess excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts* Proven success in the following job competencies:
3.
Analysis and Reporting
4. Business Planning and Management
5.
Communication and Presentation –
6.
Customer Focus and Relationship Building
7.
Information and Technology Proficiency
8.Leadership
8.Problem Solving and Decision Making
9.Technical Industry and/or Profession Expertise* BA degree business or related field preferred* Equivalent work experience (minimum of 5 years of experience in IT or healthcare related field as a business analysis and/or project management) * Ability to develop/maintain various analyses and reporting tools* Advanced skills in Microsoft Office applications, specifically Word, Excel and Outlook* Must have advanced SQL programming skills* Knowledge of e-mail/scheduling software applications nnJob Requirementsnbusiness analyst, ba, project manager, healthcare, crm, business systems analyst, infrastructure, requirements, bank, salesforce, peoplesoft, business analysis, sql, agile, sharepoint, sap, oracle, process,
Requirements
•Undergraduate degree or equivalent experience
•3+ years of experience leading software development projects
•Software integration experience
•Software delivery experience
Required Soft Skills:
1.Good analytical and problem-solving skills
2.Exceptional communication skills (written and verbal)
3.Good documentation skills
4.Proficiency in English language (as a medium of communication)
5.Frank and open communication with peers and higher-ups about realistic estimations and meeting timelines/expectations and proactive communication of issues and concerns thereof
6.Assertiveness in communicating ideas, estimates, scope and timelines
This position is based in Chicago.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'oracl']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'oracl', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"To learn more, visit: R1RCM.com.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Oak Brook, IL
Posted 2 weeks ago
The Business Analyst is responsible for helping implement technology solutions in a cost-effective
way by determining the requirements of a project or program, and communicating them clearly to all
stakeholders, facilitators and partners.
Duties & Responsibilities
Look at and review business processes.
Document business processes and make
recommendations to improve processes, in light of new or proposed business tools and
techniques.
Document business cases and cost/benefit of work order or request for service
Conduct interviews and product analysis to gather and document business requirements and
functional requirements via workshops, questionnaires, surveys, site visits, workflow
storyboards, use cases, scenarios, and other methods.
Communicate application problems & issue to key stakeholders, incl.
management,
development teams, and other methods.
Analyzes, defines and documents requirements for data, workflow, logical processes,
interfaces with other systems, internal and external checks and controls and outputs
Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates, using natural
language
Conduct end user tests on behalf of the “business” of new solutions developed by IT as
checkpoints and precursors to production implementation
In conjunction with Trainers, develop training materials, end-user manuals and other
guidance tools (primers, quick hits, presentation products)
Use quantitative techniques to analyze data and make decisions.
Skills
 Proven experience with troubleshooting IT principles, methodologies, and issue resolution
techniques.
 Demonstrated ability to create systematic and consistent requirements specifications in both
technical and user-friendly language.
 Excellent written and oral communication skills, including an ability to communicate across
business areas
 Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office, MS Visio, MS Powerpoint, etc.
Experience & Education
 Bachelor’s Degree (in Business Administration, Computer Science, Finance, or Information
Systems) required
 3+ years related experience with business and technical requirements, analysis, elicitations,
modeling, verification, and methodology development.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Chicago, Illinois, United States
The hire will be responsible for conducting exploratory analysis to provide data driven insights, working with business units and senior management to define key performance indicators (KPIs) and building dashboards to monitor portfolio performance using these KPIs.
The ideal candidate is a self-directed individual who is excited to think out of the box to come up with new ideas using data driven insights.
The individual must be comfortable working with cross functional teams.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
Conduct ad hoc analysis using advanced data mining tools to support risk management, operations and marketing strategies and present results in a clear manner to senior management
Work with business units and senior management to develop key performance indicators (KPIs) and build dashboards to monitor the performance of the models and the portfolio
Work with cross-functional teams to explore new ways of finding insights from data and provide recommendations
REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor's, Master's or PhD in math, statistics, computer science, engineering or related field
2+ years of experience with data analytics and statistical modeling
Working SQL knowledge and experience working with relational databases, query authoring (SQL), as well as working familiarity with a variety of databases
Strong quantitative and problem-solving skills with key attention to detail
Strong project management and organizational skills and the ability to work independently in a fast-paced, quickly changing environment
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
NICE TO HAVE
Experience working with specialty finance or FinTech
Data visualization experience
Programming experience with Python
Start-up experience
BENEFITS
Competitive salary and benefits package, including material equity grant
Casual dress policy
Fun, fast-paced work environment
Dynamic start-up culture
Convenient downtown Chicago office located in the heart of the city
Equal opportunity employer
","['sql', 'python']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['sql', 'python', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"Six core values are embedded within these commitments - student centered, whole child, equity, academic excellence, community partnership and continuous learning.
The Business Analyst will support the NSS Finance Team, which is primarily responsible for managing all fiscal activities, managing business operations and overseeing the financial performance of the department.
This is a senior level analyst position that will play a key role in financial reporting and analysis along with developing, tracking and presenting key performance indicators and related trends to help guide business process improvements and inform strategic decision making with minimal oversight.
The Business Analyst will be held accountable for the following responsibilities:
Budget analysis, development, planning, monitoring and financial reporting;
Revenue and expenditure forecasting and reporting;
Financial transactions, cash reconciliation, and invoice audits;
Tracking, reporting and analyzing vendor and departmental key performance indicators;
Analytical and transaction support for financial and grant audits;
Providing back-up support to the NSS Claims Analyst by managing data and submitting claims for various Child Nutrition Program grants as needed;
Performing data entry, ad-hoc trend analysis and other administrative tasks, as needed.
Prepare and present weekly and monthly financial and operational reports comparing original budget to actuals, forecasting overall financial performance and explaining variances in meal counts, revenues, expenditures and fund balances.
Analyze and forecast meal counts, revenues, expenditures and other factors that are key to the management of school food operations in order to assist the NSS Business Manager with the annual budget development process.
Perform financial transactions (e.g.
purchasing, reimbursements, billing, receipting, budget transfers), cash reconciliations and invoice audits in support of daily operations.
Assist the NSS Business Manager with the development, analysis and communication of key operational metrics and performance indicators, including creating and maintaining dashboards, business reports and presentations for senior leadership.
Participate in maintaining the food service program's fiscal integrity by monitoring, tracking and auditing financial activities, recommending cost savings, identifying revenue-generating opportunities, and implementing sound fiscal activities and internal controls.
Provide analytical and transactional support for financial and grant audits.
Help the NSS Finance team manage the district's inventory of cafeteria safes.
Perform other administrative duties and ad-hoc analysis, as needed.
Type of Education Required:
A Bachelor's degree (B.A or B.S.)
in Accounting, Finance or a related field.
Type of Experience and Number of Years:
5-7 years of progressive finance or accounting experience in similar analytical roles.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Knowledge of key analytical concepts with the ability to conduct historical analysis and make future projections (e.g.
volume, financial statements, economic data, consumer preference, headcount).
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with a demonstrated ability to work with large data sets, conduct trend analysis, identify issues, mitigate risks and make sound recommendations with minimal oversight.
Strong leadership skills with the ability to influence others without having formal authority.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to write professional reports and business correspondence as well as draft and effectively present information to senior leadership.
Integrity and tact when dealing with confidential information and sensitive situations.
A high proficiency with the use of computers and software including, but not limited to, Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word and PowerPoint) and Google applications.
A wide degree of creativity and independent thinking with a demonstrated ability to follow tasks through to completion in a fast-paced environment.
Familiarity with grant and/or contract administration, preferred, but not required.
Knowledge of Oracle (e.g.
Hyperion) and PeopleSoft ERP systems are a plus.
Experience with cash collection and point of sale (POS) across multiple locations is a plus.
'244301
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'oracl']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'oracl', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Only considering LOCAL CANDIDATESA commercial bank headquartered in Chicago, Illinois is looking for business analyst assistance for a variety of technology projects which may include Compliance projects, Security systems, ITM (Interactive Teller Machine) project, Salesforce implementation, and others
Will be required to gather requirements do Process mapping, Write test cases and plans to suppose the program.
Elicit and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, surveys, business process descriptions, business analysis
Build process maps based on information captured in surveys and interviews
Pro-actively communicate and collaborate with internal stakeholders to analyze information needs and requirements
Deliver functional requirements and business requirements documentation
Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously
Work independently with users to define concepts, under the direction of project managers
Be the liaison between business units, technology teams, and support teams
Lead testing efforts to ensure issues are identified, tracked, reported, and resolved in a timely manner
7-10 years of Business Analyst experience, in support of the financial services industry
Proficient in Microsoft Office including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio
Microsoft Project and SharePoint experience preferred
Individual must have strong written and oral communication skills
College Degree required
That's the power of true partnership.
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Required Experience : Telecom Billing or Enterprise Product Catalog (Telecom related), IT Business Analysis expertise.
Strong IS Business analysts with experience IS request gathering experience, Agile experience, Telecom would be a major plus.
The Systems Analyst is responsible for leading significant business and systems analysis efforts and improving the overall impact of system requirements in support of critical enterprise projects and programs.
Serve as a requirements liaison between technology and business leaders to support the delivery of business and technology capabilities throughout the project lifecycle.
Responsibilities:
• Responsible for enterprise program requirements, using appropriate facilitation techniques, including interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, task and workflow analysis.
• Provide oversight and review of functional design documents, impact assessments and test deliverables to ensure that they meet the requirements.
• Provide oversight of the requirements traceability process from requirements through to testing with appropriate gap analysis to ensure requirements meet the needs of the business through the delivery lifecycle.
• Lead and provide oversight of cross-functional system or enterprise process initiatives.
• Provide estimates to project team for team effort, identify and communicate risks to delivering solution on time and provide input to resource needs at the project- or program-level to identify key / required skills
Experience and Educational Requirements :
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related discipline or equivalent experience is required.
Master’s degree a plus.
• Atleast 4 years’ experience in Enterprise Product Catalog (EPC) and/or billing system in a Telecommunication environment preferred.
• Strong analysis, verbal and written communication skills is required.
Must be able to communicate effectively and confidently with business and technology stakeholders, team members and management.
• Process-driven analysis skills and a background in various requirements elicitation methods are required.
• Proficiency with requirements based on an Agile project delivery methodology is required.
• Experience with wireless or telecom industry is highly desirable.
• Project leadership experience preferred
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Absolutely about 40% in year-over-year revenue growth in 2018.
Definitely.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"The Role
Responsibilities
Direct experience in the tactical operations of a Commerce website.
Ability to support functional discussions and scoping decisions based on best practices for implementing the commerce platform.
Experience eliciting high-level business requirements and creating detailed functional specs as well as other documentation like requirement traceability matrixes, work-flow diagrams and use-cases.
Experience with performing gap analysis outlining client gaps in technology, resources, and institutional knowledge necessary to deliver and execute a successful channel rollout.
Consulting experience with demonstrated track record of continuing responsibilities, creativity and innovation.
Serve as an integrator between business needs and technology solutions, helping to create technology solutions to meet client’s business needs.
Perform project tasks independently and may direct the efforts of others.
Facilitate client meetings and coordinate functional discovery with external and internal stakeholders
Build a clear requirements development strategy for each customer engagement
Translate business requirements into use cases, activity diagrams, and functional specifications
Resolve business problems with both technical and non-technical solutions
Responsible for identification and inventory of customer process pain points in best practices
Work closely with clients to understand, oversee, and guide the project to address long/short term needs
Collaborate with developers to support the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance
Desired Skill & Experience
5+ years of experience in business consulting and client services
Ability to analyze business requirements and define solutions to address complex business needs
Excellent communication, problem solving and analytical skills
Strong judgement, issues management, and problem analysis techniques
Proven ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Demonstrated ability to balance priorities on simultaneous projects
Experience working in a globally distributed model preferred
Also desired, but not required:
Knowledge or experience using other Salesforce or Adobe solutions, such as:
Salesforce Sales Cloud
Salesforce Service Cloud
Adobe Experience Manager
Adobe Target
Adobe Campaign
Magento
This year will be no different.
","['excel', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Differing perspectives lead to challenging the expected, which keeps new ideas bubbling up.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"WHAT YOU’LL DO
Collect and analyze requirements from external partners and internal stakeholders
Translate business requirements into technical specifications with acceptance criteria, implementation strategy documentation, and rollout plans
Interact with enterprise partners to support systems integration milestones and new feature development
Collaborate with Software Engineers to design, execute, and test your team’s solutions
Leverage technical and business domain knowledge to improve your product’s features and underlying architecture
Work with Product and Delivery Managers to plan and prioritize your team’s design and development work
WHERE THIS MAY TAKE YOU
Lead a team of engineers and designers, facilitating work management and organizational reporting
Drive informed decision making and strategy within a given product area
Requirements
You have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems, Finance, or equivalent experience in software development or financial services
You have experience or interest in working with external clients throughout the software development lifecycle
You have prior programming experience or an interest in learning software development concepts and working with data models
You have demonstrated experience driving and executing on use cases, test cases, sequence diagrams, and feature documentation
You have experienced the software development lifecycle, leveraging development methodologies such as Agile, Waterfall, or Lean
You possess excellent communication skills and can easily organize your thoughts into clear, consumable deliverables
You are a creative thinker who understands the big picture as well as the details
NICE TO HAVE
1+ years of consulting or customer-oriented work experience is strongly desired
Experience with financial services or retirement planning concepts
Experience juggling multiple priorities and overlapping project timelines
Benefits
WHY YOU’LL LOVE IT
Disrupt the financial advice industry by bringing affordable, easy to use financial tools to millions of people
Receive great benefits like stock options, employer 401(k) match, and employer contributions to health, dental and vision coverage
Enjoy a casual work environment surrounded by top quality designers & engineers that enjoy working with each other
Participate in company-sponsored sporting leagues, wine tastings, fantasy football leagues, hackathons and other fun events
Enjoy a newly built out office on Michigan Avenue with unobstructed views of the lake and Millennium Park
Sip locally roasted coffee, iced tea, cold brew, or espresso at your modular sitting/standing desk
",['excel'],"['sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Business Analyst in Bloomingdale, IL area.
2 positions open.
5 years experience.
Please send your resume to recruiter@cyberkorp.com!
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or in a related fieldDevelops and performs system performance load and stress test case scenarios.
Oversees the development of test standards for script development, deployment, and reuse.
Serves as subject matter and technical expert for assigned areas.
Leads quality audits to ensure standards, procedures, and methodologies are being followed.
Monitors post-implementation system/program performance to prevent reoccurrence of operational issues and ensure efficiency of operation.
Serves as primary liaison/consultant between the system users and the technical team.
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Duration: Long Term
Please see the bold items to know what is critical to this role.
Candidates MUST have an active LinkedIn profile to verify their identity.
Must have:
Very strong, independent, critical thinking.
A go getter.
A senior BA who has worked on large, enterprise wide implementations.
They understand urgent priorities and can self-manage their desk/tasks
Deadline driven and self-accountable for their work.
Exhausts all avenues to get answers and at same time raise hand, in advance, when they know they will not meet a deliverable.
Comes in with solution options.
Can tell a good narrative, visual story.
E.g.
Current state vs Future state.
Clear and easy to understand Use Case development.
Explain issues and challenges in a quick and concise manner.
Strong Accounting, Financial and Banking experience.
I would lean on Accounting as highest priority skill set (i.e.
take a transaction lifecycle and map out all possible cash movement and accounting/GL/DR & CR posts, balance sheet understanding (i.e.
understanding Asset, Liability, Cash, Sundry, Suspense, Wash, all other types of accounts).
GAAP, IFRS, and FASB understanding.
Understands concepts of Interest rate accrues and capitalization.
People person.
Has the savvy to work with different personality types and still get what is needed to complete her/his tasks.
Need only Citizens
Duties
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'visual']",1.0,"['busi', 'account', 'visual']"
BA,"Designs and documents workflows and makes appropriate recommendations that will positively impact operational efficiencies.
Tracks and analyzes program and departmental trends and makes appropriate recommendations that will positively impact the unit.
All work to be completed with minimum supervision and in accordance with organizational standards.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Defines project scope and objectives and assesses the operational impacts, workflow, training, etc.
of a project along with the Director of Strategy Management.
Takes assigned projects from original concept through final implementation.
Creates and maintains project schedules by developing project plans and specifications, estimating time requirements, establishing deadlines, monitoring milestone completion, tracking all phases of the project product/service lifecycle, providing timely reporting of issues that impact project progress, coordinating actions, and resolving conflicts.
This includes documenting, prioritizing and tracking requests (changes, enhancements, etc.).
Coordinates with Strategy to ensure that project management is aligned with best practices and strategic goals.
Analyzes the programs/departments activities and trends and compares analyses against the service standards and best practices.
Presents findings and works with the appropriate staff to identify and implement strategies that will address tactical and strategic goals.
Reviews, analyzes, and creates detailed documentation of business process improvement and reporting and user needs, including workflow, program functions, and steps required to develop or modify improvement programs.
Works with IT and business units to ensure that business requirements are adequately reflected in existing and new software applications.
Develops use cases to test changes and new implementations, to ensure they align with business processes.
Assists with the development of training and process improvement requirements of the program/department.
Other Functions: The organization may assign other functions to the job at its discretion.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE:
Bachelors degree required.
Fifth year college or university program certificate preferred; two to four years related experience and/or training.
",[None],"['supervis', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['supervis', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Project work in more than 25 countries
Extensive industry experience in B2B markets
Responsibilities:
Create and use analytical models to simulate or forecast business problems and results
Conduct data analysis including basic statistical analysis
Participate in client interviews and related fact-finding initiatives
Use and develop communication skills to communicate project findings, conclusions and recommendations with your peers and clients
Prepare initial drafts of high quality, error free deliverables
Participate in client meetings to review and present analytical approaches and interpret results
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree with solid academic achievement
Coursework in business administration, finance or economics is a strong plus
1+ years of relevant professional experience
Good business acumen and awareness of business trends
Moderate to advanced Excel and PowerPoint skills are required
Quantitative skills and general problem solving skills for business problems
Strong interpersonal and team working skills
Good communication skills (written and verbal)
Ability to learn quickly and resourcefully
High degree of motivation, flexibility and creativity
Positive attitude and strong willingness to learn from mentors and peers
Ability to travel (sometimes on short notice)
EEO Employer.
Pre-employment background check required.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The primary responsibility of an entry-level business analyst includes to perform business analysis and related duties.
Liaise with the project sponsors, stakeholders, external vendors and other divisions within the Client to document current state, elicit & document requirements to ensure the delivery of quality products.
Responsibilities:
Analyze complex problems, derive options and solutions and present in an understandable manner to stakeholders, developers, testers and users at multiple levels.
Act as a liaison with technology and business unit subject matter experts in support of Transactions Monitoring project.
Solicit information from business and IT SMEs about application functions, data and process flows.
Document application functions, data and process flows using prescribed template, or appropriate fit-for-purpose format
Participate in integration design process and provide detailed documentation and requirements as appropriate.
Document reports required by system stakeholders.
Oversees the acquisition, analysis, strategy and dissemination of subject matter knowledge.
Conducts high level business analysis involving complex business requirements and processes.
Requirements
Master’s degree in Computer Science / Information Technology
0-2 years of experience as a business analyst
Clear written and oral communication skills
Good listening skills
Customer focused
Strong attention to detail and results oriented
Well organized; adaptability and ability to learn quickly
Ability to develop good, effective working relationships with customers through minimal contact
Experience with MS Office Suite
Willing to Re-locate anywhere.
Powered by JazzHR
NI6uioPbZK
",['ms office'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Here, you can impact markets worldwide.
Transform industries.
And build a career shaping tomorrow.
But big enough for your ideas to make an impact.
Problem solvers, difference makers, trailblazers.
An early career job that will rarely be the same day-to-day.
The role requires left and right brain problem-solving.
The role relies on Interpersonal and communication skills, with the goal of building and maintaining trusted working relationships.
The role works in close coordination and oversight with all members of the Delivery team.
Organization, attention to detail, flexibility, self-direction and critical thinking are a must as well as an ability to recommend a path forward - your input and views are required, not optional.
Lovers of routine, risk adverse order-takers and advocates-of-the-status-quo are not meant for this role.
Job Duties (from most time spent to least time spent)
· Manage project-efforts by drafting, updating and auditing project documentation, dashboards tickets and workflows, recommending process improvements and automation where appropriate
· Perform data and trend analysis for multiple systems and processes, recommending courses of action
· Take notes and co-facilitate project meetings
· Create, improve, and maintain monthly metrics including analysis for anomalies and remediations
· Aid in the creation of decks and documents
· Work with the Portfolio lead to manage resource supply, project demand and the creation of reporting tools
Background and Experience
· Entry-level
· Recent college graduate or someone looking to break into the Project Management field
· No Project Management experience required
· Degrees (not limited to): Business, IS, and IT Management.
Liberal Arts majors are encouraged as well
· Excellent communication, organization and written skills
· High level analytical, attention to detail and critical thinking
· Experience with Microsoft Office (strong in XLS) a plus and a requirement to learn and use other systems as needed for analysis, tracking, auditing and reporting
]]>
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"General requirements a.
REST, JSON, XML) f. Knowledge of data warehouse concepts, data model, knowledge of SQL(Structured Query Language) and ability to query databases, source to target mapping g. Technical experience with systems networking, databases, Web development, Mobile App development, and user support 2.
Domain a.
Knowledge in Blue CrossBlue Brand plans preferred 3.
Core BA TechniquesArtifacts a.
Requirement discovery workshops, JAD sessions, and stakeholder interviews, Job shadowing, Prototyping etc b.
User stories, process flows, Use cases, context diagrams and other requirement artifacts c. BRDSRSFRS , RTM d. Process modeling (UML BPMN), strategy analysis, Non functional requirements, transition requirements e. Change management, CR, impact analysis f. UAT, Test plan, Test data, business testing 4.
Underlaying competencies Soft skills a. ability to see the bigger picture but also work through the details, able to multi-task b.
Excellent communication skills , interpersonal and stakeholder management skills, self-driven attitude is a must c. Experience willingness to work under high pressure, short deadline, multi-vendor engagements d. Excellent stakeholder identification and management skills 5.
Tools a.
Strong in MS Office and diagraming tools like MS Visio b. ClearQuestJira as a repository for application code and ticket information c. ServiceNow to log tickets for each enhancement and defectbug fix d. SharePoint to upload documents related to the project and submit requests e. Toad and IBM DataStudio for DB2 database query operations f. HP-ALM, Rally (for Agile Mgmt.)
g. Ab Initio software such as Co-Op, MDH, EME, QueryIT, ExpressIT, Control-Center, Ab Initio Test Framework Required Soft Skills a.
Good analytical and problem-solving skills b.
Exceptional communication skills (written and verbal) c. Good documentation skills d. Proficiency in English language (as a medium of communication) e. Frank and open communication with peers and higher-ups about realistic estimations and meeting timelinesexpectations and proactive communication of issues and concerns thereof f. Assertiveness in communicating ideas, estimates, scope and timelines Nice to have a.
Experience working with PHI PII and sensitive data b.
Can also consider candidates for Washington DC BCBSA Office Norfolk Dev Center (least preference
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary:
The Business Analyst will provide expertise in the data extraction, report creation / visualization, and analysis to support critical management decisions.
This role will be tasked with the development of user-friendly KPIs and dashboards for consumption by Senior Leadership and the Service Organization.
The Business Analyst's primary focus will be on providing analytics and data visualization for service related KPIs, including staff utilization, inventory management, mean time between failure, and other critical service activities.
This role will also provide support to the Finance team by applying statistical analysis, trending, and other visual insights around various strategic initiatives.
Key Responsibilities:
Service Analytics: Support the Service organization's efforts to understand the financial and behavioral drivers of the business through meaningful KPIs and dashboards: Employee utilization, inventory replenishment / waste, work order effectiveness, etc.
Finance Analytics: Support leadership's efforts to understand the financial and behavioral drivers of the business through meaningful KPIs and dashboards: Revenue, cost, product utilization, etc.
Develop and maintain performance dashboards and scorecards through database management tools, data transformation, and business intelligence platforms and (e.g.
Power BI, SQL, AWS, MS Office Suite)
Extract, transform and integrate data from multiple internal and external data sources.
Develop and implement procedures for data validation and quality control of reports and queries.
Design and implement, and embed reports and visualizations into third party applications
Occasional travel for sales meetings and trainings
Minimum Requirements/Qualifications:
Data analytics experience
Strong technical background, including experience with BI reporting tools (Power BI, Tableau, etc.)
and data transformation via SQL
Working knowledge of CRM software and reporting (Salesforce.com)
Demonstrate Strong analytical, critical thinking and organizational skills, detail orientation and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with various systems and data sources to gather and assimilate required information
Comfortable with large amounts of data and the ability to identify key trends and variances and summarize with a high degree of accuracy
Able to multi-task.
Bring a strong sense of 'customer service'; a strong responsiveness ethic and a sense of urgency and a drive for accurate results
Ability to communicate in writing and verbally with all levels in the division
Bachelor's Degree or greater in Business Intelligence, Business Analytics, Information Management, Statistics or Qualitative Analysis preferred
Healthcare experience preferred
Frequent Contacts:
Internal
Cross-functional teams in Portage, MI office, remote Service team leaders and teams
External
Data and Technology vendors
Other Job Requirements:
Adhere to OHS policies and procedures and ensure a safe and healthy workplace environment
","['ms office', 'power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'aw']","['data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'aw', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Role
Responsibilities
Facilitate client meetings and coordinate functional discovery with external and internal stakeholders
Build a clear requirements development strategy for each customer engagement
Translate business requirements into use cases, activity diagrams, and functional specifications
Resolve business problems with both technical and non-technical solutions
Responsible for identification and inventory of customer process pain points in best practices
Work closely with clients to understand, oversee, and guide the project to address long/short term needs
Collaborate with developers to establish technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance
Ensure requirements have been properly documented to be handed off to the technical team
Conduct training, as necessary, on platform and project customizations with clients
Strong presenter to C-Suite level audiences as well as technical teams
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types
Desired Skill & Experience
7+ years of experience in business consulting and client services
Ability to analyze business requirements and define solutions to address complex business needs
Excellent communication, problem solving and analytical skills
Strong judgement, issues management, and problem analysis techniques
Proven ability to work both independently and as part of a team
Demonstrated ability to balance priorities on simultaneous projects
Experience working in a globally distributed model preferred
Also desired, but not required:
Knowledge or experience using other Salesforce or Adobe solutions, such as:
Salesforce Sales Cloud
Salesforce Service Cloud
Adobe Experience Manager
Adobe Target
Adobe Campaign
Magento
This year will be no different.
","['excel', 'c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['excel', 'c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"They are looking for a professional Business Analyst with excellent communication skills and at least 3-5 years of relevant experience.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Work with key stakeholders to capture business requirements.
Document functional and technical business requirements to ensure efficiency and consistency.
Provide consultative assistance with business users and stakeholders to streamline processes by analyzing and determining problem/opportunity/solution resolution.
Develop and implement process flowcharts for IT developers to follow.
Effectively communicate with clients and stakeholders using data process models to validate requirements.
Oversee test implementation to validate performance and ensure all business requirements and their integrity are maintained.
Address all issues and questions related to the functionality of the process system.
Utilize effective time management skills to ensure all projects and deliverables are being met while working both independently and collaboratively within a team.
REQUIRED SKILLS & QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor's degree required from an accredited institution.
3-5+ years experience in all phases of the software development life cycle.
Minimum 3 years as a Business Analyst.
Exceptional communication skills.
Microsoft Visio for process/workflow charting and diagrams (similar software experience will be considered).
Requirements documentation- BA artifacts.
Healthcare industry experience is highly preferred.
Experience working efficiently with Agile Methodology.
Knowledgeable about the software development life cycle.
Duration: 6 months
Position Type: Contract To Hire
Compensation Range: $80,000-$90,000
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'commun', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'commun', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
Reports To: Chief Information Officer
The focus of this position is to work closely with the business and IT to gain in-depth understanding of customer's business strategy, processes, services, roadmap and the context in which the business operates.
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for reviewing assigned business processes from end-to-end to identify and address operational, financial and technological risks.
Responsibilities will include a full range of activities from leading small to mid-size projects to assisting other project managers on larger more complex projects.
Responsibilities:
Identify, create and facilitate process design changes by conducting business and systems process analysis and design at a complex level; focusing on quality improvement and data management; ensuring data is reliable and valid; developing process improvements or re-engineering and recommending elimination; integrating new systems and processes with existing ones; and partnering with internal and external customers to ensure systems provided meet the long-term business strategies
Provide and support the implementation of business solutions by building relationships and partnerships with key stakeholders; identifying business needs; determining and carrying out necessary processes and practices; monitoring progress and results; recognizing and capitalizing on improvement opportunities; and adapting to competing demands, organizational changes and new responsibilities
Provide project level analysis producing required project analysis documentation (business requirements, scope matrix, use cases, sequence diagrams, future state proposals, UAT plan)
Collaborate closely with developers to implement the requirements, provide necessary guidance to testers during QA process
Create and maintain project schedules by developing project plans and specifications, estimating time and resources, monitoring milestone completion, tracking all phases of the project lifecycle, providing timely reporting of issues that impact project progress, coordinating actions and resolving conflicts
Identify improvement opportunities (proactive and reactive)
Elicit and clearly document business and systems requirements
Identify ways to increase adoption and customer satisfaction
Qualifications:
Must have experience working on large scale projects as well as handling day-to-day operational requests from the business
6+ years of experience in business analysis with at least 3 years of experience with internally built software solutions
Strong project management, ability to successfully manage multiple tasks at any given point, strong relationship building skills & communication skills
Open to learning new technology and utilizing it to solve complex business challenges
Proficient at designing scalable solutions that institute proactive frameworks
Entrepreneurial drive and demonstrated ability to achieve stretch goals in an innovative and fast-paced environment
Bachelor's degree in Business, Technology or Data
Rewards:
Excellent benefits, including health, dental, vision, disability, 401(k) and life insurance, and a paid time off policy
A progressive, employee-centric culture with multiple social, wellness, and volunteer events throughout the year
Casual dress code
",['excel'],"['risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be charged with supporting various financial reporting and analyses, participating in and coordinating the segment’s key leasing function, and managing property and leasing tracking system applications needed to support the growth and oversight of the Office portfolio, which includes medical office and research and innovation properties.
Responsibilities
Coordinate and participate in the Office segment’s core leasing functions; including facilitating lease decision discussions, tracking and memorializing various approvals, and assisting internal and external leasing and Asset Management teams
Assist with portfolio monitoring of aged accounts receivables and collection efforts, including related litigation matters
Support portfolio redevelopment execution activities such as project job cost creation, redevelopment budget and schedule tracking, and other various analytical support
Assist with the Office segment’s monthly and quarterly financial reporting; including providing analytical support, interfacing with Financial Planning & Analysis team, and preparing presentation materials
Monitor and report on earnings results for other publicly-traded healthcare REITs and healthcare providers
Assist with portfolio benchmarking and industry/competitor/market analysis
Assist the Office Asset Management teams in the creation of presentations for the Board of Directors, Senior Leadership, Management/Investment Committees, Dispositions and Redevelopments
Provide general analytic support as needed to others within the Office Asset Management department.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics, Mathematics, Real Estate or similar business or quantitative field required - GPA must be included
Candidate should possess financial analysis or similar business experience
Internship or job experience in Accounting, Finance or Commercial or Investment Banking strongly preferred
Microsoft Office proficiency, specifically in Excel and PowerPoint is required.
Ability to meet deadlines and manage multiple tasks while maintaining an extreme attention to detail and professionalism within a fast-paced, team-oriented and lean environment
Confident self-starter and quick learner who requires minimal supervision, is comfortable with ambiguity and very adaptable
Strong quantitative skills and an ability to succinctly communicate to a wide variety of audiences are a must
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['healthcar', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'econom', 'segment']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'healthcar', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'econom', 'segment']"
BA,"Friday, June 26, 2020
Lead analytical support for senior leadership, Sales, and other internal stakeholders to develop and execute value-added pricing strategies and business proposals.Support sales with pricing activities focused on margin improvement, business analytics and sales reporting.
Synthesize current business intelligence or trend data to support recommendations for pricing action.
Recommends and develops improvements to the existing pricing process, guidelines and strategies.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities:
Prepares financial scenario models and proposes pricing options based on value-add, market and competitive information to drive financial performance.
Executes account profitability analysis and price review process as needed using Protocols system and reports to maintain or improve profitability.
Assists in financial forecasting and fiscal year budgeting process through effective collaboration and communication with Sales and detailed analysis.
Participate in customer calls or in person visits to support the commercial team in any pricing related matters.
Provides ad hoc sales information to internal and external customers.
Maintains cost records for incentives, royalty and brokerage fees; provides reporting needed for internal & external clients.
Supports Client RFI, (Request for Information) and RFP's (Request for Price).
Assists in preparing and executing mass price changes within urgent time frames as needed.
Knowledge & Experience:
Bachelor’s degree (BA or BS) in Finance, Business Administration or a related field from a four-year college or university.
Advanced Excel usage including but not limited to VLOOKUP, pivot table usage and development, formula development.
2-3 years related industry experience.
EEO AA M/F/Vet/Disability
Other details
Job Function
Finance
Pay Type
Salary
Travel Required
No
Required Education
Bachelor’s Degree
",['excel'],"['data', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Profile Summary
CAI is hiring!...
Duties & Responsibilities
Gathering, documenting and tracking business requirements;
Assisting with development and review of system design;
Identifying, tracking and documenting action items;
Assistance and management in the development of use and test cases;
Providing oversight for test cases and monitoring and reviewing of test results;
Monitoring and reporting on testing activities in all project phases;
Facilitate and document project meetings, as needed;
Identify, manage and trace requirements by type throughout the entire project life cycle;
Manage scope, define assumptions, constraints and dependencies for the design and testing of the requirements;
Prepare, review and monitor compliance of all projects;
Prepare, execute, monitor and report on testing activities/status in each testing phase;
Validate post implementation with Requirements Traceability Matrix (RTM) and manage defect identification, tracking and resolution;
Assist in the preparation of training materials
Identify and communicate potential project risks and issues for Department review;
Prepare and post updated documentation; and
Other duties as outlined in the RFP or as necessary to meet the goals and objectives established in this RFP.
Qualifications
Experience/Education Required
Minimum of six (6) years of experience in HHS IT systems procurement planning, implementations and certification
Physical Demands
Ability to safely and successfully perform the essential job functions consistent with the ADA and other federal, state and local standards
Sedentary work that involves sitting or remaining stationary most of the time with occasional need to move around the office to attend meetings, etc.
If you have questions, or would like to speak with a Recruiter directly, send an email to the contact person below and note the job identification number in the subject line.
Ryan McHenry
Senior Technical Recruiter
717-612-3012
Ryan.mchenry@cai.io
www.cai.io
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business AnalystLocation: Chicago, IL
Duration: 9 Months (Possible for Extension)
Need Strong IS Business analysts with experience IS request gathering experience, Agile experience, Telecom would be a major plus.
The TSA is responsible for leading significant business and systems analysis efforts and improving the overall impact of system requirements in support of critical enterprise projects and programs.
Responsible for working with key IT stakeholders and business owners to analyze and assist with solutions, business needs and document/manage requirements for large, complex, enterprise projects or programs.
Serve as a requirements liaison between technology and business leaders to support the delivery of business and technology capabilities throughout the project lifecycle.
Job Requirements:
• Section II.
Essential Duties and Key Responsibilities Responsible for elicitation, analysis and documentation of all technical requirements for any new/or changes to technology applications, including internal and external development requirements and analysis of impacts to proposed technology solutions on existing and new technology platforms.
Responsible for enterprise program requirements, using appropriate facilitation techniques, including interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, task and workflow analysis.
Provide oversight and review of functional design documents, impact assessments and test deliverables to ensure that they meet the requirements.
Provide oversight of the requirements traceability process from requirements through to testing with appropriate gap analysis to ensure requirements meet the needs of the business through the delivery lifecycle.
Lead and provide oversight of cross-functional system or enterprise process initiatives.
Provide estimates to project team for team effort, identify and communicate risks to delivering solution on time and provide input to resource needs at the project- or program-level to identify key / required skills Section III.
Experience and Educational Requirements Bachelors degree in Computer Science or related discipline or equivalent experience is required.
Masters degree a plus.
4 years experience in Enterprise Product Catalog (EPC) and/or billing system in a Telecommunication environment preferred.
International Institute of Business Analysis (IIBA) Business Analyst certification a plus.
Strong analysis, verbal and written communication skills is required.
Must be able to communicate effectively and confidently with business and technology stakeholders, team members and management.
Process-driven analysis skills and a background in various requirements elicitation methods are required.
Proficiency with requirements based on an Agile project delivery methodology is required.
CIM and RIM knowledge is a plus JIRA/Confluence/QC experience is a plus Experience with wireless or telecom industry is highly desirable.
Project leadership experience preferred.
",['jira'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Immediate need for a talented Business Analyst with experience in the Energy Industry.
This is a 05+ Months contract opportunity with long-term potential and is located in OAK BROOK, IL.
Job ID: 20-22522
Key Responsibilities and Technology Experience:
Provide business function support in various power delivery settings in addition, develop processes to satisfy the needs and requirements of a diverse financial group that utilize a variety of O&M.
Capital and/or balance sheet and clearing accounts.
Minimum of either a Bachelors degree or an Associates Degree and 5 years experience in preparing project estimates in the electric and gas utility industry using software and or estimating manuals to expedite estimating preparation process.
Utilize PC and mainframe applications, such as Microsoft Office, People Soft, Time, EERS, and PassPort proficiently.
Develop customized reports.
",['microsoft'],"['account', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.
**Essential Duties and responsibilities:**Project Delivery Responsibilities:+ Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what’s delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Must have SQL experience along with .Net
Must have Cloud XP with micro services knowledge
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let’s take this journey together.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
","['excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions.
In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities.
While your role requires deep technological skills - including expertise in everything from data management to functional design - it also hinges on teamwork and leadership.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Position Summary
I. ID
Business Analyst
Application Support and Analytics
JOB TITLE
BUSINESS UNIT
Information Technology
DEPARTMENT
Chicago, IL
Application Support Manager
HIRING MANAGER’S TITLE
II.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
· Manage the quality control of operational programs, results, and reporting for all clients in order to eliminate issues and increase client satisfaction.
· Troubleshoot reported application issues and help facilitate resolution to prevent future issues going forward.
· Execute various corporate and client projects as assigned within tight deadlines.
· Manage documentation creation and updating of policies and procedures to ensure that all team members understand the correct manner for completing their tasks.
· Coordinate configuration and programming tasks internally, as well as externally with clients and vendors.
· Perform data analysis to interpret trends, optimize efficiency and evaluate data quality.
· Responsible for the design and testing on custom programming applications.
· Ability to successfully create ad hoc reporting on demand and develop specifications to recurring reports for programming to help increase department productivity.
· Listen closely and understand the specific needs of other departments to ensure that reporting is accurate and relevant.
· Create and present data results to various internal departments to aid them in interpreting the data and make recommendations.
· Work collaboratively with other IT members as needed for programming initiatives, changes to routines, file processing, strategies, letters and other functions as related to client operations.
· Assist with help desk requests/tickets directly through telephone or online ticketing system as needed.
· Other duties and tasks as assigned.
III.
KEY REQUIREMENTS
3-5 years in a technical or application support environment with experience troubleshooting customsoftware applications/databases
Ability to work within the expected guidelines with limited supervision and excellent attention to detail
Ability to work in a fast paced and ever changing work environment
Must be well-spoken, as well as beable to understand client needs and suggest appropriate solutions
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)
Excellent analytical, problem solving and time management skills
Experience with the CUBS system preferred
Experience with UNIX system a plus
Excellent project management skills a plus
Application development/programming experience a plus
Regular office hours at corporate downtown Chicago headquarters
After hours support on a rotating schedule as well as special projects and emergencies required
IV.
ORGANIZATION STRUCTURE
· Other Positions reporting to same leader
1.
Senior Business Analyst
2.
Operations Specialist
3.
Senior Operations Specialist
4.
Automation Specialist I& II
V. EMPLOYMENT APPLICATION
Please review this information below before beginning this application
I certify the answers given herein are true and complete to the best of my knowledge, and I authorize the investigation of all statements contained within this employment application that may be necessary in arriving at an employment decision.
is contingent upon my ability to satisfy the physical and mental requirements for the position offered, which may require me to submit to a drug/alcohol screening test and physical examination.
or me beyond those existing in an “at will” employment relationship unless provided otherwise by an applicable collective bargaining agreement.
at any time, with or without notice.
","['unix', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",999.0,"['unix', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Hello Hope you are doing good!!
Conduct analysis sessions during implementation of Product Interact with IT Application Development Group and users to determine project requirements.
An ERP business systems analyst recommends best system utilization and practices as well as participates in project teams representing systems solutions, enablers, and integration.
An ERP business systems analyst should have a bachelor's degree in an IT or related field.
",['erp'],['busi'],1.0,"['erp', 'busi']"
BA,"What this job involves
The Business Analyst will be part of the Azara Product Management team, working to develop and deliver against a product roadmap for the AZARA product.
This position requires a high degree of collaborative and technical skills.
The role requires a high energy, intellectually curious, detail oriented professional with excellent time management, research, content management, analytical, problem¬-solving, project management, organizational, collaboration and technology skills.
The role also requires a variety of technical and business skills.
Participate in product roadmap discussions with the Azara Product Management team to identify and create requirements for priorities
Participate in user-facing discussions to understand and prioritize product feature needs
Work closely with Subject Matter Experts and internal contacts to define detailed reporting and
analytics requirements
Work closely with active product users to identify and understand needs and opportunities to modify or change existing content – changes to visualizations, new features, metric improvements
Work with Engineering to identify and test source data
Work with Engineering to develop, test and deliver reporting and analytics content
Form partnerships with identified contacts and subject matter experts
Work with partners to understand and document reporting and analytics needs
Create detailed requirements
Design or iterate through design process of early stage mockups of solutions to meet requirements
Investigate existing data sources to clearly define metrics and calculations
Prototype new components, reports and features as necessary
Collaborate with partners to finalize new components for inclusion in the Azara product
Identify and specify product feature requirements, documenting details of needs for development by Engineering team
Create or manage creation of user documentation for new components
EXPERIENCE & SKILLS
3+ years’ experience in corporate real estate or related fields
3+ years’ experience in IT or technology fields
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Business, Information Technology or related field required.
MBA or Master's degree in related field preferred.
Strong understanding of data warehousing, cloud computing, data architecture
Skill and experience managing change management projects/programs
Experienced in data management, data analysis and data integration
Excellent people skills and ability to interact with a wide range of client staff and demands
California Residents only
If you are viewing this on a mobile device you may want to view the CCPA version on a larger device.
This email is only to request an accommodation.
","['excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"bull Responsible for elicitation, analysis and documentation of all technical requirements for any newor changes to technology applications, including internal and external development requirements and analysis of impacts to proposed technology solutions on existing and new technology platforms.
bull Responsible for enterprise program requirements, using appropriate facilitation techniques, including interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, task and workflow analysis.
bull Provide oversight and review of functional design documents, impact assessments and test deliverables to ensure that they meet the requirements.
bull Provide oversight of the requirements traceability process from requirements through to testing with appropriate gap analysis to ensure requirements meet the needs of the business through the delivery lifecycle.
bull Lead and provide oversight of cross-functional system or enterprise process initiatives.
bull Provide estimates to project team for team effort, identify and communicate risks to delivering solution on time and provide input to resource needs at the project- or program-level to identify key required skills Section III.
Experience and Educational Requirements bull Bachelorrsquos degree in Computer Science or related discipline or equivalent experience is required.
Masterrsquos degree a plus.
bull 4 yearsrsquo experience in Enterprise Product Catalog (EPC) andor billing system in a Telecommunication environment preferred.
bull International Institute of Business Analysis (IIBA) Business Analyst certification a plus.
bull Strong analysis, verbal and written communication skills is required.
Must be able to communicate effectively and confidently with business and technology stakeholders, team members and management.
bull Process-driven analysis skills and a background in various requirements elicitation methods are required.
bull Proficiency with requirements based on an Agile project delivery methodology is required.
bull CIM and RIM knowledge is a plus bull JIRAConfluenceQC experience is a plus bull Experience with wireless or telecom industry is highly desirable.
bull Project leadership experience preferred.
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Games Library includes more than 400 types of games: Numerical Lotteries, TV Lottery Games, Sports Lotteries, Fixed Odds Betting, Instant Lotteries, Pari-mutuel, Video Lottery and Monitor Games.
Education:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, IT, or similar field, or equivalent combination of training and experience
Five years experience as a Business Analyst
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Possesses understanding in the areas of lottery on-line and instant game application programming, database and system design.
Understands Internet, Intranet, Extranet and client/server architectures.
Understands web-based systems.
Focus on testing and verifiable history of excellent written and oral communication skills with internal and external customers.
Duties and Responsibilities:
This person is responsible for maintaining updated end-user system manuals/documentation (not Operations Procedures).
Assists in enforcement of project deadlines and schedules
Takes input from supervisor and appropriately and accurately applies comments/ feedback.
Manages resources in accordance with project schedule.
Develops and maintains functional specifications and system design specifications and NASPL QA Certification processes
Leads system, client acceptance, and all life cycle testing efforts
Ensures Virtual Prototypes and System Simulators are kept up to date
Writes test plans, test cases, test scripts and test summaries
Employment Eligibility Verification
Must possess valid documentation to establish identity and U.S. employment eligibility
Security Requirements
A pre-employment drug screening is also a requirement
EEO is the Law.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Local candidates are only being considered at this time.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work with the Business to define needs and teams to recommend solutions.
Collect and document business requirements from various business teams and provides written functional requirements for various technology teams.
Serve as the liaison between business teams and technology teams.
Work with stakeholders to understand business and technical requirements, building and managing the product backlog, and successfully leading agile projects through their respective life-cycles.
Manage and drive the requirements-gathering phase of technology projects.
Sometimes provide second-tier technology applications support and application reporting.
Work with the Business to identify requirements and think critically about what will make it successful; write user stories that effectively communicate the Business’ requirements and that are easily consumed by software development teams.
Attend and lead Business stakeholder meetings; provide project status reporting to management; assist with testing scenarios and validate results.
Create deliverables such as process flows, wireframes, mockups and functional prototypes to effectively communicate design strategies and detailed interaction behaviors.
Prepare and deliver client presentations.
Advocate on behalf of Business to IT, and advocate on behalf of IT to Business.
Become a Subject Matter Expert on a variety of packages and custom business applications including User Experience best practices.
Go beyond just reading and understanding information, to making sense of it, and finding patterns for improvement.
Support business applications.
Troubleshoot and resolve applications issues.
QUALIFICATIONS:
7+ years of prior experience as a Business Analyst or other IT role, such as support or development.
BA / BS in IT, statistics, computer science, mathematics, information management, business or a related field or equivalent experience.
Strong investigative, analytical skills.
Interpersonal communication skills with the ability to work independently or as part of a team with both the Business and technology staff.
Skilled at defining and documenting business and functional requirements for ongoing system enhancement initiatives in agile software development environments.
Experience writing clear acceptance criteria to a testable level.
Experience leading or participating in all Agile meetings including: sprint planning, sprint grooming, review, demo, stand-up, and retrospective sessions.
Experience in all phases of product, software, and testing lifecycles.
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills.
Curious, self-motivated, independent.
Microsoft Office experience: Word for documentation, Excel for data handling, Visio for process explanation, PowerPoint for presentation and Outlook for email.
Beginner to moderate SQL knowledge.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
3+ years of experience on a business team interfacing with IT.
3+ years of experience in healthcare.
Ability to become a Subject Matter Expert on various healthcare, insurance, pension, and/or payroll technology systems.
Experience working on different project types, such as off-the-shelf, new development, enhancements projects.
General knowledge of databases, applications, system interfaces, and operating systems.
Experience creating reports for business users, especially via SSRS or similar tools.
Knowledgeable in SDLC, Agile and/or Waterfall methodologies.
#IND123
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr']","['data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Local candidates are only being considered at this time.
Sr IT Business Analyst - Healthcare insurance
IT Business Analyst - Healthcare Insurance vertical Contract with option for hire possibility Client is in healthcare insurance (EDI 834, 835, 837 etc.).
Good experience with SQL queries needed Chicago (bordering O’Hare airport - Off Higgins)
SUMMARY
The Business Analyst is responsible for collecting and documenting business requirements from various business teams and provides written functional requirements for various technology teams.
This key role is the liaison between business teams and technology teams.
The primary responsibilities of this role include working with stakeholders to understand their business and technical requirements, building, and managing the product backlog, and successfully leading agile projects through their respective life cycles.
The Business Analyst must be comfortable managing and driving the requirements-gathering phase of technology projects.
The Business Analyst will also be needed to sometimes provide second-tier technology applications support and application reporting
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
7 years of prior experience as a Business Analyst or other IT role, such as support or development.
BA BS in IT, statistics, computer science, mathematics, information management, business or a related field or equivalent experience.
Experience in writing SQL queries, joins etc.
Experience with EDI formats like 834, 835, 837
Skilled at defining and documenting business and functional requirements for ongoing system enhancement initiatives in agile software development environments.
Experience writing clear acceptance criteria to a testable level.
Experience leading or participating in all Agile meetings including sprint planning, sprint grooming, review, demo, stand-up, and retrospective sessions.
Experience in all phases of product, software, and testing lifecycles.
Microsoft Office experience Word for documentation, Excel for data handling, Visio for process explanation, PowerPoint for presentation and Outlook for email.
#IND123
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['busi', 'statist', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'busi', 'statist', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job Overview:
You will be responsible for maintaining all tasks associated with an implementation, managing the project to meet deadlines and stay within contract budgets to deliver a working application to the customer in a timely manner.
Having well-developed organizational skills and strong attention to detail is critical to success in this role.
You will create training materials and presentations, conducting training sessions with new users, helping them learn the application and how to use it.
Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for coordinating the completion of client implementations, maintaining project schedules and organizing all of the tasks associated with implementation.
Manage project execution to ensure adherence to budget, schedule and scope; monitoring and tracking project milestones and deliverables
Prepare project status reports by collecting, analyzing and summarizing information and trends
Build relationships with customers, conducting needs assessments to identify organizational EMR management requirements
Confer with customers regarding software needs and develop creative solutions to customer user requirements and problems.
Coordinate with the customer and staff for updates to the customer environment, responsible for testing the application environments, ensuring that the environment is functioning.
Develop, document and revise new application design procedures, test procedures, and quality standards, including testing of new build designs.
Create training materials, prepare and compile training presentations to facilitate learning and conduct training sessions with new users, helping them learn the application.
Job Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in a business related field preferred, but not required
History of academic and professional success
Highly motivated, organized, and proactive in managing projects from end-to-end
Results driven, and able to prioritize multiple tasks in a fast paced, deadline driven environment
Strong analytical skills, problem solving abilities and sharp attention to detail
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Strong presentation abilities and interpersonal skills
Can work independently and be self-directed
Confidence in dealing with and serving customers
Experience with Microsoft Office suite and Google Apps
Willingness to travel up to 30%
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title
Business Analyst / Systems Analyst
They are looking for a BA and SA to help with their Core Banking Systems Strategy on 7 major functional areas to support recommendations whether to replace or enhance any of the processes or software systems currently be used by the Bank.
The main accounting platform for the bank(which feeds directly into general ledger).
are processed daily.
As the system of record for Advances (loans) and Letters of Credit.
This has created some customizations of the core application to be able to handle these instruments.
Job Duties and Responsibilities
Work with a team of consultants to evaluate the current state and make recommendations to the future state after analysis.
The main responsibilities are:
Requirements Gathering
Lead JAD Sessions
Analyze the current process and possible updates or replacements
Experience, Skills, Knowledge
Core Banking Experience as a BA or SA with several large projects completed
",['sa'],"['recommend', 'account', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['sa', 'recommend', 'account', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Should have 5+ years experience as business analyst
Should have 5+ years Agile / Scrum experience
Should have 3+ years healthcare payer / healthcare insurance industry expertise
Experienced creating and writing user stories
Experienced documenting and modifying / recommending business processes
Experience with Salesforce desiredExperience with SAFe (Scaled Agile Framework)
Excellent communication skill
must have Agile / SDLC experience.
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Overview
If you want to be a part of something bigger than you can imagine, you’ve come to the right place.
As a Business Analyst at Foot Locker, Inc. within the product management team, you are responsible for documenting, writing, analyzing, validating and managing both technical and functional requirements for your products following best practice agile principles.
You are a self-motivated person with a passion for accuracy, attention to detail, timeliness and problem solving.
You will actively participate within team and development meetings and ceremonies, and are required to collaborate with cross-functional teams.
Responsibilities
Gather, document, write, analyze and validate business, technical and functional requirements for your product
Actively collaborate with team members across the organization to track down incomplete requirements, resolve blockers and ensure tasks are moving appropriately
Manage requirements and UAC (user acceptance criteria) on all product / JIRA cards to ensure accuracy and completeness at all times
Maintain the product backlog ensuring cards are properly groomed and prepared at least 1 sprint in advance for development
Lead requirements gathering sessions through the use of discovery workshops, interviews and analysis in partnership with UX
Develop and maintain effective working relationships with cross-functional team members including COE teams, technical leads and developers, CX, UX & UI, store teams, data, vendors, and digital brand teams
Ability to take on additional tasks within the product management practice to help / assist the product managers in managing backlogs, current sprints, communication to stakeholders, competitive research, etc.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in business, marketing, technology
Minimum 1-3 years in a BA or similar role
Solid technical background, specifically with ecommerce, mobile app and website technologies
Demonstrated technical knowledge and proficiency; is effective in translating technical knowledge into business language as needed
Ability to juggle multiple priorities and make things happen in a fast-paced, dynamic environment
Bias for action and willingness to roll up one’s sleeves to get the job done
Ability to effectively manage time and priorities while maintaining a positive attitude in a high pace environment
Collaborative spirit, and relationship-builder both internally and externally
Proven ability to work on cross functional teams in a matrix organization
Knowledge of agile methodology and scrum
Experience using JIRA, Confluence and Sharepoint
Excellent communication skills (verbal and written) to clearly, concisely, accurately, unambiguously and tactfully present information to an audience
Applies a business professional communication style with written documentation containing the appropriate grammar, punctuation and language
","['excel', 'jira']","['analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Can you picture yourself working for one of -America's Ideal Employers-?
They've been named one of Fortune Magazine's -World's Most Admired Companies- of 2018 and are included in the -Top 50 Most Innovative Companies- named by Boston Consulting Group.
With on-site training and mentoring, they are committed to your professional development as well.
Summary:
The Business Systems Analyst is responsible for understanding the functional application, business operations and technical flow of any application.
The BSA should have application knowledge but also be able to fully explain the operational workflow.
The BSA should be able to understand how requirements impact both the technical and functional nature of an application.
The role is a technical role, one in which an analyst can drive business decisions based on application and technical expertise.
REQUIREMENTS:
BS degree in Computer Science/Engineering, MIS, CIS, or related or equivalent
5+ years of relevant experience in business systems analysis
3+ years of experience in agile environment (e.g.
Scrum, RUP, Kanban)
Ability to work on and across multiple agile teams
Ability to communicate the entire scope of delivery across teams
Experience eliciting requirements from multiple business stakeholders
Excellent critical thinking & troubleshooting skills, ability to find and solve root causes of problems amid ""noise""
Experience with business rule intensive systems and high-volume manual workflows
Ability to understand data analytics, understand system volume and trends that help drive technical and business decisions
JIRA experience required.
Understand how to manage work, understand how to define acceptance criteria
Ability to query data using SQL, Splunk, Kibana
Understand business driven development
Experience with test automation, such as unit test, functional test, or integration tests
Skills a Plus:
Development experience
Automated testing, using tools such as FitNesse, Cucumber, Selenium
Experience with a business rules engine, such as Drools or ILOG
Tableau
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['splunk', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'jira']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['splunk', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'jira', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Working as a consultant you will be connected to work that matters, putting your expertise to its best use while developing skills for the future.
Most consultants work in a model where they have the flexibility and autonomy to choose projects aligning to their experience, skills and desired lifestyle.
Other opportunities exist in team-based, strategy and solutions work.
PURPOSE OF THE ROLE
This requires special attention to increasing both the profitability and the stability of the business.
You will combine your systems knowledge with your functional experience in accounting, information management, human capital, internal audit, and supply chain to help Clients ensure project success.
Respect for people and opinions and confidently offer your point-of-view with clients and among colleagues
A drive for proactively cultivating relationships with clients and colleagues
Optimism when faced with challenges and complex situations, coupled with the drive to solve client issues
Dedication to continuous improvement and development of your skillset and talents
A strong personal identification with RGPs values loyalty, integrity, focus, enthusiasm, accountability and talent
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ROLE
Lead business stakeholder engagement meetings, striving to understand the Clients processes and building trust among business groups
Define and document business requirements and functional specifications from business users and subject matter experts
Understand as-is business processes to effectively identify and document the to-be requirements
Identify root cause(s) of an issue to help determine the optimal solution(s)
Write test plans and/or perform User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and functional testing of new solutions
Perform business needs analysis and design workflows, including as is and to be process mapping
Collect timely feedback from stakeholder groups and ensure terms of requirements and specifications are being met through the solutions being built
DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND REQUIREMENTS
BA or BS in Business, Accounting or related field required; MBA preferred
A minimum of 5 years of Business Analyst experience
Exceptional communication skills and professionalism
Strong analytical skills and problem-solving ability
Experience in technical writing (business cases, project charters, etc.)
Experience in business process improvement efforts
Experience with SQL, Tableau, or related systems is a plus
Strong business acumen
Equal Opportunity Employer
","['tableau', 'sql']","['optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
W2 Only
Skills and Experience Required:
2-4 years Business analyst role with Finance
Experience in Financial industry is a MUST.
Experience gathering business requirements, gap analysis, process flows, solution design
Graduate or undergraduate degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent
Excellent analytical and process-based skills, i.e.
process flow diagrams, business modelling, and functional design
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Significant Business Analysis experience across the full project lifecycle (requirements, design, development, testing and deployment).
Strong understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle
Experience with modern software development practices (test-driven development, Agile continuous integration)
Excellent organizational skills, including the ability to effectively manage multiple priorities simultaneously
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong work ethic and ability to work in a team environment
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $70,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year
Experience:
business analysis: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
RDBMS: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
","['excel', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:-Work with stakeholders to understand their business objectives -Lead requirement gathering sessions -Plan and facilitate workshops/interviews to identify, analyze, and document business requirements and translate them into business plans/solutions -Track projects throughout their respective lifecycles -Manage release schedules, prioritize projects, and ensure adequate resources are available -Perform technical analysis to determine present and future business performance -Gather and coordinate project impact assessments from various groups within a client’s organization -Prepare and deliver client presentations -Attend and lead meetings; provide project status reporting to management -Assist with testing scenarios and validate results -Liaison between business stakeholders and technology teams Qualifications: -Healthcare experience in payer/provider preferred -3+ plus years of business analyst experience or in similar role -Experience in business analysis with focus on managing business and technical requirements -Experience with Waterfall and Agile/Lean methodologies -Advanced skills with Microsoft Office Suite (Word, PowerPoint, and Excel) -SQL/Database expertise -Ability to analyze complex business process -Analytical problem-solving approach -Ability to proactively identify risks, and drive action to mitigate and resolve issues -Strong communication skills, with the ability to work independently -Strong organizational skills, with the ability to manage a vast array of information -Understand the technology, data management, information flow, and data governance issues -Previous experience from a management consulting environment desirable.
-Business process flows experience -Understanding of Visio, -Understanding of SQL queries
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what’s delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let’s take this journey together.
Cognizant Softvision is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
Benefits
Great globally diverse culture
Flexible work-life balance
Ongoing career development
Competitive Salary
","['excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Responsibilities Include but Not Limited to:
• Performs and coordinates the analysis and design of business systems.
• Works closely with clients and with other system groups to capture business requirements and see them through implementation.
• Develops and executes systems testing.
• Acts as a liaison between the business user groups and the technical systems groups.
Minimum Qualifications:
• Extensive F&O industry knowledge (Ideally minimum 2 years experience)
• Detailed F&O exchange / product knowledge for global markets across all asset classes
• Experience in handling a client base consisting of Banks, Hedge Funds, Pension Funds, Insurance Companies, Asset Managers, Commodity Trading Advisors, Corporates, Utility Companies, Oil Companies & Food Companies.
• Comprehensive understanding of physical delivery process for key Fixed Income, Currency, Equity & Commodity F&O products
• Excellent interpersonal skills and be able to communicate across multiple aspects of the organization at various levels
• Be a dynamic & proactive team player
• Ability to identify process improvements that drive capacity, efficiency and control
• Strong written and verbal communication skills
• Ability to work accurately and effectively under pressure
• Strong time management skills required to meet critical deadlines and prioritize
• Strong PC & Industry application skills (e.g.
GMI, Microsoft Office)
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (KAL 140511)with Mast.
deg in Mgt, Bus Admin or rel to test, maintain, monitor & install comp programs & sys.
Devl, document & revise sys design procd, & quality std.
Assist in developing sys req & producing design specification for new tech apps.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Responsibilities
Job duties include:
Project management support
Process analysis and design
Business analysis and conversions
System configuration
Specifications for enhancements & integrations
Qualification
Bachelor’s/ Master’s Degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, Finance or Accounting
Minimum 6 months of experience required
Strong attention to detail, analytical and problem-solving skills.
Must be inquisitive and possess a strong desire to learn
Excellent communication, relationship-building, and interpersonal skills.
Individual should have a high energy level and be a creative thinker in a changing environment.
SQL is a plus
Ability to multitask
Requirement
· 6 months to 1 yr of work experience required
· Long term job opportunities with competitive salary structure
· Prompt payroll, very good Clientele
· H1B sponsorship with GC filing
· Very efficient compliance department
Interested candidates please send resumes to farah.n@ecqrinc.com
","['excel', 'sql']","['financ', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'financ', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"In this role, the successful candidate will be required to have an ownership mentality and be outcome oriented.
On a day to day basis, the Business Analyst will report to a Product Manager and be working with other Business Analysts, Global development teams, operational leaders, and technology advisors.
The successful candidate must have demonstrated a strong academic track record, willingness to take on complex challenges, and a background in business, technology, or other related fields.
Responsibilities:
Opportunity Identification& Solution Design:
Develop detailed business cases that project potential financial value for given opportunities
Gather requirements, acceptance criteria, and create use cases
Lead visioning sessions with various technology and operational stakeholders to explore solution design to begin crafting initial frameworks
Develop detailed process maps that cover a process in its entirety with identified design considerations for the business
Support the development of design documents used to outline design architecture details and proposed systems / processes
Development& Implementation Support:
Serve as the primary counterpart between development teams and operational stakeholders, actively resolving open issues and enabling solution development
Escalate development blockers through appropriate management channels to ensure timely issue resolution and assignment of issue owners
Coordinate and deliver on testing with operational stakeholders to validate that development meets expectations defined by business counterparts
Product Support:
Manage post stabilization automation performance through digital workforce management tools such as Tableau, SQL, and other analytical platforms
Determine improvement opportunities, prioritize fixes/enhancements, and deliver sustained, predictable business outcomes
Additional Requirements:
Perform ad hoc analysis to support additional management decisions
Perform other duties as required
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree, preferably in business, technology, engineering, healthcare; equivalent experience acceptable
Strong academic track record
Problem-solver
Strong communicator
“Go-getter” and“can-do” attitude
2+ years’ experience in a business analyst or product role; special consideration for healthcare industry
Agile project management experience
Desired Qualifications:
Interest in Healthcare Finance/Operations or previous healthcare experience
Interest in automation and digital solutions
Understanding of various healthcare related technologies
To learn more, visit: R1RCM.com.
","['tableau', 'sql']","['financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Looking for a job in IT?
Excellent communication skills and be able to work well in a collaborative team environment
Understand standard business practices.
Possess a passion for leveraging technology to create enterprise wide solutions
Ready to relocate.
Education:
Bachelor/Master degree in Business or engineering.
Thanks and Regards
Adi
302-6134361/adibahel1207@gmail.com
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you naturally a curious and confident person?
Are you highly passionate and motivated in the discovery and implementation of cloud technologies?
Do you want to be on the forefront of helping drive customer engagements, as they move workloads to Microsoft's Azure?
This role will focus on customer discovery, data gathering, data rationalization, facilitating customer discussions and translating that into a well-defined actionable cloud migration plan.?
Walk clients through analysis findings, gaps, and remediation requirements necessary for successful workload migrations.
* Support discovery, testing, and migration scheduling activities* Assist in the development and continuous process improvement and documentation within the Cloud Migration CenterPreferred Experience & Skills:* 2+ years of technical or business analyst related experience* 2+ years of data center migration experience* General understanding of on-premises IT infrastructure and cloud technology.
The ideal candidate will have fundamental experience with on-premises and cloud infrastructure, systems administration, and databases.
* General understanding of work item management and backlog contribution with Azure DevOps (Github One) and DevOps / Agile practices* Ability to effectively communicate and present to customers* Creating detailed technical documentation* Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint, and Word* Strong attention to detail* PowerShell experience is a plus* Azure certifications a plus (Azure Administrator Associate)* Azure Site Recovery & Azure Migrate experience a plusTravel.
","['github', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'azur', 'cloud']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['github', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'azur', 'cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Duration: 12 Months
Rate: DOE
SAP preferred, not required
Magento
eCommerce experience
Power BI
Business Objects
Adobe Analytics (ecommerce if possible)
Adobe Web Analytics
","['power bi', 'bi']",['busi'],999.0,"['powerbi', 'busi']"
BA,"• Manage Agile backlog and SDLC.
• Guide business analysts in decision making.
• Provide subject matter expertise to help define and translate business decisions into technology solutions.
• Participate in root cause analysis and provide solutions for day-to-day process challenges
• Conduct process management modeling and documentation review sessions to identify product enhancements.
• Lead process mapping workshops with diverse business groups.
• Document business process flows using UML-style diagraming and manage version control of changing process definitions.
• Generate actionable requirements within an Agile software development framework.
Qualifications & Requirements:
• 3+ years of experience in digital product development/business analyst positions, with strong supporting skills such as project management, technical support, and requirements writing.
• Subject matter expertise in Brokerage Operations, Financial Services, Trading Operations
• Prefer a Bachelors degree in Business Management, Finance, Economics, Computer Science or Information Systems
• Series 7 or Series 99 securities industry license preferred
Contact: kfrank@judge.com
Job Requirements:
",[None],"['financ', 'econom', 'busi']",1.0,"['financ', 'econom', 'busi']"
BA,"Opportunity will be one year with a strong chance for a long-term extension.
Position Summary: This role will support Exchange Traded Derivatives (ETD) OTC products cleared across EMEA and the Americas region.
Primary Responsibilities/Accountabilities:
• Provide subject matter expertise to both onshore and offshore associates
• Ensure deadlines are adhered to with regard to settlement of transactions and lifecycle events
• Assist with various initiatives impacting regional or global functions
• Work with different teams to standardize processes, streamline functions and onboard/off board clients
Qualifications:
• Bachelors degree in Finance, Business Administration or Engineering
• 2-5 years experience in ETD OTC operations
• Knowledge of industry rules and regulations, and as well as business practices is a plus
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills with ability to communicate with stakeholders at all levels
• Detail oriented and effective time management skills
• High level of intellectual curiosity, critical and quantitative thinking skills
• Demonstrated ability to work in a fast pace, high volume environment and continuously multi-task
• Ability to meet tight deadlines
• Ability to assess risk, implement controls and streamline existing processes
• Ability to problem solve, outline and propose tactical and strategic solutions
• Advanced Microsoft office skills (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
• GMI query writing and navigation skills
Let's talk!
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Title: Technical Business Analyst
Responsibilities:
Work with stakeholders and product owners to understand the users’ goals and objectives and identify success criteria.
Lead efforts in analyzing, collecting, and prioritizing user requirements, and translates business requirements into technical design and processes.
Create and maintain software development artifacts such as requirements documentation, use cases, test cases, data flow diagrams, UI wireframes, and internal support documentation
Work with stakeholder requirements to build data visualizations and metrics turning data into information for the user
Work with stakeholders and product owners to evaluate buy versus build solutions where appropriate
Build functional prototypes of technical design ideas as needed using SQL, Excel, and other BI tools
Work with all stakeholders to ensure implemented solution meets defined success criteria.
Communicates complex systems to Stakeholders, in a manner that enables them to have a common understanding of the product status, risks, and decision points.
Contributes to the PMO team in assessing tools, approaches, and techniques to add efficiency and value add improvements to existing PMO processes and methods.
Build, modify, and maintain reports used by middle and back office teams
Specific Skills/Abilities
Excellent verbal, visual, written and listening skills
Excellent data visualization and analysis skills
Excellent organizational skills
Excellent facilitation, collaboration skills
Ability to create structure and provide leadership in ambiguous situations
Ability to thrive within a matrix organization.
Ability to excel both independently and in a team environment
Ability to synthesize BI data visualization artifacts (e.g.
reports, graphs, charts, etc.)
to meet business needs.
Advanced data analysis skills.
Affinity working with complex data sets and complex systems.
At least intermediate proficiency with Excel, VBA, databases, T-SQL, and one other BI tool (e.g., Tableau, Cognos, etc.)
At least intermediate systems analysis skills (systems, business workflows, business processes, data modeling, etc.)
Proficient navigation skills on Windows and UNIX Platforms.
Solid understanding of Visio and ability to diagram complex system interactions and data flows
Education/Experience
Bachelor’ s degree or higher Management Information Systems or equivalent technical field
5+ years in a business analyst role delivering software requirements, managing product development
3+ years of experience as a developer on Windows or UNIX platforms.
2+ years of financial trading industry preferred
","['unix', 'cogno', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau']","['risk', 'data', 'graph', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['unix', 'cogno', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'risk', 'data', 'graph', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
Overview
Excellent written, oral and interpersonal communication skills are required for a senior business analyst position.
Senior business analysts should also have the ability to train, lead and mentor younger analysts.
Responsibilities
The Senior Business Analyst ensures that the technical solutions being developed will satisfy the needs of the business.
Works with Product Management, Application Developers and strategic partners to analyze and develop conceptual design of system components.
Ensures high level designs including architecture requirements are accurately documented and map to the approved requirements.
Understand, formulate, and define Product needs, scope, objectives, and business requirements.
Determine how changing business needs will impact systems.
Assist the business with quantifying business benefit relating to specific projects.
Participate in project sizing activities.
Assist project managers to determine resource needs and to estimate the activities, tasks, and deliverables required to implement assigned projects.
Gather business requirements and document for the implementation of assigned projects, according to Project Methodology.
Create functional designs and detailed specifications as determined from project needs
Provide subject matter expertise for assigned projects, support business units to ensure full understanding of system capabilities are realized and utilized to meet business needs and requirements.
Assist in planning and managing the appropriate feature set that are included in a production release package that provides the most value and least negative impact to the field
Lead the transfer of knowledge to the client, ensuring that they have all the information and training necessary to effectively use delivered business solutions.
Lead end user training sessions and monitor user adoption.
Ensure documentation related to the business analysis, design, and user acceptance validation functions are current, accurate and version controlled.
Provide input into the evolution of system development processes, standards, procedures, and methodology.
Lead the evolution of PMO and BA processes, standards, procedures and methodology.
Establish and maintain positive working relationships with clients and team members.
BASE REQUIREMENTS
BA/BS degree or equivalent work experience
Salesforce Advanced Administrator, Salesforce App Builder or Sales Cloud Certification
3-5 years experience administering or consulting with Salesforce
Experience with data migrations from 3rd parties into Salesforce
Ability to install and configure 3rd party Salesforce Apps (Drawloop or DocuSign experience considered a plus)
Must be highly proficient in Microsoft Excel, Microsoft Power Point, and Microsoft Visio
Strong organization, communication, and interpersonal skills with demonstrable previous project management experience
Strong stakeholder management skills, including the ability to articulate pros/cons of recommended solutions
Passionate team member, who can motivate individuals across different disciplines
Indeed, the Legal and Compliance industries have historically lacked a delivery model that integrates both legal know-how and operational excellence.
In-house departments tend to be sub-scale, law firms lack process DNA, and traditional BPO providers lack legal know-how.
This critical distinction is what has attracted an incredibly talented team made up of partners and consultants from leading strategy consulting firms (McKinsey, BCG), pioneers from the world of Business Process Outsourcing (BPO), and experts in cutting edge technologies and systems.
www.AxiomLaw.com
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Duties and Responsibilities: -Analyze, create, document and test new and enhanced business processes for validated Quality systems.
-Identify, evaluate, develop and or redesign systems and procedures to meet user requirements.
-Create detailed written user requirements for developers.
-Provide consultation to internal customers on business process redesign.
-The incumbent will perform other duties assigned.
-Own key tasks, demonstrate solid business knowledge, require minimum direction, give medium guidance to others, handle moderately complex problems, possess solid knowledge of SDLC -Gather, understand and document business objectives, specifications and requirements on small/medium/large size projects.
-Develop and execute unit/system test cases, scripts and plans.
-Define, design, and document business flows and processes on small & medium size projects.
-Define and articulate business rules required for data accuracy and consistency.
-Identify and resolve issues / defects.
-Identify and understand issues that may impact day-to-day operations and or project costs.
-Use technical tools for (queries, process maps, etc) for problem resolution.
-Understand and follow appropriate SDLC, quality validation processes and application processes.
-Communicate status, solutions and concerns.
-Provide cross-functional and business knowledge to develop business system and process alternatives.
-Train others as appropriate on specific area of business or systems expertise.
-Strong communication skills (verbal/written/listening).
-Solid business knowledge.
-Sense of urgency with strong follow-up skills.
-Must be detailed oriented and able to work with in a team setting.
-Bachelor's degree preferred or relevant work experience in systems or business.
-5+ years experience in applying information systems solutions to business problems.
-Experience in system validation, testing, problem resolution, and training users, HP ALM, Cognos, Tableau.
crs_mgallian crs_tprewitt ss # 87239 Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or genetic information.
","['tableau', 'cogno']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'cogno', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary
Candidates must be intelligent, analytical problem solvers with strong written and verbal communication skills.
Senior Business Analyst must have:
The ability to analyze complex situations and adapt to changing projects and responsibilities
A sound understanding of requirements gathering processes, tools and templates
The ability to create business deliverables, including functional specifications, use cases, requirement traceability matrices, user stories and acceptance criteriaall with minimal direction and support from a team lead or project manager
A thorough understanding of testing capabilities, including performing functional, regression, quality assurance and user acceptance testing, as well as the creation of test scripts pertaining to each
Experience using bug-tracking software such as JIRA
An understanding of project delivery methodologies, including waterfall and the agile Scrum framework
Fundamental knowledge of user experience principles
Business Analysts work closely with leads and project managers to drive requirements definition and prioritization, and contribute to project scoping estimates.
They must be comfortable working with a variety of teams and individuals, including user experience, visual design, technical and program management and must have direct client-facing experience.
In addition, as often the sole Business Analyst on a project, Senior Business Analysts must be self-assured representing the functional discipline.
Responsibilities
Help determine the approach and methodology that best suits the task requirements and client environment
Serve as a functional/domain expert on the project team
Adept at identifying, quantifying and managing project delivery risks
Contribute to a variety of deliverables, possibly managing a single activity or stream of work
Extrapolate core project requirements based on client needs and translate the requirements into project documentation
Able to prepare and execute test scripts and document test results with minimal direction from a lead or project manager
Able to define a problem and possible conclusions and present options for mitigation
Communication
Actively contribute to client working sessions
Present written and oral communications in an organized and structured manner
Technical Understanding
Basic understanding of leading-edge mobile and web application technologies, including but not limited to mobile web and iOS/Android applications, CMS, CRM and other Internet applications in a variety of different industries
Experience in one of more of the following solution sets: corporate sites, consumer sites, B2B sites, B2C sites, employee portals, or marketing platforms
Understand the elements of user experience and visual design and the application and benefits of a user-centered design process in the delivery of solutions
Maintain a cursory understanding of new and emerging technologies and their potential client applications
Required Experience/Skills
Bachelors degree
3+ years professional experience in consulting, with at least 2 years experience as a Business Analyst and at least 1 year experience performing QA testing
Consulting experience delivering web and/or mobile channel solutions on an enterprise scale
Understand user experience and visual design
Experience serving as a functional subject matter expert on projects based on previous experience and/or the ability to quickly learn and become the resident expert
Powered by JazzHR
",['jira'],"['risk', 'regress', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'regress', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Who you are
Well-spoken and customer facing, you have the ability to present ideas in user-friendly language
A self-starter, able to keep up in a fast paced environment, a team player, capable of juggling multiple projects, and a curious learner
A self-directed, trusted liaison among stakeholders that understands structure, policies and operations of a client accounts
A synthesizer adept at recommending SAP Hybris solutions that enable clients to meet their business goals.
What you’ll do
Sales Support
Provide proposal preparation support to Delivery Managers
Provide cross-reference of customers’ requirements against CS/CL/SP/Services component features
Provide SAP Hybris business solution domain expertise to Delivery Managers
Solution Delivery
Provide SAP Hybris business solution domain expertise when engaging clients, guiding them to the best practices for their needs
Gather business, functional and user requirements into a solution requirements specification
Define the vision statement and business objectives for the customer, ensuring that it fulfills the customer needs
Participate in systems analysis and high-level design; identify, troubleshoot, and escalate risks throughout the lifecycle
Lead dynamic & interactive requirements gathering sessions with stakeholders throughout the enterprise, leveraging findings and recommendations from Analytics, User Experience, and Development teams
Communicate clients' processes and requirements to the project team
Develop functional requirements documentation in the form of user stories, process flows, and user acceptance criteria.
Support QA and UAT efforts.
5+ years of full-lifecycle SAP Hybris project experience
Served as a business analyst on ecommerce engagements/projects; consulting experience preferred.
Strong facilitation, negotiation, and conflict-resolution skills
Adaptability and capacity to work effectively in an environment where priorities change frequently
Superior communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to develop and foster long-term relationships
PMP certification
The next big thing isn’t what you’ll buy, it’s how you’ll buy it.
Offices in Gatineau, Seattle, Dayton, and Spokane service clients including Air Canada Vacations, AT&T, PCNA, Honeywell, Microsoft, and more.
Learn more at SMITH.co
",['microsoft'],"['risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Hello Associates,
Â
Title: Sr. Business Analyst
Length:Â12+ month's contract
Â
Required Skills:
Business Analyst with experience with BI projects (OBIEE or Tableau)
Â
The role is expected to aid in one or more BI projects in gathering requirements with multiple elicitation activities, document and model business processes and requirements following USG standards and templates.
Other activities would include in preparing test scenarios, helping in functional testing, training end users and other change management type activities.
Ideal candidate should be a self-driven, organized, agile and should be able to work efficiently in a fast-paced environment
Detailed Experience and Skills Requirements:
Strong Business Analysis experience with excellent communication, interpersonal and organization skills.
Basic knowledge of systems development cycles, methodologies, and work flow diagramming
Excellent analytical, problem solving skills
Proficient in elicitation of requirements through workshops, interviews, etc.
Ability to work with various levels of business users.
Experience in modeling and analyzing business processes and requirements.
Understanding of metrics, dashboard design and drivers of business analysis
Properly documenting the business and functional requirements and getting sign-off.
Experience in preparing high level data dictionaries, data mapping documents
Experience in mock-ups and wireframes for reports, dashboards, forms, etc.
based on the requirements
Experience in use case development.
Assisting in the functional testing process
Ability to perform analysis on data via ad-hoc reports or freehand SQL queries to support the requirements process
Understanding of Business Intelligence, Data Warehousing, Data Integration fundamentals to gather complete requirements
Ability take ownership of BA activities in project when needed and/or take direction from Project Management/Lead BA
Experience in BI Products such as OBIEE 11g, Tableau to design solutions appropriate for business users and within best practices.
Support developers and ensure that the solution is built according to specifications
Experience in Order to Cash with specific focus on invoice/sales reporting
Thank You,
Naresh
Main: (888) 266-9166 Ext: 401 | Direct: 901-317-3453
Email: naresh@conchtech.com
Leading IT solutions provider for more than a Decade!ÂFind out why!
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi']","['dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
gK0C1ysGZB
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"The success of all relationships begins with the basis of great communication.
The Cloud Business Analyst will be an excellent communicator, ensuring professionalism and establishing patterns of exemplary follow-up.
* Documentation.
A large part of the Cloud Business Analyst role is excellent technical documentation via PowerPoint, Excel, PowerBI and other tools.
* Customer Facing.
As such, the Cloud Business Analyst will be comfortable in group environments, with an ability to present well in front of customers.
* Attention to Detail.
* Organizational Skills.
The Cloud Business Analyst will have multiple customer and internal projects to juggle and track at any given time.
Organizing tasks, effort to complete and communication of those tasks is critical.
* Analytical / Logical mindset.
* Passion for Learning.
* Reporting.
* Agile Requirements Definition.
Collaborate with clients to define requirements and translate them into user stories.
Add vision to the project along the way.
* Lead Assessment Engagements.
* Travel.
Expected to be up to 15%.Required Experience:* Proficiency in Microsoft Excel (comfortable working with Pivot Tables)* Proficiency in Microsoft PowerPoint (ability to present to customers)* Proficiency in Microsoft Word (Technical documentation and writing)* Beginner to intermediate experience with PowerBI* Beginner to intermediate experience with relational databases such as SQL or MySQL* Exposure to cloud computing is a plus, though not required* Exposure to statistics and intermediate level mathematics (e.g.
business math, pre-calculus, etc.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'mysql', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi', 'cloud']","['statist', 'math', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi', 'cloud', 'statist', 'math', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
The Business Analyst will work alongside other business analysts and report directly to the Project Manager.
The role includes performing detailed requirements analysis, documenting processes, and performing some user acceptance testing.
Responsibilities
Effectively participate in all stages of the software development lifecycle including:
conducting meetings and presentations
performing requirements gathering, gap analysis and functional designed
creating reports to document and communicate results
ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements
performing user acceptance training
conducting training, and
performing other related duties as requested.
Demonstrate strong analytical problem solving and decision making skills.
Work with other business analysts, project managers and stakeholders to gather requirements and create functional and technical specifications.
Job Qualifications/Education
Expert knowledge of eCommerce processes and lifecycle, specifically business processes around understanding and supporting the implementation of eCommerce platforms and associated risk
Strong understanding of SEO and personalization, and other key industry terms and functions, such as A/B testing, cart abandonment rate, AOV, site search and navigation, back office integration, email marketing and analytics.
Exposure and experience with key industry platforms such as Magento, Hybris, OCC, Episerver, Shopify, Kibo or Big Commerce a plus.
General business understanding of B2C and B2B eCommerce processes including integrations with core supporting business applications such as ERP, OMS, and PIM.
Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
The ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions.
Advanced technical skills.
Excellent documentation skills.
Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
Competency in Microsoft applications including Word, Excel, and Outlook.
Education: Bachelor’s degree in business or related field
Experience: 5 years of experience in business analysis or a related field.
Preferred Skills
Excellent verbal and written communication
Deep analytical skills with the ability to explain difficult concepts to non-technical users
Project and product management skills
Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
Independent thinker with the ability to work collaboratively
Able to plan, organize and prioritize effectively
Quick learner
Self-motivated
","['erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Analyst will interpret results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to complex data.
Analyst will use existing proprietary analysis tools developed in Excel and Word and will be expected to expand analysis as needed based on review of information.
Analyst will work under the direction of Senior Managing Directors who manage the client engagements.Job RequirementsApplicants must have 2 to 4 years of experience and be knowledgeable in aspects of financial analysis.
Outstanding analytical skills are required.
Individual must be able to perform:* Cash flow forecasting and 13-week cash flows* Financial modeling and budget variance analysis* Identification of the key issues threatening the performance of client companies.
* Development of strategies that quickly maximize cash flow and improve business processes.
* Excellent PC skills - must be proficient with all Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, and Outlook) and be able to easily learn other software programs.
* Understands and clearly articulates basic and complex business decisions.
* High level of organizational skills and the ability to multi-task.
* Detail-oriented with good follow-up skills; ability to meet deadlines.Travel & Hours of Work* Expect to travel up to 80% of time.
* Must be willing to work significant flexible hours.Growth PotentialFMG is committed to developing its internal resources.
This position will provide the opportunity for a well qualified, forward thinking individual to develop the skills necessary to move into higher level consulting positions.Please send your CV/resume to
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']"
BA,"Nest disrupted the thermostat.
Uber disrupted cab hailing.
The ideal candidate has exceptional analytical skills, is extremely detail oriented, and focused on producing measurable business outcomes in a team environment.
Key Responsibilities:
Understand business pain points and gather business requirements through meetings, workshops and individual information gathering sessions.
Analyze data (pricing, demand, capacity, service offerings, competition) to determine optimal strategies for business, process and systems improvements.
Evaluate existing systems and business processes against business requirements to identify areas for improvement.
Translates user needs into system requirements through cross-functional collaboration.
Collaborate with internal teams and vendors to design and implement business and IT solutions.
Assist in developing systems documentation and training materials.
Skills and Qualifications:
Experience in project management, data analysis and devising and implementing recommendations for business process improvement
Experience with Python, Tableau, Power BI, SQL or similar tools
Self-starter mindset, strong business acumen, and attention to detail
Consultative approach to problem solving
Critical thinker with strong interpersonal skills
Strong work ethic, and a team-player with positive and friendly attitude
Bachelor’s degree
Significant opportunity for personal and professional growth.
Supportive and collaborative work environment.
Competitive compensation and comprehensive benefits package.
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python']","['data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'python', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"General requirements a.
REST, JSON, XML) f. Knowledge of data warehouse concepts, data model, knowledge of SQL(Structured Query Language) and ability to query databases, source to target mapping g. Technical experience with systems networking, databases, Web development, Mobile App development, and user support Domain a.
Requirement discovery workshops, JAD sessions, and stakeholder interviews, Job shadowing, Prototyping etc b.
User stories, process flows, Use cases, context diagrams and other requirement artifacts c. BRDSRSFRS , RTM d. Process modeling (UML BPMN), strategy analysis, Non functional requirements, transition requirements e. Change management, CR, impact analysis f. UAT, Test plan, Test data, business testing Underlaying competencies Soft skills a. ability to see the bigger picture but also work through the details, able to multi-task b.
Excellent communication skills , interpersonal and stakeholder management skills, self-driven attitude is a must c. Experience willingness to work under high pressure, short deadline, multi-vendor engagements d. Excellent stakeholder identification and management skills 5.
Tools a.
Strong in MS Office and diagraming tools like MS Visio b. ClearQuestJira as a repository for application code and ticket information c. ServiceNow to log tickets for each enhancement and defectbug fix d. SharePoint to upload documents related to the project and submit requests e. Toad and IBM DataStudio for DB2 database query operations f. HP-ALM, Rally (for Agile Mgmt.)
g. Ab Initio software such as Co-Op, MDH, EME, QueryIT, ExpressIT, Control-Center, Ab Initio Test Framework Required Soft Skills a.
Good analytical and problem-solving skills b.
Exceptional communication skills (written and verbal) c. Good documentation skills d. Proficiency in English language (as a medium of communication) e. Frank and open communication with peers and higher-ups about realistic estimations and meeting timelinesexpectations and proactive communication of issues and concerns thereof f. Assertiveness in communicating ideas, estimates, scope and timelines
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"An integrated approach to tax requires experienced professionals who push limits and question the status quo.
As a member of the National Tax Technology (NTT) Team you will be on the cutting edge of integrating Technology and Tax.
In this role, you will work with organizations undergoing transformative change to develop and implement innovative solutions elevating how tax functions operate.
The Role:
Youll also be responsible for:
Assisting the Product Owner in leading, directing, and reviewing all activities associated with delivering technology products
Ability to work collaboratively with Tax Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) and technical teams and project managers on development projects during all phases of software development life cycle
Responsible for conducting Design Thinking sessions to gain insights into end user needs, Manages the Product Backlog for a Product, working with the Product Owner to prioritize requirements, define and manage scope and sprints for a project
Provides operational support to tax practitioners.
Configures SharePoint features in production and non-production environments.
Engages with various teams to resolve problems as they arise
Maintain a solid knowledge base of the functional capabilities of and is a Subject Matter Expert on the various areas and tax technology products
Interface with clients to define and document requirements for a named set of custom developed or vendor software products
Required Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or Business Administration, or relevant educational or professional experience
3+ years of related experience in related field.
Tax industry experience is a plus
Accreditation such as BA Certification.
Experience in process design and process improvement experience
Advanced written, verbal analytical and communications skills required
Strong interpersonal and relationship skills
Basic client interaction skills
Ability to coordinate and work effectively with teammates, end-users and leadership
Ability to work in a virtual team environment
Ability to complete work in an acceptable timeframe and manage a variety of detailed tasks and responsibilities simultaneously and with accuracy to meet deadlines, goals, and objectives and satisfy internal and external customer needs related to the job
Familiarity with agile project methodology
Ability to write simple Microsoft SQL Server statements
Up to 10% travel required
Preferred Qualifications:
Working knowledge of analytics, data management, statistics, accounting, and computer applications
Knowledge and experience with tax compliance systems or financial systems
You want your next step to be the right one.
You've worked hard to get where you are today.
And now you're ready to use your unique skills, talents and personality to achieve great things.
Experience the power of being understood.
Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans.
","['microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Conducts and documents moderately complex analysis for a Business Unit and makes recommendations to implement solutions that improve the quality of services delivered assisting in integration, testing and implementation of solutions to achieve desired results.
Coordinates small to intermediate Client projects and acts as a liaison between team members and functional area management.
Creates and administers assigned budgets, monitors and analyzes actual spending and develops projections in order to authorize financial commitments, projects future performance and functions purchasing activities and interfaces with vendors.
Utilizes problem solving, decision making and analytical skills to meet changing business needs.
Administers and monitors department`s compliance and control environment activities.
The level of work is considered intermediate and staff must be able to work under general supervision.
This position has no direct reports
Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Conducts moderate to complex analysis and projection (financial, performance, operational and statistical) projects, including compilation and arrangement of data, computations, result analysis, charts and exhibit creation, report preparation and data accuracy validation; identifies issues or problems with data and makes recommendations to remedy errors
Plans, directs and coordinates department project activities and resources to ensure project goals are completed on time, within budget and with optimum quality; provides direction, prioritization, and conflict resolution in managing project teams to accomplish project objectives
Develops, maintains, manipulates and analyzes spreadsheets and databases for department, extracting data from other systems as necessary; develops metrics to track performance plans
Develops briefing materials and presentations for the client
Supports department business operations, financial processes and improvement/efficiency initiatives
Monitors, reconciles and analyzes budget performance, analyzes spending, processes purchases as well as prepare detailed reports on budget expense management
Develops internal and external communications for stakeholder groups, including use of innovative technologies to reach multiple audiences throughout the Bank
Conducts market research, trend, cost/benefit and best practice analysis to develop a business case and recommendations to be presented to senior leadership
Consults with department to define and document current business processes and areas for improvement
Works with senior leaders to establish metrics and targets to be used to analyze and determine organizational performance
Education and Experience
Bachelor's degree
1 to 5 years of direct work experience
Experience in project management methodologies
Experience in performing specialized business analysis and project assessment
Experience gathering and analyzing data, reporting and presenting financial data and coordinating efforts of a project team
Experience communicating with internal stakeholders including executives, technical resources, internal communications and public relations
Knowledge and Skills
Strong analytical skills and ability to think independently
Self-directed and motivated
Knowledge of Bank operation preferred
Demonstrated ability to learn new technical applications
Possesses and applies strong internet navigation and research skills
Strong written, oral and interpersonal communication skills
Strong relationship building skills
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Summary
Responsible for collecting and summarizing data that will assist Pharmacy and Retail Operations management in both long- and short-range strategic planning, and the development and implementation of programs.
Develop and maintain a thorough understanding of business processes pertaining to all aspects of Pharmacy and Retail Operations.
Analyzing data to develop cost benefits of proposed programs through collection and data.
Job Responsibilities
Responsible for collecting and summarizing data that will assist Pharmacy and Retail Operations management in both long- and short-range strategic planning, and the development and implementation of programs.
Develops and maintains a comprehensive understanding of business processes and practices pertaining to all aspects of Pharmacy and Retail Operations within the Retail Hub.
Analyzes corresponding data to effectively recommend system and operational procedure changes, enhancements, development of functional specifications or interface opportunities with costs and or return on investment summarized.
Serves as operation point of contact for various projects to drive project execution.
Communicates relevant project information to stakeholders, both corporately and in the field.
Plans, designs and deploys appropriate reports and tools.
Collaborates across Pharmacy and Retail Operations, IT, legal and regulatory, process improvement teams, and others, to develop operational solutions.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelors degree OR, High School Diploma/GED and 3 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions.
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Word (for example: inserting headers, page breaks, page numbers and tables and/or adjusting table columns).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Excel (for example: using SUM function, setting borders, setting column width, inserting charts, using text wrap, sorting, setting headers and footers and/or print scaling).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft PowerPoint (for example: applying a theme, formatting character spacing, inserting a picture, changing slide layout and theme colors, adding transitions, customizing slide numbers, changing chart style and/or formatting font).
Willing to travel up to 10% of the time for business purposes (within state and out of state).
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelors degree and at least 2 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions; OR, High School Diploma/GED and 5 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions.
Masters degree or MBA.
Bachelors degree.
Retail Pharmacy Experience.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,")o Regulatory Affairs, Regulatory Information Managementlocation: Deerfield, Illinoisjob type: Contractsalary: $39 - 49 per hourwork hours: 8am to 4pmeducation: Bachelorsresponsibilities:Critical Responsibilities- Lead business functional requirements, technical requirements and solution delivery on enterprise/large projects within Baxter's R&D IT function.- Gather, understand and document business objectives, requirements, functional specifications through workshops/interviews/meetings.- Manage the creation and approval of the deliverables in a validation package- Identify, evaluate, develop and /or redesign systems and procedures that meet user requirements.- Define, design and document business flows and processes for large, highly complex projects.
Understand interdependencies of systems for multiple businesses or functions.
Provide cross-functional and business knowledge to develop business system and process alternatives.- Design data flow through software solutions, including upstream and downstream interfaces- Use technical tools (queries, process maps, etc.)
for problem resolution.- Conduct data analysis; design business rules for data accuracy and consistency; design data mapping and data migration.
Identify and resolve data quality issues.- Establish validation test strategy; develop and execute test cases; lead validation testing with IT and business partners; manage defects with software vendors and IT.- Assist in development of training materials and/or conduct training.- Provide support on R&D business applications.- Understand and follow appropriate SDLC, quality validation processes and application processes.- Communicate status, solutions and concerns.- Disseminate information in a timely manner within the team and across functions.- Make decisions that have a cross-functional or business impact and analyze financial impact.- Collaborate with software vendors (i.e., understand capabilities of software vendor solution and identify gaps/mitigations, resolve issues, etc.
)Key Qualifications- Bachelor's degree in Information Technology- 8+ years of business analysis experience and implementing IT solutions- Prefer 3+ years of regulatory affairs and/or regulatory information management experience- Demonstrate strong business acumen, solution delivery expertise and a strong understanding of systems for both on-premise and SaaS offerings- Proven success (3+ years) managing large project requirements highly desired- Ability to accomplish results through others, utilizing effective influencing and leadership skills- Must be able to solve complex business problems and present recommendations to senior management effectively- Must be able to define, shape, and drive projects to completion while effectively collaborating with others- Experience working on all SDLC business processes: requirements, design, development, testing, training and deployment- Experience working with third-party external teams in the support and implementation of IT solutions- Data analysis and data migration experience- Require limited direction; give significant direction; detail and quality oriented; possess extensive knowledge of policies, standards and procedures; have excellent presentation, communication, teamwork and interpersonal skills.qualifications:+ Experience level: Experienced+ Minimum 8 years of experience+ Education: Bachelors (required)skills:+ Information Technology+ business analysis+ regulatory affairs+ managing large project+ SDLC business processes+ Data analysis+ data migrationEqual Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
","['r', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst / Consultant
As a Salesforce Consultant you will leverage your business and technical skills to uncover pain points within the client's current technology and processes.
This is the ideal position for someone with experience as a Salesforce Admin, Business Analyst, or Salesforce Consultant looking for a role working on a full-scale Salesforce implementation from start to finish.
*This project could be delayed due to market uncertainty.
If interested in other roles, please join the Talent Network for consideration: https://www.pinkuspartners.com/salesforce-talent-network/
Facilitate requirements development sessions in order to gain an understanding of the customer’s current state.
Present implementation needs and options confidently to technical teams as well as a C-Level audience.
Strong attention to detail is required.
Elevate the client experience as a knowledgeable liaison between technical teams, testing teams, and business stakeholders during the implementation phase.
Lead discovery workshops which may include large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations
Execute rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Perform business process modeling, user experience modeling, and basic technical architecture diagramming.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities)
Requirements:
Strong attention to detail
5+ years of experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Salesforce Admin Certification Required, additional certifications preferred
You have a strong understanding of Salesforce functionality and can clearly communicate its capabilities and limitations to customers.
Ability to build and demonstrate prototypes in Salesforce.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
You have experience with Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Community Cloud functionality.
You are a highly motivated individual with a desire to learn and contribute.
You have strong presentation and communication skills.
Hands on experience working with companies implementing Salesforce.com functionality in some of the following areas is preferred:
System Implementation & Adoption
Salesforce.com Service Cloud
Salesforce.com Community Cloud
Salesforce.com Sales Cloud
Experience with data migration tools is a plus.
Quickly scale your business with experienced and pre-vetted Salesforce Talent.
Job Type: Contract
License:
Salesforce (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst / Project Manager (Technical)
Mission:
The mission of the Digital team's Project manager / Business Analyst is to thoroughly analyze Blick's business systems and processes, elicit, document and manage the business and system requirements and delivery of the requirements on various projects (or product track), including, but not limited to Web and Data, using effective tools and techniques.
This role requires an individual to play multiple functions.
Product Manager, Scrum Master and a Business Analyst.
The individual will need to
Foster an environment of accountability and conduct the planning, and help in design, development, testing and deployment of high quality software solutions that are appropriate and cost-effective, to support organization growing needs.
Provide guidance and training to users
Understand the needs of multiple stakeholders to help prioritize work in a high pressure environment and also contribute to the design and architecture of the system with a good understanding of business use-case and requirements.
Facilitate the negotiation of requirements among multiple stakeholders.
Identify the current- and future-state business processes.
Help the business stakeholders envision the future and how their work will need to change to support the future.
Create, analyze, and validate detailed functional specifications.
Facilitate design sessions with the implementation team to define the solution.
Deliver elements of systems design, including data migration rules, business rules, wireframes, or other detailed deliverables.
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'analyz', 'data']",2.0,"['busi', 'account', 'analyz', 'data']"
BA,"Help users solve their IT problems and provide targeted instructions to users to improve their skills and confidence in using computer systems and the Cobalt application to meet their business needs.
Promptly notify Service Desk management of issues that require management attention.
Validate documentation for accuracy and adherence to Service Desk standards
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"by translating business needs into BI solutions.
This position will also involve identification/development of and execution of test plans to ensure that technical solutions meet the needs of the business.
In addition to being experienced in gathering and documenting requirements, facilitating meetings, and delivering results, this person must also be a highly organized, self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environment.
Should an individual in this classification not be able to adhere to this requirement due to a disability, they should contact their Human Resources department to see what, if any, reasonable accommodation may be made.
Drug Free Employer.
",['bi'],"['classif', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'classif', 'busi']"
BA,"Local candidates are only being considered at this time.
Sr IT Business Analyst - Healthcare insurance
IT Business Analyst - Healthcare Insurance vertical Contract with option for hire possibility Client is in healthcare insurance (EDI 834, 835, 837 etc.).
Good experience with SQL queries needed Chicago (bordering O’Hare airport - Off Higgins)
SUMMARY
The Business Analyst is responsible for collecting and documenting business requirements from various business teams and provides written functional requirements for various technology teams.
This key role is the liaison between business teams and technology teams.
The primary responsibilities of this role include working with stakeholders to understand their business and technical requirements, building, and managing the product backlog, and successfully leading agile projects through their respective life cycles.
The Business Analyst must be comfortable managing and driving the requirements-gathering phase of technology projects.
The Business Analyst will also be needed to sometimes provide second-tier technology applications support and application reporting
REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS
7 years of prior experience as a Business Analyst or other IT role, such as support or development.
BA BS in IT, statistics, computer science, mathematics, information management, business or a related field or equivalent experience.
Experience in writing SQL queries, joins etc.
Experience with EDI formats like 834, 835, 837
Skilled at defining and documenting business and functional requirements for ongoing system enhancement initiatives in agile software development environments.
Experience writing clear acceptance criteria to a testable level.
Experience leading or participating in all Agile meetings including sprint planning, sprint grooming, review, demo, stand-up, and retrospective sessions.
Experience in all phases of product, software, and testing lifecycles.
Microsoft Office experience Word for documentation, Excel for data handling, Visio for process explanation, PowerPoint for presentation and Outlook for email.
#IND123
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['busi', 'statist', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'busi', 'statist', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Roles and Responsibilities
Key roles and responsibilities include:
Work with clients and end users to gather, understand, and define business requirements
Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet a client’s business requirements and fulfill user stories
Complete the configuration for user stories within Salesforce, AppExchange products, or other cloud-based technologies
Participate in key meetings with clients including requirement sessions, system demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Requirements
Hands on experience configuring Salesforce or similar CRM Product, including workflows, validation rules, and security controls
Proven ability leveraging analytical and problem-solving skills in a fast paced environment
Detail-oriented individual with the ability to quickly ramp up on new clients, their business needs, and technologies
Strong presentation, communication (written and verbal) skills, and interpersonal skills
Ability to juggle and prioritize multiple tasks within a collaborative team environment
Demonstrates flexibility and willingness to do what it takes to get the job done
Drive and desire to learn and grow both technical and functional skill sets
Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, and Visio
Bachelor's degree required
Must be authorized to work for any U.S. employer
Willingness to travel up to 50%
Preferred Experience and Skills
Experience leveraging and configuring AppExchange products to develop a solution
Experience soliciting, gathering, and analyzing user input and requirements
Experience documenting user stories and creating to-be process flow diagrams
Experience collaborating with business stakeholders
Experience on a Salesforce implementation through the full Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Salesforce Admin Certification and one Consulting Cloud Certification (Sales, Service or Community)
Benefits
EOE M/F/V/D
VEVRAA Federal Contractor
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"What you get to do:
Act as a liaison between business users and technical team.
Document functional user requirements in user stories along with detailed specifications for use in the development cycle.
Support development team with functional testing and validation of delivered solution
Contribute to system design reviews to identify potential issues.
Assist with systems test planning and test script development.
Contribute to development of deployment and communication plans.
Develop customer communications, training, and job aids to assist in successful business transitions.
Document business requirements, translate requirements into system specifications, support system development activities, document the solution for training, provide customer support, and support test execution.
What you bring to the role:
Minimum 3 to 5 years of related professional experience.
Ability to wear multiple hats and take on a variety of functional roles including project management and business analyst as needed to ensure client success.
Problem solving and analytical skills, in addition to strong verbal and written communication skills.
Attention to detail with a desire to become a business process and solution expert within the structure of a consulting project
Understanding of the Quote to Cash business process preferred
Successfully worked on multiple consulting projects implementing CRM/ERP/cloud applications, with SalesForce.com knowledge a plus.
Understanding of systems development life cycle, in particular with Agile methodology.
Bachelor’s Degree in computer science, engineering, business, finance or equivalent educational or professional experience.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite (especially Project, Excel, PowerPoint and Visio).
Individual must be able to travel.
Health, vision, life & disability, dental insurance
Snacks and Drinks
Happy hours
Casual Dress
Tuition reimbursement & Professional Development Program
Team outings & open office floor plan
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Chicago, IL
Posted 2 weeks ago
Responsibilities include:
 Serve as a Liaison between Customer and Development, often being the product owner
proxy for a customer
 Gather customer requirements and document current and future state
 Serve as SME for end-to-end solution
 Facilitate and lead sessions with varying audiences
 Visualize and assist to model overall business solution
 Write and deliver customer required documentation including
o User Stories
o Process flows
o Sequence Diagrams
 Convert customer requirements to task based solution implementation
 Convert customer deliverables into viable development work products
 Work with QA to facilitate understanding of requirements
Skills Required:
 BS/BA or equivalent.
Minimum of 5 + years prior experience with business analysis and
project management preferred.
 Background in Software Development and/or Project Management of Software Solutions
 Prior Consulting Background Desired
 Familiarity with both Waterfall and Agile Methodologies
 Familiarity with SCRUM
 Knowledge of Agile Story Mapping and Creation
 Familiarity with User Driven Development and Test Driven Development
 Strong analytical and QA skills as well as attention to details.
 Ability to manage multiple priorities and work independently with a focus on quality of
deliverables.
 Strong collaboration skills to drive solution through partnerships
 Ability to interact well with all levels of the organization and with stakeholders.
 Excellent communication and presentation skills
",['excel'],"['sequenc', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'sequenc', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Be the liaison between IT and HR, leading the charge to get the most out of the current software and elevate the delivery of reporting to executive leadership in the business unit.
Serve as the subject matter expert in PeopleSoft
Lead the charge in reporting analytics
Execute directives for streamlining process and procedure
Work closely with audit to ensure compliance
They offer a competitive salary, great benefits and a chance to continue your education while working at the school.
Explore the possibilities!
Interested in hearing more?
Please share your contact information and resume for consideration.
Powered by JazzHR
18IgkvKeyA
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"In this role, the ideal candidate will have 3+ years implementing Oracle ERP systems with a focus on Oracle Financials and Retail modules.
In these full-time positions, you would be working with the latest versions of this technology and be integral to its successful implementation.
These positions are based in central Illinois and close to world-class educational facilities and entertainment while maintaining it's small-town charm.
JOB SUMMARY The Business Analyst defines the business requirements and processes that will be used to create deliverables and deliver end software modifications.
The Business Analyst will also define, analyze, and document current and future business processes and the business functions that support them to help design the software functionality expected in the overall delivery to the project.
JOB DUTIES AND ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS Serves as a primary point of contact in the requirements and design phases of projects.
This involves research and application of best practices with respect to business and operational processes, technologies, and industry trends Maps out and documents ldquoas isrdquo and ldquoto berdquo process models, defines associated business requirements and performs gap analysis between process models, technology and people Works with the development team and explains business-focused concepts to ensure requirements and functionality are being met Creates requirements and functional design documents and presents them to internal team members.
Prepares accurate and detailed requirements, interface specifications documents, user interface guides, functional specification documents, and related test documents Plans, documents and executes the test scenarios and scripts.
May be involved in supporting testing and issue remediation Identifies and assists in managing any defects, change requests, or new functionality related to the project and current work efforts May be involved in loading and managing client or test data during the test execution phase of a project.
Corporate httpswww.rekruiters.com ndash Main Site rekruiters.com ndash Twitter httpswww.facebook.comrekruiters ndash Facebook 6562 bh
","['erp', 'oracl', 'erp system']","['research', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['erp', 'oracl', 'erp system', 'research', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary:
Duties and Responsibilities:
Develop and analyze functional specifications in order to provide advice and technical training.
Design efficient IT systems to meet business and technology needs, as well as make recommendations for process improvements through data analysis.
Integrate multiple systems and reconcile needs of different teams.
Gather feedback from end users about system performance.
Develop, implement, and maintain elements of systems design, including business process documentation, workflow charts, diagrams, data migration rules, business rules, wireframes, and other detailed deliverables including integration documentation.
Responsible for documenting and maintaining quality meeting data.
Assist with defining assessment and implementation methodology and deliverables for client delivery.
Supporting production-related issues reported by client and CSR team.
Understand issues and help resolve them through data analysis, technical research, and team collaboration on complex issues.
Publish weekly release notes for delivery to internal and external stakeholders.
Keep job-related reporting Standard Operating Procedures up-to-date and accurate.
Assist with connecting processes and overcoming internal silos, as well as identify controls necessary to ensure long-term system stability.
Create various plans and strategy in a well-documented format for clients.
Understand platform strategy and direction.
Identify process, system, and data gaps and pain points both within and across operational workflows.
Write clear requirements and creating data models, process diagrams, and design wireframes that will further support the business’ needs.
Participate in pre-scheduled after-hours support of weekly on-call rotation and/or as a team member supporting special projects or releases.
Teleworking may be required based on business needs.
Education, Experience, and Other Skills:
Bachelor's Degree in Information Services, Business Administration, Computer Science, or related field.
3+ years experience in IT in a business environment.
Experience with SQL, Diagramming tools (e.g.
Visio), and Productivity tools (e.g.
Word, Excel, PowerPoint).
Understanding of system/API and data integration concepts, a plus.
Understanding of the Insurance Business from the IT side, a plus.
Business process management and modeling.
Self-starter, creative, and thrives under limited supervision.
Works well under pressure.
Rock star organization skills – you pay attention to the details that others might overlook.
Exceptional oral and written communication skills.
Strong presentation skills and experience explaining technical concepts to clients are crucial in this role.
Ability to deal with rapidly shifting priorities.
A calm and focused approach to high-pressure situations.
The ability to be receptive and action-oriented in response to constructive feedback.
Must be legally authorized to work in the United States for any employer without sponsorship.
Competitive base salary
Benefits package including health, dental, and vision
Generous paid time off policy
Casual dress code
Complimentary office snacks and beverages
Free parking
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Application Question:
Will you now or in the future require sponsorship for employment visa status (for example, H1B visa status)?
Fully Remote
www.trionfo.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The resource may support and lead teams responsible for implementation of initiatives with high complexity that affects multiple functional areas within the division.
Supports the prioritization of divisional activities and tracks progress to goals.
Job Responsibilities Special activities may include, but not limited to Support team responsible for successful implementation of large scale divisional activities that cross multiple functional areas including, but not limited to, the Affordable Care Act, other large federal legislative changes, merger and other large integration activities.
Support the translation of divisional strategy into executable plans and successful implementation.
Develop clear and compelling deliverables that present work approach and results to multiple internalexternal audiences, in presentations, reports, dashboards, intranet site content, etc.
Develop business cases to support divisional efforts and assist in managing budgets appropriately Collaborate with SDO, Product Development and other key areas that support the division Lead divisional business impact analysis of regulatory requirements Coordinate design, development and implementation efforts of divisional initiatives that cross multiple functional areas.
Track initiatives and activities across the division to ensure proper handoffs and coordination happen between functional areas.
Interact one-on-one and in group settings with departmentalinter-departmental team members to identify issues, gather data, brainstorm, prioritize, discuss analytic approach, and share findings.
Manage multiple large priorities across projects to complete tasks on time.
Supports divisional leadership meetings and projects on an ad hoc basis Preferred Job Qualifications Bachelor Degree and 3 yearsrsquo experience in business analysis, process improvement, strategic planning, research, project management, product administration, product operations or relevant health care industry experience -- OR -- 7 yearsrsquo experience in business analysis, process improvement, strategic planning, research, project management, product administration, product operations or relevant health care industry experience Project management skills, including strong organization, prioritization and problem solving skills strong oral, verbal and interpersonal communication skills ability to accept direction and feedback Experience interacting with personnel of multiple departments and at various levels in the organization Knowledge of strategic planning techniques and industry trends Experience interpreting business and financial information Verbal and written communication and organization skills Experience with changing assignments and priorities PC proficiency to include MS Office products
",['ms office'],"['dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'dashboard', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills.
* Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management* Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team* Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals* Knowledge of business applications, data usage and management* Understanding of basic software development principles and processes* 5+ years of strong experience utilizing SQL or PL/SQL
",['sql'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
HIXqwftlCF
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what's delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor's Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Must have SQL experience along with .Net
Must have Cloud XP with micro services knowledge
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let's take this journey together.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
]]>
","['excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst
Lisle, IL
Pay Rate- $45-55/hr
Salesforce Business Analyst Responsibilities
Work with Business, Technical and IT Subject Matter Experts to document business and functional requirements
In conjunction with the technical team, define solutions within the Salesforce platform to meet project objectives while following Salesforce best practices
Configure Salesforce to implement business solutions per business requirements
Communicate with project managers, business units, and developers to ensure effective collaboration throughout all phases of development, testing and deployment
Write use cases, test cases, conduct functional and end-to-end testing, and facilitate User Acceptance Testing sessions
Take accountability for quality of deliverables, provide status on development effort, and deliver on time
Assist the Support Team with escalated issues arising from support of internal and customer-facing Salesforce environments
Salesforce Business Analyst Qualifications
BS in Computer Science and 2 years experience, or 5 years applicable experience with a BS in another technical field
Proficient with MS Office Suite: Word, Visio, Excel, and PowerPoint
Salesforce Business Analyst and configuration experience with Sales Cloud, Marketing Cloud, Pardot, Service Cloud and/or Partner Communities preferred
Highly detail oriented, accurate, and organized
Proven ability to succeed in a cross-functional environment
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Experience in an Agile development environment
","['ms office', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud']","['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary:
The IT Business Analyst position is responsible for developing a detailed understanding of business process and functional needs, conducting industry-based research and data analysis, and determining options and alternatives for technology solutions to meet those business needs.
Additionally, this position is expected to be the advocate for the best user experience design possible for all technology solutions proposed for meeting those business needs.
Duties and Responsibilities:
Conduct analysis of business and user needs, documentation of requirements, and translation into functional system requirements.
Perform market, data, technical, and technology option analysis and recommendations.
Create relevant documentation, including but not limited to, user stories/use cases, wireframes, screen mockups, process flow documents, and data flow diagrams.
Interface with stakeholders to ensure buy-in to the functional and user design of the systems before and during development.
Develop, define, & build technology business cases that will enable business and technology change.
Work hand-in-hand with both business functional specialists (Knowledge Management, Accounting, Marketing, etc.)
and technical development teams to formulate functional requirements and specifications.
Coordinate with Application Development team members, vendors and Project Managers, as appropriate, to review the proposed solution and design to ensure that the requirements are met.
Work with the QA group to review test plans and ensure requirements are covered.
Evaluate solutions to ensure they have high scores on usability and user experience design.
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Computer Science, Information Systems, related field or equivalent experience.
A minimum of 2 years of experience in business analysis / requirements management for a product or system.
Demonstrated skill managing small to medium-size projects.
Proficient in mapping of business processes to user and functional needs.
Working knowledge of business processes, system development, process improvements and change management.
Experience with the full software development life cycle.
Preferred:
Experience in Knowledge Management systems
Background in Project Management.
Experience with User Experience Design or in a previous User Experience role.
Other Skills and Abilities:
Strong organizational skills
Strong attention to detail
Good judgment
Strong interpersonal communication skills
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Able to work harmoniously and effectively with others
Able to preserve confidentiality and exercise discretion
Able to work under pressure
Able to manage multiple projects with competing deadlines and priorities
A self-starter who desires to show ownership and commitment to the job
Powered by JazzHR
9YrbvpO8sP
",[None],"['data', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"to Assist in developing system requirement & producing design specifications for new technology apps or changes to existing apps.
Analyze the client needs & provide time estimation with a good project plan.
Liaison between the business units, technology & support teams.
Analyze the impact of proposed solution across the org & develop use cases that explain/ demonstrate business requirements/specifications to develop the team.
Structure & lead the user acceptance test effort to ensure that products created match business specifications.
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Ref ID: 01300-0010867374Classification: Business Analyst - Financial Services
Compensation: DOE
Essential Duties:
• Provide key input into the development of departmental strategic goals along with identifying key measurable to support the departmental goals.
• Responsible for review and modification of internal control, budgeting, forecasting, cost analysis and business practices and processes to ensure operational integrity.
• Recommends systems process improvements and implements changes.
• Leads projects and team assignments for general accounting and financial analysis activities in the plant.
• Collects and analyzes plant, product and process results and statistics.
Job Requirements:
• Fluency with QAD or similar integrated manufacturing system
• 3+ years of relevant experience
• Bachelor's Degree in FInance or Accounting.
Master's Degree preferred
• CPA or CMA preferred
• Knowledge of Hyperion preferred
• Ability to mentor and teach effective problem-solving skills
For any inquires, you may reach out to John Sadofsky at 312-616-8200.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.
",[None],"['analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Team:
The role requires effective management of both short term, tactical solutions as well as longer term, multi-quarter strategic initiatives.
A successful candidate will be a proficient PM/BA who communicates and collaborates effectively, taking ownership and accountability for all aspects of each project assigned to them.
They will manage requests throughout their life-cycle from business analysis, to prioritization, to collaboration with technical counterparts, through to delivery and business acceptance.
The ability to work across a wide range of stakeholders; business and technical, internal and external is central to the role.
Responsibilities:
Reporting to the PM/BA Lead, the PM/BA will evaluate current tactical issues, lead small/mid-size initiatives, and contribute to enterprise-wide strategic initiatives.
Work with front and back office stakeholders across the organization to design and deliver comprehensive reference data solutions across a wide range of asset classes, geographies, and instrument types.
Assist in management front/middle office requests to development teams to ensure concepts are properly evaluated, implemented, and risk assessed.
Evaluate systems for opportunities to automate with focus on highest return on investment.
Help design and implement metrics for tracking product and operational health.
Manage tracks within larger strategic initiatives.
Work with stakeholders within the organization to refine and improve knowledge and processes.
Design and implement processes that facilitate the use and administration of reference data.
Required Skills
5 or more years of professional experience in financial services, particularly reference data or technology
Extensive product knowledge across a broad array of financial products and Instruments
Experience supporting data integration, data governance, data life cycle management, data quality, and data strategy
Strong analytical, quantitative skills
Project Management and Business Analysis experience
Experience in developing metrics (Tableau preferred)
Python, SQL, or similar for data analysis and tool building (preferred)
Education: BA/BS Bachelor’s Degree (STEM degree preferred)
","['tableau', 'sql', 'python']","['risk', 'busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'python', 'risk', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Translate business and design requirements into technical requirements for multiple Development teams - back end service developers, framework developers, and UI developers.
Perform critical analysis on information consolidated from multiple sources, identify and resolve conflicts, and break down high-level information into detailed workable requirements.
Work with Developers and Subject Matter Experts to understand the work effort for a requirement, communicate any compromises or risks to the Designers and Product Managers, and, if needed, facilitate making adjustments that satisfy all parties.
Actively participate in adding to the wiki that is living documentation of the latest business and technical requirements.
Minimum 6 years of hands-on experience as a Business Systems Analyst, System Analyst, or Technical Analyst, with heavy emphasis on technology and implementation understanding.
Excellent verbal and written skills are critical since this job primarily entails communicating technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Experience managing or leading a team of Business System Analysts or other contributors on a software delivery project.
Experience working with software or web technology teams.
Experience with software development methodologies and practices (SDLC, Agile, Scrum, Waterfall, etc.)
General knowledge of financial services concepts and products.
Strong interpersonal skills to manage relationships with a variety of partners and stakeholders.
Basic computer programming skills.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
Uses this knowledge to develop cost benefit analysis of proposed programs through collection and data analysis.
Develops and presents specific recommendations to Pharmacy Purchasing management team.
Job Responsibilities
Develops and maintains a comprehensive understanding of business processes and industry practices pertaining to purchasing, distributing, and dispensing of pharmaceutical products.
Collects, analyzes and presents information pertaining to long-term planning and strategic goals of the Pharmacy Purchasing department.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelors degree and two (2) years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions; OR, High School Diploma/GED and five (5) years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions.
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Access (for example: designing and creating simple queries, modifying data types, adding dates, working with required fields and/or creating labels).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Excel (for example: using SUM function, setting borders, setting column width, inserting charts, using text wrap, sorting, setting headers and footers and/or print scaling).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft PowerPoint (for example: applying a theme, formatting character spacing, inserting a picture, changing slide layout and theme colors, adding transitions, customizing slide numbers, changing chart style and/or formatting font).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Word (for example: inserting headers, page breaks, page numbers and tables and/or adjusting table columns).
Experience using time management skills such as prioritizing/organizing and tracking details and meeting deadlines of multiple projects with varying completion dates.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelors degree in Business Administration, Finance, Economics, or Mathematics.
Basic level skill in SQL (for example: build queries, add, modify, and delete data; create and maintain tables, query and update databases using SQL statements, etc).
Experience providing customer service to internal and external customers, including meeting quality standards and evaluation of customer satisfaction.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'econom', 'recommend']"
BA,"Summary The Business Analyst will work on providing requirements for an Oracle CCB CIS System at a large utility client.
This work will be performed under the direct supervision of the Project Executive or Project Lead.
The Business Analyst will work with other SMEs to develop and document the current state and proposed solution.
This individual will also assist with ensuring that deliverables meet client standards and expectations.
The successful candidate may work on multiple projects simultaneously and be a team player.
Responsibilities Participate in workshops, design as-is flows, designed to-be flows, gather requirements (through customer interviews, JAD sessions and review of project artifacts), ensure requirements align, perform a fit-gap analysis, and conduct a RICEF inventory (Reports, Interfaces, Conversions, Enhancements, Forms) Develop new process documentation Develop and or update user and system documentation Create and present reports or presentations as requested by the Project Executive or Project Lead Requirements Business Analyst with 3-5 years of experience working directly with the Oracle Customer Care Billing package (no specific module ndash generalist) Experience in Utilities industry (gaselectric) Experience in consulting, requirements gathering and solution design using Oracle CCB Experience in functional testing of different business processes in Oracle CCB Experience in writing designs in various functional areas ndash such as Billing Cancel rebill Credit and collections Rates Service Order Manager Strong analytical skills required.
Should be able to understand end-to-end billing-related process flows within CCB and to either solve directly or document and escalate any issues that are discovered.
Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
",['oracl'],"['supervis', 'busi']",999.0,"['oracl', 'supervis', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsible for designing and executing strategy to drive trading, research, and operational initiatives forward.
Summary
The successful candidate will be a self-starter who has demonstrated the ability to function independently in a fast-paced, dynamic, and demanding trading environment.
This person will be intellectually curious, intuitive, rigorous, trustworthy, and have the highest ethical standards.
In addition, (s)he will be effective addressing a number of internal and external audiences in a professional manner.
This person will add value by working on a number of simultaneous projects with minimal supervision and exemplary follow-through.
Mandatory:
Knowledge of financial products, trading and order management systems.
Some experience leading large scale projects or product deployments
Experience in working with development teams, ability to understand technical/development items.
Contribute to entire life-cycle of the project/product (analysis/design/testing/rollout/post-rollout)
Exposure to working with SQL, Unix/Linux, Python, R, Tableau etc.
Analytical mindset with an ability to analyse complex-problems and determine a direction forward
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Results oriented, self-starter and the ability to work with minimal supervision.
Ability to work with uncertainty, ask a lot of questions and clarify scope of projects
Desirable:
Server-side scripting experience on Linux using shell scripts, python, and SQL/KDB.
Understanding of financial markets and protocols.
Prior experience in C++, Java, Python development.
Education:
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or equivalent
","['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'java']","['supervis', 'research', 'commun']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'java', 'supervis', 'research', 'commun']"
BA,"by translating business needs into BI solutions.
This position will also involve identification/development of and execution of test plans to ensure that technical solutions meet the needs of the business.In addition to being experienced in gathering and documenting requirements, facilitating meetings, and delivering results, this person must also be a highly organized, self-starter who thrives in a fast-paced and rapidly changing environment.
Drug Free Employer.
",['bi'],['busi'],999.0,"['powerbi', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Technical Recruiter
Duration: 06+ Months
• This job performs analytical services to design or redesign multiple, integrated system workflow and process mapping to ensure that processes are customer focused, consistent, effective and efficient for multiple lines of insurance – Medicare Supplement, Medicare Advantage, Long-Term Care, Hospital Indemnity and Life.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
• Design, Build, Update and Deploy all Premium Rate Increase Control Reports for all Long-term care products
• Update and Maintain all end user computing tools that have been built to support the operational departments
• Performs and assists in the system configuration of premium rate increase implementation for Long-Term Care policyholders, such as:
o Product and rating system configuration (actuarial rate tables and rating directives)
o Testing of premium rate increase implementation
o Work with the information technology team to copy data from testing environment to production environments
o Implementation of premium rate action
• Assist with configuration and testing of premium rate increase notification letter from the creation of the template through printing instructions with vendor
• Ability and Flexibility to work overtime as required.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
QUALIFICATIONS
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
• Read / Write SQL statement / Sequel Server
• Read / Write VB for complex macro’s
• MS Access form builder and table structures
• Database structures and OLAP tools, including ETL
• Excellent oral, written and interpersonal communication skills
• Excellent attention for detail
• Strong problem solving skills
• Critical thinking and independent decision making using sound judgment
• Exceptional analytical skills
• Demonstrated ability to work well independently and in a team environment
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
• Minimum of bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology and /or business analytics
• 5 years related experience in an analytical technical position; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
• Superior knowledge of all Microsoft Office applications
• Long-Term Care or Insurance Industry experience preferred
• Six Sigma preferred
LANGUAGE SKILLS
• Need the ability to read and comprehend simple and complex instructions, correspondence, and memos.
• Candidate should have the ability to write correspondence / emails with minimal errors.
COMPETENCIES
• Promote an exceptional level of excellence and pride in Customer Service
• Integrity/Honesty
• Motivation
• Ability to multi-task and work in a fast paced environment
• Organizational/Planning/Organizing
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS
• Ability to add, subtract, multiply, and divide in all units of measure, using whole numbers, common fractions, and decimals
• Ability to compute rate, ratio, and percent and to draw and interpret bar graphs
• Financial aptitude in product pricing, accounting and banking methodologies
• Data science, algorithms, and probabilities
Required Skills
Required Experience
Chicago, IL,
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['probabl', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'graph', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'probabl', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'graph', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Hello,
Hope you are doing well!!
Please go through the job descriptions mentioned below and please share your updated resume/your consultant's updated resume with their contact details.
Role: Sr. Business Analyst
Duration: 12+ Months
USC/GC preferred
Mandatory:
CRM domain experience.
Retail Banking Domain.
Good writing skills.
Understanding of software development lifecycle.
Agile methodology.
Need senior candiadtes.
Requirements:
Extensive experience of CRM and banking domain.
Requirement gathering and Analysis.
Facilitating the review and approval of requirements from all stakeholders
Facilitating and participation in design discussion and workshops.
Writing user stories, conducting grooming sessions and story walkthroughs
Providing first sign-off on the development post Dev testing.
Giving demo to the PO and other stakeholders for final sign-off
Support UAT, SIT and Production.
Collaborating with partner system Client and other stakeholders- Stakeholder Management
Preparation of use case diagrams, UMLs, Sequence diagrams, Visio flows
Be the interface between the business, the customers, and their product related needs on one side, and the Team on the other
Impacts analysis of change requests on the existing business flows
Thanks
Vidushi
......................................................................................................................................
Vidushi@empowerprofessionals.com | Phone: 732-356-8008 x 342 | Fax: 732-356-8009
100 Franklin Square Drive – Suite 104 | Somerset, NJ 08873
www.empowerprofessionals.com
Certified NJ and NY Minority Business Enterprise (NMSDC)
",[None],"['sequenc', 'busi']",999.0,"['sequenc', 'busi']"
BA,"Role Specific Responsibilities· Provides functional feasibility assessment to the business partners related to emerging initiatives\.· Provides high\-level business process and technical overviews and insight where appropriate\.· Maintains continuity between business team and IS organization throughout complete system development life cycle\.· Serves as primary contact between technology and business end\-users in understanding the specific business requirements, critically and prioritization of business capability\.· Identifies, assesses, and documents business requirements, recommending business priorities and advising business on options, risks and costs versus benefits of various solutions\.· Conducts research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within or outside the business, and if not, whether new solutions are feasible\.· Helps analyze impact of proposed solution on existing technology platforms\.· Provides input to buy vs\.
build decision based on input received from the business and other functions within technology\.· Provides input to the development of formal business cases, when applicable\.· Develops use cases to explain / demonstrate business requirements / specifications to the technology team\.· Contributes a business or process perspective during design reviews\.· Actively participates in system test preparation and execution of user acceptance testing \(UAT\)\.· Helps create test cases\.· Assists testing team to ensure that requirements documentation can be easily translated into test plans, and ensures that the proper testing plans have been completed\.· Facilitates implementation of new functionality through training sessions, demos, and the development of appropriate documentation\.· Provides relevant test scenarios for the testing team; works with test team to develop system integration test scripts and ensures the testing results correspond to the business expectations\.· Provides input into project / resource estimating activities\.· Identifies and communicates risks to delivering solution on time\.
That's the power of true partnership\.
is acting as an Employment Agency in relation to this vacancy\.TEKsystems is a equal opportunity employer and will consider all applications without regard to race, genetic information, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, veteran status, disability or any other characteristic protected by law\.
",[None],"['risk', 'research', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'research', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job descriptionPosition Purpose: Perform and lead various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function and implement process improvements.
• Lead the support of business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
• Lead the identification and analysis of user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
• Resolve issues and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
• Evaluate risks and concerns and communicate to management
• Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
• Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
• Oversee all changes to departmental policies and procedures, including communicating and implementing the changes
• Serve as the subject matter expert on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance
• Ability to travel
Job Requirements:
Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
6+ years of business process or data analysis preferably in healthcare or 5+ years of HEDIS analysis.
Must Have great rounded knowledge Managed Care org and Clinical knowledge.
Medical management, UM, Authorization, Hospital experience.
This is not an IT or Data heavy role.
Need someone with expert clinical knowledge.
RN, Prior authorization, utilization management)
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Industry: Electric Utility
Duration: 6 months
• A minimum of 5 years' experience in business analysis or a related field.
• Strong quantitative background including forecasting, data cleansing, Dashboard creation execution methods.
• Ability to distill complex data into easy to understand analysis with actionable recommendations
• Customer driven with strong analytical, problem solving skills.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite and Expert user of Excel (VBA & Macros, Advanced Charting) and PowerPoint
• Proficient in basic product management concepts
• Experience with data visualization tools specifically Power BI
• Some travel likely to support sprint planning & review in-person as-necessary
Job Requirements:
Preferred:
• Experience with working in the Electric/Gas Utility industry.
• Experience with Agile Methodology
Education and Experience:
Bachelors Degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, Finance.
And 5 - 8 years related business experience.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'bi', 'powerpoint']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'powerpoint', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Provide end-user support and training, release/upgrade support and testing, sales support and new client onboarding.
Work with peers, clients and 3rd parties in resolving software problems.
Assist with IOT technology implementations at client site locations.
Support solution design sessions enhance business processes and operations.
Analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing systems and process.
Create process specifications to translate conceptual user requirements into functional requirements in a clear manner that is comprehensible to developers/project team.
Flexibility to work remotely.
Competency in the following core skills:
Experience working with clients and senior decision makers
Strong communication/interpersonal skills
Proven analytical background
Quality Assurance experience
Advanced Excel skills
Qualifications:
1 - 3 years as Business Analyst in IT, software, or related disciplines
Knowledge of SaaS cloud solutions, IOS/Android Apps, Databases
Demonstrated knowledge of mobile, IOT & cloud technologies
Outstanding Customer service attitude & communication skills
Previous Interns/Co-op experience a plus
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $35,000.00 - $45,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Flexible Schedule
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Multiple locations
","['excel', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Contract Web Business Analyst role for immediate need in Rosemont, IL
The ideal candidate is a strong communicator, has a collaborative work style, is continually looking for ways to do things better and with an eye toward what may come next, is self-motivated, detail-oriented, and results-driven.
Work with the Business to identify requirements and think critically about what will make it successful; write user stories that effectively communicate the Business’ requirements and that are easily consumed by software development teams.
Attend and lead Business stakeholder meetings; provide project status reporting to management; assist with testing scenarios and validate results.
Create deliverables such as process flows, wireframes, mockups and functional prototypes to effectively communicate design strategies and detailed interaction behaviors.
Become a Subject Matter Expert on a variety of packages and custom business applications including User Experience best practices.
Required Skills:
7+ years of prior experience as a Business Analyst or other IT role, such as support or development.
Strong User Experience background.
Comfortable with concepts such as user-centric design, personas, user research and common tools and methods.
Able to visualize and explain concepts on the fly using a whiteboard or the latest tools such as Mural as well as have stellar documentation skills with hands on experience with MS Visio for use case diagrams, cross-functional process flows, entity relationship diagrams, etc.
Excellent communicator
Skilled at defining and documenting business and functional requirements for ongoing system enhancement initiatives in agile software development environments.
Experience writing clear acceptance criteria to a testable level.
Experience setting up and leading in all Agile meetings including: sprint planning, sprint grooming, review, demo, stand-up, and retrospective sessions as well as working with development teams applying feature-driven development concepts.
Experience in all phases of product, software, and testing lifecycles.
Clear and concise verbal and written communication skills.
SQL Skills
Healthcare experience preferred
Experience using Azure DevOps – added plus
#IND123
","['azur', 'excel', 'sql']","['research', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['azur', 'excel', 'sql', 'research', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"IS Business Analyst This position requires you to be onsite every day this is not a remote position.
Plan and support broad assignments, with responsibility for recommending changes in analysis and budgetary methods and procedures.
You may also supervise and assist with the development of other financial and accounting personnel.
Responsibilities - Develop project scope, plan and schedule.
- Organize, implement and completely manage simple focused projects.
- Healthcare experience.
- Develop moderate to complex reports that meet user needs and requests.
- Developprogram moderate to complex applications.
- Independently design test plans and conduct testing for multiple applications ensuring system integration and integrity.
- Assist end users in solving moderate to complex system and application problems.
- Provide leadership to small core teams and other technology staff as assigned.
- Support initiative for Access to Care, Patient Engagement, Patient Self Scheduling, Telehealth, and Coordination of Care.
Qualifications - Some college education (Bachelorrsquos degree in IT desired).
- 2 years of relevant experience with Bachelor's Degree.
- 5 years of relevant experience without Bachelorsrsquo Degree.
Keywords Chicago IL Jobs, IS Business Analyst, Planning, Scheduling, Healthcare, Support, Budgetary Methods, Personnel Management, Chicago Recruiters, Information Technology Jobs, IT Jobs, Chicago Recruiting
",[None],"['end user', 'account', 'busi', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['end user', 'account', 'busi', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"SAP Business Analyst
Position Summary
I. ID
SAP Business Analyst
Business Intelligence
JOB TITLE
BUSINESS UNIT
Information Technology
DEPARTMENT
Chicago, IL
Manager of Telephony, Analytics and Reporting
HIRING MANAGER’S TITLE
II.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for working with internal and external clients in meeting reporting needs.
This role is responsible for the development, testing, and implementation of all tasks associated with the SAP Data Warehouse.
This includes coordinating programming changes internally, and externally with clients and programming vendors.
Responsibilities and essential duties that must be completed to meet the objectives of the position, including but not limited to:
Application Support
Manage documentation creation and updating of policies and procedures to ensure that all team members understand the correct process for completing their tasks.
· Works collaboratively with coworkers to ensure consistent and accurate usage of the SAP Data Warehouse/Collection system resulting in a more productive workforce.
· Manage time and production in order to effectively handle reporting needs.
· Ability to perform daily, weekly and monthly routine client processes and procedures providing excellent customer service and ensuring client issues are resolved in a timely manner.
· Manage client processes and procedures for maximum efficiency and optimal results including database operations, client operations, reporting, and quality control to ensure client satisfaction.
· Manage the quality control of operational programs, results, and reporting for all clients in order to eliminate problems, mishaps and increase client satisfaction.
Data Analysis
· Performs data analysis, design and testing on custom programming applications between SAP and collectionsystem, and vendor systems to ensure data integrity.
· Ability to create ad hoc reporting on demand and develop specifications to recurring reports for programming to help increase department productivity.
· Listens closely to the needs of other departments to ensure that reporting is accurate and pertinent.
· Ability to create and present data results to various internal departments and help these departments to interpret the data.
Technical Support
Responds to help requests directly through telephone or Help Desk system.
Walks in others’ shoes by offering suggestions and troubleshooting instructions appropriate to the employee’s level of technical knowledge to ensure that the employee understands and has the clarity they need to complete their job functions.
· Gathers requirements on issues reported for resolution on their own or forwards information to responsible functional group in order to help the Business Intelligence department productivity.
· Support the relationship between Operations and Business Intelligence to encourage a synergistic relationship.
· Demonstrates professionalism at all times by being respectful, helpful and customer focused.
· Works collaboratively with other Business Intelligence individuals as needed for programming initiatives, changes to routines, reporting, strategies, letters and other functions as related to the Business Intelligence Department.
III.
KEY REQUIREMENTS
3-5 Years SAP application development/programming experience
3-5 Years experience in creating SAP reports
Ability to work within the expected guidelines with limited supervision
· Strong communication skills (written and verbal)
· Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
· Demonstrated project management skills
· Experience with the CUBS system a plus
· Experience with SQL a plus
· Experience with Dashboards a plus
Special Position Requirements
· Excellent time management skills
· Excellent attention to detail
Willingness and ability to deliver superior customer service to all internal and external clients
· Willingness to work in a fast pace and ever changing work environment
IV.
ORGANIZATION STRUCTURE
· Other Positions reporting to same leader
· Positions reporting to this job
1.
Strategy& Inventory Analysts
1. n/a
2.
Dialer Administrator
2.
V. EMPLOYMENT APPLICATION
Please review this information below before beginning this application
I certify the answers given herein are true and complete to the best of my knowledge, and I authorize the investigation of all statements contained within this employment application that may be necessary in arriving at an employment decision.
is contingent upon my ability to satisfy the physical and mental requirements for the position offered, which may require me to submit to a drug/alcohol screening test and physical examination.
or me beyond those existing in an “at will” employment relationship unless provided otherwise by an applicable collective bargaining agreement.
at any time, with or without notice.
","['excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'supervis', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job Summary
Responsible for collecting and summarizing data that will assist Pharmacy and Retail Operations management in both long- and short-range strategic planning, and the development and implementation of programs.
Develop and maintain a thorough understanding of business processes pertaining to all aspects of Pharmacy and Retail Operations.
Analyzing data to develop cost benefits of proposed programs through collection and data.
Job Responsibilities
Responsible for collecting and summarizing data that will assist Pharmacy and Retail Operations management in both long- and short-range strategic planning, and the development and implementation of programs.
Develops and maintains a comprehensive understanding of business processes and practices pertaining to all aspects of Pharmacy and Retail Operations within the Retail Hub.
Analyzes corresponding data to effectively recommend system and operational procedure changes, enhancements, development of functional specifications or interface opportunities with costs and or return on investment summarized.
Serves as operation point of contact for various projects to drive project execution.
Communicates relevant project information to stakeholders, both corporately and in the field.
Plans, designs and deploys appropriate reports and tools.
Collaborates across Pharmacy and Retail Operations, IT, legal and regulatory, process improvement teams, and others, to develop operational solutions.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelors degree OR, High School Diploma/GED and 3 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions.
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Word (for example: inserting headers, page breaks, page numbers and tables and/or adjusting table columns).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft Excel (for example: using SUM function, setting borders, setting column width, inserting charts, using text wrap, sorting, setting headers and footers and/or print scaling).
Intermediate level skill in Microsoft PowerPoint (for example: applying a theme, formatting character spacing, inserting a picture, changing slide layout and theme colors, adding transitions, customizing slide numbers, changing chart style and/or formatting font).
Willing to travel up to 10% of the time for business purposes (within state and out of state).
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelors degree and at least 2 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions; OR, High School Diploma/GED and 5 years of experience with analyzing and reporting data in order to identify issues, trends, or exceptions to drive improvement of results and find solutions.
Masters degree or MBA.
Bachelors degree.
Retail Pharmacy Experience.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Type: Contract
Supplier call Notes 3/18:
CBAP Certification - Required
Looking for a Sr level Business Analyst
Work on large projects from start to finish creating documents and templates
Manager looking to hire someone ASAP
One year contract for the International Institute of Business.
THIS IS A ""NON-TECHNICAL "" but FUNCTIONAL Analyst position!
Preferred Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree minimum in business; information technology or related field.
Master's degree.
CBAP certification.
Previous experiences in higher education.
Experience
Previous experience in successfully setting up a business analyst center of excellence organization.
Developed maturity models of BA practices and identified future maturity state and implemented activities to reach maturity state
Developed a series of best practices and processes for a Business Analyst team to include business analysis; requirements gathering and analysis; requirement governance and success determination
Developed KPI and metrics measuring the effectivities of business analyst organization in meeting business needs
Created artifact templates such as Business Requirement Document (BRD); Change Management; Functional Requirements Document; Use Case and Process mapping; Test plans; Business Case and Data Mappings.
Functioned as the primary BA on multiple high profile and complex projects.
Minimum eight years of business analyst experience.
Ability to shift from a highly detailed; analytical focus to broader big picture view.
Experience working with a wide range of different business units across an organization.
Provide recommendations for business process improvements to senior level business stakeholders.
Knowledge and skills developed through eight years of experience with the full System Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Ability to collaborate within a project team as well as acting as an independent contributor.
Proven ability to be flexible and adapt to changing business needs and direction.
Minimum five years of experience with the development of testing and training materials.
Excellent communications skills both verbally and writing.
Professional work knowledge of Microsoft Office, Visio and MS Project.
TOP 3 SKILLS
Previous experience in successfully setting up a business analyst center of excellence organization.
Developed maturity models of BA practices and identified future maturity state and implemented activities to reach maturity state
Developed a series of best practices and processes for a Business Analyst team to include business analysis; requirements gathering and analysis; requirement governance and success determination
Unit-specific Responsibilities
Assist in enhancing the Business Analyst Organization through the implementation of standard BA process and best practices
Create and update BA artifact templates
Plan and facilitate workshops/interviews to identify, analyze, and document business requirements and translate them into business plans/solutions.
Work with stakeholders to understand their business objectives and needs.
Conduct ongoing reviews of business processes and develop current state documentation.
Liaison between business stakeholders and technology teams.
Manage Test Plans/ Test Cases/ Defect Management and Remediation plans.
Track project functional tasks throughout their respective lifecycles.
Maintain Business Process documentation.
Uncover areas for improvement or process simplification.
Ensure solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Perform end user training of new system functionality including development of training materials.
Act as a liason and collaborate with variety of application development teams.
Make data driven decisions.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree minimum in business; information technology or related field.
Master's degree.
CBAP certification.
Previous experiences in higher education.
Experience (TOP 3 Skills highlighted)
Previous experience in successfully setting up a business analyst center of excellence organization.
Developed maturity models of BA practices and identified future maturity state and implemented activities to reach maturity state
Developed a series of best practices and processes for a Business Analyst team to include business analysis; requirements gathering and analysis; requirement governance and success determination
Developed KPI and metrics measuring the effectivities of business analyst organization in meeting business needs
Created artifact templates such as Business Requirement Document (BRD); Change Management; Functional Requirements Document; Use Case and Process mapping; Test plans; Business Case and Data Mappings.
Functioned as the primary BA on multiple high profile and complex projects.
Minimum eight years of business analyst experience.
Ability to shift from a highly detailed; analytical focus to broader big picture view.
Experience working with a wide range of different business units across an organization.
Provide recommendations for business process improvements to senior level business stakeholders.
Knowledge and skills developed through eight years of experience with the full System Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Ability to collaborate within a project team as well as acting as an independent contributor.
Proven ability to be flexible and adapt to changing business needs and direction.
Minimum five years of experience with the development of testing and training materials.
Excellent communications skills both verbally and writing.
Professional work knowledge of Microsoft Office, Visio and MS Project.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Purpose
It’s borne of sweat and toil and dealing with complexity and scale problems that few companies are privileged enough to enjoy.
The Sr. Engineering Business Analyst may be involved in multiple technology projects at a time and will need excellent technical and organizational skills to ensure projects are being completed on time and at the highest of quality.
The Sr. Engineering Business Analyst must have a blend of business and technical acumen as they must understand the business cases and requirements and then help to analyze and solicit requirements.
Using the requirements, the Sr. Engineering Business Analyst must make technical documentation and write stories for the engineering team to use.
Throughout the lifecycle of a project, the Sr. Engineering Business Analyst may develop data models and process flows, facilitate implementation through training, update cost estimates and timelines, and assist with testing and change management.
The Sr. Engineering Business Analyst will be liaising with multiple stakeholders during a project – mainly engineering, but also portfolio management, quality, finance, product, and operations.
They serve as the technical glue holding project or product work together.
They will be expected to share their skills and assist more junior business analysts on their projects as needed.
The Sr. Engineering Business Analyst will have strong technical and analytical skills as well as strong interpersonal and effective communication skills.
They will have strong curiosity and an ability to drive insights from data – synthesizing not only what is happening by why it is happening.
The Sr. Engineering Business Analyst be a team player with the ability to work across and with many team members in various functions and levels.
They should have prior experience as an Engineering Business Analyst and be ready to take the next step in their career as a leader.
Responsibilities:
User Stories – Writes stories and ensures integrity of stories across projects.
Writes and validates acceptance criteria within area of expertise.
Grooms and maintains user stories.
May define, perform and document functional configurations
Develops and maintains a deep understanding of business processes and operations.
Possesses a strong contextual understanding of how several key areas of the business operate (i.e.
Supply Chain, Marketing, Finance, MSM, etc.)
As required, facilitates requirements gathering sessions to aid business partners in properly exposing and articulating their needs.
Completes impact analysis for complex projects and products
Enables effective decision making by retrieving and aggregating data from multiple sources and compiling it into a digestible and actionable format; Has an opinion on the correct decisions and is able to influence the engineering team
Creates artifacts, reports, and data driven recommendations that are easily digestible by business and technology partners.
Prepares and delivers business requirements reviews to the senior management team regarding progress and roadblocks.
Helps lead strategic and tactical planning discussions.
Designs, develops and maintains scaled, automated, user-friendly systems, reports, dashboards, etc.
Mentors other Engineering Business Analysts
Qualifications:
BA/BS in Business, Computer Science, Finance or related field preferred
7-10+ years of relevant work experience in a role requiring application of analytical skills in a business analyst, data analyst or statistical analyst role
Deep technical expertise in IT systems, workflows, and data structures
Strong analytical skills and ability to synthesize multiple types and sources of information into action.
Strong verbal, written communication and data presentation skills – including an ability to work with senior business and technical stakeholders
Stakeholder management skills and the ability to push back respectfully to get projects completed
Self-starter – show ability to deliver on ambiguous projects with incomplete data
Previous experience managing large bodies of work in a complex enterprise environment preferred
Ability to grasp technical concepts quickly
Excellent communication and conflict resolution skills.
Experience operating in an agile context
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, or protected veteran status.”
",['excel'],"['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Key responsibilities may include:
Identifying business/functional requirements by working with key client personnel or end-users
Evaluating software applications/IT environments, analyzing gaps between current/desired states
Designing and executing use & test cases for custom application development projects
Discovering and documenting business and IT processes, workflows and requirements
Assisting the sales/ client-facing teams with activities for on-boarding clients
Preferred Skills
Strong knowledge in the area of requirements definition and software development lifecycle methodology
Significant experience with Word, Excel, MS Project, PowerPoint and Visio
Basic project management experience
Strong writing, problem solving, communication and client-facing skills
Able to utilize a business analysis strategic roadmap and project archetypes for guiding the organization towards increased business agility and reduced IT rework.
Proven techniques for defining and/or improving requirements
With proven techniques for collaborating to define requirements and specifications with Business Architects and IT professionals
Powered by JazzHR
FjXz8mro3p
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Mandatory Skills The position requires an experienced Business Analyst in the Pharma manufacturing Domain.
Experience multiple manufacturing domains like manufacturing, asset management, historian, serialization, scheduling, order management etc., Understanding of various key integration touch points between multiple manufacturing plant applications and enterprise applications Experience in creating various artefacts like Requirements document, process flows, URS, functional specifications, test plans etc., Experience conducting requirement gathering workshops, interviews etc., Understanding of data models across manufacturing functions such as operations, maintenance, process data etc.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Positions can be remote for deserving candidates.
Skills Needed - Understanding of Financial products e.g.
Banking products, investment products, brokerages etc.
- Knowledge on FDX DDA API.
Understanding of API data models as exposed by FI's and to create data mappings to the FDX standard.
- Understanding of oAuth 2.0, OIDC frameworks - Ability to write test plans for end to end integration - Good presentation and communication skills If interested rush your resume with full contact details
",[None],"['commun', 'data']",999.0,"['commun', 'data']"
BA,"Fixed Income Lead QA Business Analyst
It defines the fixed income capability roadmap, works with Data Operations and Data Technology organizations in sourcing and integrating value-added data, and coordinates across product squads to build new and enhance fixed income functionality.
The Role: The Fixed Income team seeks an enthusiastic, results-driven senior business analyst with knowledge of and experience with fixed income securities and financial concepts.
This critical role will have the opportunity to shape and design quality processes and systems within a growing and visible business line.
The Lead QA Business Analyst works with data analysts, data developers, quantitative developers and project managers to ensure distribution of accurate, reliable, and timely data to clients.
This individual will validate changes to the fixed income calculation library, assure the quality of data and analytics produced in production processes and delivered through front-end software and assist with model validation.
You will monitor processing activities of the fixed income production data set and respond to all problems that may occur.
Responsibilities:
Guides software quality assurance practice, principles, and internal QA processes
Continuously provides feedback for process improvements with testing activities
Mentors junior members of the team
Promotes QA best practice by developing quality assurance methodologies and tools
Write effective test cases based on requirements documents, specifications and client use cases
Analysis of automated test results and failure
Perform exploratory testing to catch defects missed by test cases and automation
Report defects into issue tracking system, maintain defect tracking lists
Validate bug fixes and system builds, and write up testing summaries
Keep Project Managers informed regarding testing status and issues found
Perform post-deployment testing and effectively communicate with deployment team
Environment management.
Creation, upgrade and maintenance of test environments, creation and maintenance of test cases and expected results
Requirements:
A bachelor’s degree, with an exceptional academic record in economics, mathematics, finance, computer science, or a related field
Knowledge of software testing methodologies and the Software Development Lifecycle
Excellent analytic, writing and communication skills and a strong attention to detail
Proven ability to manage and organize multiple projects in a flexible and fast-paced environment
Self-motivated and the ability to work effectively with limited guidance when necessary
Experience with project management and issue tracking systems, such as JIRA
Experience working with relational databases (Microsoft SQL server, RedShift)
Experience with the Microsoft Office suite of software, including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Outlook
","['redshift', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira']","['data', 'financ', 'econom', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['redshift', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title Sr. Business Analyst
Duration 3 months
Number of positions 1
Please Note: Look for Business Analyst with Project Management, Technical Writing, Experience with BRD's
Role is Remote/Virtual
Responsible for consulting with the business and IT in solving complex business problems through implementation of new processes or technology solutions.
Manage multiple, concurrent initiatives or projects through the early stages of definition and justification.
Manage initiatives entering pre-feasibility and feasibility analysis in determining priority for funding and scheduling.
Facilitate requirements gathering sessions to elicit business and functional requirements on complex initiatives across multiple business owners.
Facilitate discussions to bring consensus and agreement on requirements across a diverse group of business and IT representatives.
Leverage an IT development background to identify technical solutions for complex problems.
Continue to support the project through implementation to ensure business benefits are achieved and ensure the business adopts the process and technology changes.
Project Management, Technical Writing, Experience with BRD's, good communication skills.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
Full-time/Direct Hire
Chicago, IL 60601
Technical Business Analyst with experience working on software development projects in an Agile/Scrum environment.
Experience acting as a liaison between clients and the internal development team.
All clients have financial application needs so experience in the finance and banking industry is needed for this role.
Act as the liaison between customers and IT teams for various business initiatives
Analyze customer's current environment and recommend technologies and technical solutions
Responsible for creating business requirements and test cases that can be easily translated and used by the involved IT/Technical teams.
",[None],"['financ', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['financ', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst II
Duration: 6 Months
Type: Contract to Hire
This person would aim to grow more into a data analyst and be interested in data science.
Job Summary:
Business Analysts support the operations they are aligned with by providing reporting, interpretation and data-based recommendations to business leaders.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
· Working directly with business stakeholders, designs a limited variety of moderately complex reports using data from one or multiple systems to specifications.
Delivers report in format to aid business stakeholder interpretation (pivot tables, graphs, etc)
· Reviews existing reports for data accuracy.
Proposes resolutions for quality issues of limited scope to more senior level analysts / supervisor and escalates complex quality issues to supervisor or senior staff for resolution.
· Uses data methodologies and business acumen to generate recommendations to moderately complex problems to review with supervisor / senior analyst.
· Identified Experience (years): 2-5 years
Key Skills and Competencies:
· Can synthesize complex data into themes, stories and recommendations
· Intermediate systems knowledge in assigned functional area
· Microsoft Excel – intermediate skills
· Can present data in a visually compelling format to help business stakeholders understand the issues, possibilities and recommendations
· Microsoft PowerPoint - intermediate
· Presentation skills – intermediate skills required.
Some
formal training in public speaking / presentation skills
preferred
Travel Requirements: ?10%
Thank you,
Sachin Patil,
510-402-1063
sachin@apninc.com
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst needs to focus on the business side vs. technical side
Having technical experience is great, but real distinction is if they have experience in different areas of the business and not all technical for example operation ,understanding of accounting, function supply chain, front line sales vital in role
Business Acumen - willingness to learn how business works and interest in that area.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Are you ready to make a difference?
That means working closely with educators, sharing experience, and traveling into unchartered territories together.
The primary focus to provide high-level support and maintenance of applications as well as deliver the highest quality software implementation for enhancement/projects while working with cross functional Delivery teams, product owners and IT resources.
Work with both waterfall and agile methodologies.
The Business Analyst II position is part of a larger Delivery Team.
Summary of Essential Job Functions:
Work as part of a Delivery team, building trust with the business to achieve organizational, internal and external customer goals.
Mentor junior staff on agile methodologies, delivery techniques, and process improvement opportunities.
When needed play multiple roles on delivery team for a project such as Scrum Master or QA.
Facilitate requirements elicitation sessions and walkthroughs with business stakeholders and Program Management teams.
Monitor ticket queue following the intake’ process with regards to KPI standards, priority, escalation, triage and resolution.
Support the weekly on call standard process and affective monitoring.
Be available support and follow the standard process/escalation process.
Work closely with team members during the development process to continually test changes to ensure necessary requirements are being met.
Document technical and business processes for support team members.
Always being mindful of opportunities to improve processes.
Work closely with the enterprise architect, developer, Program Management team to ensure alignment of plans with what is being delivered.
Become a thought leader in current business processes and software to be a valued team member and provide insight on possible improvements.
Minimum Experience
Bachelor’s degree / equivalent work experience
5 years of progressive analyst and support experience in a varied background of enterprise systems such as ERP, e-commerce, WMS, SalesForce, or custom software.
2 years experience working in a delivery team environment that includes support/maintenance, enhancement and/or project activities.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification.
They are not to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.
All personnel may be required to perform duties outside of their normal responsibilities from time to time, as needed.
All applicants are subject to a drug screen and background check as a condition of employment.
EEO/AA including Vets and Disabled
","['erp', 'salesforc']","['classif', 'busi', 'normal', 'kpi']",1.0,"['erp', 'salesforc', 'classif', 'busi', 'normal', 'kpi']"
BA,"Required Job Qualifications:
Bachelor Degree and 3 years’ experience in business analysis, process improvement, strategic planning, research, project management, product administration, product operations or relevant health care industry experience -- OR -- 7 years’ experience in business analysis, process improvement, strategic planning, research, project management, product administration, product operations or relevant health care industry experience
Project management skills, including strong organization, prioritization and problem solving skills; strong oral, verbal and interpersonal communication skills; ability to accept direction and feedback
Experience interacting with personnel of multiple departments and at various levels in the organization
Knowledge of strategic planning techniques and industry trends
Analytical and information synthesis skills
Experience interpreting business and financial information
Verbal and written communication and organization skills
Experience with changing assignments and priorities
PC proficiency to include MS Office products
These relationships are based on mutual interest, and create added value for all parties involved.
",['ms office'],"['problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
Lead and support the development and coordination of the CRSO Channel's business planning activities along with execution and tracking of strategic plans.
Lead product, market, financial and customer analysis of Channel product and business opportunities.
Responsibilities
Coordinate with CRSO, System and District groups on development of CRSO Channel strategic plans
Develop metrics to track performance to plans
Lead or contribute to the development of yearly and multi-year forecasts
Be a senior business analyst for CRSO related channel, channel products or access to the channel products
May manage small to medium sized projects to bring product or component enhancements to the electronic access channels
Perform analyses and projections of financial, performance, operational and statistical data
Identify customer and product research goals, conduct analysis, summarize results, present findings and make recommendations on findings
Prepare channel communications for customers or customer-facing groups and prepare written memos and reports on special projects; and provide editorial consultations
Review system capabilities, workflow, and scheduling limitations to determine if requested program or program change is possible within existing system
Organize information within CRSO's systems of record: SharePoint, JIRA, Confluence, FedPPM
",['jira'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['jira', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Summary:
The Sr. Business Analyst will be responsible for gathering, analyzing and documenting business requirements and translating the requirements to the technical team.
S/he will also be working with vendors, risk provider groups to integrate between systems through consistent, secure data exchange.
S/he will be responsible for retrieving and analyzing data to assist end users with their business decisions.
The requirements gathered are reviewed with internal IT team and provided to the development team.
S/he will be responsible for development of business test cases and ensuring quality output is delivered.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Working closely with all levels of end users, including executive level staff, to quickly understand new requirements or problems, and then suggest a possible solution.
Understand their reporting requirements and put together requirements and support solutioning discussions for the requirements.
Working with vendors, risk provider groups to discuss integration needs and ensuring ultimate business goals are achieved through right data solutions.
Gathering and performing thorough analyses of all the information available.
Enhancing business processes when applicable.
Creating and documenting the business requirements.
Communicating with the development team to schedule development of system configuration or modifications and/or new modules.
Developing test cases and perform testing to ensure requirements are met for data extracts.
Demonstrate leadership by coordinating the requirements, specifications, and user acceptance testing efforts.
Qualifications:
Experience working in Medicare with CMS file standards
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Must be high energy, creative, results-driven and self-motivated.
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree required.
BA/BS in Information Technology, or related discipline preferred.
5+ years of experience working as Business Analyst or similar positions.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $85,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Fully Remote
www.myzinghealth.com
www.facebook.com/myzinghealth
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Hi,
Please send me candidates that are available to work on site in Chicago.
Candidates should have a LinkedIn profile as well that matches their resume.
An employment and education check will be done if an offer is made.
I appreciate your help.
Required Skills/# of Years: 5 or more years in the following:
Business Analysis experience with:
SDLC process
Scope
Gathering Requirements
Writing Test Scripts
Writing Test Plans
Some PM experience understanding would be helpful in case a PM is not assigned to the project to understand project risks and issues and let the team know.
Ensure that business is completing the UAT process
Business side experience with:
OTC Derivatives experience - CDS/CDX Swaps, Total Return Swaps, FX options, Interest Rate Swaptions, Equity Swaps, and Collateral Management.
Back Office experience
Trade capture - Pricing and Settling - automating trade capture
Understanding the trading lifecycle - New trades, amends, terminations, cash flow, and coupon payments
Understanding of Summit, Calypso, and/or Murex
Understanding of XML to map to downstream to AIP and Fundmaster - Pricing, Confirmation, and Settlement
only GC/UGC candidates are required.
Duties
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Analyze complex problems, derive options and solutions and present in an understandable manner to stakeholders, developers, testers and users at multiple levels.
Act as a liaison with technology and business unit subject matter experts in support of Transactions Monitoring project.
Solicit information from business and IT SMEs about application functions, data and process flows.
Document application functions, data and process flows using prescribed template, or appropriate fit-for-purpose format
Participate in integration design process and provide detailed documentation and requirements as appropriate.
Document reports required by system stakeholders.
Oversees the acquisition, analysis, strategy and dissemination of subject matter knowledge.
Conducts high level business analysis involving complex business requirements and processes.
Minimum Requirements
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.We believe that great outcomes are everything.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.Key Responsibilities:* Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
* Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
* Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
* Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Intermediate - Finance & Accounts Payable
Full-Time - Days
The Information Systems (CBIS) Department seeks an experienced Business Systems Analyst, Intermediate to formulate and define systems scope and objectives.
Job Summary
Develops or modifies moderately complex information systems.
Analyze business and user needs, documenting requirements, and revising existing system logic difficulties as necessary
Guide and advise less experienced Business System Analysts
Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities
Analyze business and user needs
Formulates and defines systems scope and objectives
Document Requirements
Revising existing (problematic) system logic
Mentors less experienced Business System Analysts
Under general supervision, must be able to prioritize, organize, and assess work in order to meet deadlines
Able to correlate business, management and information technology functions
You'll thrive in this position if you:
Deliver Results – you identify issues, problems and opportunities; proactively recognize the need for improvement.
You generate alternatives - Create relevant options, including financial and resource implications, for addressing problems and opportunities.
You select appropriate action - Formulate clear decision criteria; evaluates options by considering implications and consequences; chooses an effective option.
You honor the need in others to ask questions; helps others overcome resistance.
You alert the right person when expectations or standards are not met or when UCMC’s values are at risk.
You ensure proper resolution is achieved and an explanation is received; escalates appropriately if needed.
You convey messages logically, simply, and with confidence.
You check for understanding by asking questions, seeking clarity and responding accordingly
Qualifications
Associate or Bachelor’s degree or equivalent relevant certification in healthcare, business management, or information systems is required
Ability and commitment to meet aggressive deadlines and to cope in a fast paced environment
Beginning skills in documenting and analyzing business processes
Excellent interpersonal, written and oral communication skills and effective presentation skills
Experience developing presentations for project work
Ability to plan and facilitate meetings with diverse participants
Ability to maintain a professional attitude and demeanor in both normal and pressure situations
Proven skills in problem solving
Bring your passion.
________
",['excel'],"['risk', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The role is fully remote at this time but will transition to an on-site role in the future.
The BA will work closely with the Software Engineering team to deliver best in class solutions to their clients in the mortgage industry.
The role ensures projects move forward efficiently while keeping focus on the goals and the business value of the solution.
RESPONSIBILITIES The individual will be involved in the following critical activities Gather input from subject matter experts, users and stakeholders to document business needs and constraints that are easily understood, thorough, and accurate.
Define and analyze solution options that balance business value, usability and technical feasibility.
Create project plans that set milestones, identify dependencies, and communicate progress.
Organize and facilitate meetings to share timelines and address open questions.
Coordinate internal resources and third partiesvendors through implementation and rollout.
Build trusted relationships with end-users by providing system support and incorporating feedback.
Provides a user-focused approach to all ideas and decisions.
Advocates for the user community through understanding of their roles, responsibilities and processes.
GENERAL EDUCATION, SKILLS OR EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS .The ideal experience and critical competencies for the role include the following Bachelorrsquos degree and at least 1 year of experience as a business analyst, preferably with custom system development andor vendor software implementations.
Experience working in collaborative environments and with Agile methodologies.
Experience making complex concepts and business problems lsquosimplersquo.
Powerful analytical skillset with the ability to motivate others to share your vision and enthusiasm.
Adaptable, dependable, and dedicated to your products and team.
Familiarity with application architecture, web applications, databases and other relevant technologies.
Self-starter that likes to get their hands-on and tinker with data and reporting tools.
Excellent writing and listening skills with a proven ability to disseminate information effectively and articulate your thoughts in a clear and concise manner.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"OverviewCIBC is a leading North American financial institution with 10 million personal banking, business, public sector and institutional clients.
CIBC offers a full range of advice, solutions and services in the United States, across Canada and around the world.
This individual will have responsibility for creating business requirement documents, process maps and analyzing project needs.
The Business Analyst will work collaboratively with the bank project managers and stakeholders.
The individual will also have responsibility for developing test scripts, coordinating, and tracking testing.
The individual will need to be highly detail oriented and have strong organizational skills.
The Business Analyst will often support more than one project at a time.Qualifications* Positive attitude and proactive approach* Elicit and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, surveys, business process descriptions, business analysis* Build process maps based on information captured in surveys and interviews* Pro-actively communicate and collaborate with internal stakeholders to analyze information needs and requirements* Deliver functional requirements and business requirements documentation* Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously* Work independently with users to define concepts, under the direction of project managers* Be the liaison between business units, technology teams, and support teams* Lead testing efforts to ensure issues are identified, tracked, reported, and resolved in a timely manner* 7-10 years of Business Analyst experience, in support of the financial services industry* Proficient in Microsoft Office including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio* Microsoft Project and SharePoint experience preferred* Individual must have strong written and oral communication skills* College Degree required
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The ideal candidate must possess excellent background on extracting, transforming and loading data into the warehouse.
The candidate must possess excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability and collaborate effectively with domain and technical experts in the team.
Responsibilities As a Senior Business Analyst, you will work on the following requirements 1.
General requirements a.
REST, JSON, XML) f. Knowledge of data warehouse concepts, data model, knowledge of SQL(Structured Query Language) and ability to query databases, source to target mapping g. Technical experience with systems networking, databases, Web development, Mobile App development, and user support 2.
Domain a.
Knowledge in Blue CrossBlue Brand plans preferred 3.
Core BA TechniquesArtifacts a.
Requirement discovery workshops, JAD sessions, and stakeholder interviews, Job shadowing, Prototyping etc b.
User stories, process flows, Use cases, context diagrams and other requirement artifacts c. BRDSRSFRS , RTM d. Process modeling (UML BPMN), strategy analysis, Non functional requirements, transition requirements e. Change management, CR, impact analysis f. UAT, Test plan, Test data, business testing 4.
Underlaying competencies Soft skills a. ability to see the bigger picture but also work through the details, able to multi-task b.
Excellent communication skills , interpersonal and stakeholder management skills, self-driven attitude is a must c. Experience willingness to work under high pressure, short deadline, multi-vendor engagements d. Excellent stakeholder identification and management skills 5.
Tools a.
Strong in MS Office and diagraming tools like MS Visio b. ClearQuestJira as a repository for application code and ticket information c. ServiceNow to log tickets for each enhancement and defectbug fix d. SharePoint to upload documents related to the project and submit requests e. Toad and IBM DataStudio for DB2 database query operations f. HP-ALM, Rally (for Agile Mgmt.)
g. Ab Initio software such as Co-Op, MDH, EME, QueryIT, ExpressIT, Control-Center, Ab Initio Test Framework Required Soft Skills a.
Good analytical and problem-solving skills b.
Exceptional communication skills (written and verbal) c. Good documentation skills d. Proficiency in English language (as a medium of communication) e. Frank and open communication with peers and higher-ups about realistic estimations and meeting timelinesexpectations and proactive communication of issues and concerns thereof f. Assertiveness in communicating ideas, estimates, scope and timelines Nice to have a.
Experience working with PHI PII and sensitive data b.
Reply to projectsupstreamgs.com www.upstreamgs.com
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"As they continue to expand their national footprint with offices in multiple states, they seek a Senior Wealth Advisor.
$3.9 Billion in assets under management
Seven offices in established markets: Chicago, Houston, Dallas, Atlanta, Austin, Philadelphia Area, Knoxville, and San Francisco Bay Area
70 staff members and growing
Named 14th on Forbes 2019 top 100 Registered Investment Advisor List
Named to Barron's Top 100 Independent Advisor List (2018,2019)
Named to Financial Times Top Advisers List (2016, 2017,2018,2019)
In this role you will be responsible for mapping and migrating legacy data from external CRMs to Salesforce.
Migrate CRM data from acquired RIA firms to Salesforce
Create and update internal workflows, business processes, and process builders
Manage data feeds from various platforms including Orion Advisor & MoneyGuidePro
Maintain Salesforce data integrity
Integrate and maintain 3rd party applications installed via Salesforce’s AppExchange
Create dashboards and reports for end users
Provide solutions related to sales, client service and internal processes/administration/accounting
Create and maintain fields, validation rules, record types, assignment rules, custom objects, page layouts, sharing rules, etc.
POSITION REPORTING
CANDIDATE REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree: Business Admin, Information Systems, Management, Computer Science
Salesforce Administrator Certification
3+ years of experience in supporting/deploying Salesforce.com
In-depth knowledge of Salesforce.com features and capabilities
Experience migrating CRM from other CRMs (Junxure, Tamarac, Redtail, etc.)
to Salesforce
Self-motivated with ability to work independently
CANDIDATE PREFERENCES
Salesforce Advanced Administrator
Salesforce Sales Consultant Certification
Salesforce Platform App Builder Certification
Salesforce Pardot Specialist Certification
",['salesforc'],"['bay', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'bay', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Client: HCSC
Duration: through end of year, with possible extension
Rate: $40-$50
Work Authorization: USC or GC EAD
NO layers â SSN last 5 digits
This position is responsible for developing requirements related to data and reporting.
Participates in strategy discussions and other business unit (BU) discussions to understand and capture high level business requirements and technical requirements.
Responsible for the development of user stories and user acceptance criteria for epics/features to drive planning.
Validates business and technical requirements are met during the project delivery process.
Requirements:
Bachelorâs Degree in computer science, data information systems, health information management field OR 4 years of experience in data analysis, reporting and/or product management
Experience with Agile Management and product lifecycle
4 years of experience in data analysis and/or preparing database reports
2 years of experience gathering requirements and writing user stories/acceptance criteria
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to project manage and work with cross-functional teams
Analytical skills, Organizational and Planning skills
Verbal and written communications skills to interact with internal customers, leadership and vendors
Experience analyzing and preparing recommendations on process improvement
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
0pNkwKnxSV
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Functional Analysts combine in-depth product expertise with the latest tax and regulatory changes to produce system impact specifications and test strategies for Development & QA.
The position will follow each tax and regulatory change from discovery through successful translation into an application update.
* Knowledge of Payroll from a business perspective and as an end to end process.
* Provide in-depth functional knowledge of SAP applications across multiple releases.
* Design and development of business requirements, functional specifications, configuration requirements, test plans.
* Work closely with the development team to ensure adherence to the functional design and that all business requirements are being satisfied* Formulate test strategies, review test plans, and perform system tests working with the QA team to ensure high quality deliverables* Assist the Development and QA Management Team with planning activities related to product specific Tax & Regulatory updates (i.e., bundle scheduling, project planning and tracking, etc.
)* Organization and communication of such information, clearly disclosing the details needed for product specialists and subscribing clients including release documentation, installation instructions, and client manual configuration instructions to make necessary system changes.
* Ability to explain payroll processes and calculations independent of ERP system* Experience in the support of global SAP operations.
* Strong analytical and product management skills* Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously* Must be strong self-starter and with a committed work environment with stable internet service* Strong professional written and verbal communication skills and the ability to work well with other groups within the delivery organization.
According to Gartner, the third-party support market will grow to $1.05 billion by 2023, a 200% increase.
With tight IT budgets and flat global economic growth, IT and procurement professionals are actively looking for proven methods to cut costs while improving service.
Unsolicited resumes will be ineligible for referral fees.
","['erp', 'erp system']","['commun', 'busi', 'econom']",999.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'commun', 'busi', 'econom']"
BA,"Business Analyst - IIBCforward is currently seeking highly motivated Business Analyst - II for an opportunity in Chicago, IL 60654
Summary
Job title: Business Analyst - II
Expected Duration: 6 months
Hours: 6am to 3pm ideally but looking for someone who can be flexible and come in early or leave later.
Available to work weekends as needed.
Performance Objectives:
Proven results with implementing standard procurement best practices, building strong relationships with internal customers and suppliers, and consulting on procurement best practices for cross-functional project teams.
Understanding of process and cost modeling involved in technology sourcing
Knowledge of key business operations and ability to find efficiency gains and cost advantages through next generation technology
Collect information and analyze supplier market data, including industry structure and demographics, supplier performances, cost dynamics, etc.
Maintaining supplier databases around manufacturing forecasts and measurement of key performance indicators, Service Level agreements and other metrics
Understanding of business contract law, and experience with negotiating contracts (i.e.
Master Agreements & Statement of Works) for the procurement of hardware commodities and components.
Implement proactive procurement philosophies, strategies, policies, procedures, and systems where necessary.
Influence cross-functional organizations while enhancing strong internal relationships in order to meet business requirements and cost objectives.
Position Requirements:
BS degree in Supply Chain Management, or Engineering, plus 2-3 years experience or equivalent.
A technical education, or technical knowledge in network, data-center, telecom commodities
Strong attention to detail.
Strong presentation skills with the ability to analyze and explain pricing models and contract terms.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and strong interpersonal skills.
Excellent relationship management skills, as well as the ability to work collaboratively with suppliers, internal business customers and senior management.
Proficiency in Google / Microsoft Office applications (i.e.
Docs/Word, PowerPoint and Excel)
Proficiency in Lucid Charts and Tableau
Work well under pressure, ability to multitask and skilled time manager that is comfortable working under minimal supervision
www.BCforward.com
www.facebook.com/bcforward
This posting is not an offer of employment.
All applicants must be authorized to work in the United States and willing to cooperate with a background check and drug screen, to the extent permitted by federal and local laws up to and including both criminal and financial reviews.
The submission of intentionally false or fraudulent information in response to this job posting shall render the applicant ineligible for the position.
Any subsequent offer of employment shall be considered employment at will regardless of the anticipated assignment duration.
Interested candidates please send resume in Word format Please reference job code 107892 when responding to this ad.
Job Requirements:
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint']","['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Join a team that combines state of the art technology with sustainable growth and a proven track record of performance while offering a strong culture of work, life balance.
Are you an SAP-WM/LE Consultant searching for a home?
Outstanding opportunity to work along the side of one the most exciting technology introduction supporting Automotive Aftermarket in NA.
Introduction of several SAP system has a big influence on the organization.
This position work closely with process experts from IT and business to highlight changes needed in the organization to support future processes.
Engaging all aspect of the business to embrace change is the focus of this position.
Progress tracking and Key Performance Indicators (KPI) development for the purpose of management and stake holder reporting.
Excellent opportunity to learn how business works and learn from Organization Change Management industry leaders to support IT project.
Provide expert level of business process guidance on SAP requirements and design, specifically in the area of Warehouse Management (Inventory Management, Storage Bin management, Warehouse control, Goods movements, Radio Frequency (RF) and related Master Data) and Logistics Execution (Goods Receipt, Goods Issue, Physical Inventory, Quality Management and related Master
Data).
Being a Process expert of warehouse management and logistics execution module,
ensure business requirements are gathered and map all required processes
in the ERP system (SAP).
Provide consultancy in the respective module for the best practice processes.
Initiate necessary business process re-engineering in order to have effective and efficient operations.
Serves as process lead role for SAP warehouse Management module related to all warehouse processes and related master data
Serves as process lead role for Logistics Execution module covering both inbound and outbound logistics
Provide expert level consultancy in SAP warehouse management and its integration to sales and procurement processes
Co-ordinates and support in defining MM (Materials Management), SD (Sales and Distribution) and QM (Quality Management) module subsequent processes (like outbound, inbound, Quality process).
Proactively supports the business processes with issue identification, resolution and process optimization.
Proactively analyze the evolving SAP capabilities to meet the business requirements and work with key users to implement the process in the organization.
Identify cross-functional topics and ensure the processes are aligned across modules with the support of Sub-Project leader.
Detects and escalates necessary process decisions in the project regular meeting.
Coordinates all training activities according to training concept and plan.
Coordinates all testing activities and contributes to test plan creation.
Coordinates data clean-up/migration activities with IT process consultant to support key users and team Members.
Support the key user community with user mentoring, process documentation, and end user training.
Work with the key users to maintain process documentation and training tools.
Act as contact window for IT process consultant to clarify open points and provide final decisions to IT process consultant (Second Level Support).
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree required.
5+ years of SAP WM/LE experience
Experience with implementation of WM/LE modules; minimum 2-3 end to end implementations.
Demonstrated experience and ability to translate technical requirements for business needs.
Demonstrated experience in providing solution based recommendations to support implementation efforts.
Possess analytical and communication skills and ability to interact with business users
This position is for U.S. work authorized individuals only.
Sponsorship for work authorization is not available.
Additional Information
","['erp system', 'erp', 'excel']","['data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'excel', 'data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'end user', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Candidate should have,
Good ERP knowledge Preferable Oracle Finance modules
Experience in Data Mapping
Experience in Data Conversion (Preferable from AS 400 to SQL Server)
Strong knowledge and experience in MS SQL Server
Assist other team members by performing technical development work related to operational module
Support on functional aspect and help maintain custom components of Operation modules in Oracle
Analyze impact of patches and development work in other areas, on existing Oracle customizations, and coordinate their migration to production system
Perform continuously to improve system capabilities and business processes.
Conduct analysis sessions during implementation of Product
Interact with IT Application Development Group and users to determine project requirements.
An ERP business systems analyst recommends best system utilization and practices as well as participates in project teams representing systems solutions, enablers, and integration.
An ERP business systems analyst should have a bachelor's degree in an IT or related field.
Job Type: Contract
Experience:
Business Analysis: 6 years (Required)
Data conversion ( To MS SqL Server): 5 years (Required)
Data Mapping: 5 years (Required)
ERP Systems (Preferable Oracle): 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
More than 1 year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['erp', 'oracl', 'sql', 'erp system']","['financ', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['erp', 'oracl', 'sql', 'erp system', 'financ', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Job #: 1074029
Responsible for working with key IT stakeholders and business owners to analyze and assist with solutions, business needs and document/manage requirements for large, complex, enterprise projects or programs.
Section II.
Essential Duties and Key Responsibilities
• Responsible for elicitation, analysis and documentation of all technical requirements for any new/or changes to technology applications, including internal and external development requirements and analysis of impacts to proposed technology solutions on existing and new technology platforms.
• Responsible for enterprise program requirements, using appropriate facilitation techniques, including interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, task and workflow analysis.
• Provide oversight and review of functional design documents, impact assessments and test deliverables to ensure that they meet the requirements.
• Provide oversight of the requirements traceability process from requirements through to testing with appropriate gap analysis to ensure requirements meet the needs of the business through the delivery lifecycle.
• Lead and provide oversight of cross-functional system or enterprise process initiatives.
• Provide estimates to project team for team effort, identify and communicate risks to delivering solution on time and provide input to ressurce needs at the project- or program-level to identify key / required skills
Section III.
Experience and Educational Requirements
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related discipline or equivalent experience is required.
Master’s degree a plus.
• 4 years’ experience in Enterprise Product Catalog (EPC) and/or billing system in a Telecommunication environment preferred.
• International Institute of Business Analysis (IIBA) Business Analyst certification a plus.
• Strong analysis, verbal and written communication skills is required.
Must be able to communicate effectively and confidently with business and technology stakeholders, team members and management.
• Process-driven analysis skills and a background in various requirements elicitation methods are required.
• Proficiency with requirements based on an Agile project delivery methodology is required.
• CIM and RIM knowledge is a plus
• JIRA/Confluence/QC experience is a plus
• Experience with wireless or telecom industry is highly desirable.
• Project leadership experience preferred.
EEO Employer
",['jira'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
KXSPoJO7kB
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary:
The Business Analyst – Salesforce is responsible for business analysis, application design, configuration and administrative support for Salesforce solutions.
This individual will provide day to day support of user needs while working with business partners to outlining the growth and progression of the application.
Position Responsibilities may include, but not limited to:
Participates in requirements gathering, design workshops to understand applications’ functionality and support requirements.
Works with business and technology leaders to further define the support and project functions needed within the organization.
Application administrative support; manage Salesforce security including roles, profiles, sharing rules, workflows and groups.
Manage operational requests and reporting including analysis, issue troubleshooting, prioritization and resolution.
Build custom reports, dashboards, and workflows.
Work with internal change management team to develop training materials and provide training and support to Salesforce end users.
Work within a large agile team and business product owner(s).
Gather, refine and document user stories and acceptance riteria.
Create/update data dictionary, data modeling and flow diagrams as needed.
Document business process/data flows.
Participate in solution design and testing activities as needed.
Support the evaluation of AppExchange & partner solutions.
Continuous improvement and innovation on the Salesforce Consumer Goods platform.
Hands-on Salesforce configuration in Lightning environment.
Other projects or duties as assigned.
",['salesforc'],"['dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Positions are based across geographies.
A strong understanding Adobe Cloud Desktop, requirement for the product deployments, and experience in production and user validation plans is required.
Any experience with advanced analytics is preferred.
Responsibilities:
• Work as product owner for desktop based software maintenance.
• Create the user requirement for the product deployment.
• Create the patch deployment in production and user validation plans.
• Co-ordinate with all of the user about the patch deployment and maintenance schedule.
• Track the product patches.
• Experience in Adobe creative cloud desktop version patch deployment will be added advantage.
",['cloud'],[None],999.0,['cloud']
BA,"Role: Kronos Business Analyst
Experience: 8+ Year
Duration: 12+ Months
Essential Skills:
Functional Application knowledge of Kronos WTK 8.0 or 8.1 in a retail environment.
Including reporting and integration
Functional and domain knowledge of cloud based HR/Payroll system (SAP Success Factors preferred)
Functional and domain knowledge of a cloud based WFM system (Reflexis preferred)
Experience in writing SQL queries, data analysis and validation
Previous experience with Kronos WTK upgrades and implementations
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
","['sql', 'cloud']",['busi'],999.0,"['sql', 'cloud', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
The Business Analyst will regularly interact with business and IT resources from various levels in the organization as well as directly with the primary vendor for transformational project within the client.
The candidate for this position must be adept with technology and business use of technology and should have experience eliciting business functional requirements and documenting these and feature level detail.
Experience and understanding of retail specific technology including POS systems is a plus.
Responsibilities:
Gather and document business, non-functional and operational requirements by analyzing transformation team objectives, business and user needs and documenting potential modifications to existing systems.
Create and/or review As Is/ To Be Process documentation.
Support inter-team relationships.
Partner with others in the formation and definition of scope and objectives through research and fact-finding activities.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources; reconcile conflicts, sort high-level information into details and distinguish user requests from underlying true needs
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
Skills Required:
Masterâs Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
0-2 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Microsoft Office, Visio, SQL, MicroStrategy or similar tool
Bachelorâs degree in related field or equivalent, preferred
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements
Powered by JazzHR
","['microsoft', 'sql']","['research', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'research', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Sr. Salesforce Systems/Business Analyst
Duration: 6 month with potential for extension
The Salesforce System/Business Analyst role is a globalrole that supports and drives Sales and Service tool utilization working with cross functional teams to include Sales, Marketing, Commercial Operation, IT and external vendors/consultants.
The community is + 1000 users supporting 20 selling units.
This individual will be work as part of a support team that is responsible for all system administrative duties, act as the first line subject matter expert and in-house consultant/advisor as it relates to the use of Salesforce Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, FSL, Quoting-LCPQ and DOMO to sustain and grow the current infrastructure.
This role will be the Level2 - Expert for FSL and Service Cloud.
In addition, this role will be part of a growth team to implement/rollout a global extension of: Service Cloud and Field Service Lightning solution to the EU and Asia service team.
Additionally, this individual will be the administrator of the EU region and perform basic updates, such asadd/delete users, and adding basic custom fields as the need arises.
The role includes supporting salesforce community by, but not limited to, being the voice of the customer, training, creating dashboards, reports, preparing ad-hoc analysis of data, supporting integration, validation, spec/implement change, supporting salesforce configuration.
In the growth team, this individual will be working closely with the user community and team to define/documentsprocess, configure/testing in Salesforce, training documentation and rollout.
Experience with Salesforce Service Cloud and Field Service Lightning major PLUS
Experience with a large + 1000 global multi language/multi-currency implementation with integration to ERP/QUOTING is critical to the success/growth of this role.
Foundational understanding of SAP: customer and product master data, pricing and order management is strongly preferred.
RequiredExperience/Skills:
5 + years w/ Salesforce experience required: all configuration basics: roles/profiles/fields/pagelayouts, validation, workflow, workbench, process builder, process flow, reports, dashboards, ERPintegration concepts/specs (certification desirable but not required)
5+ years relevant experience working in some capacity supporting sales, marketing or service
3+ System/Business Analyst experience required
Project Management - take a leadership role in enhancements and deployment to countries acrossEurope and Asia Pacific.
Define plan, process, test, and implementation schedules
Understand SAP or other ERP systems - query / data mining / database management experiencerequired
Understanding of full development cycle, building specification, testing results, audit and improving
Good documentation skills / detail orientated
Multi-tasker/Teammate
High degree of proficiency with Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel)
Problem solving problems skills for the following: SFDC CRM and Services:
Technical skills: apex, writing and supporting triggers, sql basics, informatica is a pluslSalesforce Service Cloud and Field Service Lightning is a plus
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'erp system', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'erp system', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"job summary:
6 Months Contract to Hire
Remote till 2021
Oakbrook, IL
This role will be heavily involved with QA and Development.
No Third Party Vendors, please.
education: Associates
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"17412 Business Analyst Sr (Open)
Position Type:
Full time
US.IL.Chicago.Office
Position Details:
As the one of largest business support solutions (BSS) provider, CSG International provides solutions to a global client base and across market segments.
This is a great opportunity for experienced individuals with a strong background in consultative services and/or implementing software.
A proven track record consulting with software and communication companies is preferred.
Qualifications include:
Bachelor degree in Business related field or equivalent work experience required; Master degree/MBA is a plus
Strong knowledge of MS Office Suite and documentation software
Demonstrated ability to gather technical requirements and perform gap analyses
Experience with HTML5, CSS, JavaScript is a plus
4 - 6 years of consulting experience a plus
Project management experience is a plus
Experience with web services (JSON, SOAP, XML) is required
Strong knowledge of SQL is a plus
Knowledge of: .NET, C#; PHP or Java is a plus
Experience in customer facing application software projects/programs with deep knowledge of IT systems
Software package implementation and/or upgrade experience
Media Industry Experience a plus
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Excellent independent learning skills
Excellent problem solving skills
Strong presentation/demo skills
Experience working with issue management software
Expectations:
Partner with clients and CSG team members to translate client business rules into documented software requirements
Ability to lead a project team and also work independently
Lead tasks such as solution identification, and solution configuration
Provide subject-matter expertise, customer advocacy, and analysis through all phases of engagements
Play a pivotal role in client management
Lead a specified work stream within a project
Ability to manage multiple assignments/projects at the same time
Leveraging internal and external tools that integrate with client systems
Ability to communicate effectively with internal project managers as well as front end and back end developers
Manage and assist in completion of project deliverables in a timely fashion
Act as a liaison between a client and internal technical teams.
Ability to read and understand technical requirements documents and online documentation
Open to travel
Mentor and develop newer hires and on-board new client team members to a project
Lead and manage business process re-engineering efforts on multiple work streams
Play a team lead role managing resources, deadlines and issues
Provide status updates to senior client and internal executives
Ability to drive functional and business requirement meetings
CSG International is an Affirmative Action-Equal Opportunity / Veteran / Disabled Employer.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'php', 'javascript', 'c', 'java']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'php', 'javascript', 'c', 'java', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"LEAD IT BUSINESS ANALYST
Park Ridge, IL
SUMMARY:
While work experience and educational preparation are certainly important, a can-do attitude and strong work ethic are the most desired characteristics for this new position.
All AANA colleagues are expected to foster a workplace culture that promotes divergent thinking, openness, respect, trust, and the desire to be epic!
The AANA is recruiting for a brilliant Lead IT Business Analyst.
To be successful in this role, you must be a team player, work smart, have a passion for IT, and always learning to improve your knowledge and skill set.
MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
IT Business Analysis:
Communicates with project managers and internal stakeholders regarding project deliverables and issue resolution
Mentors junior-level IT Business Analysts in business requirements gathering methodologies and documentation best practices
Evaluates current application implementations, identifies opportunities to leverage off-the-shelf software to replace/improve current customizations
Analyzes and designs new business processes around requirements definition, information gathering, and consistent documentation methodologies; standardizes IT requirements methodologies to reduce cost, improve productivity, quality, predictability, and timeliness, reduce risk, improve cross group coordination, improve skills, improve customer and associate satisfaction
Support:
Works in tandem with the Application Development Team to support all applications and systemic processes and objects
Establishes effective business relationships with application vendors to ensure operational, effective, and best-in-class interfaces for data, security, and functionality
Serves as key team member in troubleshooting/assessing, testing, and implementing bug and maintenance needs for all applications
Professional Development:
Ensures that knowledge is in alignment with new technologies, approaches, and systems related to applications and systems
Demonstrates proactive approach to gaining knowledge on new languages, platforms, and architecture
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelors degree in Computer Science/Information Technology discipline from an accredited university or other applicable education required
Proficient in Microsoft Office and Visio
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Demonstrated problem-solver with the ability to cope well under pressure and coordinate multiple activities in a dynamic, fast-paced team environment
Strong attention to detail and analytical skills
ScrumMaster certification a plus
Experience working with SharePoint 2013 or later, Office 365, SharePoint Online, Azure and Power BI preferred
The AANA proudly offers a phenomenal employee benefits package which includes:
Wellness program (cost covered by AANA)
Dental (cost covered by AANA)
Vision (cost covered by AANA)
Life (cost covered by AANA)
Flex Spending
Tuition assistance
Telecommuting
Paid holidays
Paid office closure between Christmas Day and New Years Day
Generous time off for vacation
Sick time
Floating holidays
Employee referral bonus
Accordingly, all employment decisions at the AANA, including but not limited to in recruiting, hiring, compensation, training, promotions, discipline, and termination will be made based only on individual merit, qualifications and abilities, and the AANAs needs and resources.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'bi', 'azur']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'azur', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Essential Job Duties:
Identifies business operations trends and patterns using various systems and methodologies for analyzing and reviewing information and data.
Works directly with internal departmental staff to understand project concepts, objectives and approaches.
Takes assigned project from original concept through final implementation.
Tests documented strategies and plans.
Analyzes impact on, and risks to, essential business functions or information systems to identify acceptable recovery time periods and resource requirements.
Interprets government regulations and applicable codes to ensure compliance.
Writes reports to summarize testing activities, including descriptions of goals, planning, scheduling, execution, results, analysis, conclusions, and recommendations.
Identifies opportunities for strategic improvement or mitigation of business interruption and other risks caused by business, regulatory, or industry-specific change initiatives.
Acts as liaison between internal & external client and the software development staff as well as the support staff.
Manages incoming requests for assistance, including prioritizing and managing the client expectation.
Tracks all work performed in CRM solution.
Maintain third party vendor relationships as assigned.
Lead requirements gathering (user voice, use case and “as is/to be” documentation) and develop specifications including work/process flows, narrative descriptions, and user interface designs for trading platform and operational system enhancements
Test platform product concepts with stakeholders, including external customers, to validate design integrity and usability
Work with the Technology team to produce implementation details including change request management
Communicate between the Technology team and business unit leader to manage issue resolution and provide continuous feedback loops to all respective parties
Lead internal and external testing and training efforts for new system releases
Draft and finalize customer communication and instructional materials for releases
Must be able to engage in technical and business discussion
Education & Experience Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in business management or related field
MS Excel, MS Access and VBA expert (advance Excel function and macro test)
","['excel', 'vba']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst
The business analyst identifies and develops the conceptual solution and business requirements for the information management program or project.
This includes facilitating customer meetings to identify analytic processes and key performance indicators.
The business analyst will capture and formalize this information to develop the business strategy and business requirements.
They are then responsible for the successful delivery of a solution that meets customer requirements and supports the overall strategy and scalability identified during the strategy and roadmap phase.
Individuals must have strong interpersonal skills to facilitate requirements gathering, quality reviews, deliverable approvals, and project/program decisions with key stakeholders and project teams.
Candidates must have a proven track record of successful project delivery with increasing responsibility over time.
Skills & Responsibilities:
Develop business cases for information management projects including development of ROI, NPV, and risk estimating
Expert understanding of users' needs by facilitating and gathering user requirements and preferences and leading/recommending solutions that meet these needs
Implement/participate in MDM, metadata, profiling, and information quality projects or programs
Identify business requirements and ensuring designs adequately meet the requirements of the project while remaining aligned with the overall program strategy and architecture
Identify quality assurance criteria and test cases
Regulatory requirements
Industry best practices
Capture and refining the 'as is' and 'to be' business processes, especially as they pertain to information management and program delivery
Key Requirements:
Broad knowledge of the upstream operation model (facility management, drilling, completion, production, land, geoscience, reservoir management, etc)
Good communication skills
Good understand of Information Technology (databases, integration, data models, cloud services, web services, etc.)
but doesn't have to be a developer.
Knows how to translate data problems, process problems, into data management solutions
Understands the components of good data management
Willingness to travel
Project Communication:
Conduct and facilitate business requirements and quality reviews
Review user adoption of deliverables and acceptance testing
Ensure project documents are complete, current, and stored appropriately
Industry Expertise:
Must have a minimum of 5 years experience working in information management within the upstream oil & gas energy sector.
Education:
A BA or BS degree is required for this position
A degree in an energy discipline (e.g.
geology, petrophysics) or engineering is preferred
EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Requirement Gathering - Understanding of client's requirements and business process.
Analyzed and documented Business requirements and detail design of the software for full understanding of the business.
Developed a deep understanding of requirements, using interviews, research and knowledge of technology.
Interact with Project Requirements, Business Issues, Solution and made recommendation
Work closely with customers to identify and document their requirements and translate to user stories for development team consumption.
Serve as the conduit between the customer and the software development team through which requirements flow
Qualification:
Bachelors or Master’s degree.
0-1 years of professional experience
Strong analytical skills, work ethic, independence, problem solving ability, and positive attitude
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Strong organizational skills with the ability to multi-task
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $63,000.00 - $73,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",['excel'],"['analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst- Houston, Tx5800-Houston Corp3555 Timmons Ln, Ste 1400Houston, Texas, 77027United StatesRequirements:* Bachelor's in Information Systems, Engineering, Computer Science, or related field.
* 2+ years of experience working with MS Excel.
Ability to write macros and VBA code is a plus.
* Demonstrated ability to write complex SQL statements and stored procedures.
* 2+ years of experience working with relational databases.
* Experience with AS400/iSeries (query interface), DB2, and MS SQL Server is a plus.
* Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
* Create custom queries to extract data from enterprise database and other data sources.
* Provide analytical support to optimize processes and improve efficiencies of different departments.
* Provides ad-hoc research and analytical support to business users.
Research and resolve data discrepancies.
* Assist in gathering information, analyzing user requests, and translating the same to functional specs.
* Assists in prospecting and analyzing new business.
* Produce, update, and maintain documentation for available reports.
* Provide technical support and training to end users in using business intelligence/reporting tools.Additional Functions/Job Duties:Other duties as assigned.
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql']","['data', 'end user', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'data', 'end user', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"This would be a contract to hire opporutnity.
Qualified candidate should send their resume (Word format) to Mike Sabo: MSabo@genuent.com
Position Summary:
They will look at two types of candidates:
A Petroleum, Production, or Reservoir Engineer looking to get into the IT space as a Business Analyst with some understanding of Information Technology.
A Business Analyst with experience in the Oil & Gas space, with knowledge of economics and planning, and SQL skills.
Duties:
As the Business / Engineer Analyst, you'll serve as the primary liaison between the IT / Development Team, and the end users (Engineers).
Using your knowledge of the Oil & Gas space, you'll provide your input to solutions, as well as work with end users to gather and document business requirements.
You'll be responsible for translating the business requirements into both technical and functional specifications for the Development Team – these documents will be used for the development of in-house software and applications.
Qualifications:
A Bachelor's Degree is required (Petroleum / Production / Reservoir Engineering, Chemical Engineering, Computer Science, or Economics & Finance) – a Master's Degree is preferred, but not required.
Must have 2-4+ years of professional experience.
Proficiency with SQL – ability to write some queries, unions, joins, etc.
Experience with other tools such as ArcGIS, PHDWin, or OFM would be beneficial.
Ability to travel as needed – this can range from 10-30%, but varies based on work activities.
You must be a go-getter, energetic, and enthusiastic, and excited to join a top-tier team, with the ability to hit the ground running.
",['sql'],"['financ', 'end user', 'busi', 'econom', 'information technology']",1.0,"['sql', 'financ', 'end user', 'busi', 'econom', 'information technology']"
BA,"Kindly review the job requirements below.
Must Have Experience providing services as Business Analyst Solid experience in Salesforce CRM and Cloud Services Experience with end to end implementation, systems development, implementation, and integration Experience with developing and executing product roadmap Nice to Have Salesforce Certification Cloud Certification Contact Information Talent Advocate Ebad Qamar Call (832) 240-3246 Email resumearthurlawrence.net mailtoresumearthurlawrence.net Applicants must have valid work authorization in the United States, as visa sponsorship is not available at this time.
Named one of the top ten fastest growing businesses in Houston in 2016.
Ranked 25th in the HBJrsquos Fast 100 Private Companies Award in 2017.
For more information, visit www.arthurlawrence.net httpwww.arthurlawrence.net
","['salesforc', 'cloud']",['busi'],999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst accomplishes objectives through the analysis of business functions and process requirements.
The Business Analyst interacts with local operations managers and their team to develop business processes based on project requirements.
The Business Analyst is also able to communicate directly with clients to further refine processes based on client needs.
The Business Analyst interacts with the IT organization to translate project requirements into deliverable systems.
A forward-thinking, anticipatory professional driven by a passion to pursue your full potential and dreams.
A work environment that promotes collaboration, consistency and community service to empower people.
An inclusive culture that promotes career/life integration and invests in developing people in areas of focused expertise.
A team of professionals grounded in strong, personal relationships and a sense of belonging to a common purpose for adding value and making a difference.
“Fearless Unrivaled Flexibility”– It’s about results, not the hours you work.
Required Experience and Education
Two (2) to five (5) years’ experience as a Business Analyst or Project Manager, demonstrating a progression in complexity, scope, and number of projects managed
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, accounting, and/or business discipline preferred
Work with operational management to establish scope, deliverables and resources requirements
Conduct needs assessments and requirements gathering while developing business process models in order to meet project goals
Coordinate with IT to support systems development required for program operations, including, but not limited to, development of user stories and user acceptance testing
Support training of staff members, providing guidance for the use of project systems
Resolve issues and solve problems throughout the project lifecycle
Communicate project’s progress, problems, resolutions, and other business concerns to appropriate stakeholders in a clear, accurate, and timely manner
Develop tools and best practices for project execution
Possess excellent communication and written skills
Ability to think outside of the box and perform root cause analysis
Ability to learn quickly and lead in adapting to new technologies
Ability to manage multiple priorities, commitments and projects
Self-starter but ability to work well in team environment
Position may require travel
Other tasks that may be required to complete project requirements
Project Management Professional (PMP) certification is preferred
Certified Business Analysis Professional (CBAP) or equivalent certification is a plus
Proficiency in use of business analysis and project management tools required
Experience with M-Files, Hyland OnBase or another ECM solution is a plus
Proficiency in Microsoft SQL, Power BI, and SSRS is a plus
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'ssr']","['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'ssr', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Accountabilities
The Business Analyst role will focus on defining/refining business requirements for a project.
As an Entry Level Business Analyst you will be responsible for providing user support for the various applications developed by the Business Systems Development team.
This includes answering user questions, troubleshooting issues, testing new features, and managing ongoing enhancements to the internal applications
Responsibilities
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, developing and implementing solutions.
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
• Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Performing requirements analysis.
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful and relevant reports.
Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Qualification
Bachelor’s or Masters degree
0-2 years of Experience .
Must be very proficient at Word and Excel.
Familiarity with claims processing software is a plus.
Strong problem solving and analytical skills
Willing to relocate anywhere
Powered by JazzHR
BS6WvDGNwK
",['excel'],"['optim', 'problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Functional Salesforce Business Analyst
Rate: DOE
Duration: 6+ months
Interview times for next week
Must Haves:
Experience in Salesforce (SFDC) CRM- Sales and Service Cloud end to end implementation experience, systems development, implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
Job Summary
Conducts business process analysis, detailed requirement gathering, document user stories, prioritize backlog and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
""
Possess a fundamental understanding of end-to-end customer experience integration and dependencies.
""
Works in an Agile environment and continuously reviews the business needs, refines priorities, outlines milestones and deliverables, and identifies opportunities and risks.
""
Develops, owns, and executes product roadmap.
""
Translates product roadmap features into well-defined product requirements including features, epics, user stories, and acceptance test criteria.
""
Prioritizes and maintains the sprint backlog for assigned products, balancing the requirements of stakeholders.
""
Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet business requirements and fulfill user stories
"" Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
""
Collaborate with developers to test and verify that solutions will meet the business requirements
"" Participate in key meetings including discovery sessions, sprint demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Please send resumes to michael.meade@mondo.com
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"The Requirements
Strong understanding of the administrative process as it relates to Health & Welfare and/or Pension benefit plans
Knowledge of flexible benefits administration
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong knowledge of Microsoft Office tools including Outlook, Excel and Word
SQL query skills are preferred
Ability to schedule work, delegate and monitor progress of others
Professional and responsible approach to work, clients and associates
Ability to organize and prioritize with strong attention to details
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Ability to work in a team environment
Ability to work independently in a project related work environment
Ability to work a flexible schedule
Ability to complete multiple projects within established deadlines
Bachelors degree preferred
Equal Opportunity/Vet/Disaiblity
The Role
The full time position requires an individual who is comfortable with benefits administration systems and client contact.
Note: Employment-based non-immigrant visa sponsorship and/or assistance is not offered for this specific job opportunity.
Performance Objectives:
Act as a principal contact with clients on day-to-day plan administration processing issues
Review and resolve calculation and eligibility errors with client as needed
Review error reports and resolve issues as needed utilizing case management tools
Exercise discretion and independent judgment in responding to and resolving client issues
Assist with system testing; Web, interfaces and system generated reports for new and ongoing systems
Understands the system interfaces with HRIS, payroll, and insurance carriers
Develop and maintain system processing documentation and processing calendar
Set up and test data encryption and transmission protocols with client and vendors
Manage ongoing and annual enrollment process including; updating documentation, testing, and carrier/vendor coordination
Manage fulfilment inventory with clients
Manage client accountability
Provide back up for other team members as needed
Understands and able to communicate the plan design, including coverage levels and options, eligibility, enrollment/change and termination procedures
100% compliance with SAS70 and Professional Excellence criteria
Attends ongoing client status meeting as needed to establish client relationship
Attends internal project meetings to ensure project continuity into ongoing
Assist project team with client assignments to deliver timely, within-budget and high quality work
Performs other duties as assigned
Take initiative to proactively share knowledge and/or experience with team members
Develop strong partnerships with team members
Identify potential out of scope work and new opportunities to client teams
Meet service level agreements across all clients
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title : Business Analyst
No of Openings: 1
Job Responsibilities/Skills:
Involve in all phases of software development cycle.
Gather business requirements, design database, develop, maintenance of the applications.
Commercial software testing of the applications.
Ability to influence and drive quality across disciplines including C#, and debug skills with JavaScript.
Automation and test processes of JavaScript based applications.
Resolve defects in complex business and product issues.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills enabling comprehension of complex business and product issues.
Educational Background and Experience needed:
Requires Bachelors Degree in Computer/ Electronics Engg.
Or Eqiv.
with 5+ yr relevant experience.
827 Houston, TX 77036
","['javascript', 'c']","['problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['javascript', 'c', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary: The Business Analyst Assistant will assist in seamless delivery of Learning and Development (L&D) services to the Procurement/Supply Chain Management function.
Position requires intermediate to advanced excel skills and experience within SuccessFactors LMS and SAP is preferred.
Strong problem-solving skills, interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively in a diverse workforce are also necessary.
The successful candidate should be flexible, self-motivated, conscientious, learns quickly, anticipates needs, and has demonstrated ability to multi-task.
Job category
Branch
Pay rate
Posted date
5/14/2020
Job ID
Job type
Responsibilities for this position may include, but are not limited to:
SuccessFactors LMS administration duties: o Training course metrics, including creation, tracking and reporting of metrics o Creates, maintains and closes courses in LMS o Processes participants certificates o Maintains the P/SCM function training inventory and communicates upcoming classes for registration o Generates LMS reports and advises of participant headcount for upcoming classes
Processes training invoices through SAP and Ariba, redirecting training costs to participant cost centers.
Updates and maintains L&D/OC SharePoint site.
Monitors L&D mailbox and responds to inquiries
General L&D Administrative Support: Catering and class logistical support, provides guidance regarding course logistics and expenses associated with training events; other miscellaneous administrative support.
Required Qualifications:
High School Diploma or equivalent.
3+ years of administrative support and/or experience in OC or L&D.
Must be professional, responsive and flexible to changing priorities, and be customer focused.
Strong proficiency in Excel and SAP, and proficient with MS Office (Word, Forms and PowerPoint).
Demonstrated understanding of basic HR/OC products, services, policies, and practices and/or where to obtain counsel.
Ability to use data to support conclusions and recommendations for action with error-free output.
Strong planning and organizational skills.
Demonstrated ability to manage and complete multiple tasks while working with tight deadlines and changing priorities.
Works with minimal supervision and guidance.
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills.
Ability to build positive working relationships and effectively works with various levels of customers; managers and peers with different working styles.
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge or exposure working in Learning and Development
SharePoint Administration skills
Ariba experience
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'busi', 'recommend']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.Essential Duties and responsibilities:Project Delivery Responsibilities:* Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
business rules, data mapping, and product integrations)* Architect solutions based on client's needs by utilizing established ELM Solutions methodologies and tools, industry experience and best practices* Analyze client's existing systems of record to create data conversion mappings into ELM Solutions core products* Document functional requirements and partner with the development team to translate into technical requirements* Gather and document reporting requirements* Complete the configuration spreadsheet based on client requirements* Coordinate and organize client product training* Support user acceptance testing and production support tickets* Act as the primary client advocate and problem solver throughout the implementation process* Review and validate deliverables from development team and quality assurance resources against requirements and provide feedback* Coordinate activities and communication of requirements with internal and external teamsProject Operations Responsibilities:* Assist the program manager in tracking project delivery* Assist program manager in identifying and challenging scope and work estimates that seem extraordinary, providing acceptable alternatives as needed* Communicate functional or scope risks against statement of work to program manager in a timely manner* Provide a successful and seamless hand-off of client to customer supportOther Duties:* Perform quality assurance tasks when needed* Understand project management and quality assurance best practices* Foster team spirit within the team and across teams within the department* Attend seminars and web events to maintain professional and industry knowledgeJob QualificationsEducation:Bachelor's degree required preferably in business, finance, accounting, MIS, computer science or a related fieldExperience:* Minimum 2-4 years of experience in implementing and supporting technology solutions, gathering requirements, participating in client interviews and meetings, and providing value-add services preferably in corporate legal departments* Professional consulting experience is highly preferred* Experience implementing and integrating with ERP systems* Experience working with relational databases* Experience in gathering requirements rel
","['erp', 'erp system']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary:
The Retail Commissions Analyst I is responsible for the management of Incentive programs within the Retail Customer Operations organization.
The Retail Commissions Team works with the Retail Organization, managing commissions from the creation of the programs through execution.
The programs include cash sales bonuses, monthly/weekly performance based contests and monthly/quarterly/annual recognition events.
The team works with each line of business to create the programs to best drive the desired metrics to achieve annual goals.
Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
• Support the Retail Customer Operations department with the creation, implementation and execution of all incentive programs.
• Perform commission calculations for LOB’s transitioned to the Retail Commissions Team
• Prepare payroll reporting for both internal and external agents, as well as accrual and amortization data
• Validate and process agency invoices
• Communicate incentive programs including the announcement of programs, all details of the contests including qualifications and sending updates for any changes throughout the year.
• Produce monthly/quarterly sales contest budgets for all lines of business (including all vendor sites) and work with the teams to determine measurable contests to drive desired performance outcomes.
• Purchase and manage distribution of all awards and prizes associated to the incentive contests exploring all options for prizes requested in order to get the most out of the set budget.
• Organize, coordinate and execute annual Pinnacle Club trip, including all travel arrangements, all events, receptions and awards dinners to entertain the Pinnacle Club winners and their guest on the annual trip.
• Create monthly imputed income report of non- cash bonus incentives earned for distribution to all required payroll departments (internal and contractor)
• Audit process map, SOX control documentation, and plan structure for each commission plan on a scheduled basis (monthly/quarterly/annually)
• Monitor compliance and facilitate the Commission SOX control process.
• Monitor the Incentives team mailbox and respond to questions or concerns in a timely manner.
• Skilled in Microsoft Excel in order to utilize calculation models.
Working Conditions:
• Open office environment.
• Some overtime required as special projects arise.
• Minimal travel may be required.
Minimum Requirements:
• High School diploma or GED required.
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred.
• 1+ years experience working directly with incentive programs in a sales environment required.
• Strong project management skills and experience as well as relationship sales skills are preferred.
• Strong math and excel skills required.
NOTE: If a candidate does not meet these requirements, Success Factors will automatically disqualify the candidate.
Preferred Qualifications:
• Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university preferred
Additional Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Strong work ethic.
• Must be an effective team player.
• High level of honesty and integrity.
• Attention to details.
• Able to handle multiple tasks simultaneously.
• Strong leadership skills.
• Excellent communications skills, both written and verbal.
• Analytical thinking in order to create and maintain necessary reports
• Excellent personal computer skills, including all MS Office applications are required
","['ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['math', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'math', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary
This position works with key stakeholders to capture requirements, perform gap analysis, and collaborate with Quorum Software and Transport4 on enhancements to the e-ONE and T4 applications that will provide the highest value add to the Lone Star NGL commercial business.
This position is also responsible for day-to-day and month-end close application support, implementing new assets into the existing application software stack and supporting custom interfaces and reports.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Implement new assets and support existing assets in the third party enterprise software suite for the Natural Gas Liquids (NGLs) business sector.
Develop and support in-house written custom interfaces and reports.
Collaborate with business users, internal technology teams and vendors to establish and prioritize business and technology requirements.
Develop and review integration and quality assurance test plans as needed.
Follow a strict methodology and process for change control, application support, and escalation.
Provide training, guidance, and resource support for end users.
Provide emergency support for critical priority issues and other business critical situations in a fast-paced environment.
These systems include enterprise software to support the Measurement, Commercial and Accounting business groups.
Requirements:
Education and/or Experience, Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential job duty satisfactorily.
The requirements for this position are listed below:
BS degree in MIS/CIS/CSE or equivalent experience.
Business analysis experience translating business requirements into functional and technical specifications.
in the NGL sector or other Midstream sector.
Experience querying and writing scripts for Oracle Server and MS SQL Server databases.
A motivated self-starter that is able to work independently and in teams on tasks and projects with limited supervision.
A strong customer service attitude and focus.
Excellent oral and written communication skills as well as business presentation skills.
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills.
Experience working with Business Users and Software Developers to provide solutions that further enhance the applications and provide the business user with an improved experience.
Attention to detail and a rigorous focus on delivering quality output.
Required experience is commensurate with the selected job level:
Preferred Qualifications:
End-to-end transactional experience in Natural Gas Liquids pipelines, storage facilities and fractionators utilizing Dearman, Flow-Cal, Quorum e-ONE (Entero ONE) and Transport4 software or similar systems.
Experience with Project Management methodologies to successfully implement business focused technology solutions.
Familiar with the Sarbanes Oxley control environment and change control processes.
Working Conditions:
Usually, normal office working conditions.
Occasional overnight travel may be required.
Occasional visits to industrial/manufacturing settings, which may include exposure to various materials and chemicals, as well as extreme temperature conditions and loud machinery, and require appropriate personal protective equipment.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Vet
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql']","['end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Ready to elevate your knowledge of the oil and gas industry?
Challenging, Hands-on Assignments within Elite Project Teams
EAGs small, elite teams place you on the frontline with experts in all sectors of the oil and gas marketplace.
As your knowledge and experience advance, so will the challenge and complexity of your assignments.
Mentoring from experts with deep consulting and industry knowledge is available at any time, from anywhere, giving you immediate access to experience-based, best practice solutions.
Respected by Clients and Peers
A candidate for this role should have experience participating in one or more of the following types of projects:
Financial Accounting, Operational Accounting, Supply Chain or ERP implementations, Mergers and Acquisitions
Software Selections
Master Data Management, Business Intelligence & Data Analytics
Facilitate project activities such as client meetings, process/design workshops, user acceptance test sessions, and weekly status updates.
Provide hands-on business and technical analyst activities while completing project deliverables.
Assist with the development and delivery of training materials and programs.
Position Requirements
This position may require travel (Monday to Thursday) to client projects.
Applicants should be willing to travel up to 50% in North America.
Bachelors Degree
2+ years of consulting experience
2+ years of experience participating in the development or implementation of software systems
2+ years of upstream energy industry experience, including working knowledge of one or more of the following areas within upstream is preferred but not required:
Revenue Accounting
Production Accounting
Well Data and Drilling
Land Management
Midstream
Strong experience with Visio and Excel is required
Compensation
Competitive salary, commensurate with experience.
Comprehensive benefits package including:
Medical
Dental
Vision
401(k)
Get Started Today
People are EAGs most valuable asset.
","['erp', 'excel']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst
One of North America's leading energy infrastructure companies is hiring a Business Analyst in downtown Houston, TX.
Someone with finance and budgeting experience within a project environment would excel in this role.
Successful Candidates will have:
Bachelors degree
4+ years of experience in a BA role
Exposure to complex project management environments and an understanding of the differing interdependencies that need to be considered
Core Responsibilities:
Facilitate and support the preparation, roll-up, analysis, and review of annual departmental operating budgets and monthly forecasts
Monitor, analyze, reconcile, and prepare detailed and summary cost reports and presentations, including compiling variance explanations and cost performance results by line of business and budget accountability area
Qualifications:
Demonstrated collaboration skills and ability to build trust, working with multiple stakeholders and partners at various levels of the organization;
Communication, planning and presentation skills to support facilitation and enable team building and participation from project teams;
An attitude and aptitude for continual improvement and change management, with strong analytical and problem-solving skills and ability to focus on details without losing sight of the bigger picture;
Self-starter; takes a proactive approach and can work with minimal supervision;
Able to manage multiple and conflicting priorities, can work through ambiguity and meet deliverables;
Flexible and adaptable; thrives and can work in a dynamic, constantly changing and sometimes ambiguous environment.
Job ID: 43417
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Details
Business Analyst
Schedule: Full-time
Job Summary
Job Responsibilities
1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
Proficient in developing visual modeling artifacts such as flow diagrams, data models, UI mockups
6.
7.
Identify any process specific data retention or processing requirements
8.
9.
Coordinate the development of all components of Business Requirements Documentation.
5+ years of business process analysis
IIBA certification a plus
Experience with agile or scrum teams
MS Project, Azure Boards, JIRA
Strong experience in working well with cross-function teams in a global organization
","['azur', 'jira']","['busi', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['azur', 'jira', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"JOB SUMMARY
Under general supervision, formulates and defines systems scope and objectives through research and fact-finding combined with an understanding of applicable business systems and industry requirements.
With this knowledge, develops or modifies moderately complex information systems.
Includes analysis of business and user needs, documenting requirements, and revising existing system logic difficulties as necessary.
Competent to work in some phases of systems analysis and considers the business implications of the application of technology to the current business environment.
Generally uses existing procedures to resolve standard problems.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Provides end user support for a specific application while learning about the application and customer.
Assists in application implementations and assists in testing end user processes using defined guidelines.
Updates existing application tables and verifies the accuracy.
Collects data and runs basic reports in response to client inquiries as directed by more senior associates.
Interacts with clients, both internal and external, to supply basic information.
Analyzes business and user needs, documenting requirements, with the guidance of a senior associate.
Documents business rules/functional requirements to support system enhancements with the guidance of a senior associate.
Logs and tracks basic problems/work tickets with external product vendors or support organizations.
Performs other duties as assigned.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
No formal supervisory responsibilities in this position.
May provide informal assistance such as functional guidance, and/or training to coworkers.
May coordinate and assign tasks to co-workers within a work unit and/or project.
QUALIFICATIONS
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
SQL experience preferred.
EDUCATION and EXPERIENCE
Bachelor's degree (BA/BS) from 4-year college or university required.
Minimum of 2 years of related experience and/or training.
0-3 years of experience preferred.
CERTIFICATES and/or LICENSES
None.
COMMUNICATION SKILLS
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong organizational and analytical skills.
Ability to provide efficient, timely, reliable and courteous service to customers.
Ability to effectively present information.
FINANCIAL KNOWLEDGE
Requires knowledge of financial terms and principles.
Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts and/or commissions.
Conducts basic financial analysis.
REASONING ABILITY
Ability to comprehend, analyze, and interpret documents.
Ability to solve problems involving several options in situations.
Requires intermediate analytical and quantitative skills.
OTHER SKILLS and ABILITIES
Intermediate experience in MS Office Products (Excel, Access, Power Point, Word, etc).
Heavy emphasis on Excel and PowerPoint.
Ability to use query and report generation tools.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
Basic SQL knowledge and able to comprehend system design.
Strong communications and service oriented.
SCOPE OF RESPONSIBILITY
Responsible for setting own project deadlines.
Errors in judgment may cause short-term impact to coworkers and supervisor.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Vacancy Number: 25240
Date Posted: January 17, 2020
Business Analyst
Duration: 6 months renewable
Schedule: 5/40
The Business Analyst is responsible for accounting and controls associated with stewardship and performance reporting, Authority for Expenditure (AFEs), fixed assets, cost allocations, travel and expense reporting and other general accounting areas.
This position interfaces with various levels of management and reports directly to the Finance & Tax Supervisor.
Responsibilities
Assists management in understanding budget and spend by
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Consider the possibilities of joining a Great Place to Work!
Responsible for participating in the analysis of business processes, application requirements, development of detail project specifications, and the development and implementation of major business initiatives.
**JOB RESPONSIBILITIES** **Data Analysis & Presentation** * Develops business insights based on analysis of results, and communicate key findings to various members of management to facilitate data-driven decision-making.
* Assists in the development of measurement processes/methods for assessing progress towards goals and project outcomes.
* Leads efforts to define business and systems requirements including documenting processes, business requirements and resulting technology needs.
* Prepares reports, performs analyses, and evaluates opportunities.
* Develops polished executive-level presentations and confidently delivers the information to internal business associates and external clients in a clear and concise fashion.
* Assists in identifying best practices through a review of processes.
* Establishes and maintains relationships with various departments.
* Escalates obstacles/issues to meeting timelines and deliverables.
* Reports project status according to prescribed timelines for a given project.
Education: * Bachelor's degree in Business, IT or directly related field.
Experience: * Four (4) years' experience as a Business Analyst.
Dignity Memorial providers care for more than 300,000 families each year and understand the importance of thoughtful, personalized arrangements.
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst Core Responsibilities: Facilitate and support the preparation, roll-up, analysis, and review of annual departmental operating budgets and monthly forecasts.
Monitor, analyze, reconcile, and prepare detailed and summary cost reports and presentations, including compiling variance explanations and cost performance results by line of business and budget accountability area.
Decision Making: Operates more independent, decisions range from those governed by general policy to those on technical or complex issues within authorized limits.
Duties: Uses independent judgment to handle situations outside standard methods and resolve difficult problems.
Easy.
About Kelly®
Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
Job Requirements:
",[None],"['account', 'forecast', 'busi']",999.0,"['account', 'forecast', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst<b>
Duration: Long Term
Rate: 35 $ phr on w2 or 40 $ phr on Corp- Corp
Role:<b>
Acts as a liaison between the Technology and the business of new systems and enhancement of existing systems.
Converts functional requirements to technical requirements.
Conducts advanced level business process analysis, needs assessments and preliminary cost/benefit analysis in an effort to align Technology solutions with business initiatives.
Essential Functions & Responsibilities:<b>
E 50% Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
Contributes advanced knowledge in formulating systems scope and objectives relative to the organization's business plan and user requirements, process flow definitions and functional specifications.
Documents requirements and formulates test plans with QA and other partner groups prior to requesting business user testing.
E 30% Coordinates with users to determine and document business and user requirements, process flow definitions, and functional specifications.
Responsible for document repositories, maintenance and updates of project documentation library.
E 15% Leads project team with gaining business user acceptance.
Reviews progress and evaluates results for accuracy and efficiency.
N 5% Other job duties as assigned.
Knowledge and Skills:<b>
Experience:
Â
* 5 years of relevant work experience (in addition to education requirement).<b>
Education:<b>
Bachelor's Degree (accredited) in Computer Science, MIS, Business Administration, or in lieu of degree, High School Diploma or GED (accredited) and 4 years of relevant work experience.
Interpersonal Skills:<b>
Courtesy, tact, and diplomacy are essential elements of the job.
Work involves much personal contact with others inside and/or outside the organization for purposes of giving or obtaining information, building relationships, or soliciting cooperation.
Other Skills:<b>
Strong verbal and written communication skills, with attention to details.
Must be able to take a lead role to analyze data to identify opportunities for improvement.
Demonstrates expert knowledge in working with integration and interfaces to other systems.
Extensive PC software skills and experience; including Microsoft Word/Excel/Access/ Project, and other database management and reporting software.
Requires documentation expertise including experience creating Business Requirements, Functional and Non-Functional Requirements, Workflows, etc.
Background in business process analysis, system requirements, as well as data modeling and detailed functional design.
Advanced knowledge or skills in one or more of the following is required:<b>
* Systems development, implementation, upgrades and related analysis.
QA testing, business analyst methodologies, system design and analysis.
Advanced analytical thinking and creative problem solving, (ability to define multiple approaches to business problems, exposure to business process re-engineering).
Strong analytical problem-solving skills, analysis and design skills, communication and documentation skills, and strong customer service skills.
Must have expert computer skills in working with office applications such as word processing and spreadsheet applications.
Must have organizational skills with special attention on details and be able to work independently.
Must demonstrate ability to provide guidance to junior staff.
Demonstrable proficiency in simultaneously managing multiple priorities and assignments.
Demonstrates ability to utilize personal computers and standard office equipment.
Demonstrates proficiency to maintain expert knowledge about the system through participation in vendor classes, vendor client conferences, and working with vendor support.
Demonstrates proficiency in maintaining operational procedures to ensure data integrity and maximum system availability.
Demonstrates proficiency in documenting application specific support information (e.g.
developing Frequently Asked Questions (FAQ), daily procedures, etc.)
and maintaining the information on the Intranet.
Experience with Agile Software Development, Continuous Delivery and DevOps practices.
Experience in Web, Ecommerce and Mobile technology-based projects.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Finance, Business, Accounting or Technical degrees preferred.
Duties:
Perform testing, documentation and quality assurance for new product features
Provide project management for internal product development projects.
Other duties as assigned
Requirements:
Technical Degree Preferred
Experience with Java and or SQL
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Able to Identify problems, compare data from sources to draw conclusions, and make timely sound decision
Must be able to perform under pressure
Ability to work effectively with others to accomplish organizational goals and to identify and resolve problems
Must be committed to customer service and demonstrate appropriate attention to customer needs and requirements when making decision and taking action
Benefits
Medical Insurance Including Prescription Coverage
Dental Insurance
Medical and Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Voluntary Life Insurance
Company-paid Short Term and Long Term Disability Coverage
401(k) Retirement Plan
Paid time off and Holidays
EO Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.
","['excel', 'sql', 'java']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'java', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Principle Duties and Responsibilities
Perform monthly financial close functions, including preparation of and posting of journal entries and other analytical reporting
Maintain and reconciliation of source system to the general ledger
Assist with monthly and quarterly close process
Evaluate general accounting processes, make recommendations, and drive solutions to automate processes/reconciliations
Development of internal reports and analysis thereof using Tableau such as statistical report, variance and expense report
Assist with Financial Statement Reviews of Insureds
Lead on implementation of new budget tool
Special projects as assigned by Controller or CFO
Qualifications and Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Accounting, Finance or Computer Science or equivalent work experience
Advanced Level of Microsoft Excel
Technical aptitude and knowledge to create Microsoft SQL Queries and leverage mature data warehouse environment
Proven Experience using Business Intelligence tools which provide impactful reports & analysis.
Tableau and/or Essbase experience a Plus.
Insurance industry knowledge is a Plus
Excellent analytical skills, able to research and resolve issues quickly and independently
Ability to effectively communicate and collaborate with all levels of management and staff across various functional departments.
Project management skills and experience is a Plus
Ability to effectively work in a fast-pace environment with competing demands on resources, time and priorities
Demonstrated ability to be proactive, complete assignments and meet deadlines
Ideal candidate possesses a natural curiosity and inclination to analyze all aspects of a situation.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst III
Houston, TX
Summary: The Business Analyst Assistant will assist in seamless delivery of Learning and Development (L&D) services to the Procurement/Supply Chain Management function.
Position requires intermediate to advanced excel skills and experience within SuccessFactors LMS and SAP is preferred.
Strong problem-solving skills, interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively in a diverse workforce are also necessary.
The successful candidate should be flexible, self-motivated, conscientious, learns quickly, anticipates needs, and has demonstrated ability to multi-task.
Job category
Branch
Pay rate
Posted date
5/14/2020
Job ID
Job type
Responsibilities for this position may include, but are not limited to:
SuccessFactors LMS administration duties: o Training course metrics, including creation, tracking and reporting of metrics o Creates, maintains and closes courses in LMS o Processes participants certificates o Maintains the P/SCM function training inventory and communicates upcoming classes for registration o Generates LMS reports and advises of participant headcount for upcoming classes
Processes training invoices through SAP and Ariba, redirecting training costs to participant cost centers.
Updates and maintains L&D/OC SharePoint site.
Monitors L&D mailbox and responds to inquiries
General L&D Administrative Support: Catering and class logistical support, provides guidance regarding course logistics and expenses associated with training events; other miscellaneous administrative support.
Required Qualifications:
High School Diploma or equivalent.
3+ years of administrative support and/or experience in OC or L&D.
Must be professional, responsive and flexible to changing priorities, and be customer focused.
Strong proficiency in Excel and SAP, and proficient with MS Office (Word, Forms and PowerPoint).
Demonstrated understanding of basic HR/OC products, services, policies, and practices and/or where to obtain counsel.
Ability to use data to support conclusions and recommendations for action with error-free output.
Strong planning and organizational skills.
Demonstrated ability to manage and complete multiple tasks while working with tight deadlines and changing priorities.
Works with minimal supervision and guidance.
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills.
Ability to build positive working relationships and effectively works with various levels of customers; managers and peers with different working styles.
Preferred Qualifications:
Knowledge or exposure working in Learning and Development
SharePoint Administration skills
Ariba experience
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'busi', 'recommend']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'logist', 'supervis', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Need the consultant who has very good understanding of advance excel and good communication
Please work this req
Rate : $65/hr on C2C to $70
Houston, Texas – Aldine Westfield Drive (Only local)
Job title : Business Analyst
Lead Business Analyst
Duration:
6 Months.
Renewal will be based upon business needs.
Essential Responsibilities:
Onsite Analyst to facilitate data integration across multiple platforms
Gather business data integration requirements
Manipulate excel spreadsheets for uploading in various systems
Coordinate and collaborate with business and IT teams
Works with business and project teams to troubleshoot issues with data integration
Qualifications/Requirements:
· Bachelor Degree in Business or Information Technology
· Minimum of 10 years of hands-on experience in IT
· Excellent MS Office Skills (Excel, Word, Outlook, etc.)
· Demonstrates a logical and structured approach to time management and task prioritization.
· Strong verbal and written communication skills.
· Ability to work under pressure and to strict deadline
· Self-Motivated
Desired Characteristics:
Excellent communication, organizational and time management skills with ability to manage multiple priorities and meet deadlines
Client focused and support oriented, with strong customer service skills
Analytical and Detail Oriented
Action oriented and drive results
Adaptable to changing environment
Assumptions:
Local (Houston based) resources only, no travel required.
Baker Hughes is not paying for travel for out of town consultants.
Equipment List, SOW Specific Software and other Tools:
Baker Hughes will supply laptop with standard software package and sign-on credentials for consultant.
Houston, Texas – Aldine Westfield Drive
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
• Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
• Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
• Performing requirements analysis.
• Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
• Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
• Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
• Managing competing resources and priorities.
Requirements:
• Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
• The ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions.
• Advanced technical skills.
• Excellent documentation skills.
• Fundamental analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
• Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
• Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
• Experience leading and developing top performing teams.
",['excel'],['busi'],999.0,"['excel', 'busi']"
BA,"The ideal candidate will be energetic, adaptable, detail oriented, capable of understanding a diverse set of business systems, and knowledgeable of how data flows across departments in an organization.
Responsibilities
Capture and document user stories, map workflows, and write specifications to develop processes and systems that focus on the customer's journey
Design and maintain business intelligence and analytics reports to provide quality assurance and monitoring of business processes, as well as providing insight to stakeholders for continuous improvement of the business
Collaborate with internal stakeholders to solve application issues, system integration deficiencies, and process breakdowns
Evaluate various manual processes and own the implementation of automation to replace them
Analyze data on customer environments to ensure consistency across platforms
Analyze process flows and automation between applications and teams to identify trends, patterns, and opportunities to scale the business
Develop and maintain business application design documentation (data maps, process flows, system integration diagrams and departmental interdependencies)
Support critical business applications ensuring they are continuously operational across technical departments
Work with application vendors to address issues
Requirements
The following skills represent the minimum requirements to be considered for this position:
Bachelor's degree in Management Information Systems or a related field
5+ years of experience as an Information Technology Business Analyst or similar position
Proven track record of capturing and documenting user stories, process mapping, and application designs, specifically pertaining to development of automation efforts
Excellent technical capabilities in navigating different software and systems
Demonstrated project delivery of cross-functional, technical projects for business outcomes
Strong ability to influence and collaborate with a diverse set of teams and roles
Understanding of the ""as-a-service"" business model and cloud-based services
Strong attention to detail
Excellent analytical and technical skills
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Excellent planning and organizational skills
Preferred Skills
The following skills represent additional proficiencies preferred to be successful in this position:
Cross team process mapping/building
Business intelligence software, such as Tableau
Experience working with different types of requirements models: Use cases, user stories, wireframes, etc.
Knowledge of scripting languages and tools
Basic understanding of the concepts of data backup/replication
Obsessed problem solver
Good listener with low ego
Capable of working independently with minimal supervision
Benefits
Competitive Salary
Bonus Plan
Stock Plan
PPO Healthcare Insurance Plan
Dental Insurance
Vision Insurance
Life Insurance
Short-Term Disability Insurance
Long-Term Disability Insurance
Paid Vacation & Holidays
The result of this investment is a rapid development cycle with up to four product releases per year.
Gartner Magic Quadrant Disaster Recovery as a Service Leader: 2016-2019
Zerto Service Provider of the Year: 2016 & 2017
Veeam Service Provider of the Year: 2016 & 2017
The Forrester Wave Top DR-as-a-Service Providers: Q1 2014
Houston Business Journal #1 Best Place to Work: 2012 & 2013
Nine Lives Media Inc. Talkin Cloud 100: 2011, 2012 & 2013
Houston Business Journal Houston Fast 100: 2012 & 2013
Cisco Cloud Managed Service Provider (Cisco Powered)
VMware Global Service Provider Partner (VSPP) of the Year: 2010-2012
","['tableau', 'excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst Houston TX 6 months (W2 Only) Industry Waste Management Needs Peoplesoft Conducts highly complex business process analyses, needs assessments, and preliminary costbenefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
Responsibilities To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
bull Works at the highest technical level of most phases of systems analysis while considering the business implications of the application of technology to the current and future business environment.
bull Coordinates with users to determine business and user requirements, process flow definitions, and functional specifications.
bull Coordinates documentation of requirements and formulation of test plans.
bull Develops and manages development of highly complex information systems, or revisions to existing system logic difficulties as necessary to meet business requirements.
bull Reviews progress and evaluates results for accuracy and efficiency.
bull Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
bull Guides and advises less-experienced Business Systems Analysts and other computer support staff.
bull Acts as team leader on systems projects.
Establishes and communicates common goal and direction for the team.
Coordinates activities of the project team, project plans, and assists in monitoring project schedules and costs.
Supervisory Responsibilities Some informal supervisory duties, such as delegation of tasks, may be required.
Qualifications Bachelorrsquos Degree, or equivalent experience, in Computer Science, MIS, Business Administration or similar area of study, and seven or more years previous experience.
Preferred Masterrsquos Degree.
Preferred PMI Certification.
ScrumAgile experience using JIRA May require intermediate skills in one or more of the following PeopleSoft HRMS systems development, implementation, upgrades and analyses, QA testing, catalyst or unified business modeling, system design and analysis, web application development, imaging technology, subject matter knowledge such as benefits, payroll, and basic accounting, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
",['jira'],"['commun', 'account', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'account', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"This is a hybrid role of PM and BA with 3 to 5 years of experience.
The individual needs to not only manage the project but must be able to do details analysis of number of different commodities trading instruments.
Strong preference of Commodities experience is preferred.
The individual demonstrates an understanding of customer’s goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions.
Effectively manages project risk.
Coordinates the work efforts of multiple functional teams through a project plan.
Manages basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders.
Analyzes and reports project status.
Monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content.
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.
Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.
4 year degree.)
Great presentation skills, possesses a commanding presence Commodities knowledge is nice to have.
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Designation
Senior Business Analyst
14-Jul-2020
SR Number
ERS/ERS/2020/1290655
Country
USA
No.
of Positions
1
Auto req ID
698779BR
Experience
5-8 Years
Skill (Primary)
Technical Skills (ERS)-Teamcenter Unified-Teamcenter Functional
Qualification
B Tech
Texas
Job Family
Engineering(Product Lifecycle Mgmt.)
Employee Group
Business Line FT
To act as a liaison between the business and technical teams| understand, analyze, prioritize and document business requirements| suggest design solutions to the assigned project team as per the business requirement.
(1.)
To understand the business requirements, document, analyze, prioritize and map them to functional specifications.
Maintain business requirements in a standard format ( BRD Business Requirements Document).
(2.)
To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (3.)
To analyze and suggest design solutions (4.)
To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements ensuring traceability.
(5.)
To prepare the functional specification document (FRS Functional Requirement Specification) and ensure for completeness, coverage and storage.
Entity
CSW
City
Houston
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll interact with colleagues in various lines of businesses to learn about challenges and opportunities, and translate that insight into high-quality solutions.
In addition to working with the development team to create new solutions, you'll help optimize existing technology and identify new capabilities.
While your role requires deep technological skills - including expertise in everything from data management to functional design - it also hinges on teamwork and leadership.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"The ERP Business Analyst provides insight, guidance and recommendations to identify design enhancements and systems configuration opportunities to improve the utilization of the various ERP modules/applications.
The nature of this work requires an individual whose background combines business expertise and business management skills with an understanding of information technology, and knowledge of the assigned enterprise-wide software and modules.
Primary duties of this position include:
Business systems analysis, project management, workflow analysis, and technical communications.
Provides project coordination, functional expertise, and contributes to improvements and enhancements for mission-critical, enterprise-wide information systems.
Must have problem solving and analytical skills, as well as the ability to communicate information to both technical and non-technical users will be key.
Must have an ability to manage multiple tasks, respond quickly to emergent problems, and to focus both on long-range projects and immediate tasks required to maintain system functionality.
Must have a full understanding of the ERP systems life cycle and be able to guide the team through full SDLC lifecycle of planning, design, development, testing, implementing, maintaining and supporting application software that is delivered on time and within budget.
Serves as a liaison to the technical resources to manage the development of new system functionality, upgrades, system modifications, and day-to-day problem analysis, issue tracking, and resolution.
Maintains effective communication (Oral & Written) between product owner and IT to ensure customer satisfaction.
Facilitates planning and design sessions to clearly document the functional requirements that comply with organization standards to obtain a scope sign off from the directors/product owner(s) effected
Collaborates and facilitates product demos / UAT sessions to ensure customer needs are met prior to deployment.
Analyzes impact of patches and development work on existing functionality/customizations and coordinate their migration to the production system as appropriate
Works with technical resources to develop, test and document software necessary to implement the requested solution
Assists in issue resolution and in the determination of business solutions
Manages small to medium projects involving the various business functions
Directs and coordinates work of others to develop, test, install and/or modify programs per requirements
Facilitates continuous process improvement opportunities
Provides alternative options for any client requests
Ensures adherence to Methodology, IT Controls, and Quality Standards
Ensures proper testing of developed solution is completed
Conducts end user training when needed and prepare user documentation
Prepares or coordinates the preparation of technical reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
https://hrrm.harriscountytx.gov/Pages/EqualEmploymentOpportunityPlan.aspx
If you need special services or accommodations, please call (713) 274-5445 or email
ADACoordinator@bmd.hctx.net
Requirements
High school diploma, or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution AND five (5) years of progressive work experience as a ERP business analyst AND experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation).
Additional Requirements:
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP application and knowledge of various modules (HR, Payroll, Purchasing and Finance).
Experience using Microsoft Office tools.
Experience with Agile and Waterfall projects.
Experience using Visio or similar tool.
Experience with Change Management practices.
Experience with systems analysis, design and a solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies.
Experience with backlog management, along with creating detailed specifications from which programs will be written.
May have quality assurance responsibilities.
Ability to work independently.
Must possess excellent written and oral communication skills and be self-driven.
Must have strong reporting knowledge.
NOTE: To qualify for this position, required education, experience, knowledge and skills must be clearly stated on your application's employment history.
NOTE:
Applicants for this position will be subject to a criminal background check that includes being fingerprinted.
This applies to any position with network access to CJI (Criminal Justice Information) systems or access to an area where CJI is received, maintained or stored either manually or electronically (i.e.
custodian, maintenance).
Automatic Disqualifiers:
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for any Felony.
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for any Class A Misdemeanor.
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for a Class B Misdemeanor if within the previous 10 years.
Open arrest for any criminal offense (Felony or Misdemeanor).
Family Violence conviction.
Preferences
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university.
PeopleSoft Certified.
Knowledge of HCM or FSCM modules in PeopleSoft.
Experience in PeopleSoft v9.2.
General Information
Houston, TX
HOURS:
40 hours per week/ Monday - Friday.
Weekends and 24 on-call infrequently, as needed.
SALARY:
Depends on Qualifications
Based on 26 Pay Periods
Due to a high volume of applications positions may close prior to the advertised closing date.
BENEFITS
Medical
Dental
Vision
Wellness
Life Insurance
Long-term disability
Employee Assistance Program
10 days of vacation each year for the first five (5) years of service.
Accrual rates increase based on years of service.
Professional development opportunities
Dependent Care Reimbursement Plan
Healthcare Reimbursement Account
457 Deferred Compensation Plan
Retirement pension (TCDRS)
Flexible schedules (varies by department)
Transportation Assistance (Metro RideSponsor Program)
https://hrrm.harriscountytx.gov/Pages/Medical.aspx
01
Which of the follow best describes your education as it relates to this position?
High school diploma, or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution
Bachelors degree or higher
None of the above
02
Please describe your educational background including the level of education completed, area of study, and completed major and minor programs.
03
Which of the following best describe your progressive work experience as ERP business analyst?
Less than five years
Five years or more, but less than six
Six years or more, but less than seven
Seven years or more, but less than eight
Eight years or more
I do not have this experience
04
Please describe your progressive work experience as ERP business analyst.
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
05
Do you have experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation)?
Yes
No
06
Which of the following best describe your experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation)?
Less than six months
Six months are more but less than one year
One year or more, but less than two
Two years or more, but less than three
Three years or more, but less than four
Four years or more, but less than five
Five or more years
I do not have this experience
07
Please describe your experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation),
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
08
Do you have experience in any of the following?
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP application and knowledge of various modules (HR, Payroll, Purchasing and Finance).
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP.
Experience using Microsoft Office tools.
Experience with Agile and Waterfall projects.
Experience using Visio or similar tool.
Experience with Change Management practices.
Experience with systems analysis, design and a solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies.
Experience with backlog management, along with creating detailed specifications from which programs will be written.
None of the above
09
Please briefly describe your experience to your selection choice to question #8.
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
10
Do you have a PeopleSoft Certificate?
Yes
No
11
Do you have knowledge of HCM or FSCM modules in PeopleSoft?
Yes
No
12
Do you have experience in PeopleSoft v9.2?
Yes
No
* Required Question
","['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"SUMMARY
TheSenior Business Analyst is responsible for product execution throughout the product lifecycle, including conducting research, creating and aligning product strategy with corporate strategy, defining the product roadmap, requirements gathering and documentation, release management and readiness of their products, measuring the effects of these activities, and using metrics to feedback into the process.
This role has an additional critical function of working closely with other product managers to align roadmaps and works closely with other stakeholders to define the product strategies.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.Other duties may be assigned.
Communicate clear priorities and status of roadmap items to all stakeholders.
Responsible for maintaining relationships and understanding expectations.
Work closely with internal customers in order to understand customer issues and propose solutions.
Manage, coordinate, and establish priorities for complete product life-cycle including the planning, design, development, testing, implementation, and commercialization of business solutions.
Support the creation of business cases for future project proposals, highlighting how new business opportunities are expected to promote sustainable business growth.
Work with cross-company product managers to ensure strategic product roadmaps are successfully executed.
Implement key metrics for product features and analyze metrics to verify objectives are progressing as planned.
Initiate marketing strategies, maintain product development roadmaps, and execute product launch activities.
Participate in and foster a working environment where creativity, innovation, ownership, and teamwork are encouraged and rewarded.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
None
QUALIFICATIONS:
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Business/Marketing Degree with Computer Science minor, or equivalent work experience
7+ years of software product management/business analyst experience
Experience in an AGILE working environment
Industry experience in IT-enabled healthcare or animal health is highly desirable.
Exposure to project management/information sharing tools like JIRA, Confluence, Lucid Charts, Balsamiq, etc.
highly desirable.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None
COMPETENCIES (SKILLS AND ABILITIES)
Deep understanding of Agile product lifecycle; including planning, development, and implementation.
Exceptional communication, presentation, active listening, analytical, and financial skills.
Strong leadership capabilities with experience in managing cross-functional teams, especially in highly leveraged, fast growth environments.
Ability to think critically and creatively and to contribute in a team environment.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENT
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Pet friendly environment
Extensive computer work
Covetrus is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
",['jira'],"['analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['jira', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Title: Salesforce Business Analyst
Rate: DOE
Duration: 6+ months
Interview times for next week
Must Haves:
Experience in Salesforce (SFDC) CRM- Sales and Service Cloud end to end implementation experience, systems development, implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
Job Summary
Conducts business process analysis, detailed requirement gathering, document user stories, prioritize backlog and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
• Possess a fundamental understanding of end-to-end customer experience integration and dependencies.
• Works in an Agile environment and continuously reviews the business needs, refines priorities, outlines milestones and deliverables, and identifies opportunities and risks.
• Develops, owns, and executes product roadmap.
• Translates product roadmap features into well-defined product requirements including features, epics, user stories, and acceptance test criteria.
• Prioritizes and maintains the sprint backlog for assigned products, balancing the requirements of stakeholders.
• Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet business requirements and fulfill user stories
• Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
• Collaborate with developers to test and verify that solutions will meet the business requirements
• Participate in key meetings including discovery sessions, sprint demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Please send resumes to sean.mullen@mondo.com
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['risk', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'risk', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Core Responsibilities:
Facilitate and support the preparation, roll-up, analysis, and review of annual departmental operating budgets and monthly forecasts.
Monitor, analyze, reconcile, and prepare detailed and summary cost reports and presentations, including compiling variance explanations and cost performance results by line of business and budget accountability area.
Decision Making:
Operates more independent, decisions range from those governed by general policy to those on technical or complex issues within authorized limits.
Duties: Uses independent judgment to handle situations outside standard methods and resolve difficult problems.
Your engineering skills are in demand, but how do you find the right fit?
Easy.
Whether you prefer the variety and flexibility of short-term projects, or are looking for something more long-term, were here every step of the way to find your dream engineering job.
Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law. ]]
",[None],"['account', 'forecast', 'busi']",999.0,"['account', 'forecast', 'busi']"
BA,"This position is responsible for the support of the 9.2 PeopleSoft Financials platform (with a focus on General Ledger).
This includes requirements gathering, application configuration, end-user support and testing for ongoing enhancements to the production application.
The role provides functional expertise and contributes to improvements and enhancements for mission-critical, enterprise-wide information systems**
Job* *Duties and Responsibilities: *
Serve as a liaison to the Accounting team in maintaining the best practice accounting processes in PSFT FSCM.
Tasks include but are not limited to updating PS setups, Trees, Reports, Queries, Combo Edit Rules, Allocations, supporting month-end & year-end.
Assists in the analysis, design, and development of PeopleSoft deliverables based on business requirements.
Educate and advise on PeopleSoft FSCM functionality with emphasis on General Ledger modules.
Work with technical resources to develop, test and document software to implement and maintain an operational system
Review / validate client's requirements and identify opportunities for improvement based on available system functionality and best practices.
Ensures that project deliverables meet business requirements and ensure to the complete project within assigned timelines.
Prepare or coordinate the preparation of reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
Provides support in all phases of SDLC.
Independently determine and develop approaches to solutions, - Partner with Business, IT, and Vendors.
Requirements*
High school diploma or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution; *_and_*
Five (5) years of experience supporting PeopleSoft General Ledger (GL) version 9.0 and above is a must.
Experience with Billing, Accounts Receivable, Grants modules will be plus.
PeopleSoft Query and or SQL knowledge to extract data for analysis.
Highly proficiency in SDLC practice.
Experience creating functional specifications, planning and design documents.
Hands on experience in ERP Change Management practices.
End to end knowledge of major accounting processes.
Experience using Microsoft Office package (Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Word)
Effort estimation.
Strong verbal and written skills.
Strong documentation skills.
Preferences*
Bachelors Degree
Experience working in public sector
Prior experience in Accounting
Nvision
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $35.00 - $42.00 per hour
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 3 years (Required)
PeopleSoft: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Contract Length:
7 - 11 months
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Geo Tech/Business Analyst
Vacancy Number: 25331
Date Posted: January 28, 2020
Geo Tech/Business Analyst
Duration: 9 months
Schedule: 5/40
Data must be inventoried and tracked through the process, with management dashboards generated.
Key Accountabilities
• Manages release and control of updates to project: instructions, specifications, drawings and other documentation.
• Controls distribution of new releases and recall/destruction of obsolete documents, both electronic and hard copy, according to SET retention rules.
• Responsible for manual and electronic archiving of documentation according to SET retention rules.
Requirements
• 7+ years of subsurface data management
• 5+ years in a customer facing role
• Understanding of subsurface well & seismic data
• Experience with both Landmark data environment & reporting tools such as Web OpenWorks etc.
• Experience with both Schlumberger Petrel & Petrel Studio data environment & reporting tools
• Hybrid background of Geo & Business Analyst experience
Preferred
• Landmark well data management – reporting
• Schlumberger Petrel and Petrel Studio data extraction and reporting
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.
",[None],"['busi', 'dashboard', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['busi', 'dashboard', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration Work Experience 1-3 years City Houston State/Province Texas Zip/Postal Code 77011
Supports changes and enhancements from development through production.
recommending and implementing system enhancements e.g., screen appearance, report distribution and setup testing.
https://innovasourcing.com/yjvo
View similar jobs
",[None],['recommend'],999.0,['recommend']
BA,"Responsibilities:
· Must possess strong communication skills.
· Must be able to make business decisions based off of analyzed data
· Perform User Acceptance testing
· Provide leadership, training, coaching, and guidance to junior staff members
· Evaluate business processes, suggest areas for improvement and develop and implement solutions
· Lead ongoing reviews of business processes and develop optimization strategies
Requirements:
· Minimum of 3 years' experience as Business Analyst or related field.
· Analytical and conceptual thinking skills
· Advanced technical skills
· Proven track record of following through on commitments
· Excellent planning, organizational and time management skills
· Excellent documentation skills
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job DescriptionSUMMARYThe Business Analyst is the liaison between business domain experts, development and operational groups and may also interact with external customers.
Primary responsibilities include reviewing existing business processes for compliance and operational efficiencies, gathering business requirements for system enhancements, prepare systems requirements documentation for technical and end-users, and becoming a subject matter expert on the specific programs assigned.Essential Duties:* Project Analysis - Assists project manager and project resources to coordinate projects; prepares business requirements documents, develops and maintains project plans, communicates changes and project status; shares responsibility for the project success.
* Reviews existing business processes and workflows to determine operational compliance and efficiencies.
Defines changes to the processes and workflows as appropriate.
* Performs data validation to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of operational activities related to existing business processes or new implementation projects.
* Customer Service - Responds in a positive and professional manner to internal and external customers.
Maintains a professional approach with difficult or emotional customer situations; Responds promptly to customer needs; Responds to requests for service and assistance; Meets commitments.
* Documents all work thoroughly and accurately.
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"About WestRock
WestRocks 50,000 team members support customers around the world from more than 320 operating and business locations spanning North America, South America, Europe, Asia and Australia.
Learn more at www.westrock.com.
Business Analyst- Houston, TX
5800-Houston Corp
3555 Timmons Ln, Ste 1400
Houston, Texas, 77027
United States
Based in Houston, Texas, Victory Packaging has more than 65 warehouses and distribution facilities in the United States, Canada and Mexico.
Business Analyst Houston, TX
The opportunity:
Â Â Â Â Â Â Develop, test, implement, and maintain various business intelligence and reporting applications
Â Â Â Â Â Â Produce weekly/monthly as well as ad-hoc reports and perform analysis for different departments
Â Â Â Â Â Â Create custom queries to extract data from enterprise database and other data sources
Â Â Â Â Â Â Provide analytical support to optimize processes and improve efficiencies of different departments
Â Â Â Â Â Â Provides ad-hoc research and analytical support to business users.
Research and resolve data discrepancies
Â Â Â Â Â Â Assist in gathering information, analyzing user requests, and translating the same to functional specs
Â Â Â Â Â Â Assists in prospecting and analyzing new business
Â Â Â Â Â Â Produce, update, and maintain documentation for available reports
Â Â Â Â Â Â Provide technical support and training to end users in using business intelligence/reporting tools
Â What you need to succeed:
Bachelors in Information Systems, Engineering, Computer Science, or related field
2+ years of experience working with MS Excel.
Ability to write macros and VBA code is a plus
Demonstrated ability to write complex SQL statements and stored procedures
Experience working with relational databases
Experience with AS400/iSeries (query interface), DB2, and MS SQL Server is a plus
Â Experience in R and Alteryx a plus
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Basic knowledge of statistical analysis
Â Â Â Â Â Â Corporate culture based on integrity, respect, accountability and excellence
Â Â Â Â Â Â Comprehensive training with numerous learning and development opportunities
Â Â Â Â Â Â An attractive salary reflecting skills, competencies and potential
#CB
","['r', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql']","['data', 'end user', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'statist']"
BA,"Duration: 12+ Months
IAM BA
Responsibilities:
• Work with IAM Architects to analyze/Refine Requirements for SSO architecture
• Perform application design activities (e.g.
writing functional designs, use cases), portions of technical architecture, High Level Design (Software Design Specifications), Detailed Design Documents
• Document, plan, and execute maintenance and changes for business critical IAM systems.
• Develop and implement testing strategies and robust change management processes.
• Develop a strong understanding of business and system dependencies to avoid service disruptions.
• Create, review and maintain department documentation to ensure it reflects current policies and procedures.
• Collaborate with QA team for all testing cycles
• Guiding users in building business cases, performing impact analysis, and supporting application testing, implementation and training activities throughout the process
• Communicates technical content to assigned project stakeholders.
Qualifications:
• Minimum of 5 years experience as an Enterprise business analyst
• knowledge of Identity and Access Management protocols and technologies: OAuth, OpenID Connect, SAML, Federation, SSO, etc.
• Minimum 2 years Experience with process modeling tools
• Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
• Strong written and verbal communication skills needed; ability to tailor approach based upon
audience and message.
The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
",[None],"['machine learning', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['machine learning', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This job is responsible for producing various ad-hoc and recurring reports from the SAP billing system or data warehouse equivalent (e.g.
IRW) for Executive/management, Customer Operations, Account Management (i.e.
customer requests), Marketing, ARM and Finance.
In addition, this job is responsible for creating support tools to assist with daily business operations.
The purpose of the team is to achieve an increase in the effectiveness of the Reporting data being utilized across the organization by eliminating redundant data and consolidating reports where appropriate and reducing work required to push data to users by automating as many recurring reports as possible.
Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
• Developing reports using Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) and supporting other analysts who use SQL Server Data Tools
• Knowledge of development and running reports in PC SAS and Unix SAS environments desired.
• Knowledge of automation tools like worksoft ,winrunner would be an additional asset.
• Participate in development and implementation of appropriate methods for monitoring, analyzing, and preparing data for management reports and statistics.
• Helping to gather and/or clarify data and reporting requirements from business owners
• Developing and maintaining database stored procedures
• Assimilate information from various environments and develop queries or reporting solutions to fulfill business needs.
Recognize data anomalies to analyze and troubleshoot to determine cause.
• Utilize thorough knowledge of table structure and reporting environments to gather data to report metrics.
Generate effective reports and manipulate data in reports to provide key metrics to business operations.
• Demonstrate proficiency in SAP and external systems to diagnose and correct failures and errors from a reporting perspective.
• Participate in developing and implementation of new processes and tools to streamline workflow.
• Provide innovative solutions.
Document and communicate technical data requirements for development of system queries and reports to support ongoing root cause analysis.
• Prepares documentation on business and functional processes in support of reporting activities.
• Interact and consult with other areas/departments regarding Reporting issues and activities.
Additional Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Ability to import, export, and manipulate data files between various IT applications and databases (e.g.
Oracle, SAP, BW) is preferred
• Ability to develop recommendations/action plans and manage multiple projects simultaneously.
• Must be detail oriented.
Clearly communicates complex technical concepts both in a written and oral manner.
• Excellent problem- solving skills and ability to use good judgment to make recommendations and decisions.
• Ability to prioritize both routine and unpredictable work activities and identify exceptions and recommend solutions.
• Ability to import, export, and manipulate data files between various IT applications and databases (e.g., Oracle, SAP, BW) is preferred.
• Excellent personal computer skills within a Windows environment demonstrating advanced working knowledge of Microsoft Office applications.
(Word, Excel, Access)
• Knowledge of SAP (SAP and BW) is desired.Knowledge of statistical analysis (including time-series, sampling, probability, regression, linear programming and forecasting) is desired.
• Ability to use fundamental math daily (add, subtract, multiply, divide, and calculate percentages).
• Ability to conceptualize, negotiate and communicate innovative concepts or ideas to work groups or management level representatives.
• Ability to meet deadlines.
Must be dependable and available.
• Ability to develop and make formal presentations to internal and external groups.
• Interact and consult with other areas/departments regarding Reporting issues and activities.
Education: Bachelor’s degree or equivalent education and/or work experience.
Experience:
• At least 2 years’ experience in: Microsoft SQL Server (which uses the T-SQL ANSI/SQL development standards), SSRS (SQL Server Report Services), SSIS/DTS package development, Visual Studio, VisualBasic.net.
Microsoft SSAS, cube development, and .NET experience is a plus.
• 2+ years’ experience in data mining, querying / accessing large data sets and developing key business reports and metrics.
• Experience writing stored procedures, T-SQL, functions, and SQL queries.Experience utilizing report writing best practices (optimization, use of joins and sub-queries)
• Experience with manual testing to include User Acceptance Testing (UAT)
• Experience pulling data from Microsoft SQL Server 2005/2008 R2/2012/2014, Oracle, SAP, text files, excel files, MS Access databases for reports
• Experience with cubes and drill down/drill through reports
• Experience with SQL Server Data Tools (SSDT) SSRS/SSIS/SSAS, Visual Studio, and/or other (non-Microsoft) reporting platforms
• A minimum of 1-4 years’ experience in billing, enrollments, and/or work within SAP is required.
• Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word, Power Point).
","['unix', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'dt', 'sql', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa']","['probabl', 'regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'math', 'anomali', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['unix', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'dt', 'sql', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa', 'probabl', 'regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'math', 'anomali', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Position Purpose:
Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function.
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations
Identify ways to enhance performance management and operational reports related to new business implementation processes
Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Diagnose problems and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
Formulate and update departmental policies and procedures
Serve as the subject matter expert on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance.
Ability to travel
Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
4-6 years of business process or data analysis experience, preferably in healthcare.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
4 years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements).
Experience in healthcare industry, preferably with managed care techniques and administrative philosophy.
Experience working with and leading diverse teams in matrix managed environments.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst IV
Vacancy Number: 24280
Date Posted: September 09, 2019
Business Analyst serves as a liaison to functional Business Leads in order to translate and prioritize requirements for assigned area project and maintenance work for GTM Operations.
Key Responsibilities:
Indirect report to the Project Manager to assist with project scope definition and provide business analysis support throughout the project lifecycle.
May assist the Project Manager with project management tasks as needed, documentation, issues, change requests, status, etc.
Strong writing skills to prepare business cases, current state (as-is) and future state (to be) analysis, process flow mapping, RACI and RAPID model, business process optimization recommendations, workshop facilitations, and training content.
Assists the business in identifying proper controls, recommendations for automation, and understands integration with other interdependent programs.
Responsible for preparing business requirements (business rules, business/functional/technical) specifications and managing requests for changes to the specifications.
Maintains functional peer relationships and detailed working knowledge of the assigned areas systems, organization, and business processes.
Ability to translate business information into terms understandable by non-IT savvy personnel.
Coordinate and participate in UAT and testing activities.
Can act as a cross functional Business Analyst to support multiple areas of the business, as needed (e.g.
pipeline integrity, facility integrity, asset management, work management, compliance, etc.)
Criteria & Qualifications
Business Analyst certification, related degree and/or a minimum of 10 years related experience within the oil and gas industry
Understanding of project lifecycle stage gating controls and importance of document and records management
Ability to support, adapt to change quickly, and move across various types of projects when needed
Excellent writing skills, problem solving skills, interpersonal skills, oral communication skills, and time management
Adept at interacting in both business and IT focused discussions with a strong understanding of information technology and its application to solving business problems
Ability to influence and negotiate with clients and 3rd party vendors
Proficient at operating within a North Americanly distributed team
Advanced experience with Microsoft Office products, especially Visio
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Globally, the group’s over 44,000+ Professionals serve across 60 delivery centers in 16 countries worldwide.
SUMMARY
The Business Analyst is the liaison between business domain experts, development and operational groups and may also interact with external customers.
Essential Duties:
Project Analysis – Assists project manager and project resources to coordinate projects; prepares business requirements documents, develops and maintains project plans, communicates changes and project status; shares responsibility for the project success.
Reviews existing business processes and workflows to determine operational compliance and efficiencies.
Defines changes to the processes and workflows as appropriate.
Performs data validation to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of operational activities related to existing business processes or new implementation projects.
Documents all work thoroughly and accurately.
Qualifications
Qualifications:
· Bachelor’s degree in computer technology discipline desirable.
· Technical writing and documentation skills are essential.
Intermediate to Advanced skills with Microsoft Office tools (MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio.
Project) necessary to document, track and present information related to the program/products supported.
· Strong quantitative, analytical, problem solving, organizational, communication and interpersonal skills are required.
· Strong Ad-hoc SQL query skills.
Advanced knowledge of relational databases and ability to independently extract data using multiple tables, joins, and various complex data manipulation query logic statements.
· Superior data manipulation skills and ability to understand and interpret operational data and or processes.
· Knowledge of health system functions (especially claims data), terminology and standard ICD 9/10 and CPT coding systems highly desirable..
· Ability to comprehend complex technical and logical concepts and adapt quickly to changes.
· Ability to define and scope new projects and assigned tasks.
· Ability to prioritize and manage concurrent projects, demonstrate initiative and work independently with minimal supervision.
· Strong understanding of the software development life cycle and experience with project planning tools and methodologies.
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title: Adobe Analytics Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ month contract (long-term project!)
Rate: DOE
Start Date: ASAP!
"" Manage assigned projects focusing on digital marketing strategies; including engagement, retention, customer satisfaction, and revenue generation.
""
""
Partner with internal teams to ensure highly complex, extensive email campaigns are designed and executed flawlessly to meet business goals.
""
Oversee email marketing strategies to ensure complete success from conception to completion.
Set up multiple programs and mechanics within a code deployment.
""
Recommends and refines segmented targeting, implements testing strategies, develops schedules, writes optimization rules, and audits waterfalls produced by the Marketing Information Management Team.
""
Review email creative submissions and confirm conformity to branding guidelines and email best practices including ADA digital guidelines.
""
""
Focus to detail, while managing multiple email campaigns simultaneously is of utmost importance.
""
Ensure quality deliverables are disseminated on or before deadlines.
""
""
Drive compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices with transparency.
""
Adheres to web metric standards and best practices when measuring traffic and evaluating activity.
Requirements:
Website tagging & digital analytics
Ability to write business requirements and specifications
Comfortable working on multiple projects at the same time
Experience working with Adobe Analytics & Google Analytics
Background with SEM and SEO
Nice to Have :
Managed PPC campaigns
Can read and write JavaScript
Can perform jQueries
Hands-on experience with website tagging and debugging tools (Adobe Experience Manager)
Comfortable navigating Dynamic Tag Manager, Adobe Launch, Telium, Google Tag Manager or similar technologies
Has managed content in CMS's like AEM, WordPress, Joomla, Wix or similar technologies
Background in digital marketing or advertising
","['javascript', 'jqueri']","['optim', 'recommend', 'busi', 'segment']",999.0,"['javascript', 'jqueri', 'optim', 'recommend', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"The individual needs to not only manage the project but must be able to do details analysis of number of different commodities trading instruments.+ Preference of Commodities experience is preferred.
The individual demonstrates an understanding of customer's goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions.+ Effectively manages project risk.
Coordinates the work efforts of multiple functional teams through a project plan.
**Responsibilities:**+ Manages basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.+ Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders.
Analyzes and reports project status.+ Monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content.+ Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.+ Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.+ Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.+ Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.
**Qualifications:**+ 4 year degree.
Great presentation skills, possesses a commanding presence Commodities knowledge is nice to have.location: Houston, Texasjob type: Contractsalary: $53 - 63 per hourwork hours: 9am to 5pmeducation: Bachelorsresponsibilities:+ Manages basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.+ Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders.
Analyzes and reports project status.+ Monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content.+ Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.+ Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.+ Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.+ Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.qualifications:+ Experience level: Experienced+ Minimum 4 years of experience+ Education: Bachelorsskills:+ Project Analyst+ Business Systems Analyst+ IT Project ManagerEqual Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Title: Network Business Analyst
Reports To: Provider Network Manager
Salary: DOE
Status: Exempt
Summary: The Healthcare Business Analyst is responsible for, and should have experience in, analyzing medical claims data sets in multiple formats and form factors and the ability to transform/manipulate this data to do insightful analysis yourself or providing this data to others.
The position will work across many different data formats including Excel, CSV, proprietary systems and experience in these formats and capabilities like PowerBI will be valuable.
The person in this role is expected to understand the impact of the data trends and have the ability to speak to the direction of the business based on results as needed.
A successful candidate for this role would be highly analytical and have a passion for data.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides advanced analytical support for business operations in all or some of the following areas: claims, provider data, member data, clinical data, pharmacy, external reporting,
Reviews data to determine operational impacts and needed actions; elevate issues, trends, areas for improvement and opportunities for management,
Partner with IT to develop appropriate dashboards and reports in support of the enterprise management operating system.
Responsible for understanding the various data sources available within the organization for reporting and analysis, as well as a clear understanding of business operations to be able to appropriately guide the development of quality program activities, including analysis and reporting in support of ongoing operations.
Significant participation in analysis, interpretation, and translating of complex health plan data, issues, trends, and relationships into effective strategies and action plans.
Establish and maintain effective working relationships with others throughout the organization.
Compiling and organizing healthcare data in support of program and/or plan audits and inquiries.
Using healthcare data to help achieve administrative needs and goals.
Investigating data to find patterns and trends.
Converting data into usable information that is easy to understand.
Developing reports and presentations.
Communicating business insights to management.
Leverage and analyze data to identify issues and processes needing improvement
Communicate findings to Management through standard and ad hoc reports
Support compliance posture of operations with federal and state deliverable reporting requirements by performing data quality audits and analysis.
Gather and interpret business requirements and partner with IT on driving enhanced monitoring and dashboards
Handle multiple projects and timelines effectively and communicate risks and issues to manager regularly
Other duties maybe assigned
Required Skills:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent work experience in business intelligence, analysis or related fields
Minimum 2 years experience in the use of statistical tools and various business reporting platforms such as Excel, PowerBI, Tableau, Qlikview
Working knowledge of data analysis, study methodology, and preparing professional documents.
Basic understanding of statistical methods.
Minimum 2 years’ experience working in the Healthcare industry.
Strong problem-solving capability, excellent interpersonal/ communication skills.
Strong attention to detail.
Medical claims codes familiarity ICD10, CPT, Revenue Codes, Bill Types, HCPCS
Medicare and/or Medicaid experience
Strong attention to detail, problem solving, and critical thinking skills
Ability to prioritize and multitask
Provider data
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 2 years (Required)
Healthcare: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['tableau', 'excel', 'powerbi']","['risk', 'data', 'dashboard', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'powerbi', 'risk', 'data', 'dashboard', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
• Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
• Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
• Performing requirements analysis.
• Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
• Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
• Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
• Managing competing resources and priorities.
Requirements:
• Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
• The ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions.
• Advanced technical skills.
• Excellent documentation skills.
• Fundamental analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
• Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
• Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
• Experience leading and developing top performing teams.
",['excel'],['busi'],999.0,"['excel', 'busi']"
BA,"Duties:
• Detailed documentation preparation for requirements, use cases, functional, non- functional requirements.
• Creating UML Diagrams.
• User Interface prototypes development.
• Process flow development.
• Conducting JAD sessions.
• Designing UI mockups.
Qualifications:
• Previous experience in business intelligence, analysis, or another related field.
• Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Master's degree in Business Administration, Management Information Systems, or any related business or IT management field of study that provided the required skills and knowledge, and 6 months of related experience in any position that provided the required skills and abilities.
No travel or telecommuting
Employee privileged benefits are offered.
Powered by JazzHR
KciS14K4Am
",[None],"['problem solving', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"This position provides support for division systems configuration, system testing and workflow processes.
It also provides technical expertise for identification, research and resolution of technical issues.
This position also supports the successful achievement of overall performance goals established by the appropriate entities
You will become a Business Analyst if you are:
· Proficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, Excel and PowerPoint)
· Knowledge in Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) and its Phases
· Excellent oral and written communication skills.
· Strong interpersonal and organizational skills
· Must be a team player, be organized and have the ability to handle multiple projects
· Ability to work independently with minimal supervision or function in a team environment sharing responsibility, roles, and accountability
· Proficient process improvement and project management skills.
· Database reporting skills utilizing Access, Cog-nos and data warehouse
· Possess strong analytical, technical, and decision making skills
Responsibilities:
Study the existing system with the aim of understanding the business process and to identify the shortcomings
Analyze requirements and document and research components of solutions
Should be a good leader with excellent management skills
Understanding of Risk, End User, Integration, UI, Error/bug • Prototype tools
Create Business Requirements Specification Document
Make the requirements and solutions understandable to both User as well as to the development team
Qualifications
Bachelors degree in a business related field or combination of education and industry experience.
Experience with case implementation, underwriting, life insurance or project management.
Have the ability to read financial illustrations to obtain information required in new business insurance paperwork package.
Additional Information
Skills Development Program:-
Highly qualified trainers, Hands-on professional training,
Online Interactive session.
One Live project with using SDLC (Agile and waterfall).
On Job Support with dedicated support team.
Immigration Support for International Student (CPT, OPT, H1B Sponsorship, GC Processing)
Benefits:-
Competitive compensation.
Excellent health, vision, and dental plans.
Education reimbursement programs available.
Extensive product training and professional career development
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Evaluating business functional requirements.
Translate and document business requirements into technical requirements and solutions.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Tracking Code
2535
This position is contingent upon Contract Award.
This individual will provide part-time support as a Business Analyst III consultant for the the International Space Station program.
This individual will review, analyze and evaluate business systems and user needs.
They will document requirements, define scope and objectives and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Required Skills
Familiarity of the space industry is a plus.
Required Experience
Education/Experience: Associated Degree with a minimum of 10 years of professional experience or a BA in business or specialized field with a minimum of 5 years of professional experience.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The qualifications listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
This position is contingent upon contract award
Houston, Texas, United States
Position Type
Part-Time
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Functional Area:
OP - Operations
Estimated Travel Percentage (%): No Travel
Your future team
In support of that, Operations Business Supports works alongside other talented, highly motivated individuals to provide production support, project support and analysis with an emphasis on client experience.
As a more experienced team member, you are capable of driving continual improvement and impacting the way that things get done.
The position is responsible for
The Sr. Business Analyst will work as the liaison between Operations business units and IT.
The focus of this position will be to handle production support, projects, initiatives and special assignments related to Operations business units.
Business process improvements, system enhancements, and issue resolution are key responsibilities of the Sr. Business Analyst.
Lead cross-functional team members assigned for the duration of a project / initiative to ensure in scope, on budget and timely completion of project deliverables.
Coordinates with IT and business sponsors on business case development, feasibility analysis and scenarios through cost/benefit analysis.
Ensure that the project sponsor's expectations are translated into clear defined scope.
Responsible for end-to-end coordination, ensuring the requirements, needs, goals and expectations of the functional stakeholders are met accurately and timely.
Evaluate all options available and identify the pros and cons of each option as they relate to system processing, business processing, time and cost, and recommend the best possible solutions and / or estimates.
Author and present business requirements, project charters, scenarios, user stories, meeting minutes, and other documentation related to project to stakeholders and business partners.
Integrate business rules and business data with technology.
Partner with project team members to identify sequence, estimate project related activities and produce the required project management schedule.
Coordinate with IT/QA, business owners and project team members to ensure test plans and test cases are comprehensive.
Provide data manipulation and analysis requirements.
Analyze, convert and present into value added management information.
Provides guidance on a continuous basis to team members in the areas of project lifecycle, LEAN manufacturing, operating procedures, processes and practices.
Creates risk management plan to identify, analyze, monitor and respond to risks associated with the project to ensure ability to achieve expected outcomes, on time and on budget.
Develop reporting documentation (Monthly Status Reports, etc.)
so that all administrative coordination points between cross-functional departments and projects / initiatives are informed/updated regularly.
Communicate project status weekly to team, business owners and executive leadership as appropriate throughout the duration of assigned projects / initiatives and through post implementation.
Bachelor's Degree preferred.
5+ years work experience as a Business Analyst working on projects, reporting, and quality review.
Certifications in Business Analysis, Certified-Project Management, Certified Lean Practitioner or Project Management- SDLC, Agile Scrum.
Experience in MS Office applications, including use of MS Project, Visio, PowerPoint, OneNote, SharePoint and JIRA.
Strong analytical & problem solving skills.
Ability to identify a problem, analyzes the source problem, verifies and validates the source problem, and recommends viable solutions.
Proven ability to communicate information of a complex nature to all levels of management (written and verbal) in easy to understand business language.
Strong ability to interact with and use relationship management skills with project stakeholders.
Strong communication skills-oral, written and presentation.
Extensive knowledge of business analysis and user experience design tasks with a focus on client usability experience.
Extensive knowledge of the principles of Lean manufacturing and integrated systems project work to drive business results and operational performance.
Strong ability to provide solution assessment and validation including proposed solution assessment, organizational readiness, transition requirements, solution validation and performance.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'jira']","['risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'jira', 'risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"JD:
Essential Responsibilities:
Â
* Onsite Analyst to facilitate data integration across multiple platforms
Â
* Gather business data integration requirements
Â
* Manipulate excel spreadsheets for uploading in various systems
Â
* Coordinate and collaborate with business and IT teams
Â
* Works with business and project teams to troubleshoot issues with data integration
Â
Â
Â
Qualifications/Requirements:
Â
* Bachelor Degree in Business or Information Technology
Â
* Minimum of 10 years of hands-on experience in IT
Â
* Excellent MS Office Skills (Excel, Word, Outlook, etc.)
Â
* Demonstrates a logical and structured approach to time management and task prioritization.
Â
* Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Â
* Ability to work under pressure and to strict deadline
Â
* Self-Motivated
Â
Â
Â
Desired Characteristics:
Â
* Excellent communication, organizational and time management skills with ability to manage multiple priorities and meet deadlines
Â
* Client focused and support oriented, with strong customer service skills
Â
* Analytical and Detail Oriented
Â
* Action oriented and drive results
Â
* Adaptable to changing environment
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"This position is responsible for the support of the 9.2 PeopleSoft Financials platform (with a focus on General Ledger).
This includes requirements gathering, application configuration, end-user support and testing for ongoing enhancements to the production application.
The role provides functional expertise and contributes to improvements and enhancements for mission-critical, enterprise-wide information systemsenspenspenspenspensp Job Duties and Responsibilities ndash Serve as a liaison to the Accounting team in maintaining the best practice accounting processes in PSFT FSCM.
Tasks include but are not limited to updating PS setups, Trees, Reports, Queries, Combo Edit Rules, Allocations, supporting month-end year-end.
Assists in the analysis, design, and development of PeopleSoft deliverables based on business requirements.
Educate and advise on PeopleSoft FSCM functionality with emphasis on General Ledger modules.
Work with technical resources to develop, test and document software in order to implement and maintain an operational system Review validate client's requirements and identify opportunities for improvement based on available system functionality and best practices.
Ensures that project deliverables meet business requirements and ensure to the complete project within assigned timelines.
Prepare or coordinate the preparation of reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
Provides support in all phases of SDLC.
Independently determine and develop approaches to solutions, - Partner with Business, IT, and Vendors.
Ensures adherence to Methodology, IT Controls, and Quality Standards.
Works under limited direction.enspenspensp Requirements ndash High school diploma or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution and Five (5) years of experience supporting PeopleSoft General Ledger (GL) version 9.0 and above is a must.
Experience with Billing, Accounts Receivable, Grants modules will be plus.
PeopleSoft Query and or SQL knowledge to extract data for analysis.
Highly proficiency in SDLC practice.
Experience creating functional specifications, planning and design documents.
Hands on experience in ERP Change Management practices.
End to end knowledge of major accounting processes.
Experience using Microsoft Office package (Excel, Access, PowerPoint, Word) Effort estimation.
Strong verbal and written skills.
Strong documentation skills.
Ability to work independently.
Preferences ndash Bachelorrsquos Degree Experience working in public sector Prior experience in Accounting Nvision
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title: Sr. Business Analyst
Duration: 6 Months with the possibility of extension
Client: Confidential (Energy Client)
The Senior Business Analyst provides strategic business analysis services to business partners.
The focus of this position is to work closely with the business units to gain in-depth understanding of customer's business strategy, processes, services, roadmap and the context in which the business operates.
This role will be key to understanding the documenting capabilities needed to address business challenges.
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for reviewing assigned business processes from end-to-end to identify and address operational, financial and technological risks.
Identify opportunities to improve efficiency.
Responsibilities will include a full range of activities from leading small to mid-size projects to assisting other project managers on larger more complex projects related to operational business functions that affect team members and providers at the market level.
Â
Responsibilities:
Support and align efforts to meet customer and business needs
Manage customer relationships and expectations by developing a communication process to keep others up-to-date on project results
Stay current with customer needs and strategies; utilizing formal and informal written communication methods (for example, emails, newsletters, PowerPoint presentations, executive updates, task lists, updates) to communicate updates and findings; and facilitating project meetings and presentations to all types of diverse audiences (for example, senior management, Customers, technical staff)
Lead or participate in multiple projects by completing and updating project documentation; managing project scope; adjusting schedules when necessary; determining daily priorities; ensuring efficient and on-time delivery of project tasks and milestones; following proper escalation paths; and managing customer and supplier relationships
Provide leadership to team members and peers by collaborating with others; articulating ideas and viewpoints to senior management, peers and others; identifying and initiating projects; managing resources; driving the resolution of issues; and holding self and team accountable for results
Identify, create and facilitate process design changes by conducting business and systems process analysis and design at a complex level; focusing on quality improvement and data management; ensuring data is reliable and valid; developing process improvements or re-engineering and recommending elimination; integrating new systems and processes with existing ones; and partnering with internal and external customers to ensure systems provided meet the long-term business strategies
Provide and support the implementation of business solutions by building relationships and partnerships with key stakeholders; identifying business needs; determining and carrying out necessary processes and practices; monitoring progress and results; recognizing and capitalizing on improvement opportunities; and adapting to competing demands, organizational changes and new responsibilities
Provide project level analysis â producing required project analysis documentation (business requirements, scope matrix, use cases, sequence diagrams, future state proposals, UAT plan)
Collaborate closely with developers to implement the requirements, provide necessary guidance to testers during QA process
Identify improvement opportunities (proactive and reactive)
Elicit and clearly document business and systems requirements
Assess business process and system inefficiencies
Identify ways to increase adoption and customer satisfaction
Demonstrated fluency in business processes and process differentiation
Ability to analyze and synthesize business requirements, including recognizing patterns and conceptualizing processes
Understand and negotiate needs and expectations of multiple stakeholders
Serve as a liaison between Operations and IT to assist or gather business requirements needed for system modifications, enhancement and implementations
Assist with and test implementation for all payer and vendor relationships to ensure data transfer collection, quality and reporting relationships are working appropriately down to the market level to ensure market team member and provider experience is appropriate
Create and maintain issue logs, meeting minutes, meeting schedules, project summaries and updates.
Create and maintain project schedules by developing project plans and specifications, estimating time and resources, monitoring milestone completion, tracking all phases of the project lifecycle, providing timely reporting of issues that impact project progress, coordinating actions and resolving conflicts
Meet with project team regularly to review project deliverables and deadlines
Develop and execute test plans
Support system conversions, upgrades, enhancements
Â
Requirements:
Must have experience working on large scale projects as well as handling day-to-day operational requests from the business
Strong project management, ability to successfully manage multiple tasks at any given point, strong relationship building skills & communication skills
Understanding of Indices, fundamentals and analytical data, returns level data etc.
Data analysis â Must have proficiency with SQL, Microsoft Excel
Must be located and available to work in Houston, Texas
Must have strong understanding of Energy Business specially retailed to Retail for Whole Sale Customers and Residential Customers.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Tasks include but are not limited to updating PS setups, Trees, Reports, Queries, Combo Edit Rules, Allocations, supporting month-end & year-end.
Assists in the analysis, design, and development of PeopleSoft deliverables based on business requirements.
Educate and advise on the PeopleSoft FSCM functionality with emphasis on General Ledger modules.
Work with technical resources to develop, test and document software to implement and maintain an operational system Review / validate requirements and identify opportunities for improvement based on available system functionality and best practices.
Ensures that project deliverables meet business requirements and ensure to the complete project within assigned timelines.
Prepare or coordinate the preparation of reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
Provides support in all phases of SDLC.
Required Skills / Qualifications:
· High School Diploma or GED required
· Minimum of 5 years experience supporting PeopleSoft General Ledger (GL) version 9.0 and above is a must.
Experience with Billing, Accounts Receivable, Grants modules will be plus
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, sex, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis.
Accommodations are available upon request for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Applicants for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States.
This position does not meet the employment requirements for individuals with F-1 OPT STEM work authorization status.
",[None],"['account', 'busi']",999.0,"['account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Systems Analyst Specialist*
MUST HAVE EXPERIENCE in case management systems.
*
Requirements*
A minimum of five (5) years of verifiable work experience in relevant technical or business analysis.
Proficiency in gathering business requirements, documenting business process flows, and creating use cases and user scenarios
Proficiency in creating test scripts and executing test plans
Extensive experience producing end user documentation and providing mentoring and guidance to business users
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills
Excellent time management skills and ability to work on multiple projects concurrently
Excellent analytical and interpersonal skills.
Ability to communicate technical information clearly and effectively, both orally and in writing.
Ability to function as a team member.
Ability to work independently and establish good working relationships with staff.
Contract-to-Hire located Downtown, Houston
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $30.00 - $45.00 per hour
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analysis: 3 years (Required)
Legal Case Management Systems: 1 year (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
",['excel'],"['end user', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'end user', 'busi']"
BA,"DData Governance Business Analyst
Houston, TX 77002
Pay Rate: $70/hr - $80/hr
Contract: Through – 12/20 (FTE Conversion or Extension)
The Enterprise Analytics & Data Management team is part of the ***’s Digital organization.
As a member of EADM you will deliver insights and solutions across the organization in areas such as routing, logistics, revenue management, customer experience, people analytics, business operations and more.
I.
Job Summary
The Data Governance Business Analyst plays a critical role in establishing policies and requirements of master data and resolves data quality issues.
They will work closely with business partners to turn data into critical information and knowledge that can be used to make sound business decisions.
This individual must function in a fast-paced environment, be adaptable to the many changing processes and technology related to the various data warehouse environments.
The ideal candidate for this position understands business processes and how data drives those processes, has a strong commitment to quality, is detail oriented and understands how to leverage tools, such as software to execute projects and tasks efficiently.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Execute standard onboarding of technical and business metadata into the Informatica EDC and Axon environments, ensuring the population of data lineage and linkage between the technical and business metadata.
Participate in the development and implementation of enterprise metadata standards, guidelines, and processes to ensure quality metadata and support for ongoing data governance.
Provide excellent customer service and support to end users and form productive relationships with internal customers by listening, clarifying, and responding effectively.
Providing administration support for Informatica EDC/Axon/IDQ and in future other data governance related products (MDM) which includes installation, configuration, upgrades and business continuity support.
Facilitate discussion with data stakeholders on data governance processes and translate those requirements into Axon workflows.
Participate in training sessions for business and technology partners covering enterprise metadata standards, guidelines, and processes
Document data governance policies and master data entry processes
Perform data alignment analyses to support data governance
Design tools and processes to facilitate maintenance of data quality in Informatica IDQ.
Perform other duties as assigned.
III.
Supervisory Responsibilities
None required.
IV.
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Management Information systems or related field
3-5 years of progressive business experience
Must have 3+ years of hands on Informatica Data Governance (Axon), EDC, IDQ experience.
Must have 3+ MDM experience.
Must have 2+ years of practical experience configuring EDC and Axon, including business glossaries, dashboards, policies, search, Axon maps
Experience in data quality tools, including data profiling, cleansing and identity resolution.
A. Domain Experience
Demonstrated understanding of data governance principles.
Demonstrated experience with data management.
Demonstrated proficiency of data (types, content reliability, etc.).
Demonstrated problem solving and data collection, analysis, and interpretation skills.
Demonstrated understanding of underlying databases.
B.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other Requirements
None required; Informatica Certification highly desired
C. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities Required
Strong written and oral communication skills with ability to work with users, peers and management.
Strong interpersonal skills.
Must be a team player as this role requires working with multiple teams.
Highly motivated, self-starter with problem solving skills.
Ability to multitask and meet aggressive deadlines efficiently and effectively.
Detail-oriented but does not lose sight of the big picture.
Demonstrate ability to learn and understand business processes quickly.
V. Work Environment
Listed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job.
",['excel'],"['logist', 'data', 'dashboard', 'cleans', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'logist', 'data', 'dashboard', 'cleans', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Relevant Experience
(in Yrs) 8 years
Technical/Functional Skills
Esri suite of technologies
Portal for ArcGIS and Arcgis online, ArcGIS Pro, Collector, Survey123, Workforce, ArcGIS server/geoevent
Excellent knowledge of Geographic Information Systems, resource management, geography, computer science or a related field;
At least more than 8 years of experience as a BA in GIS field
Understanding of Oil & Gas domain
Understanding of business process
Must be able to work effectively as part of a team
Experience Required Oil and Gas midstream / pipeline or equivalent experience is required
Roles & Responsibilities
Creating a detailed business analysis, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for a business.
Defining business requirements and reporting them back to stakeholders.
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Performing requirements analysis.
Generic Managerial Skills
Excellent analytical thinking skills to come up with innovative options to solve problems
Able to establish and maintain positive working relationships with management, staff etc
Strong desire and ability to identify and meet the needs of clients and colleagues;
Strong planning, organizing and coordinating skills; and,
Able to communicate effectively verbally and in writing
Education Degree or masters in Geospatial/geomatics, GIS
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",['excel'],"['geospati', 'optim', 'busi', 'gi', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'geospati', 'optim', 'busi', 'gi', 'pipelin']"
BA,"SUMMARY
The Operations Business Analyst is the liaison between internal business stakeholders, IT and external Clients.
The candidate must have an aptitude to learn, critical thinking, problem solving and analytical skills in order to manage multiple project requests at one time and when needed, will be required to perform both project management (project plan, project scope) and business analysis (operational workflow, process efficiency, system gap analysis) responsibilities.
Required Skills
MAJOR RESPONSIBILITIES
Supports and partners with business stakeholder to ensure alignment of systems with business objectives
Performs data validation to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of operational activities related to existing business processes or new implementation projects
Defines application problem by conferring with internal and external clients; evaluating procedures and processes
Write business requirements, use cases, and test cases for new program or changes to existing application to support business objective
Perform exploratory/opportunistic data analysis to identify trends, patterns, correlations, and translate the data to written, actionable business recommendations in a clear and compelling manner
Maintains thorough and concise documentation for tracking of all Programs, Clinical Ops, Client Services, Operations Change Control request forms or issues for SOX Compliance purposes.
Takes responsibility for analyzing and documenting resource requirements for assigned scope of responsibilities.
Leads knowledge capture, process, and information management within the scope of responsibilities.
Required Experience
REQUIRED EXPERIENCE
Bachelor degree is required, a degree focused on Technology, Business Operations, Management Information Systems, or computer technology is required, and/or an MS/MBA is a plus.
Minimum of 5 years’ experience in Business Analysis or technical Software Analysis role
Technical writing and documentation skills are essential.
Intermediate to Advanced skills with Microsoft Office tools (MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio.
Project) necessary to document, track and present information related to the project
Ability to communicate effectively to both business stakeholder and technical team
Ability to develop business process models, write use cases and design user interface requirements.
Strong quantitative, analytical, problem solving, organizational, communication and interpersonal skills are required.
Strong ad-hoc SQL query skills and knowledge of relational databases and ability to independently extract data using multiple tables, joins, and various complex data manipulation query logic statements.
Attention to detail, maintaining high quality standards, and superior work ethic is a must
Ability to prioritize and manage concurrent projects while still delivering timely and accurate results
Demonstrate initiative and work independently with minimal supervision.
Strong understanding of the software development life cycle and experience with project planning tools and methodologies.
Ability to work independently and as a member of a team.
Collaboration and cooperation with internal staff and external customers is a must to be successful in this role.
Experience in a managed care environment strongly preferred.
Houston, US-TX
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['correl', 'data', 'supervis', 'exploratori', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'correl', 'data', 'supervis', 'exploratori', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"Summary
·
·
Learn the needs of the business at a site and functional level
·
Please note that configuration changes will be strictly limited, and this role should not focus on configuring or customizing the current plant setups.
·
Assist the project team in identifying business requirements and development of use cases and business process flows
·
Assist the project team with the identification and documentation of potential gaps found during deployment and testing
·
Assist with system testing, troubleshooting and documentation of any system related issues
·
Assist with data migration reviews and reconciliations
·
Assist with training material preparation and review
Warehouse Management / Inventory Management
·
Warehouse and Inventory management, cycle counting, physical inventory, stock transport orders (STOs), transfer orders, individual and collective material items, consignment inventory, replenishment schemes (min/max, re-order point, safety stock)
·
Dispatch using shipping networks
Requirements
·
·
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration or a related field
·
A minimum of 5 years professional experience
·
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills for issue identification, assist with root cause analysis of the issue and potential issue resolution within the template to be implemented
·
Strong experience in business process analysis and redesign
·
Must be a team player and be able to build consensus with others
·
Ability and discipline to self-manage assignments to meet deadlines, scope and budget
·
Must have excellent verbal and written communications skills
·
Ability to work individually, as a member of a functional team, and part of a global team
·
The willingness and ability to travel, including internationally (Germany or Canada)
Added Value
·
Experience with at least one full lifecycle SAP implementation and roll out projects including: planning, testing, migration reconciliation, training, and post-production support
·
Experience in a manufacturing, engineer-to-order environment or a services and repair environment for large equipment
·
Ability to develop infosets and write queries
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"In this training, you will learn -:
Introduction to SDLC
Business Analyst Fundamentals in SDLC
Business Analyst Need Assessments
Business Planning & Monitoring
Requirement Elicitation
Requirement Analysis & Management
Testing, Defects & UAT
Agile BA with Storyboarding
Visual Studio for UML
Agile Project Management
MS Excel for Data Mapping
Education/Certification - Qualifications:
Great communication skills, ability to collaborate with developers and Product Management
Master’s Degree from an accredited college or university with a concentration in Business, Economics or Computer Science (or equivalent diploma/work experience)
Participation and/or completion in testing certification programs (Six Sigma, CSTE, ISTQB or CSQA)
Training Details:
Training Mode: In-Class/online, VA
Training Duration: 4 weeks
Marketing Duration: 6-8 weeks tentatively
Benefits: Health (PPO Plan)
H1B Visa and Green Card sponsorship for qualified candidates
Hands on experience on automated tools and usage:
The candidates will not be in the training process, they will go through Direct Marketing and client interviews in a quick phase.
Benefits:
Assistance in Resume and Interview Preparation
Guidance on how to attend Vendor/ Client Interview Calls
Personal Attention for Marketing, Submissions and Interviews
On-Job Support
Health Benefits
Please Note:
**NO Third-party/C2C companies.
Serious candidates only!
If you are interested, please share your resume at Shalini(at)techpoint.net
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $58,000.00 - $62,000.00 per month
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Contract Length:
More than 1 year
Multiple locations
",['excel'],"['data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Assist in the planning, design and development of new applications and enhancements to existing applications.
Meet with decision makers, systems owners, and end-users to define business requirements and systems goals, and identify and resolve business systems issues.
Ensure compatibility and interoperability of in-house computing systems.
Review and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing systems and develop strategies for improving or further leveraging these systems.
Acquisition & Deployment
Assist in the deployment of new applications and enhancements to existing applications.
Create system design proposals.
Perform cost-benefit and return on investment analyses for proposed systems to aid management in making implementation decisions.
Create systems models, specifications, diagrams and charts to provide direction to system programmers.
Coordinate and perform in-depth tests, including end-user reviews, for modified and new systems.
Provide orientation and training to end-users for all modified and new systems.
Other duties as assigned.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
5ziht1A8tm
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"My client is looking for a Business Analyst (eCommerce/Sales) to join their growing team!
Title: Business Analyst (eCommerce/Sales)
Contract Length 6-12+ month contract
Team: Digital Analytics & Strategy
Top Requirements:
Ecommerce
Analytics
SQL knowledge
understand standing data
modeling/data analytics skills
Strong communication skills
Job Summary
Conducts business process analysis, detailed requirement gathering, document user stories, prioritize backlog and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
• Possess a fundamental understanding of end-to-end customer experience integration and dependencies.
• Works in an Agile environment and continuously reviews the business needs, refines priorities, outlines milestones and deliverables, and identifies opportunities and risks.
• Develops, owns, and executes product roadmap.
• Translates product roadmap features into well-defined product requirements including features, epics, user stories, and acceptance test criteria.
• Prioritizes and maintains the sprint backlog for assigned products, balancing the requirements of stakeholders.
• Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet business requirements and fulfill user stories
• Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
• Collaborate with developers to test and verify that solutions will meet the business requirements
• Participate in key meetings including discovery sessions, sprint demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Please send resumes to gabrielle.cappelli@mondo.com
",['sql'],"['risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",999.0,"['sql', 'risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
· Collaborate in the planning, designing, development, and deployment of new applications, and enhancements to existing applications.
· Possess excellent analytical and problem solving skills as well as strong verbal and communication skills to communicate ideas in both technical and user-friendly language.
· Collaborate with developers & subject matter experts to find solutions to meet customer needs.
· Familiar with Project Management discipline from requirements gathering through implementation of the solution.
· Ensure the full systems lifecycle process is adhered to, overseeing solutions through the entire implementation process.
· Proficient in supporting data warehouse activities, monitoring queries and addressing user questions concerning data integrity.
· Analyze and resolve helpdesk issues.
· Support systems in production environment.
· Serve as a liaison between IT and businesses
Requirements:
· Must have experience in developing business and functional requirements.
· Ability to work with teammates and with business partners to participate in sessions to gather, translate and document system requirements to support transforming requirements into effective technology solutions.
Able to conduct research into systems issues and products as required.
· Prepare reports regarding project specifications, activities, or status.
· Develop test cases and performs testing to ensure requirements are met for system modifications.
· Ability to follow direction, collaborate effectively with peers to provide results, and relay status to management and peers in a timely manner.
· Develop tools and/or utilities to help with the troubleshooting process.
· Able to plan and manage his/her own work with minimal supervision.
· Excellent written and oral communication skills.
Qualification:
· Bachelors Degree preferred
· 5+ years of industry experience
· Proficient with MS Office.
· Experience writing SQL queries is preferred.
· Insurance underwriting experience desirable.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst III
Houston, TX 77002
Pay Rate: $70/hr - $80/hr
Contract through 12/2020 (Extended)
I.
Job Summary
Conducts highly complex business process analyses, needs assessments, and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
Works at the highest technical level of most phases of systems analysis while considering the business implications of the application of technology to the current and future business environment.
Coordinates with users to determine business and user requirements, process flow definitions, and functional specifications.
Coordinates documentation of requirements and formulation of test plans.
Develops and manages development of highly complex information systems, or revisions to existing system logic difficulties as necessary to meet business requirements.
Reviews progress and evaluates results for accuracy and efficiency.
Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
Guides and advises less-experienced Business Systems Analysts and other computer support staff.
Acts as team leader on systems projects.
Establishes and communicates common goal and direction for the team.
Coordinates activities of the project team, project plans, and assists in monitoring project schedules and costs.
III.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
Some informal supervisory duties, such as delegation of tasks, may be required.
IV.
QUALIFICATIONS
REQUIRED:
Bachelor's Degree, or equivalent experience, in Computer Science, MIS, Business Administration or similar area of study, and seven or more years previous experience.
Preferred: Master's Degree.
B.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS OR OTHER REQUIREMENTS
Preferred: PMI Certification.
C. OTHER KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS OR ABILITIES REQUIRED
Scrum/Agile experience using JIRA
May require intermediate skills in one or more of the following:
PeopleSoft HRMS systems development, implementation, upgrades and analyses, QA testing, catalyst or unified business modeling, system design and analysis, web application development, imaging technology, subject matter knowledge such as benefits, payroll, and basic accounting, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
V. WORK ENVIRONMENT
Listed below are key points regarding environmental demands and work environment of the job.
Required to use motor coordination with finger dexterity (such as keyboarding, machine operation, etc.)
most of the work day;
Required to exert physical effort in handling objects less than 30 pounds rarely;
Required to be exposed to physical occupational risks (such as cuts, burns, exposure to toxic chemicals, etc) rarely;
Required to be exposed to physical environment which involves dirt, odors, noise, weather extremes or similar elements rarely;
Normal setting for this job is an office setting.
",['jira'],"['risk', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Requirements: • Bachelor's Degree • A background with Informatics • Strong statistical experience, data analysis / modelling, forecasting • SQL, SSRS, R Studio, Tableau, Stata, Power BI - any additional forecasting software tool • Creating and tracking a project using MS-Project • Needing people for COVID response and beyond Excellent verbal and written English communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group is required.
For additional information, please contact David Dummel at david.dummel@ctg.com or call 800-992-5350 x4804.
Kindly forward to any other interested parties-thank you!
Additional Information * Job Function: Business Analysis * Education Level: None * Work Remote: No * Travel: No
","['power bi', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'ssr']","['data', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'ssr', 'data', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will facilitate and manage projects by serving as the liaison for users and developers.
This role is responsible for communicating goals and evaluating results as requested.
The ideal candidate has a curious mind and enjoys taking a challenging problem, breaking it down into sections, reviewing the information, and asking the right questions.
Responsibilities:
Develop and communicate Develop and communicate detailed specifications for implementation while maintaining customer expectations.
Produce reports, timelines, and graphics to communicate expectations and progress to management, customers, investors, and other relevant parties.
Research and test - Research and analyze the nature, effect, and results of system difficulties.
Work closely with IT team to satisfy data sampling, project analysis, testing verification, and other user requests from existing client databases.
Collaborate Work closely with colleagues to understand technical needs.
Understand how any disruptions will potentially change a project and affect the business.
Communicate with team leads to ensure client satisfaction, and provide recommendations as needed.
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, Business, or a related field
Five to seven years of related experience
Excellent communication and customer service skills
Experienced management skills with the ability to lead, facilitate, motivate and organize
Powered by JazzHR
",['excel'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Business Analyst with Insurance, Actuarial domain working experience Works with business partners within one or more business organizations to align technology solutions with business strategies.
· Provides input from a business and IT perspective.
· Monitors testing process to ensure that business results are adequately tested with minimal risk
· Ensures test strategies involve appropriate integration and process components
· Delegates approvals as appropriate
· Keeps clients informed of problems, issues, and resolutions.
· Monitors and analyzes performance metrics to ensure client satisfaction
· Manages client expectations.
· Ensures IT solutions meet client needs.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Kindly review the job requirements below.
Must-Have(s) 6+ years of experience working as a Technical Business Analyst Proficiency in Business intelligence (reporting, querying, spreadsheet, dashboards data mining), Business analysis, data models, detailed functionaltechnical designs, testing system design Ability to develop tactical roadmaps while working in Agilewaterfall concepts Hands-on experience with Cloud solutions preferably AWS, Microservices Web-based API Serverless architectures, databases (RDBMS andor No-SQL) Expertise in MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, BIreporting tools, JIRA, MS Visio Basic knowledge of Python, VD, C, or Java, etc.
Named one of the top ten fastest-growing businesses in Houston in 2016.
Ranked 25th in the HBJrsquos Fast 100 Private Companies Award in 2017.
For more information, visit www.arthurlawrence.net httpwww.arthurlawrence.net
","['jira', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'cloud', 'python', 'c', 'java']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['jira', 'aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'cloud', 'python', 'c', 'java', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"JOB SUMMARY Working closely with both internal and external departmental representatives, works to optimize the use of the ERP to improve business operations.
Has a thorough understanding of businessdepartmental operations.
Examines business process, performs training and guides system use.
May guide reengineering projects, specify system requirements, conduct feasibility studies, make software recommendations and assist with implementation.
May work in a team lead role.
Work with others members of the Business Systems team to help evaluate data and processes, trouble-shooting systems and incorporating solutions as required Manage the implementation of the software and processes within a particular modulebusiness area Discuss business requirements with managers and users Identify information needs not currently met by existing software or systems Develop strategies to improve timeliness of information and overall efficiency Assess the costbenefit of recommended process changes Implement business and software solutions Follow up with managers and users to ensure compliance with new procedures and effectiveness of new systems.
Perform post-implementation review Accountable for quality, completeness, and on-time delivery of an assigned project Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS SKILLS Post-secondary education with a Computer Sciences or Business Degree At least 5 years related experience in Microsoft AX2009AX2012 and Dynamics 365 Finance and Operations Minimum 5 years of experience work experience as a Sr. MS Dynamics D365AX functional business analyst, consultant, and lead ERP analyst Completed at least one full life cycle implementation of Microsoft D365 Expert functional knowledge on at least three of the listed modules D365 General Ledger, Taxes, Accounts Receivable, Projects, and Sales Management modules Able to understand the user requirements and be able to configure the system independently for various system options across the above-listed modules to achieve the desired results.
Provide Design, Test, Support, and Training as required during the course of the projects.
Experience on upgrading from AX to D365 would be an added advantage Knowledge on Inventory Management, Procurement, Production, Planning, Projects, and Advance Warehouse management modules would be an added advantage.
","['erp', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Position : Business Analyst
Duration : 6-12 Months
Work closely with the Product Owner and Business Analysts for understanding the systems functional and non-functional requirements.
Coordinate release and sprint planning
Perform Taking part in task estimation
Implementation & review the RightAngle custom components.
Help team to resolve both technical problems & functional issues
Code Optimization and performing components tests/Integration test
Understanding of Physical (Purchase, Sale, lease) and financial deal (Future, Swaps) attributes & lifecycle
Experience and knowledge of Mark to Market and Risk Exposure calculation for all types of Physical, Logistics and financial deal types
Understanding of date rules, trade pricing (Fixed or curve based)
Good understanding of Forward curves and market curves configuration
Experience on configuring and prototyping ETRM system (either of RightAngle, Allegro, TriplePoint, Endur)
",[None],"['risk', 'optim', 'logist', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'optim', 'logist', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
REQUIREMENTS:
Ideal to utilize DMAIC and Lean Six Sigma methodologies when necessary
Ideal to have Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) knowledge such as SAP, S4 Hana
Ideal to have e-Procurement and supply chain cloud solutions such as SAP Ariba, Ariba SLP Collaboration, or Ariba On Demand
Ideal to have an understanding software development programs such as Agile, Scrum teams, waterfall and/or hybrid knowledge
Ideal to have knowledge of HP legacy assets such as Velocity, CCS, iCost, XCost, MARS, ACCOS, GPG, PMG, or WWCOA
Ideal to have supply chain and/or procurement experience from a business and/or engineering perspective, but both would be ideal
Desire working knowledge of working in SAP and ARIBA preferred
Project/program management using:
Microsoft Office suite such as Share points, Email, Excels, PowerPoints, Outlook
Ability to create, design, and maintain SharePoint
Ability to create website would be a plus but not necessary
Ability to setup/manage meetings and conduct meetings in Zoom and/or Skype
Ability and/or personality to reach out/communicate to a large network and teams
Ability to lead, facilitate, and/or document meetings with large teams
Not afraid to -cold call- contacts and ask lots of questions in a large forum and speak-up if not understanding the conversation or new to a subject
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Commercial Gas & Power Application Support Business Analyst
Vacancy Number: 21995
Date Posted: October 30, 2018
Commercial Gas & Power Application Support Business Analyst
Houston - Texas
This Gas & Power Application Support Business Analyst will be part of a team of IT professionals supporting critical systems, reports, and data used by the Commercial business as well as many other groups across the corporation.
The team supports Gas & Power application systems used by Traders, Schedulers, Confirmation, Contracts, Pricing, Risk, Compliance, Credit, F&PA, Accounting and all levels of Management to manage over $23B of annual gas & power trading.
This position will work in a team environment located on the trade floor responding to Commercial business needs.
Responsibilities may include:
Provide front line production application support to the business focusing on Commercial applications
Support TriplePoint Commodity XL (front-to-back office trading support) and interfaces
Work with leadership to prioritize work and ensure services meet customer needs
Collaborate with the business to define business functional requirements for enhancements and develop (or coordinate development) to deliver the solution to the business
Analyzing data or system issues directly with SQL and relational databases
Providing on-call day-to-day application support for both in-house developed and vendor packages
Enhancing, troubleshooting, and supporting in-house developed Excel spreadsheets with VBA macros
Liaison between Commercial business and other IT leveraged services teams to provide functional and technical support as appropriate
Liaison between Commercial and vendor to troubleshoot software issues and define software enhancements
Responding to user data mining and data maintenance requests
Responding to internal and external audit requests
Participating on project teams to define business requirements and understand the business strategies to ensure proper alignment of IS solutions
Basic/Required:
Legally authorized to work in the United States
Bachelor’s degree in MIS, Computer Science, Information Technology, Business, or other related discipline
5+ years of IT related working experience
3+ years of experience in Commercial application support
1+ years of experience with SQL (in Oracle databases)
Basic knowledge of ETRM business processing
Basic Commercial business acumen
Proficient in Microsoft Office suite of products including Excel macros
Ability and willingness to provide day-to-day application support and after-hours call-out on a rotational basis
Preferred:
Experience with TriplePoint Commodity XL
Experience with C#, Java, and/or Crystal Reports a plus
Strong interpersonal skills
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Physical and financial decomposition knowledge
Effective verbal and written communication skills
Ability to initiate tasks including developing and executing small project plans
Process improvement experience
Management of change skills
Demonstrated leadership, communication and organizational skills
Analyzes issues and understands their business impact
Delivers results through realistic planning to accomplish goals
Generates effective solutions based on available information and makes timely decisions that are safe and ethical
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'c', 'oracl', 'java']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'c', 'oracl', 'java', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Must possess strong communication skills.
Must be able to make business decisions based off of analyzed data
Perform User Acceptance testing
Provide leadership, training, coaching, and guidance to junior staff members
Evaluate business processes, suggest areas for improvement and develop and implement solutions
Lead ongoing reviews of business processes and develop optimization strategies
Requirements:
Minimum of 3 years experience as Business Analyst or related field.
Analytical and conceptual thinking skills
Advanced technical skills
Proven track record of following through on commitments
Excellent planning, organizational and time management skills
Excellent documentation skills
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Successful outcomes start and finish with eNGINE.We are hiring for a MS Dynamics CRM Business Analyst, who will be a liaison for the business directly with the internal Microsoft Dynamics CRM Development team and other departments within the organization.
In this role, the person will understand and take business requirements and translate them to functional and technical specs for the Development team, facilitate projects milestones/ deliverables, develop test plans and coordinate User Acceptance and integration testing.
Provide guidance to MS Dynamics road map and strategic vision by evaluating new features and how to best incorporate them.
This position requires 5+ years experience in technical business analysis.
Completed BS Degree in IT or related field.
Ideally 2+ years experience, with Microsoft Dynamics 365 from a technical level, along with technical capabilities or knowledge of Javascript, is nice to have.
Excellent communication, both oral and written, organization skills and demonstrated technical/ business understanding of user needs and project timelines and deliverables.
Additional experience with MS Dynamics' Sales module is a plus.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['javascript', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['javascript', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirements
This position is suited more to those who are focused on fundamental business analysis rather than the managing of business analysis units.
Extensive experience in analytics, business analysis, and defining/managing requirements in either a consulting or in-house role
Highly proficient at relationship management
Experience of business modelling, business process improvement and user experience analysis
Familiarity with Agile business analysis principals
Oil and Gas/Energy experience is preferred but not essential
What's in it for you
Training programmes to support you in developing core hard and soft consulting skills
Promotions based on merit
A diverse and skilled workforce within a collaborative, team-based environment
International client base
Client facing engagements at all levels
30 years’ old, operating a start-up mentality- risk and rewards encouraged
You will have the opportunity to shape your role, choose your involvement, leverage resources; the support is there to maximise your progress
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.
Provide support and advise on transactions in the Information Technology functional area.Manage and motivate teams of professionals with diverse skills and backgrounds.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Maintain long-term client relationships and networks.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['risk', 'information technology']",999.0,"['risk', 'information technology']"
BA,"Detailed documentation preparation for requirements, use cases, functional, non- functional requirements.
Well versed with UML modelling.
User Interface prototypes development.
Process flow development.
Prior experience in moderating JAD sessions.
Basic Project Management skills and providing project progress update to project stakeholders.
Designing UI mockups.
Minimum Requirements
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Powered by JazzHR
SOLaYVcI5w
",[None],[None],2.0,[]
BA,"Role Client needs Business Analyst who have experience on building custom applications ScrumAgile experience using JIRA Works at the highest technical level of most phases of systems analysis while considering the business implications of the application of technology to the current and future business environment.
bull Coordinates with users to determine business and user requirements, process flow definitions, and functional specifications.
bull Coordinates documentation of requirements and formulation of test plans.
bull Develops and manages development of highly complex information systems, or revisions to existing system logic difficulties as necessary to meet business requirements.
bull Reviews progress and evaluates results for accuracy and efficiency.
bull Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
bull Guides and advises less-experienced Business Systems Analysts and other computer support staff.
bull Acts as team leader on systems projects.
Establishes and communicates common goal and direction for the team.
Coordinates activities of the project team, project plans, and assists in monitoring project schedules and costs.
May require intermediate skills in one or more of the following PeopleSoft HRMS systems development, implementation, upgrades and analyses, QA testing, catalyst or unified business modeling, system design and analysis, web application development, imaging technology, subject matter knowledge such as benefits, payroll, and basic accounting, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
",['jira'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"This is a remote position and requires weekly travel to the client site Monday through Thursday.
The Senior Business Analyst will assist in the assessment, analysis, testing and requirements gathering and documentation processes for the Health Plan operations.
The ideal candidate will possess detailed knowledge of claims, clinical editing, utilization management and enrollment.
Responsibilities
Conducts the analysis and documentation of current state and future state, documenting gaps and user requirements in the design of the future state workflows, to optimize system functionality.
Along with the client, modifies or creates new workflows and testing to improve processes.
Facilitates and elicits requirements for projects, while effectively managing changes and conflicts during specifications gathering process.
Manages Clinical Business Process Modeling/Workflows utilizing Microsoft Visio.
Develops and documents Desk Level Procedures and Standard Operational Procedures
Participates in meetings and presentations effectively and professionally.
Provide documentation for meetings to report progress, issues and possible resolution.
Establishes and maintains collaborative relationships with all associated departments, workgroups, and vendors as required.
Communicates effectively and concisely to promote positive relationships.
Supports clinicians, managers, project managers and end-user timelines for assigned tasks
Key Qualifications
Solid understanding of health plan (payer) clinical operations in the health insurance space
In-depth understanding of Health Plan processes, including but not limited to, claims processing, clinical editing, utilization management and enrollment.
Knowledgeable in Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set, Utilization Review Accreditation Commission, and National Committee for Quality Assurance
Strong analytical, problem solving, negotiation and collaboration skills.
Proven ability to participate in several projects at the same time.
Expert skills with MS Office Suite, Visio, MS Project, and SharePoint required.
Experienced in Medicare, Medicare Advantage, and Medicaid.
Knowledge of Health plan software systems including Facets, QNXT, and/or Care Management systems
Perks
Competitive pay and bonuses
Excellent benefits (medical, dental, vision)
Paid holidays and vacation days
Flexible schedule
Education and Experience
A minimum of 10 years of Health Plan experience is preferred.
A Bachelor's degree in Healthcare Administration or a related field is required.
Equivalent experience may be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Summary:
The incumbent will be responsible for gathering business requirements, documenting business processes and developing reports and dashboards to support the clinical, network, and operations teams.
This role requires a self-motivated, independent individual with a solid background in healthcare analytics and knowledge of healthcare metrics.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Identification and documentation of business needs and business solution process.
Identify key areas for process documentation and improvement through data analysis and strategic thinking
Support of policy development and documentation
Conduct cost and efficiency optimization research and planning
Develop opinions/recommendations based on quantitative and qualitative analysis
Conduct Primary research and follow on statistical analysis
Conduct analyses and desk research (Secondary research) in support of project deliverables
Ensure accuracy of data and analyses presented
Data analysis, financial modeling, PPT report preparation, and project management.
Develop Dashboards and Reports
Work with external business partners to implement and integrate systems
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Health Administration, Masters in Business Administration or Health Administration highly preferred.
Required Skills:
Professional verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to clearly articulate thoughts and ideas
Organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple tasks and/or projects at one time
Analytical and interpretation skills including departmental, utilization, financial and operations data
Decision‐making skills with the ability to investigate and weigh alternatives and select the course of action that provides the greatest benefit to the organization
Creative thinking skills with the ability to ask the needed bigger‐picture questions that lead to process and team improvements
Time management skills with the ability to prioritize and schedule daily activities for the most efficient use of time
Problem solving skills with the ability to look for root causes and implementable, workable solutions
Interpersonal skills with the ability to work in a fast‐paced environment and participate as an independent contributor with little supervision or as an active team member depending on the situation and needs
Knowledgeable with Microsoft Office Suite, including MS Access and Excel
Working experience with Structured Query Language (SQL)
Working experience with Statistical Tools
Preferred knowledge base includes:
Health insurance - provider or insurer
Strong conceptual, quantitative as well as qualitative analytical skills
Strong facilitation and presentation skills
An ability to accept direction and work as an integral part of a team
Self-motivator with ability to work independently
Strong organizational skills, including ability to prioritize tasks and delegate when appropriate
Flexibility and responsiveness in managing multiple projects simultaneously
3+ years advanced experience with Visual Basic for Applications (VBA)
3+ years advanced experience in healthcare data query and analytics, preferably analyzing clinical program data and clinical operations performance metrics using SQL, or tools such as Microstrategy, Tableau, Qlik and other relational databases, MS Access and MS Excel, and advanced skills in querying databases
3+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience using R.
Advanced knowledge of Visual Studio and SQL SSIS, SSRS
Language Ability:
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business, technical procedures, or governmental regulations.
Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals.
Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations
where only limited standardization exists.
Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.
Certificates and Licenses:
No certifications needed
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $65,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
statistical analysis or data analysis using R: 1 year (Required)
IT Business Analyst: 2 years (Required)
IT in Health Insurance: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Houston, TX 77054 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'ssr']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'ssr', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'supervis', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
LcWyWCFaQg
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"SUMMARY
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for product execution throughout the product lifecycle, including conducting research, creating and aligning product strategy with corporate strategy, defining the product roadmap, requirements gathering and documentation, release management and readiness of their products, measuring the effects of these activities, and using metrics to feedback into the process.
This role has an additional critical function of working closely with other product managers to align roadmaps and works closely with other stakeholders to define the product strategies.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Communicate clear priorities and status of roadmap items to all stakeholders.
Responsible for maintaining relationships and understanding expectations.
Work closely with internal customers in order to understand customer issues and propose solutions.
Manage, coordinate, and establish priorities for complete product life-cycle including the planning, design, development, testing, implementation, and commercialization of business solutions.
Support the creation of business cases for future project proposals, highlighting how new business opportunities are expected to promote sustainable business growth.
Work with cross-company product managers to ensure strategic product roadmaps are successfully executed.
Implement key metrics for product features and analyze metrics to verify objectives are progressing as planned.
Initiate marketing strategies, maintain product development roadmaps, and execute product launch activities.
Participate in and foster a working environment where creativity, innovation, ownership, and teamwork are encouraged and rewarded.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
None
QUALIFICATIONS:
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Business/Marketing Degree with Computer Science minor, or equivalent work experience
7+ years of software product management/business analyst experience
Experience in an AGILE working environment
Industry experience in IT-enabled healthcare or animal health is highly desirable.
Exposure to project management/information sharing tools like JIRA, Confluence, Lucid Charts, Balsamiq, etc.
highly desirable.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None
COMPETENCIES (SKILLS AND ABILITIES)
Deep understanding of Agile product lifecycle; including planning, development, and implementation.
Exceptional communication, presentation, active listening, analytical, and financial skills.
Strong leadership capabilities with experience in managing cross-functional teams, especially in highly leveraged, fast growth environments.
Ability to think critically and creatively and to contribute in a team environment.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENT
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Pet friendly environment
Extensive computer work
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
",['jira'],"['analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['jira', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Seeking a candidate for an urgent contract opportunity
Responsibilities & Requirements:
Ideal to utilize DMAIC and Lean Six Sigma methodologies when necessary
Ideal to have Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) knowledge such as SAP, S4 Hana
Ideal to have e-Procurement and supply chain cloud solutions such as SAP Ariba, Ariba SLP Collaboration, or Ariba On Demand
Ideal to have an understanding software development programs such as Agile, Scrum teams, waterfall and/or hybrid knowledge
Ideal to have knowledge of HP legacy assets such as Velocity, CCS, iCost, XCost, MARS, ACCOS, GPG, PMG, or WWCOA
Ideal to have supply chain and/or procurement experience from a business and/or engineering perspective, but both would be ideal
Desire working knowledge of working in SAP and ARIBA preferred
Project/program management using:
Microsoft Office suite such as Share points, Email, Excels, PowerPoints, Outlook
Ability to create, design, and maintain SharePoint
Ability to create website would be a plus but not necessary
Ability to setup/manage meetings and conduct meetings in Zoom and/or Skype
Ability and/or personality to reach out/communicate to a large network and teams
Ability to lead, facilitate, and/or document meetings with large teams
Not afraid to -cold call- contacts and ask lots of questions in a large forum and speak-up if not understanding the conversation or new to a subject
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary
The IT Technical Business Analyst is a part of the IT
team responsible for ongoing application support and project work for the Lone
Star NGL commercial business area.
This position works with key
stakeholders to capture requirements, perform gap analysis, and collaborate
with Quorum Software and Transport4 on enhancements to the e-ONE and T4
applications that will provide the highest value add to the Lone Star NGL
commercial business.
This position is also responsible for day-to-day and
month-end close application support, implementing new assets into the existing
application software stack and supporting custom interfaces and reports.
Essential
Duties and Responsibilities:
Implement new assets and
support existing assets in the third party enterprise software suite for the
Natural Gas Liquids (NGLs) business sector.
Develop and support in-house written custom
interfaces and reports.
Collaborate with
business users, internal technology teams and vendors to establish and
prioritize business and technology requirements.
Create detailed
requirements of the user experience and user-system/system-system interactions
through discussion as well as narrative and pictorial artifacts.
Ensure
accuracy of requirements during the entire development process.
Coordinate technical
implementation and migration of software upgrades, patches, code releases, and
database changes for the various enterprise applications.
Develop and review
integration and quality assurance test plans as needed.
Follow a strict
methodology and process for change control, application support, and escalation.
Provide training,
guidance, and resource support for end users.
Provide emergency
support for critical priority issues and other business critical
situations in a fast-paced
environment.
These systems include enterprise software to support the
Measurement, Commercial and Accounting business groups.
Requirements:
Education
and/or Experience, Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:
To perform this job successfully, an individual
must be able to perform each essential job duty satisfactorily.
The
requirements for this position are listed below:
BS degree in
MIS/CIS/CSE or equivalent experience.
Business
analysis experience translating business requirements into functional and
technical specifications.
Strong knowledge of
various business processes such as Contracts, Nominations,
Scheduling/Distribution, Ticket Processing, Invoicing, Accounting, etc.
in
the NGL sector or other Midstream sector.
Experience
querying and writing scripts for Oracle Server and MS SQL Server databases.
A motivated
self-starter that is able to work independently and in teams on tasks and
projects with limited supervision.
A strong customer
service attitude and focus.
Excellent oral and
written communication skills as well as business presentation skills.
Interfaces effectively across organizational lines addressing both technical
and non-technical audiences at a variety of organizational levels.
Excellent analytical
and problem solving skills.
Experience working
with Business Users and Software Developers to provide solutions that further
enhance the applications and provide the business user with an improved
experience.
Attention to detail and
a rigorous focus on delivering quality output.
Required experience is commensurate with the selected job level:
The Senior IT Specialist level requires a Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience and 5-8 years of relevant job related experience
The Lead IT Specialist level requires a Bachelor’s degree or equivalent experience and 8 years of relevant job related experience
The Principal IT Specialist level requires a Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience and 10 years of relevant job related experience.
Preferred
Qualifications:
End-to-end
transactional experience in Natural Gas Liquids pipelines, storage facilities
and fractionators utilizing Dearman, Flow-Cal, Quorum e-ONE (Entero ONE) and
Transport4 software or similar systems.
Strong understanding
of combining multiple software applications via interfaces into a single
business solution.
Experience with Project
Management methodologies to successfully implement business focused technology
solutions.
Knowledge of the
software development life cycle (SDLC).
Familiar with the
Sarbanes Oxley control environment and change control processes.
Working
Conditions:
The work environment
characteristics described here are representative of those an employee
encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
Usually,
normal office working conditions.
Must
be able to remain in a stationary position 50
of the time due to prolonged
periods of sitting or standing.
Occasional
overnight travel may be required.
Occasional
visits to industrial/manufacturing settings, which may include exposure to
various materials and chemicals, as well as extreme temperature conditions and
loud machinery, and require appropriate personal protective equipment.
Equal
Opportunity Employer/Disability/Vet
DISCLAIMER: The
above statements, which are subject to change, are intended to describe the
general nature and level of work being performed by personnel assigned to this
job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities,
duties and skills required of personnel in the assigned position.
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql']","['end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"In subject add, Job: 1622568 You can email your resume......
https://innovasourcing.com/nr3g
View similar jobs
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Professional
Position Purpose:
Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function.
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations
Identify ways to enhance performance management and operational reports related to new business implementation processes
Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Diagnose problems and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
Formulate and update departmental policies and procedures
Serve as the subject matter expert on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance.
Ability to travel
Education/Experience:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
4-6 years of business process or data analysis experience, preferably in healthcare.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Medicare
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
4+ years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements).
Experience in healthcare industry, preferably with managed care techniques and administrative philosophy.
Experience in managed health care experience, preferably with Medicare.
Experience working with and leading diverse teams in matrix managed environments.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
XRO8a9j8ZQ
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"EDUCATION
Bachelors degree from an accredited institution in Computer Science or a related field required.
Eight (8) years directly related work experience may be substituted in lieu of degree.
EXPERIENCE
Three (3) years experience with progressively increasing responsibility in related subject matter.
Two (2) years experience as a business analyst working with PeopleSoft in production required.
Experience implementing PeopleSoft required.
KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES
Possess excellent verbal and written communications skills
Ability to function independently on project work and to interface with all levels of the HCC organization in carrying out the duties of this position
Ability to organize data in clear and logical manner for reporting purposes
Ability to analyze and evaluate complex information from internal and external sources
The Organization
The Team
Youll get the chance to make things happen and work closely with inspiring leaders across different parts of the institution.
Whether your role is supportive, administrative, financial or something else, youll be part of a dynamic team that not only provides HCC students with cutting-edge academic and career tools, it also takes care of its people.
Fourth-largest city in the U.S. and home to 54 Fortune 500 companies, second only to New York Citys 55.
145 languages are spoken here.
Overall after-taxes living costs are 5.6 percent below the average for all 308 urban areas recently surveyed.
The weather is great!
Mild winters ensure that outdoor activities can be enjoyed year-round.
World-renowned medical care.
EEO Statement
The following person has been designated to handle inquiries regarding the non-discrimination policies
David Cross, Director EEO/Compliance, Title IX Coordinator
Office of Institutional Equity
PO Box 667517
713 718.8271 or Institutional.Equity@hccs.edu
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Please email resume' to ravisomanchitecnics dot com to discuss.
Identity Business Analyst with at least 5+ years of experience.
Any identity experience with Okta Oracle Ping Splunk IBM Should be good in communication skills.
","['oracl', 'splunk']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['oracl', 'splunk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Tracking Code
2534
This position is contingent upon Contract Award.
This individual will provide part-time support as a Business Analyst IV consultant for the the International Space Station program.
This individual will review, analyze and evaluate business systems and user needs.
They will document requirements, define scope and objectives and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Required Skills
Familiarity of the space industry is a plus.
Required Experience
Education/Experience: Associated Degree with a minimum of 15 years of professional experience or a BA in business or specialized field with a minimum of 10 years of professional experience.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The qualifications listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
This position is contingent upon contract award
Houston, Texas, United States
Position Type
Part-Time
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst:
Business Support Services
Duration: Full Time
Technical Attributes:
Ability to interpret data and translate it into a business impact or strategic actions that need to occur
Familiarity of SAP ERP, HANA, S/4HANA, SAP BW and BOBJ Reporting tools
Knowledge in Financial Accounting, Financial Analysis and Financial Reporting
Familiar with Project life cycle with waterfall and Agile Methodologies
SQL Knowledge a plus
Interpersonal
Demonstrated competency in strategic thinking and management with extremely strong abilities in relationship management.
Ability to exercise creative problem-solving techniques in a highly complex environment using leading edge technology and/or integrating diverse user systems.
Strong project management skills, effectively arranging resources and managing multiple small to large scale projects in a cross-functional environment.
Excellent oral and written communication skills are critical, along with the ability to lead team or individual presentations.
Speaks English fluently
Responsibilities
Analyze financial statements like Consolidated Balance Sheet, P&L and Cash Flow Statements to document the results of the analysis, proposing alternative solutions.
Assist IS/IT business Analysts in researching and coordinating software solutions as assigned.
Conduct meetings with clients to review their problems and procedures; customize meeting topics to client and product
Interview personnel and collaborate with client finance business users to gather business requirements, ascertain unit functions, work performed, and methods, equipment
Provide support to potential clients and sales reps in determining potential, pre-contract integration needs
Develop and promote methods of increasing development efficiency, product quality, and profitability including organizational change, communications, information flow, integrated production methods, inventory control, or cost analysis
Tools
Strong MS Office skills with particular focus on Excel & PowerPoint
Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree or its foreign equivalent in Business Administration, Engineering Management, Management/Computer Information Systems, Computer Science, Electronic Engineering, Information Technology, or other related fields
0-2 years of related IT experience.
Preferably in Information Technology, Financial Accounting, Financial Reporting and Analysis
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'hana', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"PRACTICE OVERVIEW
PRACTICE OVERVIEW
POSITION SUMMARY
The position will report to the Manager, IT Data Warehouse and be responsible for working with many areas within the IT and Clinical teams with a focus on workflow and requirements.
POSITION DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
General
Obtain an expert level of data flow
Assist with root cause analysis for data integrity issues
Able to work with physicians and various levels of support staff
Assist in documentation creation
Assist in building non-standard data flows
Create, maintain and improve data processing and documentation
Assist in analyzing and auditing data flow – making recommendations for quality improvement
Highly detail-oriented with the ability to track and manage multiple work efforts concurrently
Ability to effectively align work with stakeholder priorities and execute in a fast-paced environment
Data flow
Document existing customer data flows using data flow charts
Facilitate working sessions with customers
Work with internal and external customers to propose changes to data flow
Work with project managers and project teams to plan and implement data flow changes
Conduct knowledge transfer sessions with Development teammates on existing and proposed internal and external data flows
Assist in the integration out of new sites
Requirements Gathering
Gather and document requirements for practice information enhancements and integrations
Gather and document requirements for existing data integrations to the DWH including feature / release requests
Work with Development staff and end user to understand requests and translate into requirements
Work with Development staff to develop estimates
Work with Project Managers to develop projects plans including deliverables and due dates
Work with support team to develop test plans and participate in testing
Assist in setting development priorities and bug fixes
DESIRED TECHNICAL AND PROFESSIONAL SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE
5+ years combined IT and healthcare experience
Understanding of data flow between EHR / EMR and PACS, voice recognition applications, etc.
Experience with data architecture, data warehousing, and data modeling, within the healthcare sector, a plus
Familiarity with SSIS, SSRS, Tableau, Control-M, Jira, confluence, bit-bucket a plus
Knowledge of HIPAA data privacy practices and laws a plus
Proficient in Business Analyst skills:
o Interaction with all levels of the business
o Creation of Issue statements, project objectives
o Documentation of data flows
o Gathering and documenting requirements
o Crafting and implementing solutions
Able and interested in working a flexible schedule.
CCPA Notice: When you submit a job application or resume, you are providing the Practice with the following categories of personal information that the Practice will use for the purpose of evaluating your candidacy for employment: (1) Personal Identifiers; and (2) Education and Employment History.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Professional Development Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Yes
","['tableau', 'jira', 'ssr']","['data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'jira', 'ssr', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Houston, Texas
Skills : commodity,trade,project mnager,business analyst,Commodity & Trade
Title: Business Analyst/Project Manager
Duration: 12 months (Possible Extension)
Job Details:
This is a hybrid role of PM and BA with 5+ years of experience
The individual needs to not only manage the project but must be able to do details analysis of number of different commodities trading instruments
Strong preference of Commodities experience is preferred
The individual demonstrates an understanding of customer’s goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions
Effectively manages project risk
Coordinates the work efforts of multiple functional teams through a project plan
Manages basic scope control procedures
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders
Analyzes and reports project status
Monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation
Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans
4-year degree.
Great presentation skills, possesses a commanding presence Commodities knowledge is nice to have
commodity,trade,project mnager,business analyst,Commodity & Trade
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Tasks include but are not limited to updating PS setups, Trees, Reports, Queries, Combo Edit Rules, Allocations, supporting month-end & year-end.
Assists in the analysis, design, and development of PeopleSoft deliverables based on business requirements.
Educate and advise on the PeopleSoft FSCM functionality with emphasis on General Ledger modules.
Work with technical resources to develop, test and document software to implement and maintain an operational system Review / validate requirements and identify opportunities for improvement based on available system functionality and best practices.
Ensures that project deliverables meet business requirements and ensure to the complete project within assigned timelines.
Prepare or coordinate the preparation of reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
Provides support in all phases of SDLC.
Required Skills / Qualifications: Normal 0 false false false EN-US X-NONE X-NONE /* Style Definitions */ table.MsoNormalTable {mso-style-name:""Table Normal""; mso-tstyle-rowband-size:0; mso-tstyle-colband-size:0; mso-style-noshow:yes; mso-style-priority:99; mso-style-parent:""""; mso-padding-alt:0in 5.4pt 0in 5.4pt; mso-para-margin-top:0in; mso-para-margin-right:0in; mso-para-margin-bottom:8.0pt; mso-para-margin-left:0in; line-height:107%; mso-pagination:widow-orphan; font-size:11.0pt; font-family:""Calibri"",sans-serif; mso-ascii-font-family:Calibri; mso-ascii-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-hansi-font-family:Calibri; mso-hansi-theme-font:minor-latin; mso-bidi-font-family:""Times New Roman""; mso-bidi-theme-font:minor-bidi;} - High School Diploma or GED required - Minimum of 5 years’ experience supporting PeopleSoft General Ledger (GL) version 9.0 and above is a must.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, genetic information, sex, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected basis.
Accommodations are available upon request for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Applicants for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States.
This position does not meet the employment requirements for individuals with F-1 OPT STEM work authorization status.
",[None],"['busi', 'normal']",999.0,"['busi', 'normal']"
BA,"10 yr.
Teamcenter experience who can relate to business requirements
The
Business Analyst analyzes complex business problems to be solved with
processes and PLM applications across the enterprise
Analyst
provides technical expertise in identifying, evaluating and developing
systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet user
requirements
Gather
and write specifications and move to prototype
Must write use case,
document and explain procedures
Engineering industry
experience huge plus
Work cohesively with
solutions architect
Position is located
in the Houston office
Interact with
manufacturing facility in Schertz, TX
If you would like to learn
If I can be of further assistance to you, please contact me at 248-522-6609*102
or deepa.kashinath@prolim.com.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"This position is contingent upon Contract Award.
This individual will provide part-time support as a Business Analyst III consultant for the the International Space Station program.
This individual will review, analyze and evaluate business systems and user needs.
They will document requirements, define scope and objectives and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Required Skills
Familiarity of the space industry is a plus.
Required Experience
Education/Experience: Associated Degree with a minimum of 10 years of professional experience or a BA in business or specialized field with a minimum of 5 years of professional experience.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The qualifications listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
This position is contingent upon contract award
Houston, US-TX
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Tittle:Business Analyst with Insurance
Client: AIG
Works with business partners within one or more business organizations to align technology solutions with business strategies.
Supports one or more highly complex business processes, requiring design or integration of
technical solutions that may cross multiple functions of the business.
Serves as a technical lead and may have resource and people management responsibilities.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to understand business strategy requirements.
Leads and provides direction for short- and long-term planning sessions to ensure understanding of business goals and direction.
Provides input from a business and IT perspective.
Leads the assessment of client needs utilizing a structured requirements process (gathering, analyzing, documenting, and managing changes) to prioritize immediate business needs and recommends options, risks, and cost vs. benefits.
Leads development and communicates business requirements and functional specifications for the design and implementation of business solutions.
Analyzes client operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities for improvements.
Responsible for business case development and presentation
Reviews and approves test plans.
Monitors testing process to ensure that business results are adequately tested with minimal risk
Ensures test strategies involve appropriate integration and process components
Delegates approvals as appropriate
Keeps clients informed of problems, issues, and resolutions.
Monitors and analyzes performance metrics to ensure client satisfaction
Manages client expectations.
Ensures IT solutions meet client needs.
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Kindly review the job requirements below.
Named one of the top ten fastest growing businesses in Houston in 2016.
Ranked 25th in the HBJ s Fast 100 Private Companies Award in 2017.
For more information, visit
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"This position is contingent upon Contract Award.
This individual will provide part-time support as a Business Analyst IV consultant for the the International Space Station program.
This individual will review, analyze and evaluate business systems and user needs.
They will document requirements, define scope and objectives and formulate systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Required Skills
Familiarity of the space industry is a plus.
Required Experience
Education/Experience: Associated Degree with a minimum of 15 years of professional experience or a BA in business or specialized field with a minimum of 10 years of professional experience.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The qualifications listed above are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
This position is contingent upon contract award
Houston, US-TX
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The ERP Business Analyst provides insight, guidance and recommendations to identify design enhancements and systems configuration opportunities to improve the utilization of the various ERP modules/applications.
The nature of this work requires an individual whose background combines business expertise and business management skills with an understanding of information technology, and knowledge of the assigned enterprise-wide software and modules.
Primary duties of this position include:
Business systems analysis, project management, workflow analysis, and technical communications.
Provides project coordination, functional expertise, and contributes to improvements and enhancements for mission-critical, enterprise-wide information systems.
Must have problem solving and analytical skills, as well as the ability to communicate information to both technical and non-technical users will be key.
Must have an ability to manage multiple tasks, respond quickly to emergent problems, and to focus both on long-range projects and immediate tasks required to maintain system functionality.
Must have a full understanding of the ERP systems life cycle and be able to guide the team through full SDLC lifecycle of planning, design, development, testing, implementing, maintaining and supporting application software that is delivered on time and within budget.
Serves as a liaison to the technical resources to manage the development of new system functionality, upgrades, system modifications, and day-to-day problem analysis, issue tracking, and resolution.
Maintains effective communication (Oral & Written) between product owner and IT to ensure customer satisfaction.
Facilitates planning and design sessions to clearly document the functional requirements that comply with organization standards to obtain a scope sign off from the directors/product owner(s) effected
Collaborates and facilitates product demos / UAT sessions to ensure customer needs are met prior to deployment.
Analyzes impact of patches and development work on existing functionality/customizations and coordinate their migration to the production system as appropriate
Works with technical resources to develop, test and document software necessary to implement the requested solution
Assists in issue resolution and in the determination of business solutions
Manages small to medium projects involving the various business functions
Directs and coordinates work of others to develop, test, install and/or modify programs per requirements
Facilitates continuous process improvement opportunities
Provides alternative options for any client requests
Ensures adherence to Methodology, IT Controls, and Quality Standards
Ensures proper testing of developed solution is completed
Conducts end user training when needed and prepare user documentation
Prepares or coordinates the preparation of technical reports, simulations and instructional manuals to document systems development.
https://hrrm.harriscountytx.gov/Pages/EqualEmploymentOpportunityPlan.aspx
If you need special services or accommodations, please call (713) 274-5445 or email
ADACoordinator@bmd.hctx.net
Requirements
High school diploma, or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution AND five (5) years of progressive work experience as a ERP business analyst AND experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation).
Additional Requirements:
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP application and knowledge of various modules (HR, Payroll, Purchasing and Finance).
Experience using Microsoft Office tools.
Experience with Agile and Waterfall projects.
Experience using Visio or similar tool.
Experience with Change Management practices.
Experience with systems analysis, design and a solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies.
Experience with backlog management, along with creating detailed specifications from which programs will be written.
May have quality assurance responsibilities.
Ability to work independently.
Must possess excellent written and oral communication skills and be self-driven.
Must have strong reporting knowledge.
NOTE: To qualify for this position, required education, experience, knowledge and skills must be clearly stated on your application's employment history.
NOTE:
Applicants for this position will be subject to a criminal background check that includes being fingerprinted.
This applies to any position with network access to CJI (Criminal Justice Information) systems or access to an area where CJI is received, maintained or stored either manually or electronically (i.e.
custodian, maintenance).
Automatic Disqualifiers:
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for any Felony.
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for any Class A Misdemeanor.
Conviction, probation, or deferred adjudication for a Class B Misdemeanor if within the previous 10 years.
Open arrest for any criminal offense (Felony or Misdemeanor).
Family Violence conviction.
Preferences
Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university.
PeopleSoft Certified.
Knowledge of HCM or FSCM modules in PeopleSoft.
Experience in PeopleSoft v9.2.
General Information
Houston, TX
HOURS:
40 hours per week/ Monday - Friday.
Weekends and 24 on-call infrequently, as needed.
SALARY:
Depends on Qualifications
Based on 26 Pay Periods
Due to a high volume of applications positions may close prior to the advertised closing date.
BENEFITS
Medical
Dental
Vision
Wellness
Life Insurance
Long-term disability
Employee Assistance Program
10 days of vacation each year for the first five (5) years of service.
Accrual rates increase based on years of service.
Professional development opportunities
Dependent Care Reimbursement Plan
Healthcare Reimbursement Account
457 Deferred Compensation Plan
Retirement pension (TCDRS)
Flexible schedules (varies by department)
Transportation Assistance (Metro RideSponsor Program)
https://hrrm.harriscountytx.gov/Pages/Medical.aspx
01
Which of the follow best describes your education as it relates to this position?
High school diploma, or G.E.D.
equivalency from an accredited educational institution
Bachelors degree or higher
None of the above
02
Please describe your educational background including the level of education completed, area of study, and completed major and minor programs.
03
Which of the following best describe your progressive work experience as ERP business analyst?
Less than five years
Five years or more, but less than six
Six years or more, but less than seven
Seven years or more, but less than eight
Eight years or more
I do not have this experience
04
Please describe your progressive work experience as ERP business analyst.
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
05
Do you have experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation)?
Yes
No
06
Which of the following best describe your experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation)?
Less than six months
Six months are more but less than one year
One year or more, but less than two
Two years or more, but less than three
Three years or more, but less than four
Four years or more, but less than five
Five or more years
I do not have this experience
07
Please describe your experience with software development life cycle (Planning, Design, Development, Testing and implementation),
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
08
Do you have experience in any of the following?
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP application and knowledge of various modules (HR, Payroll, Purchasing and Finance).
Experience using PeopleSoft ERP.
Experience using Microsoft Office tools.
Experience with Agile and Waterfall projects.
Experience using Visio or similar tool.
Experience with Change Management practices.
Experience with systems analysis, design and a solid understanding of development, quality assurance and integration methodologies.
Experience with backlog management, along with creating detailed specifications from which programs will be written.
None of the above
09
Please briefly describe your experience to your selection choice to question #8.
(To be considered, qualifying experience must be documented on your application's employment history.)
If you do not have this experience, type ""none"" in the space provided.
10
Do you have a PeopleSoft Certificate?
Yes
No
11
Do you have knowledge of HCM or FSCM modules in PeopleSoft?
Yes
No
12
Do you have experience in PeopleSoft v9.2?
Yes
No
Required Question
","['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
G7w6d6FgER
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Relevant Experience in years: 12+ Yrs.
Must have hands-on experience working with
Teamcenter 9 & beyond
Solid proven background across all phases of a
Solution Delivery Methodology
Sound understanding of latest Teamcenter
architecture, features, application interface framework including CAD
interfaces
Detailed exposure to Siemens PLM product future
roadmap
Good understanding of Energy Product
Development business processes.
Requirement Management, Product Structure
Configurator, Product Configuration (Rule stream)
Ability to assess the business problems and
derive scope in terms of its technical implementation
To design scalable,
reusable and robust solution frameworks
To articulate solution
ideas with absolute clarity, good communication and presentation skills
To redesign existing
systems to improve operational/business efficiency
To demonstrate
technical leadership by guiding the team in critical/challenging technical
issues
To participate and
provide guidance in technical review sessions for critical projects
To define and evaluate
technical competencies required for different types of customer requirements
Should be familiar with technologies that will
be used for this area include
C/C++, Teamcenter ITK, Teamcenter
Style sheets & Transfer modes, Java/Java Swing, Java Portal API
(TcEng), PLMXML, XML/XSL/XSLT/XSL-FO,
HTML/EXCEL/TABLEAU for reporting),
OPENGE\SVN\CVS, T4O, T4S, Teamcenter
Job responsibilities
As the senior PLM domain level expert, lead
design and build activities across P\L; take ownership of complex
implementation issues and provide design solutions and guide project teams for
successful implementations.
Support
and/or guide team through problem definition, issue identification and work
plan development using issue based problem solving principles
Assist with facilitating software assessments
Gather and document technical and functional
user requirements
Develop functional and technical specifications
Support development of application and
technical architecture
Configure various PLM software to meet
specifications
Support the development of custom code
(including integrations to ERP)
Develop and execute test scripts, document
outcomes, and perform analyze/fix bugs
Develop data architecture and manage data
migration efforts
Support business readiness and change
management activities prior to go-live
Support end user go-live and ongoing support
Architect systems, integrations, interfaces and
configurations of Design Engineering and Manufacturing Engineering systems
Provide multiple solution options and
recommendations based on extensive experience and best practices.
Requirement & Document Management
Product Configuration (Rule stream)
Parts, Part Classification, BOM, & Change
Management
Integration with System Engineering, Program
Planning & Timing & ERP tools.
Data Migration from legacy systems.
Ability to work independently; lead small teams
focused on specific work streams of larger projects
Strong oral and written communication skills
Good Analytical skill, Strong problem solving
and troubleshooting skills with the ability to exercise mature judgment
Eagerness to mentor junior team members
Proficient use of Power Point presentation
tool, and MS office tools.
Proven writing skills for mass communication.
updated resume and contact info via email deepa.kashinath@prolim.com or Contact
248-522-2575 Ext: 102
leading provider of end-to-end
IT, PLM and Engineering
They
understand business as much as technology, and help their customers improve
their profitability and efficiency by providing high-value technology
consulting, staffing, and project management outsourcing services.
Their IT
and PLM consulting offerings include; Advisory, PLM Software/Services, Program
Management, Solution Architecture Training/Staffing, Cloud Solutions,
Servers/Networking, Infrastructure, ERP Practices and QA Services.
Engineering
services include Data Translation, CAD/CAM/CAE, Process & Product
Engineering, Prototyping, and Testing/Validation within a wide range of markets
and industries.
","['ms office', 'java', 'excel', 'tableau', 'erp', 'c', 'cloud']","['classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'java', 'excel', 'tableau', 'erp', 'c', 'cloud', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Skills
Â
Business Analyst â P&C (Insurance Background is mandatory)
Conduct workshops along with Internal Tech teams and Commercial HZ Partners (UI/UX, Data Leads, Architecture and Business Product Owners)
Define Business Service capabilities and resources within domains and sub-domains
Identify and defined common capabilities across domains and sub-domains
Define Business services common capabilities.
Map LOB product line data to business services layer
",['c'],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
YzD20bTrAF
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (IAM)
C2H
local to Houston TX
Â
Responsibilities:
Work with IAM Architects to analyze/Refine Requirements for SSO
architecture
Perform application design activities (e.g.
writing functional designs,
use cases), portions of technical architecture, High Level Design (Software Design Specifications), Detailed Design Documents
Document, plan, and execute maintenance and changes for business critical
IAM systems.
Develop and implement testing strategies and robust change management
processes.
Develop a strong understanding of business and system dependencies to
avoid service disruptions.
Create, review and maintain department documentation to ensure it reflects
current policies and procedures.
Collaborate with QA team for all testing cycles
Guiding users in building business cases, performing impact analysis, and
supporting application testing, implementation and training activities throughout the process
Communicates technical content to assigned project stakeholders.
Â
Qualifications:
Minimum of 5 years' experience as an Enterprise business analyst
knowledge of Identity and Access Management protocols and technologies:
OAuth, OpenID Connect, SAML, Federation, SSO, etc.
Minimum 2 years' Experience with process modeling tools
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong written and verbal communication skills needed; ability to tailor
approach based upon
audience and message.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Kindly review the job requirements below.
Must Have Experience working as Business Analyst for website and Chat channel Working experience with Amazon lex or similar technologies Experience maintaining the website for end-user experience and customer order management Integration experience between different business systems, working with integration tools, Product owners, QA testing, system design and analysis.
Strong training, analytical and communication skills.
Contact Information Talent Advocate Ahsan Call 832-240-2093 Email resumearhurlawrence.net Applicants must have valid work authorization in the United States, as visa sponsorship is not available at this time.
Named one of the top ten fastest growing businesses in Houston in 2016.
Ranked 25th in the HBJ s Fast 100 Private Companies Award in 2017.
For more information, visit www.arthurlawrence.net
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration Work Experience 1-3 years City Houston State/Province Texas Zip/Postal Code 77011
BUSINESS ANALYST IV 6monhts contract Downtown Houston, TX 77002LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY $70-80/HR.
(w-2)I.
Job Summary Will play role of product owner and working directly with business and technical/QA......
https://innovasourcing.com/vaz1
View similar jobs
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
ts6g3QAymI
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Thank you.
PrimeroEdge is a leading provider of software solutions to Child Nutrition Departments in K-12 school districts and State Agencies across the nation.
Responsibilities:
• Review and analyze existing functionality for areas of improvement.
• Interact with internal and external customers to discover needs in order to design new features and functionalities.
• Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
• Assimilate stakeholder priorities resulting in a prioritized, estimated and groomed Product Backlog.
• Work in Scrum environment and proactively communicate and collaborate with customers and the team as needed to design software to help K-12 school nutrition professionals achieve excellence.
• Design/mockup new User Interfaces to create the optimal user experience.
• Demonstrate new and existing functionality to both internal and external users.
• While training is not the primary responsibility, some end-user training may be required especially in early stages of large projects.
• Travel from time to time as needed to gather first-hand information.
Requirements:
• You are an excellent communicator.
You easily interact professionally with a diverse group including executives, managers, and subject matter experts via phone, email and occasional on-site meetings.
• You can learn a large proprietary software suite quickly and thoroughly.
• You are innovative and eager to implement new ideas.
• You are detail-oriented with strong work ethics.
• You are comfortable preparing and presenting detailed presentations for internal and external customers.
• You have a knack for explaining complex processes/instructions to end-users.
• You know how to drive projects and get things done through a team of individuals.
• Education - Undergraduate degree
Thank you.
Please see www.primeroedge.com.
Thank you.
",['excel'],"['optim', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'optim', 'commun']"
BA,"You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],[None],2.0,[]
BA,"Position: Business Analyst with Insurance,
Duration: 9+ month Contract
Responsibilities
Works with business partners within one or more business organizations to align technology solutions with business strategies.
Supports one or more highly complex business processes, requiring design or integration of
technical solutions that may cross multiple functions of the business.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to understand business strategy requirements.
Leads and provides direction for short- and long-term planning sessions to ensure understanding of business goals and direction.
Provides input from a business and IT perspective.
Leads the assessment of client needs utilizing a structured requirements process (gathering, analyzing, documenting, and managing changes) to prioritize immediate business needs and recommends options, risks, and cost vs. benefits.
Leads development and communicates business requirements and functional specifications for the design and implementation of business solutions.
Analyzes client operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities for improvements.
Responsible for business case development and presentation
Reviews and approves test plans.
Monitors testing process to ensure that business results are adequately tested with minimal risk
Ensures test strategies involve appropriate integration and process components
Delegates approvals as appropriate
Keeps clients informed of problems, issues, and resolutions.
Monitors and analyzes performance metrics to ensure client satisfaction
Manages client expectations.
Ensures IT solutions meet client needs.
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Master’s Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional organizational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
oDTPOLbseq
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"6+ years of Business Applications Analyst experience supporting business functions around Sales ForceSFDC Proven Salesforce.com integration and administrative skills.
Familiarity with Salesforce.com Integration components for SFDC ( for example, SFDC APIs, Apex controllers, Apex Web Services, Apex callout, outbound messaging, and SFDC data loaders) 4+ Years of experience in requirement gathering, understand and translate business requirements into functional requirements and solutions in Salesforce.
4+ Years of strong experience in SFDC Admin 4+ years of experience with Salesforce CRM (Administrationconfigurationscriptingworkflow) Strong analytical and problem solving skills 4+ years of experience in client facing role in interacting with business to understand Business requirements.
Ability to design and implement new business processes leveraging and integrating across applications like CPQ, Salesforce etc Strong communication skills, both written and oral Good organization and time management skills Contact lthorupjudge.com mailtolthorupjudge.com?
",['salesforc'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Clinical Pharmacist Business Analyst
Department: Cancer Services
Job Type: Full Time
Kelsey-Seybold Clinic.
With 19 clinic locations and more than 400 physicians, Kelsey-Seybold provides medical care in 55 medical specialties and is home to a nationally accredited Breast Diagnostic Center, Endoscopy Center, Infusion Center and Cancer Center.
JOB SUMMARY
Clinical Pharmacist Business Analyst will collaborate with Cancer Services leadership, clinical pharmacy team and IT stakeholders to use data analytics to optimize operational effectiveness and business strategy.
This role will also assist in overseeing formulary and protocol development and management.
EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS & EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS
(A = basics; B = preferred)
Education
A.
Graduate from School of Pharmacy
B.
Experience
A.
3 years hospital/ infusion pharmacy experience with a focus on oncology
2 years’ experience with strong knowledge in pharmacy clinical informatics/ analytics
Experience with Oncology formulary management.
B.
Extensive chemotherapy and oncology background
EPIC- Beacon/Willow experience
SQL experience
Licenses
A.
Texas license Registered Pharmacist.
B.
Board Certification in Oncology
Communication
A.
Effective communication skills with the management team and across the organization to include physicians and other allied health professionals
B.
Special Skills
A.
Strong analytical skills in reporting on drug trends, drug cost and saving opportunities.
Add.
Subtract, multiply, and divide whole number and decimals to calculate infusion preparation dosages.
B.
Other
A.
Strong leadership skills
Good understanding of pharmacy workflows
Ability to analyze and understand business problems to provide solutions
Stress Tolerance- to accurately prepare infusion medication within the required amount of time.
Professional appearance.
.
B.
Excellent people management skills.
WORKING ENVIRONMENT
Office/ Pharmacy
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Control Analyst regularly interfaces with internal audit and compliance teams to drive comprehensive and consistent implementation of defined processes and policies.Responsibilities:The Business Analyst, Loan Operations Controls' responsibilities include, but are not limited to:* Performs daily, weekly and monthly review of existing business processes to identify process variances* Creates and publishes weekly trend reports on business process variances* Designs and implements business controls to minimize risk and ensure compliance with regulatory requirements* Executes and monitors ongoing effectiveness of business controls* Assesses the adequacy and effectiveness of internal controls and loan operations processes* Collaborates with team members across Loan Operations, Compliance and Audit functions to document, maintain and execute appropriate business controls* Identifies and documents risks, controls and self-assurance activities associated with business processes* Collaborate with operational management team to build remediation plans which includes and is not limited to creating or improving training plans, hands on training and monitoring agents* Presents findings to leadership and makes recommendations for process improvements, training initiatives, and other key actions to manage risk* Other duties as assignedQualifications:* Minimum of 5+ years' related experience in data analysis, auditing, and/or account research required* Bachelor's degree in business administration, audit or other related field preferred* Understanding of six sigma methodologies or other process improvement/ quality controls* Familiarity with establishing and monitoring SOX (Sarbanes-Oxley) controls* Multi state consumer loan operations experience a plus* Ability to cultivate and leverage relationships to drive business results* Ability to build complex SQL queries for reports* Ability to analyze data and make connections across various data sets to make recommendations to management and project teams in a timely manner.
* Proficient level experience in Microsoft Excel, Word and Power Point required.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Responsibilities bull Work closely with the Product Owner and Business Analysts for understanding the systemrsquos functional and non--functional requirements.
bull Coordinate release and sprint planning bull Perform Taking part in task estimation bull Implementation review the RightAngle custom components.
bull Help team to resolve both technical problems functional issues bull Code Optimization and performing components testsIntegration test bull Understanding of Physical (Purchase, Sale, lease) and financial deal (Future, Swaps) attributes lifecycle bull Experience and knowledge of Mark to Market and Risk Exposure calculation for all types of Physical, Logistics and financial deal types bull Understanding of date rules, trade pricing (Fixed or curve based) bull Good understanding of Forward curves and market curves configuration bull Experience on configuring and prototyping ETRM system (either of RightAngle, Allegro, TriplePoint, Endur)
",[None],"['risk', 'optim', 'logist', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'optim', 'logist', 'busi']"
BA,"middot Business Analyst with good knowledge of SFDC Administration.
middot 6+ years of Business Applications Analyst experience supporting business functions around Sales ForceSFDC middot Proven Salesforce.com integration and administrative skills.
Familiarity with Salesforce.com Integration components for SFDC ( for example, SFDC APIs, Apex controllers, Apex Web Services, Apex callout, outbound messaging, and SFDC data loaders) middot 4+ Years of experience in requirement gathering, understand and translate business requirements into functional requirements and solutions in Salesforce.
middot 4+ Years of strong experience in SFDC Admin middot 4+ years of experience with Salesforce CRM (Administrationconfigurationscriptingworkflow) middot Strong analytical and problem solving skills middot 4+ years of experience in client facing role in interacting with business to understand Business requirements.
middot Proficient with technology, including office applications, sales force automation, database systems, executing data imports, running exports, merging records, and running reports middot Create and document application requirements by working together with those involved in the development of program enhancements and changes including program staff, programmers, strategic planning and analysis staff andor outside consultants as needed middot Manage the software testing process, which includes devising test plans, creating test cases, establishing protocols and appropriate testing environments and coordinating actual software testing middot Keep application users informed about system functionality and enhancements middot Provide application users with technical support middot Creating and maintaining documentation on processes, policies, application configuration and help related materials for users as database applications are developed middot Elicit requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, business analysis, task and workflow analysis.
middot Ability to design and implement new business processes leveraging and integrating across applications like CPQ, Salesforce etc middot Strong communication skills, both written and oral middot Good organization and time management skills
",['salesforc'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
MCZSsgTdbc
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Profile
The Epic Business Analyst III ensures that the operational interests of their respective functional areas are being fully represented in the day-to-day operations of the Information Systems Department.
Minimum Qualifications
Education/Specialized Training/Licensure: Computer Science Bachelor Degree or related experience.
Experience and certification Prelude/Grand Central highly preferred.
Work Experience:
5+ Years within I.S.
Management Experience: Resource Oversight experience
Special Requirements
Communication Skills: Above Average Verbal (Heavy Public Contact), Exceptional Verbal (e.g., Public Speaking) Writing /Composing (Correspondence/Reports)
Other Skills: Analytical, Design, Research, Statistical
Benefits and EEOC
Applicants may request any reasonable accommodation(s) to participate in the application process.
Job Category
Information Technology
",[None],"['research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Summary
· Learn the needs of the business at a site and functional level
Please note that configuration changes will be strictly limited, and this role should not focus on configuring or customizing the current plant setups.
· Assist the project team in identifying business requirements and development of use cases and business process flows
· Assist the project team with the identification and documentation of potential gaps found during deployment and testing
· Assist with system testing, troubleshooting and documentation of any system related issues
· Assist with data migration reviews and reconciliations
· Assist with training material preparation and review
Quality Management
Quality Management including inspections, planning, certificates, notifications, control plans, serial and lot control, source
inspections
Requirements
· A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration or a related field
· A minimum of 5 years professional experience
· Strong analytical and problem-solving skills for issue identification, assist with root cause analysis of the issue and potential issue resolution within the template to be implemented
· Strong experience in business process analysis and redesign
· Must be a team player and be able to build consensus with others
· Ability and discipline to self-manage assignments to meet deadlines, scope and budget
· Must have excellent verbal and written communications skills
· Ability to work individually, as a member of a functional team, and part of a global team
· The willingness and ability to travel, including internationally (Germany or Canada)
Added Value
· Experience with at least one full lifecycle SAP implementation and roll out projects including: planning, testing, migration reconciliation, training, and post-production support
· Experience in a manufacturing, engineer-to-order environment or a services and repair environment for large equipment
· Ability to develop infosets and write queries
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Profile
The Epic Business Analyst II ensures that the operational interests of their respective functional areas (clinical, revenue cycle, or ancillary departments) are being fully represented in the day-to-day operations of the Information Systems Department.
Minimum Qualifications
Education/Specialized Training/Licensure: Computer Science Bachelor of Science degree or related
Work Experience (Years and Area):
3+ Years within I.S.
One (1) year Hospital/Health Care Organizations.
Experience with Blood Bank Clinical Workflow
Special Requirements
Communication Skills: Above Average Verbal (Heavy Public Contact), Exceptional Verbal (e.g., Public Speaking), Writing /Composing (Correspondence / Reports)
Other Skills: Analytical, Design, Research, Statistical
Benefits and EEOC
Applicants may request any reasonable accommodation(s) to participate in the application process.
Job Category
Information Technology
",[None],"['research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"My client is looking for a Business Analyst (Data Integration/Salesforce) to join their growing team!
Title: Business Analyst (Data Integration/Salesforce)
Type: 6+ month contract
Must Haves:
Experience integrations between Salesforce and other systems is very key.
Solid understanding of data systems, including data relationships and data modeling with the ability to learn and understand various data environments.
End to end implementation experience, systems development, implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
Job Summary:
Conducts business process analysis, detailed requirement gathering, document user stories, prioritize backlog and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
""
Possess a fundamental understanding of end-to-end customer experience integration and dependencies.
""
Works in an Agile environment and continuously reviews the business needs, refines priorities, outlines milestones and deliverables, and identifies opportunities and risks.
""
Develops, owns, and executes product roadmap.
""
Translates product roadmap features into well-defined product requirements including features, epics, user stories, and acceptance test criteria.
""
Prioritizes and maintains the sprint backlog for assigned products, balancing the requirements of stakeholders.
""
Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet business requirements and fulfill user stories
"" Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
""
Collaborate with developers to test and verify that solutions will meet the business requirements
"" Participate in key meetings including discovery sessions, sprint demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Please send resumes to Felix.Fermin@mondo.com
",['salesforc'],"['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst: Billing
Duration: 12 months contract
Pay rate: $32/hr W2
This position will occupy a unique role within the client's billing unit as the team is looking for a billing analyst that bring the capability to enhance client reporting and workflows with significant SQL and Power BI experience and skills.
Experience
Baseline 5-7 years experience in Billing Analyst role within Energy Co. with broad customer base
Utilize PC and mainframe applications, such as Microsoft Office, People Soft, Time, EERS, and PassPort proficiently.
Develop customized reports.
May be expected to travel throughout *** territory as required using personal vehicle and possesses a valid drivers license.
Position Requirements: This position can sit in DePere, WI or Houston, TX.
Education
Business Degree - or related field
Skills
Advanced Excel
Power BI Administrator
SQL & SQL Coding
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi']",['busi'],1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'busi']"
BA,"Principal Strategic Business Analyst
Job Title: Principal Strategic Business Analyst
Job Duration: Full-time, Direct hire
Job Requirements: Business Analytics, Strong problem-solving ability, Strategic analysis, SQL, Excel
What You Will Be Doing
Must be willing to act as a high-level individual contributor, utilizing SQL and Excel on a Daily basis
You will need to be a high-level individual contributor while also potentially leading a small business analytics team (2-3 analysts).
If you want to spend your entire day creating BI visualizations, look elsewhere.
Each day will be different than the last, each project different than the next.
What You Need for this Position
Must Have Skills:
- 4-6 years in Business Analytics: be able to look at the data, understand the impacts, find insights
- 4-6 years in Strategic Analysis: high-level data visualization, dig into data, create a story based on what is found
- 5+ years in SQL: Strong programming and data manipulation abilities
- 5+ years in Excel: Strong skills with pivot tables, perform quick functions, analyses, create visuals
- 3+ years Management experience: Experience leading, developing, and be responsible for a small team
- Solid Business Intelligence Tools Knowledge: strong data visualization concepts (Tableau, Qlikview, Spotfire, etc)
- Exceptional Problem Solver: receive a task, see to the heart of the problem, figure out key drivers, create compelling recommendations
- Advanced Presentation Skills: Must be able to present to C-suite executives while also customizing presentations for different audiences
Financial Services background is a big plus
What's In It for You
Competitive Salary
Bonus Opportunities
Work from home opportunities
Generous Personal Time Off
401k + match
Health, Dental, Vision (considerable employer contributions)
Career development opportunities
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'c']","['busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'c', 'busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"They will also serve as a liaison between IT and other departments
Collecting and analyzing the project's information requirements and transferring the same knowledge to development team.
Preparing estimates for projects assigned.
Evaluating the information collected through task analysis, business process, surveys and workshops.
Preparing accurate and detailed requirement specifications documents, including workflows, processes, client requirements, and gap analysis.
Providing advisement to the development team during the development stage of implementation to meet the client's business and information needs.
Documents the acquired results of analysis and workflows as well as obtaining sign-off from the appropriate client.
Acting as a strategic partner with IT to influence the design, alignment, and implementation of technical standards to address information requirements.
Identifying requirements for access management, separation of duties, integrity, quality, audit, and lineage; including driving and developing new identity access management guidelines.
Preparing presentations and deliverables.
Coordinating with the groups who test, validate, evaluate new applications and functions to ensure information adheres to requirements and business needs.
Requirements
3-5 years of exexperience working as a Business Analyst, with a focus on identity access management and related technologies.
Sailpoint experience is a must
Agile experience preferred
Excellent communication skills, presentation and interpersonal skills are required.
A demonstrated track record of making a difference and adding value.
Strong organizational skills with the ability to multi-task.
Ability to think creatively, highly-driven and self-motivated.
Ability to work and adjust to changing deadlines.
Creative problem-solving skills.
Working remotely, must be able to develop relationships across the client organization, working cross functionally to get results.
Ability to present complex information in a simplified fashion to facilitate understanding.
Proficient with MS Office products including Microsoft Project.
Familiarity with Identity, Privileged, and Data Access tools
Bachelor's Degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, CIS or related field is a plus!
MUST HAVE SAILPOINT EXPERIENCE
MUST HAVE BUSINESS ANALYST EXPERIENCE
NO PHONE CALLS PLEASE
","['ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst ERP-D365
[""United States Of America-Texas-Houston""]
largest land-based drilling rig fleet and is a provider of offshore
drilling rigs in the United States and multiple international markets.
and innovative technologies for its own rig fleet and those of third
parties.
JOB SUMMARYWorking
closely with both internal and external departmental representatives,
works to optimize the use of the ERP to improve business operations.
Has a thorough understanding of business/departmental operations.
Examines business process, performs training and guides system use.
May guide reengineering projects, specify system requirements, conduct
feasibility studies, make software recommendations and assist with
implementation.
May work in a team lead role.
DUTIES AND
RESPONSIBILITIES
Focus expertise in core Microsoft ERP systems ( Microsoft
AX2009/AX2012 and Dynamics 365 Finance and Operations )
Strong understanding of Finance functions inside Dynamics 365 F&O
Support of Supply Chain, Production, and Operations systems,
processes, and best practices
Backup support of Microsoft Field Services and CRM solutions
Analyze current business processes and assists users in making
best use of systems.
Work with others members of the Business Systems team to help
evaluate data and processes, trouble-shooting systems and
incorporating solutions as required
Manage the implementation of the software and processes within a
particular module/business area
Discuss business requirements with managers and users
Identify information needs not currently met by existing software
or systems
Develop strategies to improve timeliness of information and
overall efficiency
Assess the cost/benefit of recommended process changes
Implement business and software solutions
Follow up with managers and users to ensure compliance with new
procedures and effectiveness of new systems.
Perform post-implementation review
Accountable for quality, completeness, and on-time delivery of an
assigned project
Understanding of Software Development Life Cycle
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS / SKILLS
Post-secondary education with a Computer Sciences or Business
Degree
At least 5 years related experience in Microsoft AX2009/AX2012 and
Dynamics 365 Finance and Operations
Minimum 5 years of experience work experience as a Sr. MS Dynamics
D365/AX functional business analyst, consultant, and lead ERP
analyst
Completed at least one full life cycle implementation of Microsoft
D365
Expert functional knowledge on at least three of the listed
modules D365 General Ledger, Taxes, Accounts Receivable, Projects,
and Sales Management modules
Able to understand the user requirements and be able to configure
the system independently for various system options across the
above-listed modules to achieve the desired results.
Provide Design, Test, Support, and Training as required during the
course of the projects.
Experience on upgrading from AX to D365
would be an added advantage
Knowledge on Inventory Management, Procurement, Production,
Planning, Projects, and Advance Warehouse management modules would
be an added advantage.
Help in month end closing and
monitoring/fixing interface errors
Knowledge on the interfaces on D365 with other applications if any
Excellent analytical skills
Good understanding of existing software
Above average written and verbal communication skills
Strong business understanding in the area of specialization
(manufacturing systems and processes, supply chain and
distribution areas, and the services / operations area of the
organization)
Ability to analyze troubleshoot problems and recommend solutions
BEHAVIORAL COMPETENCIES
Self-starter with the ability to work independently with minimal
direction
Strong multi-tasking and organizational skills
Ability to quickly learn new applications and tools
","['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Proudly dedicated to serving the federal government.
Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry.
You are:
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for business process and system analysis, design/translating business requirements to technical requirements, testing, troubleshooting, and implementation of components in an enterprise SAP environment.
The SAP Business Analyst will work closely with architects, developers, technical services (i.e.
BASIS, Middleware, Portal) and business analysts to perform business analyst functions and responsibilities .
The SAP Business Analyst is involved in maintenance, enhancement and/or development work of SAP modules and those that interface with other applications.
The SAP Business Analyst has a range of skills and knowledge of the technologies used and applications supported.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide change management and training support.
The SAP Business Analyst is required to participate in pager/on-call support.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide estimates of software development cost and schedule.
The Work:
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members and executives on and across the project team.
Provide SAP application support in a timely manner.
Analyze, design, troubleshooting, and test break/fix requests and enhancements to SAP modules.
Provide change management and training support for SAP enhancements.
Identify, track and resolve issues and risks affecting the SAP application.
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members to gather and interpret functional user/system requirements into system specifications.
Design SAP components to functional and technical programming standards.
Provide support toward installation of application releases into production as directed.
Coordinate and participate in structured peer reviews / walkthroughs.
Create operational documentation.
Perform system, interface, and batch monitoring as required
Meet service commitments for assigned deliverables and proactively provide work status.
Continuously develop industry knowledge and associated skills.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Analyzes internal and external data, develops and presents recommendations that empower business leaders to make informed decisions.
Real partners.
Real possibilities.
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Sr.
IT Business Analyst - PMOHouston, TX
The Sr.
IT Business Analyst position is to optimize business performance by enhancing the alignment between business processes and IT.
The Sr. Business Analysts (Sr. BA) is also responsible for translating business requirements into technical requirements for a department or enterprise IT environment.
The Sr. BA conducts discovery workshops and facilitates the application development process to ensure systems meet business needs.
This role is pivotal to the success of critical technology projects.
Requires a Bachelor's degree in Technology Project Management, Management and Information Systems (MIS), Computer Science or a closely related field.
At least 6 years of directly applicable experience.
May require extensive knowledge on specific technologies or business functions.
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"Department Marketing Statement
Job Profile
The Epic Business Analyst III ensures that the operational interests of their respective functional areas are being fully represented in the day-to-day operations of the Information Systems Department.
Minimum Qualifications
Education/Specialized Training/Licensure: Computer Science Bachelor degree or related Experience
Work Experience:
5+ Years within I.S.
Epic Cadence, Grand Central/Prelude build and analysis experience
Management Experience: Resource oversight experience
Special Requirements
Communication Skills: Above Average Verbal (Heavy Public Contact), Exceptional Verbal (e.g., Public Speaking) Writing/Composing (Correspondence/Reports)
Other Skills: Analytical, Design, Research, Statistical
MORE INFORMATION ABOUT THIS POSITION
JOB FUNCTIONS
The Business Analyst on this project will work directly with customers to capture current state workflows, produce process and gap analyses, map future-state workflows, and conduct needs assessments.
Will be responsible for all aspects of Epic build, testing, validationn, go-live readiness, implementation and post-implementation support.
While self-motivation is a plus, most important is your ability to collaborate effectively with customers and a multi-disciplinary group of teammates including billing, HIM, lab, imaging, pharmacy, interface, technical, ambulatory, and inpatient clinical analysts.
(Please note: Due to the high degree of collaboration and team integration required, working remotely during the project phase of this position will not be possible, but maybe later!)
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Participates in core Epic project activities: design, build, test, implement and post-implementation support.
Demonstrates an understanding of Epic functionality and how clinical, business, and ancillary modules interact.
Works closely with users to identify problems and provide solutions.
Demonstrates an understanding of users needs.
Provides troubleshooting for all applications and software within assigned area.
Works independently on problems of moderate scope where analysis may involves multiple factors.
Analyzes reasonably complex issues and develops/implements solutions with general guidance.
Thinks outside the box to creatively solve problems while staying aligned with existing, foundation build.
Participates as needed to install upgrades, patches and fixes.
Manages issues/risks and escalate as required.
Assists in the design, delivery, and maintenance of related training programs and materials.
Seeks workflow guidance and technical information from managers and teammates as needed.
Provides weekly status reports.
Be available for after hours, on-call rotation shifts as needed.
GENERAL QUALIFICATIONS/REQUIREMENTS:
Current Epic certification in one or more Epic front office business modules is required: Cadence, Prelude, Grand Central.
Additional Epic certifications or proficiency in the following are a plus: HIM, Identity, Referrals, Community Connect, Reporting Workbench
3 - 5 years Epic analysis and relevant build experience, including experience implementing advanced systems.
Strong attention to detail with advanced knowledge of both clinic and hospital workflows.
Demonstrated ability to develop creative solutions for complex problems.
Strong organizational skills and ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneously.
Excellent communication (written and verbal) and interpersonal skills.
Able to communicate effectively with technical teammates, as well as managers and customers/users.
Independent, energetic, creative, and self-motivated team player!
Benefits and EEOC
Applicants may request any reasonable accommodation(s) to participate in the application process.
Job Category
Information Technology
",['excel'],"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Sr. HR Business Analyst
Vacancy Number: 23992
Date Posted: July 30, 2019
Key Accountabilities
• Translates business strategies into IT requirements and develops business requirements for IT services.
• Accountable to the IT function for advocacy of the IT policies, strategies, and practices.
• Communicates with the business customers around IT services, costs and needs.
• Translates business needs/strategies into IT requirements and sources IT services to meet requirements (current and future).
• Understands end-to-end business processes, actively measures business contribution of enabling systems (functional business system measures), and initiates improvement to the process and/or systems.
• Works with service managers to ensure services meet customer needs.
• Provides projected demand for services to the Service Managers.
• Understands and communicates to the customers on both the cost and value of services provided.
• Manages detailed business process software portfolio (when applicable).
• Performs front-end-loading (FEL), business case development and where appropriate, leads projects.
• Works with business-unit-specific vendors and industry groups.
Influences customer demand.
• Reviews range of existing solutions available and presents options and recommendations to the customer on which ones to use.
Required and Preferred Skills and Experience
• Senior level, typically 7-10+ years of experience.
• Understands advanced aspects of discipline and is viewed as an expert in a given field.
• Applies broad range of competencies to develop solutions to complex problems.
• Influences others to achieve objectives.
• Often provides specialized/technical/functional guidance to others within department and/or business asset.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status, or other status protected by law or regulation.
",[None],"['recommend', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Job DescriptionOur client is looking for someone whose skill-set combines knowledge of telecommunications software, business analysis expertise, and an understanding of Dynamics CRM.
To give you a bit of insight: The Business Analyst will provide knowledge of industry expertise and business analysis efforts to clientele during pre-acquisition, through the implementation process, and support the building out of best practices.
The primary goal is insuring the delivery of solutions and support while recommending best business practice improvements for the clients.
This position is responsible for documenting customers' business requirements for system implementations and configurations.
You will write business requirements for new product features, meet product enhancement goals, upkeep of standards and expenses, and meeting core needs of the customer base.
Salary: up to 85k + benefits package
Job Requirements:
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Manager, Financial Business Analyst
AZ, Scottsdale - 7233 E Butherus Drive
ID
2020-4004
Date Posted
4 hours ago(6/23/2020 7:57 PM)
US-AZ-Scottsdale
Category
Finance/Accounting
About W. R. Berkley Corporation
Responsibilities
This is not your traditional Accounting Manager role; this is a role of the future focusing on processes, analysis, and control structure.
A collaborative attitude, transparency, clear communication, advanced excel skills and an inclination to help others are all must-haves.
Must possess a sense of ownership and be accountable for their work.
Perform financial analysis to ensure stability of agents and mitigation of credit risk exposures
Manage and implement continuous process improvements within the vendor management process, with a focus on mitigating risk and understanding the financial impacts of vendor relationships
Recommend process improvements to achieve greater efficiencies, reduce overhead costs, and strengthen the control environment
Provide analysis for internal management reporting and external financial reporting – Dotted line reporting to CFO
Manage the travel and entertainment program
Provide hands on leadership, training, mentoring, and work product management
Collaborate on cross-functional project teams providing value.
Qualifications
Bachelors Degree in Finance, Accounting, Business or related required.
Minimum 5 years of finance experience required
Minimum 2 years of team management experience required.
Strong leader who thrives on coaching, training and building a great team environment
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, constantly changing environment
Detail oriented with strong organizational skills and ability to manage multiple priorities effectively
Proficient in core business programs (e.g.
Word, Excel and Outlook) Intermediate to Advanced Excel skills required
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Options
Create Profile & ApplyApply
Share
",['excel'],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"That’s Nice, But What’s the Job?
From API integrations and database structures to page layouts and built-from-scratch applications, you are an expert at digging in and understanding how systems work together.
In business meetings you are the technical voice who can speak to the systems impact.
In discussions with developers, you are the voice of the business advocating for your customer.
You really get the big picture and business goal, and are adept at translating that into the details needed for your team to make the goal a reality.
You play an integral, collaborative role in feature development, from business ask through user acceptance testing and deployment.
Work with Product Owners and end users to develop thorough requirements
Create concise and relevant project artifacts and build reports that tell a story
Work as a member of cross-functional teams to help design solutions
Develop user stories centered on the business value
Work with a team of developers to ensure requirements are met and provide insight during development
Partner with QA on test plans/cases, perform UAT
Communicate with all levels of the organization (end users – sr. executive level)
Function as a subject matter, process, and operational expert for supported Product Line
Assist in troubleshooting complex systems issues
Organization and time management skills in spades.
You’ll be handling multiple projects and deadlines that will require you to prioritize then re-prioritize… then… re-prioritize again.
Expert in relationships!
You’ve probably taken multiple personality assessments, know what Emotional Intelligence is, and pride yourself on your ability to build relationships based on mutual trust and respect.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills - the ability to talk and write with confidence, charisma and competence for a wide variety of audiences.
Detail-oriented.
The Specifics.
You’ve got a minimum of 3 years’ Business/Solutions Analysis experience, preferably working in an Agile environment.
Whether it be homegrown IT systems or out-of-the-box software implementations, you’ve worked on systems that are used company-wide by lots of users.
Collaboration, collaboration and one more time, collaboration.
You are an experienced liaison who can bring all stakeholders together and, more importantly, get them to agree.
Creating workflows, brainstorming use cases and coming up with clear, concise user stories are finely honed skills for you.
It’s in the job title.
You’ve got solid analytical skills.
Be it tables of data or end-user flows, you know how to analyze and organize.
Once you’ve analyzed and organized, you can create a compelling story with your excellent written and verbal skills.
You are a highly motivated self-starter who doesn’t need to be micromanaged.
You think with a business owner mindset and are consistently anticipating business needs.
Nice to Haves.
While the Microsoft Office Suite is a given (Word, Excel, Visio, PowerPoint, Project), experience working in or using any of the following applications is a plus
Microsoft SQL
Tableau
Google Analytics
Application Insights
Adobe Creative Suite (Photoshop, Illustrator, XD)
InVision
Balsamiq or any other wireframe tool
Any equivalent combination of education, training and/or experience that fulfills the requirements of the position will be considered.
Anything Else?
Absolutely.
So What About the Perks?
Perks matter.
Medical, Dental and Vision.
16 days of PTO and 6 paid Holidays.
Because who doesn’t love time off?
Casual Dress.
Game Room.
Wellness Program and In-House Gym.
Growth opportunities.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Supports requirements gathering and discovery workshops for custom IT solutions
Conducts current state assessments of business processes and supporting systems
Develop and manage projects and initiatives to meet the clients business needs
Review, update, and maintain policies and procedures
Qualifications
Bachelors or Masters Degree
Strong Communication & Technical skills
Responsible, dependable, quick learner
Demonstrated ability to adapt to new technology
Additional Information
Various Sponsorship Benefits for International Students:
OPT Sponsorship Jobs
OPT Extension
E-verified Employers
H1B Visa Processing for OPT Candidates
50 plus direct customers
Free Online training
Excellent Salary Package
Job Assistance and Support
Real-time Certified S/W Trainers
Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
Online & onsite support provided
Training Process:
2 to 3 week online training using WebEx
Training provided by instructors with extensive industry experience
Daily training (Evening 2 - 3 hours)
Teaching with 70% exercise and 30% lecture
Real time examples and case studies to practice with
Special one-on-one support before joining a project
Limited Students in every batch
Marketing & Placement:
Strong and motivated marketing team
Marketers are specifically trained
Great Marketing Support
Mock-Interviews and interview training
Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
Online & onsite support provided
Interested?
Feel free to call me or text me at (609) 796-2021
Contact Details:
Amir
(609) 796-2021
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"JOB TITLE:
Jr. Business Analyst V
JOB #:
2299
DIVISION:
Juvenile Justice Services Division
HIRING SALARY:
$52,990.00 annualized
FIRST REVIEW DATE:
March 1, 2019
CLOSING DATE:
All positions are open until filled.
POSITION SUMMARY:
This position serves as a liaison between the juvenile probation business partners and the technical team.
The position participates in the planning and completion of all juvenile automation projects roll-out; including testing, training, and application support.
In addition, the Jr. Business Analyst is responsible for documenting business requirements for system fixes and enhancements, including gathering information from subject matter experts.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
The successful candidate must have a Bachelors degree in a Criminal Justice, Computer Science, InformationTechnology, Management Information Systems, Business Administration, Communications, or related field, and three years experience.
Directly related experience may substitute for the degree requirement.
Other requirements include: an understanding of business analyst role and the role of other team members; basic understanding of courts, probation, and/or dependency; strong analytical and problem solving skills; proven verbal/written communication skills to include facilitating meetings; excellent teamwork skills; strong organization skills with great attention to detail; excellent training skills, specifically in training of business partners; experience with the creation of training curriculum and materials, including understanding of web based training capabilities; and the ability to work well in a collaborative team environment.
This position requires the ability to travel up to 25% of the time to rural probation departments.
A valid drivers license is required.
Travel level: up to 25%
SELECTION PROCESS:
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
Some positions may take 4-6 weeks to fill.
Only applicants whose backgrounds most closely meet the needs of the position may be invited to interview.
Requests for a special accommodation to participate in the interview process should be made at the time you are contacted to schedule an interview.
The Selection Process may include first and/or second round panel interviews.
This is a Regular, Full-time, Exempt position.
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"You will partner with Product Managers and other Business Analysts to research, understand, and define how specific product features and improvements should be delivered in a SaaS software development environment.
This role will
document findings into requirements, use cases and / or specifications that will be used for development and testing phases,
provide relevant acceptance test criteria and work closely with Developers and QA to ensure they have correctly interpreted the specifications,
work closely with the Product Managers to monitor and manage the progress of feature deployments,
work with Customer Care and Client services support team members, interacting with internal users to identify root causes for issues.
This individual must be a self-starter who has experience working with Agile development teams and is a strong communicator who can work with business stakeholders to understand business needs to align initiatives appropriately into releases.
General Responsibilities:
Working with the Connectivity team to architect and support the connectivity platform.
Define and maintain the infrastructure for creating workflow orchestrations and data transformations within the connectivity platform
Defining and maintaining the lifecycle of API’s in the API Management and developer portal in support of an open development platform.
Perform research to establish requirements that will best meet client needs
Write detailed specifications for developers to execute
Track all work in JIRA
Execute user acceptance tests of functionality delivered by development teams
Communicate project status regularly to product owner
Track and report status and other metrics against goals on an ongoing basis
Work with remote QA teams to develop testing plans
Ensure completion of operational and technical documentation prior to software release for each application or system
Work flexible hours with teams in multiple countries
Establish and adhere to project management best practices
Qualifications
The successful candidate will have proficiency in many of the areas defined below:
At least 5 years of experience working with data connectivity between third party systems including ERP’s, banking development platforms, treasury or finance applications.
Experience working with data transport methods and protocols (SFTP, HTTP, OAuth and APIs in general) including the administration and management of APIs using development portals.
Knowledge and experience with the Azure platform and toolsets is highly beneficial.
Modern ETL techniques using cloud-based tools and connectors.
Experience working with cloud-based platforms (e.g.
AWS, Azure)
Familiarity with SQL databases and SQL in general.
Effective communication skills, both verbal and written (required)
Experience with JIRA preferred
Desire to work with teams in multiple countries, across time zones (required)
Bachelor’s degree
","['sql', 'aw', 'azur', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud']","['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'aw', 'azur', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"This position will be responsible for Customer Service performance visibility through the reparation and analysis of data.
Utilizes data and information to produce valuable insights and partnership with the business.
Responsible for the execution of service excellence projects and programs assigned.
Determines and develops approach to solutions.
Receives technical guidance only on unusual or complex problems or issues* May be responsible for entire projects or functions having modest scope/impact or portions of projects having considerable scope/impact to department, area, and, at times, business unit results* Participate and contribute in cross-departmental collaboration to identify areas for service improvement covering processes or controls and recommend specific CS-related improvement actions* Prepare monthly summary reports and build databases as required for the CS department* Analyze service incidents and failures to surface trends in service gaps and process weaknesses in the Customer Service Dept.
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"SunIRef:Event141
NA
If you need assistance or an accommodation during the application process because of a disability, it is available upon request.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 1+ Month (Extension Due to Fiscal Year)
Position Summary:
The business analyst's primary objective is helping businesses implement technology solutions in a cost-effective way by determining the requirements of a project or program, and communicating them clearly to stakeholders, facilitators and partners.
Responsibilities:
Understand what the business does and how it is accomplished and key process dependencies that may exist
Analyze business functional requirements to identify information, procedures and decision flows
Assist in identifying scope of work
Elicit requirements and document in either a Business Requirements Document format or, as Agile Backlog Items
Prepare business process maps and high-level work flows
Create the following documents: Use Cases, Functional Specification, Wireframes, and Report Mock-ups
Develop Agile Product Backlog items for presentation to development teams and business owners including appropriate assumptions, acceptance criteria, User details, and non-functional requirements
Identify business processes for redesign; Determine how to improve existing business process; Identify modifications to automated processes
Identify complex requirements across systems and business domains
Understand the integration of processes across domains, scope, charter, plans
Ability to communicate technical information to a non-technical audience; communication of business information to a technical audience
Co-ordinate testing efforts with Quality Assurance
Performs other duties as assigned or apparent
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related field preferred; Master's degree preferred
Minimum of 4 years' practical experience in business analysis required
Minimum of 3 years' experience in scrum/agile environments; Scrum certification preferred
Experience gathering requirements from the client/business and documenting.
Experience with process improvement, workflow, benchmarking and / or evaluation of business processes required
Intermediate level of proficiency with PC based software programs and automated database management systems required (Excel, Access, PowerPoint) required.
Ability to communicate analysis including trends and opportunities to clients and the business in writing and verbally required
Ability to problem solve including multiple priorities and research conflicting and/or inaccurate data as required.
Working knowledge of relational databases, database structures is required.
Knowledge of current Microsoft .NET technologies including C#, VB.NET, ASP.Net, and SharePoint highly preferred.
Working knowledge of Team Foundation Services 2013 preferred.
Strong aspiration to learn new technologies.
Demonstrated ability to use discretion, make sound decisions, and maintain confidentiality.
Proven strong relationship-building and communication skills with team members and business users.
Ability to work with a minimal amount of direction while being pro-active in keeping their management informed of project related issues.
Ability to respectfully question ideas and share a point of view with others in support of the business requirements and needs.
Ability to manage multiple projects at the same time and shift priorities quickly.
Experience working on an Agile/Scrum team preferred.
Proven strong problem-solving skills, troubleshooting, and root cause analysis.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong aspiration to learn new technologies
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Return to Job SearchBusiness AnalystAccounting Business AnalystLocation: 2727 N Central Ave, Phoenix, Arizona 85004POSITION OVERVIEWBusiness analysis is a core business practice and the link between U-Haul accounting business objectives and information technology capabilities.
This practice contributes to profitability primarily through process efficiencies that lead to operating cost reductions.
The core skill is developing technical solutions to business problems which all begins with defining, analyzing and documenting requirements.PRIMARY FUNCTIONPartner with cross-functional teams for the purpose of eliciting detailed business requirements and documenting accounting process flows.
Research and analyze internal and external processes to further refine requirements and develop business practices.
Document requirements using standardized functional spec templates including business rules, data flows, accounting flows and test cases.
Conduct business walkthroughs and deliverable reviews that meet PMO governance standards.
Partner with IT to help design and test through the entire project life cycle to ensure final products meet expected outcomes.Business analysts typically take the lead role in:* Assisting with the business case* Eliciting requirements from leadership, key stakeholders and end-users* Organizing, translating and simplifying requirements* Analyzing and communicating requirements* Recommendation of next stepsYOUR IMPACT* Act as the business liaison between accounting users and programming staff.
* Collaborate with business partners to capture user requirements, procedures and problems to automate processing or to improve existing systems.
* Prepare workflow charts and diagrams to specify, in detail, operations to be performed by system personnel.
* Work as a lead analyst on assigned projects and make decisions on behalf of the accounting group.
* Develop and understand user support services at a detailed level, such as training, documentation and communications for accounting specific processes.YOUR KNOWLEDGE & ABILITIESBusiness analysts typically possess the following skills:* Excellent written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills* Understanding of systems engineering concepts, business case development, modeling techniques and methods* Ability to be proactive and multi-task in an ever-changing environment* Ability to think analytically and to act tacticallyYOUR PEOPLE SKILLS* Ability to work successfully within a team as well as independently* Establish and maintain effective inter-departmental relationships* Ability to work in a team environment that promotes collaborationYOUR QUALIFICATIONS* Bachelor's Degree is required.
* Advanced-level experience with Excel, Word and Visio* 2-3 years of experience as a business analyst including technical documentation writing and flow charting* IT, Programming and/or accounting experience desired.
* Knowledge of accounting principles, systems and prior experience using SAP software is preferred.JOB ASSESSMENT* Must be able to demonstrate advanced level excel skillsU-Haul is an equal opportunity employer.
All applications for employment will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, provincial, state, or local law.
Individual accommodations are available on requests for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Information obtained during this process will only be shared on a need to know basis.
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"You will work alongside other business analysts and report directly to the project manager.
Your main tasks will include performing detailed requirements analysis, documenting processes, and performing some user acceptance testing.
To succeed in this role you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to non-technical users.
Responsibilities:
Develop Excel based analytical models for clients
Should be able to deliver on time
Participate in team meetings to provide ideas to achieve the goals of the clients
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
Qualifications:
Master’s in IT/ Computer Science
0-2 years’ relevant experience
Open to Re-locate
Ability to gather and document client requirements / develop project plan
Detail oriented and able to work well independently as well as a lead the team
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong attention to detail and results oriented
Well organized; adaptability and ability to learn quickly
Ability to develop good, effective working relationships with customers through minimal contact
Powered by JazzHR
tzbRzOKg25
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst (Healthcare)
Duration: 10 Months
The Arizona Department of Child Safety is looking for a Business Analyst with Healthcare Experience to work with clients and internal stakeholders to deliver key strategic and operational business projects.
In this role, you will serve as liaison between business and technology leaders while researching and defining data and business processes.
This position requires that the business analyst have exceptional analytics skills and be able to work independently while providing concise, high quality deliverables.
Primary Functions:
Interact with business and technical resources to support targeted development and implementation activities.
Develop and implement effective business solutions through research and analysis of complex data and business processes.
Support prioritized operational / strategic business activities through creative analysis and critical thinking.
Document business requirements including assessment and analysis of identified customer needs and supporting requirements.
Develop effective relationships with key stakeholders through efficient communication and high quality project execution.
Maintain and deliver work products with a clear sense of accountability, urgency and focus on quality.
Maintenance of operational workflow documentation including troubleshooting support as required.
Active participation and leadership in application release and testing including system readiness, data validation and test script generation and execution.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or related field.
Minimum of 5 years' experience in Information Services or related business area.
Applied knowledge of Software Development Lifecycle.
Prior experience and understanding of healthcare data management, clinical informatics, and/or data analysis.
Specific Skills:
Strong expertise in facilitation and clear communication skills.
Advanced business, technical and software documentation authoring skills.
Organized, self-driven and able to manage stakeholders with diverse expectations and technical expertise.
Ability to efficiently analyze and map operational processes with support for managing change.
Problem solving that leads to reliable recommendations and clear expectations.
Prior experience with compliant (e.g.
HIPAA, 21 CRF Part 11) systems, processes and operations development is preferred.
Experience with healthcare outcomes analysis is preferred.
",[None],"['data', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['data', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"As a liaison between the business and IT department, the Business Analyst ensures that the scope of work requested to enhance or modify existing application processes are clearly documented, communicated and validated.
The Business Analyst works closely with the IT technical team and/or outside vendors to design, develop, document and test solutions that meets the business requirements.
PRINCIPAL RESPONSIBILITIES:
Serves as the primary liaison and point of contact between IT and the assigned functional business area for routine software development and enhancement projects.
Coordinates the process of obtaining functional requirements from applicable business stakeholders and subject matter experts utilizing elicitation techniques.
Performs research and analysis for proposed projects in order to determine feasibility and present findings to management.
Facilitates the development of software solutions and is responsible for the knowledge transfer of software program requirements to the IT Customer Support team throughout the life cycle of a change request or development project.
Creates detailed documentation of functional, system (non-functional), user and reporting requirements that may include but is not limited to: Use Cases, Logical Models, Process Flow Diagrams, Report Specifications and Data Mapping & Flow Diagrams.
Performs profiling and analysis of data from source systems.
Supports quality assurance and control efforts through the use of data analysis as part of pre- and post-implementation reviews for software development projects.
Provides support to functional and user acceptance testing groups as part of project implementation.
Assists others with creation of the value proposition (ROI) for proposed projects.
Maintains a system enhancement request database and coordinates the related application enhancement release schedule.
Works jointly with other IT Managers to create detailed project work plans for software development and enhancement projects.
Coordinates status meetings and produces progress reports.
Maintains and builds working relationships with software application vendors.
Performs other job related duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Experience using Structured Query Language (SQL) for data analysis.
Business Analysis or Project Management Professional certification.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Statistics, IT or related field or minimum of 5 years of experience in a business or technical analysis role.
Minimum of 1 year of work experience with business systems related to system support, analysis or development.
Minimum of 2 years of experience with business analysis.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, disability, protected veteran status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.
The statements used herein are intended to describe the general nature and level of the work being performed by an employee in this position, and are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of responsibilities, duties and skills required by an incumbent so classified.
",['sql'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Duties and Key Responsibilities:
•Assist in the client’s data acquisition process and resolve data integrity issues
•Evaluate and execute extraction, transformation, and loading (ETL) processes
•Perform extensive data validation/quality assurance analysis within large datasets
•Build product configurations for business rules, workflow, and data mapping using internal tools
•Assist in pre-go-live user acceptance testing (UAT) efforts and respond quickly to issues that arise
•Participate in regular status calls and meetings with clients and internal staff, provide excellent customer service to clients
•Create and maintain documentation related to project implementation and transition phases
•Ensure the Project Manager is updated on actions due
•Perform other duties as assigned
Education:
•Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, IT, Finance, Business or related field preferred
• Technical background preferred
Experience:
• Minimum of 3 years of prior data analysis skills, working as a data analyst, or working with data models
•Experience working in a client facing environment required
Skills:
•Microsoft Office Suite proficiency (Excel, Visio, Word, PowerPoint, OneNote) required
- Intermediate to Advance Excel skills required (Pivot Tables, V-look up's etc.)
•Knowledge of relational databases required, SQL preferred
•Proven ability to manage multiple projects and complete complex tasks to a high level of accuracy and under pressure required
•Strong analytical, problem-solving, and troubleshooting skills required
•Strong attention to detail, self-motivation, and solution-orientation required
•Exceptional written and verbal communication skills required
•General accounting knowledge helpful
Calero-MDSL is an equal opportunityemployer.
All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Project Business Analyst
Requisition # 10035998-WD
Job Type Day
Date Posted 06/12/2020
Your potential.
Your opportunity.
Do you want your voice heard and your actions to count?
Sr Business Process Analyst
Job Summary
Collaborating with the Director of RSS Project Shared Services group, and the Business Analyst Center of Excellence, the Project Business Analyst-VP works with partners from the business units and related third parties in support of efforts and projects focused and aligned with Finance Management of the Americas (FMA), Transformation and America’s Risk Management goals and objectives to drive operational efficiencies and scalability, reduce risk, support product implementations, develop and enhance business process management including but not limited to system and technology capabilities, vendor services and tools, data migration and integrity, and project lifecycle support of systems implementations, data solutions, and process redesign and implementation.
Responsibilities
Work with business partners to elicit high-level requirements and collect business needs.
This may include helping to define the business problem and primary objectives of new projects.
Clearly articulate and document business requirements in detail following prescribed project methodology.
Assesses the risks of various solutions and prioritize contending business demands.
Lead ongoing relationship with business partners to drive satisfaction with operations and technology.
Coordinate project delivery by participating in design reviews and walk-throughs to communicate systems designs and validate proposed solutions.
Acquire key inputs from enterprise architecture teams and identifies solution interdependencies.
Engage with Subject Matter Experts to incorporate usability and user interface needs when crafting or purchasing systems.
Proactively resolve customer satisfaction issues.
Participate in and support contract negotiation, maintain relationships, and monitor vendor performance against SLAs.
Develop test plans and scripts, traceability matrices.
Qualifications
Excellent verbal and written communication skills at all levels of the organization.
Proven critical thinking and analytical skills.
Ability to understand the long-term big picture and short-term perspectives of situations.
A true teammate and collaborator, translating prior knowledge and experience into strong and productive relationships internally and externally.
A respected business partner who adds value to the broader team.
A reputation for integrity, accuracy, consistency, big picture orientation and business acumen.
Excellent time leadership skills.
Demonstrated capability in both Waterfall and Agile methodologies.
Demonstrate a hands-on approach to develop insightful, beneficial, impactful analytics.
Experience with OFSAA LRM, Profitability, 2052a reporting PeopleSoft GL, Hyperion, Axiom is preferred.
2 to 3 years User Story, business process mapping and other tools.
Bachelor’s degree in any Finance field required.
Professional certifications a plus.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed.
They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities duties and skills required of personnel so classified.
A conviction is not an absolute bar to employment.
Factors such as the age of the offense, evidence of rehabilitation, seriousness of violation, and job relatedness are considered in all employment decisions.
Additionally, it's the bank's policy to only inquire into a candidate's criminal history after an offer has been made.
Federal law prohibits banks from employing individuals who have been convicted of, or received a pretrial diversion for, certain offenses.
Job Project Management
Shift Day
Schedule Full Time
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.© 2020 Accountemps.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"This is a great opportunity to join a growing and dynamic team.
The business analyst plays a vital role in the delivery of a quality project.
They will facilitate a project from inception through requirements gathering, development, testing, to installation and execution.
Responsibilities:
Working with the business team, capturing business requirements and assuring the realization of business benefits and supporting the business process.
Translate business requirements into appropriate functional specifications.
Document functional specifications, conversions, upgrades, interfaces, reports, forms, and workflow.
Balance technology and business issues as well as communicate appropriately with both technology and business specialists.
Facilitate group meetings such as workshops.
Act as liaison between multiple business teams, technology teams and vendors to facilitate communications and support smooth transitions through the phase of the SDLC:
Creation of functional requirements
Support generation of technical requirements, QA test plans, UAT test plans
Support build and testing, execution of toll gate tests between the phases
Support release/implementation to production
Create end-user guides and training
Support post implementation execution
Maintain appropriate project documentation
Timely communication of project statuses
Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science or equivalent subject area
7+ years as a technical Business Analyst working on financial systems
Hands on experience with relational database to facilitate data analysis
Participation in all phases of SDLC lifecycle
Excellent written and verbal communication
Meeting facilitation
Issue resolution
Detailed oriented
Follow-through throughout SDLC to insure project success
MS Office and MS Project
Familiarity with Agile and Waterfall methodology
Familiarity with PMI methodology (PMP certification is not required).
Experience with the Trust business is not required but highly desirable.
#LI-ME1
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Locations: Phoenix, AZ
Duration: 06 Months
50% - Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
40% - Develop test plans/scenarios/cases/scripts to ensure appropriate test coverage.
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria.
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability.
10% - Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement.
Required Skills
Windows Server Experience
Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS Experience
Intermediate T-SQL Experience
SDLC - Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience
Intermediate VSTS Experience
Intermediate STLC Experience
Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) Experience
Nice-To-Have
Beginner SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016
Beginner SSRS
.Net Applications
MS Project
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['commun', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Position Profile
Responsibilities
§ Works on multiple projects as an analyst, sometimes as a business subject matter expert (SME) in multiple functions.
§ Works with enterprise-wide business customers and IT senior management to understand business issues and their environment in order to manage enterprise-wide reporting information support systems.
§ Establishes relationships with customers, IT colleagues, contractors, vendors and consultants to influence strategic IT initiatives while managing their expectations.
§ Works with team members on problem definition and understanding stakeholder needs.
§ Transforms business needs into clearly defined requirements that can feasibly be tested and implemented in a solution.
§ Works with stakeholders and teams to ensure as-is and to-be business processes are documented.
Activities can include: vendor product research, RFP development, vendor demonstrations and scenario scripting, vendor selection criteria/scoring methodology.
§ Facilitates requirements reviews with all impacted stakeholders including business functions, IT security, IT infrastructure, application support, compliance, legal, and contracting.
§ Oversees and consults on system and integration testing activities to ensure system is developed according to defined requirements.
§ Oversees user acceptance testing and obtains sign-off from business customers.
Minimum Qualifications
§ Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Information Systems MIS or equivalent experience.
Preferred Qualifications
§ 5+ years' experience in SDLC; solid understanding in multiple methodologies (Waterfall, Agile, etc.)
EOE/M/F/D/V
",[None],"['research', 'busi']",1.0,"['research', 'busi']"
BA,"Position will act as conduit between business units and technical team.
Although a programming background is desired, the business analyst skillset would be more heavily weighted.
The skill needed is a Business Analyst that has a technical background with Development.
Ideally development with the .NetVB.net languages.
As stated above the Business Analyst background with Agile with be more important then the Development background but the development background is needed.
SkillsBackground needed 5+ years of Agile Business Analyst background Agile Scrum and Kanban experience adaptable to change Workflow writing story writing 2+ years of Development background Platform MS OS .NetVB.Net C Concepts of object oriented Knowledge and working experience with alarythems with languages Person will need to have development background not just software project background collaborative, problem solving, innovative and extreme ownership mindset team player and open to different perspectives and approaches to setting goals and achieving results.
Role Details Develop a working knowledge of Credit Union applications systems features and capabilities.
Act as a liaison between MIS and other departments to assist in the analysis of technicaloperational problems, development of recommendations and presentation of findings to department management.
May act as project lead to coordinate the development and implementation of small to medium size projects.
Prepare and maintain application system documentation and manuals.
Prepare and execute test plans for system changes and new application systems.
Develop knowledge of current and emerging technologies and best practices.
May assist in the preparation of business proposals for the evaluation and selection of application systems, development of system enhancements and acquisition of new technologies.
Perform other duties as assigned in support of team efforts and results.
Neeraj Babu s Servsys Corp Email id neerajservsys.com Number 972 232 2194
",['c'],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'problem solving', 'recommend', 'busi']"
BA,"Under limited supervision, the business systems analyst is responsible for analyzing complex business problems in order to assist with the identification, evaluation, and implementation of systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet customer requirements.
The business systems analyst is responsible for the development of both business and technical requirements that represent the best possible solution for a particular business problem.
The business systems analyst will accomplish this by forming a strong partnership with both business and technical resources on all assigned efforts and by acting as the interpreter between business and technical resources regarding business requirements and system capabilities.
Additionally, the business systems analyst will be expected to assist with the development and execution of any organizational change management activities related to their assigned projects, assist with the development and execution of user acceptance testing of new and improved products, and ensure all production system documentation is complete and thorough.
Responsible for documenting the technical requirements including high level and low level design documents, and assisting in the development of the test plans with QA The business systems analyst is also expected to become highly familiar with all supported applications and business processes.
Required Skills:
5 to 8 years of experience in analyzing complex business problems, gathering and documenting business and technical requirements and maintain production system documentation
Demonstrated ability to form strong partnerships with both business and technical resources
Demonstrated ability to analyze complex business problems and help determine if they might be solved by automated systems
Exposure to a wide variety of project management and software development methodologies
Ability to balance adherence to process with rapid delivery of benefit to the customer
Experience with all aspects of creating and reviewing technical system documentation such as architectural diagrams, process flows and data flow diagrams
Demonstrated expertise in the solicitation and documentation of business and technical requirements
Advanced experience with MicroSoft Office products such as Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Visio
* Strong customer focus
Demonstrated skills in critical thinking and analysis, meeting facilitation, written and oral communications, and interpersonal interactions
Demonstrated ability to balance, prioritize and organize multiple tasks.
Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in teams and across organizations
Demonstrated ability to synthesize feedback and adjust plans accordingly
Demonstrated ability to build strong relationships inside and outside the organization
Job Type: Contract
Salary: Up to $55.00 per hour
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Roles & Responsibilities:
Understand what business units (internal customers) do, how goals are accomplished and key process dependencies that may exist
Identify, document, and communicate complex requirements across systems and business domains
Understand the integration of processes across domains, scope, charter, plans
Collect business requirements and prepare written requirements using Client’s IT specified formats to ensure continuity of requirement documents across projects
Develop Agile Product Backlog items for presentation to development teams and business owners including appropriate assumptions, acceptance criteria, user/system details, and non-functional requirements
Prepare business process maps, high-level work flows, use cases, functional specifications, wireframes, process flow diagrams, and report mock ups
Support development teams in obtaining clarification of requirements/features from business units in a timely manner to avoid delays in development cycle
Analyze business requirements to identify/suggest feature requirements, develop user stories, assist in identifying and documenting scope of work procedures and decision flows
Identify business processes for redesign; Determine how to improve existing business process; Identify modifications to automated processes
Ability to communicate technical information to a non-technical audience and to communicate business information to a technical audience
Participate in QA process by understanding the implementation and helping to define test cases based on user requirements
Performs other duties as assigned or apparent
Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, or related field preferred; Master's degree preferred
Minimum of 4 years' practical experience in technical business analysis required
Minimum of 3 years' experience in scrum/agile environments; Scrum certification preferred
Experience generating requirements from the client/business and documenting.
Experience with process improvement, workflow, benchmarking and / or evaluation of business processes required
Advanced level of proficiency with PC based software programs and automated database management systems required (Excel, Access, PowerPoint) required
Knowledge of current Microsoft .NET technologies including C#, VB.NET, ASP.Net, and SharePoint highly preferred
Working knowledge of Microsoft Team Foundation Services 2013 preferred
Working knowledge of relational databases and database structures is required
Strong aspiration to learn new technologies
Ability to communicate analysis findings such as trends and opportunities to client’s/business users in writing and verbally required
Demonstrated ability to use discretion, make sound decisions, and maintain confidentiality
Proven strong relationship-building and communication skills with team members and business users.
Ability to work with a minimal amount of direction while being pro-active in keeping their management informed of project related issues.
Ability to respectfully question ideas and share a point of view with others in support of the business requirements and needs.
Ability to manage multiple projects at the same time and shift priorities quickly.
Experience working on an Agile/Scrum team preferred.
Proven strong problem-solving skills, troubleshooting, and root cause analysis.
Experience in the education industry preferred
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"- AS A REMINDER - Candidates must be local at time of submission, and available for in person interviews within 1 week of the posting close date.
Candidates must also be able to start within 2 weeks of an offer being made.
Under limited supervision, the business systems analyst is responsible for analyzing complex business problems in order to assist with the identification, evaluation, and implementation of systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet customer requirements.
The business systems analyst is responsible for the development of both business and technical requirements that represent the best possible solution for a particular business problem.
Responsible for documenting the technical requirements including high level and low level design documents, and assisting in the development of the test plans with QA The business systems analyst is also expected to become highly familiar with all supported applications and business processes.
Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in teams and across organizations Demonstrated ability to synthesize feedback and adjust plans accordingly Demonstrated ability to build strong relationships inside and outside the organization
",[None],"['supervis', 'busi']",999.0,"['supervis', 'busi']"
BA,"Managed Care Analytics
(Employee must work on site)
Serve as the SME for this medical management area.
*** This is not an IT or Data heavy role need the expert clinical knowledge.
Perform and lead various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives and implement process improvements.
Lead the support of business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems.
Lead the identification and analysis of user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Resolve issues and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations, including improvements and revisions to business processes and requirements.
Evaluate risks and concerns and communicate to management.
Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs.
Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications.
Oversee all changes to departmental policies and procedures, including communicating and implementing the changes.
Serve as the SME on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance.
Qualifications:
Must Have great rounded knowledge Managed Care and Clinical knowledge
(UM, Prior Authorization, Claims, Billing, Coding, G&A, HEDIS)
6+ years of business process or data analysis preferably in healthcare or five plus years of HEDIS analysis.
SQL experience is a must (but 2nd to Clinical and Managed care)
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
Preferred Skills:
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred and
Project Management experience preferred.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job Type: Full Time.
Â
Please let me know the salary you are expecting per year
Â
Travel knowledge knowing at least 1 of the GDS's (Sabre, Apollo, Galileo, etc.)
They must have been a BA with Testing experience
Must know how to write user stories, work with customer to gather requirements
Strong experience in travel domain (preferably Corporate Travel)
Proven experience in analysing business processes, identifying gaps and defining new functional requirements
Very good problem solving & analytic skills, excellent presentation skills
Hands on experience on Agile product Development Methodology
Knowledge of Web Service analysis and Data mapping through the GDS API services
Knowledge on XML and OTA (optional)
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Associate Business Analyst
Job Details
The successful candidate will have a background in the Education or Software industry, experience with project management, strong communication skills, and the willingness and ability to think creatively and flexibly.
This position is suited to a person who brings both business analysis skills and project management experience to the role.
Primary Duties and Responsibilities Include:
Manage small implementation projects and contribute to large projects
Defines and documents internal and external business functions and processes.
Configure the application to meet client needs
Acts as liaison between internal and external users to ensure optimal operational performance.
Provide member support throughout the project and project completion documentation.
Qualifications
Skills and Proficiencies:
Aptitude and desire to solve problems
Experience with project management and client-facing projects
Comfortable with written and verbal client communication
Ability to manage multiple projects at once
Proficient in MS Office apps, Project Management Tools
4 year university degree or equivalent experience.
Experience with SalesForce
AZ or Deerfield, IL office.
Personal characteristics
The candidate should demonstrate competence in some or all of the following:
Behave Ethically: Understand ethical behavior and business practices, and ensure that own behavior and the behavior of others is consistent with these standards and aligns with the values of the organization.
Communicate Effectively: Speak, listen and write in a clear, thorough and timely manner using appropriate and effective communication tools and techniques.
Creativity/Innovation: Develop new and unique ways to improve operations of the organization and to create new opportunities.
Foster Teamwork: Work cooperatively and effectively with others to set goals, resolve problem, and make decisions that enhance organizational effectiveness.
Lead: Positively influence others to achieve results that are in the best interest of the organization.
Make Decisions: Assess situations to determine the importance, urgency and risks, and make clear decisions which are timely and in the best interests of the organization.
Organize: Set priorities, develop a work schedule, monitor progress towards goals, and track details/data/information/activities.
Plan: Determine strategies to move the organization forward, set goals, create and implement actions plans, and evaluate the process and results.
Solve Problems: Assess problem situations to identify causes, gather and process relevant information, generate possible solutions, and make recommendations and/or resolve the problem.
","['ms office', 'salesforc']","['risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'salesforc', 'risk', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Role Overview
The Business Analyst, Process Optimization will be responsible for the design of improved and efficient processes for the business.
This will include design development and testing of automation workflows in order to create efficiencies to meet business objectives.
With both business analysis and RPA solutions experience, this role will assist partners and customers with process selection, process analysis and assessments, business case development, and support the operating model team.
What You'll Be Doing
Partner with business stakeholders to identify opportunities to enhance and optimize business processes while keeping the customer experience in mind.
Engage customer stakeholders to rapidly identify opportunities to drive process optimization and/or automation to achieve the organization’s key business outcomes, leveraging methodologies such as design-thinking
Comply with process standards for the documentation, tracking and communication of requirements throughout the SDLC
Facilitate JAD sessions with business stakeholders to elicit Requirement information for Project and/or Work Order requests.
Develop an expert level understanding of business processes, supporting technologies for a single line of business while ensuring processes are adhered to and system knowledge is distributed across team
Provides guidance with process design from automation perspective and ensures processes and technologies remain cost effective
Conduct workshops with key stakeholders to educate on automation technology, in addition to understanding how automation can be applied to the business
Prioritize processes for optimization and automation based on workshops and leveraging process assessment tools
Partner with business stakeholder SMEs to understand key process requirements and document the current state by leveraging existing documentation, conducting interviews and observations
Based on identified automation opportunities, create detailed RPA roadmaps with clear initiative prioritization and execution plans
Hand off design documentation to RPA developer team for automation in-scope processes, and support the development team as needed to ensure successful deployment
Collect and analyze process data to initiate, develop and recommend business practices and procedures that focus on increased productivity, enhanced customer value and/or reduced cost
Anticipate, identify, track and resolve technical issues and risks affecting delivery to ensure adherence to delivery deadlines
Create and maintain business processes from multiple resources
Analyze and measure the effectiveness of business processes
Develop, deploy and maintain standards for operational excellence
Ensure that technology is maximized and leveraged effectively
Support the implementation of new automation processes within established change control processes
Research best business practices within and outside the organization to establish benchmark data
Facilitate engagement between business and technology teams
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, related field or relevant experience
3+ years of experience in OCR and Robotic Process Automation (RPA) with one of the market leading RPA Platforms: Automation Anywhere, Blue Prism, preferably UiPath
2+ years of experience in a Business Analyst or RPA Developer role
Mid- to expert-level experience with the most common Microsoft Office applications (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Sharepoint), MS Project, Team Foundation Server, Microsoft Visio and SQL Server is preferred
Experience with Process Analysis, Design, Implementation and System Testing
Strong Problem-Solving and Analytics skills to understand complex requirements, define advanced technical/functional solutions, troubleshoot issues, and identify fixes
Ability to communicate effectively with a diverse set of clients and vendors across multiple disciplines
Ability to develop effective risk mitigation plans and adjust risk management approach as new risks arise; Demonstrated ability of liaising with teams to ensure they are managing/mitigating risk
Demonstrated experience of planning, influencing, and leading complex projects across a fast-paced, global matrix organization
Start-up experience preferred, with the ability to operate in a fluid and dynamic environment
Ability to drive projects toward business goals and delivery deadlines
Ability to lead cross-functional team discussions and engage with customer / partner leadership
Analytical thinker with strong organizational time management and problem solving abilities
Design-thinking, lean and six-sigma experience a plus
Competitive salary and incentive plans
Workplace flexibility for a balanced work/life approach
Comprehensive benefits packages and wellness program
Generous company-paid vacation days and holiday time
Challenging, collaborative, diverse corporate culture
Ongoing opportunities for learning and career development
Employment may be subject to additional background checks, drug testing and fingerprint processing.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'ocr', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'ocr', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"1 on the 2015 and 2017 Arizona Corporate Excellence (ACE) Fastest-Growing Private Companies list.
This position requires astute research, technical writing, and analytical skills to document business processes found in Customer Service and throughout the organization.
Attention to detail, evaluation, time measurement, calculating ROI, and prioritization are other key skills.
Job Duties:
Use a continuous improvement approach to identify improvement opportunities, leverage creativity and flexibility in determining solutions.
Skilled with tools like MS PowerPoint and Visio to accurately document process flows
Experience in holding business requirement gathering meetings and collecting and documenting the requirements output.
Experience in a Customer Service organization
Experience with Exigo, Zendesk Support, Sell and Guide applications is a plus
Exceptional problem solving and analytical skills
Experience working across functional areas is critical (especially Strategy, Operations, Customer Service, Marketing and IT) and in consumer products or MLM industry is a plus
Strong interpersonal, communication, collaborative and team building skills; able to partner with people with different personalities and responsibilities, demonstrating conflict management skills
Excellent team player with ability to work effectively and collaboratively with executives and staff across functions
Excellent project management skills able to effectively keep cross-functional analysis initiatives on track and overcome barriers
Results oriented and bottom-line focused; Able to commit to and follow initiatives through to completion
Outstanding written and verbal communication skills
Able to present comfortably and compellingly to C-Suite and above audiences
Work as an independent contributor to collect specific process details on operational cross-functional processes
Commit to working together as one team, exceed service expectations by developing positive relationships and treat others with value and respectalways.
Exhibit an honest and committed effort to delivering as promised, never compromising quality.
Achieve individual and team goals.
Meet deadlines with the resources provided and never compromise ethical standards.
Seek opportunities for personal and professional development.
Minimum Qualifications:
BS/BA
5 years of related experience
Preferred Qualifications:
MBA
7 years of related experience
PMIs Professional in Business Analysis (PBA) or IIBA Credentials (ECBA, CCBA, or CBAP)
Benefits:
Weekly drawings for gift cards and cash.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c']","['problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"**Required Skills:**+ 5 to 8 years of experience in analyzing complex business problems, gathering and documenting business and technical requirements and maintain production system documentation+ Demonstrated ability to form strong partnerships with both business and technical resources+ Demonstrated ability to analyze complex business problems and help determine if they might be solved by automated systems+ Exposure to a wide variety of project management and software development methodologies+ Ability to balance adherence to process with rapid delivery of benefit to the customer+ Experience with all aspects of creating and reviewing technical system documentation such as architectural diagrams, process flows and data flow diagrams+ Demonstrated expertise in the solicitation and documentation of business and technical requirements+ Advanced experience with MicroSoft Office products such as Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Visio+ strong customer focus+ Demonstrated skills in critical thinking and analysis, meeting facilitation, written and oral communications, and interpersonal interactions+ Demonstrated ability to balance, prioritize and organize multiple tasks.+ Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in teams and across organizations+ Demonstrated ability to synthesize feedback and adjust plans accordingly+ Demonstrated ability to build strong relationships inside and outside the organizationlocation: Phoenix, Arizonajob type: Contractsalary: $35 - 59 per hourwork hours: 8am to 5pmeducation: Bachelorsresponsibilities:+ Under limited supervision, the business systems analyst is responsible for analyzing complex business problems in order to assist with the identification, evaluation, and implementation of systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet customer requirements.+ The business systems analyst is responsible for the development of both business and technical requirements that represent the best possible solution for a particular business problem.+ The business systems analyst will accomplish this by forming a strong partnership with both business and technical resources on all assigned efforts and by acting as the interpreter between business and technical resources regarding business requirements and system capabilities.+ Additionally, the business systems analyst will be expected to assist with the development and execution of any organizational change management activities related to their assigned projects, assist with the development and execution of user acceptance testing of new and improved products, and ensure all production system documentation is complete and thorough.+ Responsible for documenting the technical requirements including high level and low level design documents, and assisting in the development of the test plans with QA+ The business systems analyst is also expected to become highly familiar with all supported applications and business processes.
**Required Skills:**+ 5 to 8 years of experience in analyzing complex business problems, gathering and documenting business and technical requirements and maintain production system documentation+ Demonstrated ability to form strong partnerships with both business and technical resources+ Demonstrated ability to analyze complex business problems and help determine if they might be solved by automated systems+ Exposure to a wide variety of project management and software development methodologies+ Ability to balance adherence to process with rapid delivery of benefit to the customer+ Experience with all aspects of creating and reviewing technical system documentation such as architectural diagrams, process flows and data flow diagrams+ Demonstrated expertise in the solicitation and documentation of business and technical requirements+ Advanced experience with MicroSoft Office products such as Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Visio+ strong customer focus+ Demonstrated skills in critical thinking and analysis, meeting facilitation, written and oral communications, and interpersonal interactions+ Demonstrated ability to balance, prioritize and organize multiple tasks.+ Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in teams and across organizations+ Demonstrated ability to synthesize feedback and adjust plans accordingly+ Demonstrated ability to build strong relationships inside and outside the organizationqualifications:+ Experience level: Experienced+ Minimum 8 years of experience+ Education: Bachelorsskills:+ SQLEqual Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst’s role is to elicit, analyze, specify, and validate the business needs of stakeholders, be they customers or end users.
This includes interviewing stakeholders and gathering and compiling user requirements to understand the technology solutions they need.
The Business Analyst will play a pivotal role in ensuring IT’s understanding of business requirements.
Responsibilities
Strategy & Planning
• Collaborate with project sponsors to determine project scope and vision.
• Clearly identify project stakeholders and establish user classes, as well as their characteristics.
• Conduct interviews to gather user requirements via workshops, questionnaires, surveys, site visits, workflow storyboards, use cases, scenarios, and other methods.
• Identify and establish scope and parameters of requirements analysis on a project-by-project basis to define project impact, outcome criteria, and metrics.
• Work with stakeholders and project team to prioritize collected requirements.
• Research, review, and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing requirements-gathering processes and develop strategies for enhancing or further leveraging these processes.
Acquisition & Deployment
• Assist in conducting research on software and hardware products to meet agreed upon requirements and to support purchasing efforts.
• Participate in the QA of purchased solutions to ensure features and functions have been enabled and optimized.
• Participate in the selection of any requirements documentation software solutions that the organization may opt to use.
Operational Management
• Analyze and verify requirements for completeness, consistency, comprehensibility, feasibility, and conformity to standards.
• Develop and utilize standard templates to accurately and concisely write requirements specifications.
• Translate conceptual user requirements into functional requirements in a clear manner that is comprehensible to developers/project team.
• Where applicable, develop prototypes of interfaces and attributes based on the user requirements.
• Create process models, specifications, diagrams, and charts to provide direction to developers and/or the project team.
• Develop and conduct peer reviews of the business requirements to ensure that requirement specifications are correctly interpreted.
• Assist with the interpretation of user requirements into feasible options, and communicating these back to the business stakeholders.
• Manage and track the status of requirements throughout the project lifecycle; enforce and redefine as necessary.
• Communicate changes, enhancements, and modifications of business requirements– verbally or through written documentation – to project managers, sponsors, and other stakeholders so that issues and solutions are understood.
• Provide guidance and/or instruction to junior staff members.
Position Requirements
Formal Education & Certification
• College diploma or university degree in the field of business administration, computer science, finance, or information systems.
• Three to five years related work experience.
Knowledge & Experience
• Proven experience with business and technical requirements analysis, elicitation, modeling, verification, and methodology development.
• Experience overseeing the design, development, and implementation of software and hardware solutions, systems, or products.
• Ability to create systematic and consistent requirements specifications in both technical and user-friendly language.
• Clear understanding of product management and market placement.
• Demonstrated project management skills and project management software skills, including planning, organizing, and managing resources.
• Understanding of application development and software development life cycle concepts.
• Working knowledge of Windows and Linux operating systems.
• Working knowledge of current network hardware, protocols, and standards.
• Excellent understanding of the organization’s goals and objectives.
Personal Attributes
• Able to exercise independent judgment and take action on it.
• Excellent analytical, mathematical, and creative problem-solving skills.
• Excellent listening, interpersonal, written, and oral communication skills.
• Logical and efficient, with keen attention to detail.
• Highly self-motivated and directed.
• Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks while under pressure.
• Strong customer service orientation.
• Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Work Conditions
• Occasional evening and weekend work to meet deadlines.
• Sitting for extended periods of time.
• Dexterity of hands and fingers required to operate a computer keyboard or mouse, and to handle other computer components.
","['excel', 'linux']","['analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'linux', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Locations: Phoenix, AZ
Duration: 06 Months
50% - Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
40% - Develop test plans/scenarios/cases/scripts to ensure appropriate test coverage.
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria.
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability.
10% - Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement.
Required Skills
Windows Server Experience
Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS Experience
Intermediate T-SQL Experience
SDLC - Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience
Intermediate VSTS Experience
Intermediate STLC Experience
Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) Experience
Nice-To-Have
Beginner SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016
Beginner SSRS
.Net Applications
MS Project
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['commun', 'busi', 'visual']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Overview
The Business Analyst is responsible for a full range of activities which directly support the Loan Officers/Account Executives and the overall management of the business unit's credit risk.
The Business Analyst will provide support in analyzing collateral and financial information, preparation of internal credit requests, spreading financial statements, and undertaking special Borrower specific projects.
The Business Analyst will also coordinate with collateral processing, auditing, and documentation departments when necessary.
A Business Analysts attention to detail with respect to data sets and overall trends of collateral and financial information will be critical to a candidate's success.
Responsibilities
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Review and analyze collateral reports focusing on accuracy, trends, and potential impact to availability under the borrowing base mechanics
Collect, review, spread and analyze financial statements monthly paying particular attention to changes in trends, sources and uses of cash, and projecting/forecasting impact to the performance and ultimately the credit risk of a Borrower.
Prepare data sets to be used in preparation of internal credit memorandums with the ability to provide written analysis of information compiled allowing for timely preparation of credit approvals.
Review and understand legal documents with an ability to compare documented changes to an approved credit memorandum.
Coordinate with collateral analysis department requesting needed collateral and financial reports from Borrower and assist collateral analysts with special projects and verifications from time to time.
Coordinate with Audit staff in preparation of collateral documents, review of collateral exams, and communicating additional testing needs based on identified changes to collateral.
Qualifications
POSITION REQUIREMENTS:
Four year Bachelor's Degree in Business or a related field is required.
Accounting or Finance preferred.
A minimum of 1-3 years experience in commercial banking or commercial lending
Financial Statement Analysis experience
Familiarity with various commercial lending products
Detail-orientated
Strong oral and written communication skills
Advanced Microsoft Office (including MS Access - SQL and MS Excel - Macros)
Ability to multi-task and prioritize several projects for multiple Loan Officers/Account Executives
Work Standards; Initiating Action; Detail Oriented, Customer Focus; Oral and Written Communication; Adaptability; Successful Team Builder; Decision Making
#LI-SD1
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"SUMMARY:
As a Business Analysts this position will work with a variety of teams to understand the customers objective for each request, elicit requirement and offer and execute solutions to meet these goals.
This Individual will investigate and propose solutions and may include existing or new technologies.
The role is new to the organization and individuals should be comfortable working in an unstructured environment, able to manage multiple priorities, and flexible as processes mature.
The ideal candidate will bring their innate analytical and creative skills, can see both the big picture and details within that picture, will have problem-solving skills, and is comfortable with responsibilities and accountabilities.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES, RESPONSIBLITIES, AND EXPECTATIONS: Duties
Comfortable with responsibility and accountabilities necessary to provide outstanding customer service.
Self-motivating, showing initiative and a strong sense of urgency.
Act independently or within a team structure to accomplish customers goals and objectives.
Elicit requirements to understand the objective of a request and able to interpret what is important from what is not.
Comfortable researching business processes, documenting requirements and aligning these requirements to a solution.
Learn and interpret technical information and how it is applied within a solution.
Formulate and provide multiple options to solve a customers request.
Identify gaps and areas for improvement in existing or potential solutions and work closely with other change-agents to implement resolutions.
Prepare and deliver presentations to stakeholders to explain requests and recommended solutions and how they resolve an issue/request.
Identify resources needed for projects and manage throughout the lifecycle.
Comfortable working directly with technical resources such as Sys Admins, DBAs, Developers as well as business professionals and executives.
Communicate with multiple team, customers, and with other leadership members including executives displaying excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Monitor and report status on timelines, and progress of requests.
Able to identify next steps when given an assignment or task and question when unsure, to prevent unnecessary delays in responses and timelines.
Open-minded and adaptable to new ideas for quick out-of-the-box solutions.
Engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously displaying strong organizational and time management skills.
Create resource materials/Knowledge Base that will be used by other teams to provide ongoing support of applications and processes used by customer.
Produce clear and concise communication and documentation that and turn over to the Customers or other IT Teams.
Willing and able to work and support projects after hours if required.
QUALIFICATIONS:The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or abilities required to successfully perform the job.
Excellent problem solving and decision-making skills.
Understanding of project management techniques including planning, organizing, time management and scheduling.
Sees both the big picture and details.
Highly self-motivated and directed with a keen attention to detail and willingness to assume responsibility.
Prior work within IT or demonstration of analytic skills a plus.
Bachelors degree in a related discipline (computer science, information technology, etc.)
from a regionally accredited institution or equivalent work experience, with a technical major, such as engineering or computer science.
Prior Business Analyst experience a plus.
Prior experience managing projects a plus.
Certifications, Licenses, Registrations: Iterative or Waterfall project management certifications a plus.
Writing and Communication Skills: Excellent communication skills (written and verbal) to facilitate delivery of IT solutions for business needs.
Skills, Abilities, or Other Qualifications:
Student and Customer Oriented
Excellent Communication Skills - verbal and written
Excellent Thought and Creativity
Action Oriented/Problem Solving
Self-Leadership
Project Management
Professionalism
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBLITIES:This position will not have direct reports.
Employment is contingent upon the satisfactory outcome (as determined by the university) of pre-employment screening activities, including a background check.
All staff candidates will be asked to review GCEs staff expectations as part of the application process.
Posted 6 Days Ago
Full time
R000027005
",['excel'],"['account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"*Overview**
The Business Analyst is responsible for a full range of activities which directly support the Loan Officers/Account Executives and the overall management of the business unit's credit risk.
The Business Analyst will provide support in analyzing collateral and financial information, preparation of internal credit requests, spreading financial statements, and undertaking special Borrower specific projects.
The Business Analyst will also coordinate with collateral processing, auditing, and documentation departments when necessary.
A Business Analysts attention to detail with respect to data sets and overall trends of collateral and financial information will be critical to a candidate's success.
*Responsibilities**
*RESPONSIBILITIES:**
+ Review and analyze collateral reports focusing on accuracy, trends, and potential impact to availability under the borrowing base mechanics
+ Collect, review, spread and analyze financial statements monthly paying particular attention to changes in trends, sources and uses of cash, and projecting/forecasting impact to the performance and ultimately the credit risk of a Borrower.
+ Prepare data sets to be used in preparation of internal credit memorandums with the ability to provide written analysis of information compiled allowing for timely preparation of credit approvals.
+ Review and understand legal documents with an ability to compare documented changes to an approved credit memorandum.
+ Coordinate with collateral analysis department requesting needed collateral and financial reports from Borrower and assist collateral analysts with special projects and verifications from time to time.
+ Coordinate with Audit staff in preparation of collateral documents, review of collateral exams, and communicating additional testing needs based on identified changes to collateral.
*Qualifications**
*POSITION REQUIREMENTS:**
+ Four year Bachelor's Degree in Business or a related field is required.
Accounting or Finance preferred.
+ A minimum of 1-3 years experience in commercial banking or commercial lending
+ Financial Statement Analysis experience
+ Familiarity with various commercial lending products
+ Detail-orientated
+ Strong oral and written communication skills
+ Advanced Microsoft Office (including MS Access - SQL and MS Excel - Macros)
+ Ability to multi-task and prioritize several projects for multiple Loan Officers/Account Executives
+ Work Standards; Initiating Action; Detail Oriented, Customer Focus; Oral and Written Communication; Adaptability; Successful Team Builder; Decision Making
\#LI-SD1
*Job Locations** _US-AZ-Phoenix_
*ID** _2020-1248_
*Category** _Lending/Sales_
*Type** _Regular Full-Time_
Equal Opportunity Employer
PacWest Bancorp and its affiliates are fully committed to the principles of equal opportunity and diversity.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Your Impact
You will have versatility in you role to not only develop analyses but also use those to identify improvement opportunities, develop solutions, and drive and manage projects to positive outcomes.
You will play a key role to drive predictable revenue in a fast growing sales organization with a broad scope of career growth.
Your Day to Day
You will be joining the Sales Operations team as a generalist, gaining exposure to a wide variety of challenges, processes, and data that will ultimately drive predictable revenue and repeatable processes to scale the sales and customer operations organizations as a whole.
Support sales operations with streamlining reporting along with ad hoc reporting as requested through the sales operations team.
Analyze sales and business performance and provide insights and recommendations on opportunities to improve .
Identify solutions to analysis insights, and manage project scope including project definition, stakeholder management , timeline and implementation management.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in Economics, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Business or a related discipline
Must be highly analytical, process oriented, collaborative and creative problem solver
Must be intrinsically motivated, cannot require constant support/supervision
Must be able to function independently, as a team member and as a leader depending upon the circumstances
Must be dedicated to helping to improve sales processes and outcomes
Must be able to simultaneously manage multiple tasks of varying complexity and priority
Must possess strong verbal and written communication skills including the ability to share complex topics clearly, concisely, effectively and professionally
Previous sales or sales ops experience a plus
Experience with Microsoft Excel and advanced knowledge of SalesForce
Preferred Qualifications
2+ years of experience in a demanding analytic role or professional experience, ideally in consulting, finance, or a startup
Previous sales or sales/customer operations experience
Tableau/SQL and/or R
Demonstrated leadership experience
Self-starter who thrives with problem-solving and embraces ambiguity
Willingness to join forces and drive company-wide initiatives across multiple departments
Compensation and Benefits
Competitive salary and 401K with employer match
Discretionary paid time off
Robust parental leave policy
An award-winning office/working environment
Ride along with real police officers in real life situations, see them use technology, get inspired
And more...
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'supervis', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"U-Haul Corporate Headquarters
U-Haul International
2727 N Central Ave
PHOENIX , AZ
This role will evolve as a unique position with lots of room for growth and a variety of responsibilities based on the business needs.
Responsibilities
Collect customer requirements, determine technical issues and create written requirements
Identify current process flows and methods to improve data collection, provide analysis and reporting to meet business area needs
Track and fully document changes for functional and business specifications; write detailed universally understood procedures for permanent records and for use in training.
Create tutorials to help end-users use a variety of applications
Provides technical assistance in training, mentoring, and coaching professional and technical staff.
Develops training curriculum and conducts formal training sessions covering assigned systems module.
Work with internal teams to obtain an in-depth understanding of the projects and the documentation requirements
Produce high-quality documentation that meets applicable standards and is appropriate for its intended audience
Must work closely with the Accounting Ledger and Sub-ledger Team
Write easy-to-understand user interface text, online help and developer guides
Must be organized, efficient and a motivated self-starter
Excellent written and verbal skill
Excellent analysis and problem solving skills
Strong interpersonal communication skills, verbal, listening and written
Assist with administrative projects, agendas, meeting notes and action items follow-up
Assist with project testing requirements and training documentation
Requires meticulous attention to detail but also has the capability to be a free-form thinker.
Requirements:
Proven working experience in technical writing of software documentation
Ability to deliver high quality documentation paying attention to detail
Ability to quickly grasp complex technical concepts and make them easily understandable in text and pictures
Excellent written skills in English
Strong working knowledge of Microsoft Office
Basic familiarity with the SDLC and software development
Knowledge of Mainframe processes would be a plus
Knowledge of COBOL would be a plus
Education/Training:
University degree in Computer Science or equivalent preferred
Work Status:
Full-Time
2727 N Central Ave, Phoenix, Arizona 85036 United States of America
U-Haul is an equal opportunity employer.
All applicants for employment will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, physical or mental disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, provincial, state or local law.
Individual accommodations are available on requests for applicants taking part in all aspects of the selection process.
Information obtained during this process will only be shared on a need to know basis.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
50%:
Develop test plans/scenarios/cases/scripts to ensure appropriate test coverage
Provide direction to developers to implement solutions per requirements
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria
Conduct user acceptance testing with end users to ensure implemented solution meets expectations
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability
30%:
Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be)
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict
20%:
Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement
Identify candidates for test automation, document test flow and data requirements/dependencies, and implement using approved tools
REQUIREMENTS:
Windows Server experience
SDLC - Agile (Scrum, Kanban) experience
Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS experience
Intermediate VSTS experience
Intermediate STLC experience
Intermediate .Net Applications, ETL experience
Intermediate SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016 experience
Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access) experience
Nice-To-Have Skills:
MS Project experience
SSIS/SSRS experience
.Net 4 experience
Experience with Automated testing
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Duties andKeyResponsibilities:
TheroleofSeniorBusiness Analystprovidescriticalinput to all development efforts.
TheSeniorBusiness Analystworks closely with thedevelopment team,Professional Services, and Account Managementin all aspects of the setup and implementation ofTEMsystems and processes.A BA performs feasibility analyses, scopes projectdeliverables,writes and presents specifications, and validates development results.
The BA understands development processesand is very analytical with problem-solving and conflict resolution skills to help identify, communicate and resolve issues.
Main duties:
Act as the voice of theCustomerwithin the development team.
Engage with client to understand their processes and gather ordering/procurement requirementsEnsure that all work items meet the definition of ready for the development team.
This includes:
Ensuring the business benefits are known and captured.
Writing clear and concise specifications.
Facilitating the breakdown of Epics into User Stories /Enabler Stories
Defining the acceptance criteria for all stories.
Ensuringthe team understand items in the product backlog.
Ensuring the non-functional requirements have been considered (Observability, Scalability, Maintainability etc.)
Build orderingcatalogsand inventory items from vendor data in order to define customer needs
Occasionally triage and troubleshoot support tickets, and create stories for the development team should they need further technical engagement
Review, test, and validate software deliverables to ensure that they meet stakeholder criteria
As with all members of the development team theBusiness Analystis to help continuously drive improvements within the team focusing around predictability, quality and throughput.
Skills/Experience/Personal Attributes:
Decisive: Able to make business critical decisions on priority of work by always considering what is best for the business.
Driven: Maximized value with minimized risk and balanced alignment of commitments, business needs, quality and feature/function.
Facilitator: An excellent facilitator of stakeholders, the Team, and customers such that solutions are driven forward in a timely and correctly prioritised manner.
Product Knowledge: Deeply knowledgeable about all aspects of their product area.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills,including ability to effectively communicate with internal and external customers.
Capable of taking command and control of product level decisions in such a way that the speed of development is maintained.
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is a customer facing role tasked with defining, documenting, and managing the scope of a project.
The Business Analyst is responsible for capturing and translating customer requirements into technical software and system specifications suitable for implementation, and managing the requirements through to final acceptance and delivery to the customer.
The Business Analyst is the scope manager for the system and manages the customer through the change management process.
The Business Analyst provides clarification to the customer and system implementers on the requirements.
The Business Analyst will work closely with the PMO, Product Management, Product Development, Integration and Operations teams throughout the lifecycle of the customer program to ensure that all contractual requirements are met.
Structure documentation of the system requirements and specifications.
Providing clarification to the customer and system implementers as required.
Managing the scope of the project throughout the entire lifecycle
Tracing all requirements through to delivery to the customer
Leading the customer through the change management process
Participate in testing activities to ensure that requirements are met
Guide the customer through customer acceptance testing
Essential Skills and Qualifications
Technical expertise and/or demonstrated experience in structured business or systems analysis
Degree in computer science, business or related discipline
Commercial sensibility
Customer focused
Strong problem-solving skills
Ability to translate often vague customer requirements into precise technical requirements
Previous experience with analysis tools
Strong influencer and negotiator
Collaborative leadership style
Strong written and verbal communicator
Logical and structured
Ability to prioritise effectively
Proven ability to deliver under pressure
Able to display confidence, technical expertise, and gravitas as appropriate to the circumstance
Essential Knowledge and Experience
Experience and/or knowledge in fare collection and/or payment solutions
Experience in complex combined hardware software systems delivery
Proven experience in managing a large body of complex system requirements
Experience working with a distributed delivery team
Desirable Knowledge and Experience
Software development experience
Experience in cloud-based systems and deployment methods
Knowledge of databases
Knowledge of security standards
Relevant payment or security training/qualifications
",['cloud'],"['commun', 'busi', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Do you have a passion for customer experience and a mindset for data-driven problem solving?
This position also requires significant cross functional activity and integration with transportation, tech, operations and finance.
Successful candidates must thrive in a fast paced environment.
You will analyze performance data, discover and solve real world problems and build metrics and business cases to improve decision making.
You can expect to leverage your analytical skills and have full ownership of the projects you work on.
Responsibilities:
·
· Manipulating/mining data from databases ( SQL Server, Redshift, Oracle DW)
·
· Create automated metrics, reports and dashboards using complex databases, data warehouses and web application technologies
·
· Providing analytical network support to improve quality and standard work results
·
· Root cause research to identify process breakdowns within departments and providing data through use of various skill sets to find solutions to breakdown
·
· Collaborate with BI/Data Engineer teams and drive the collection of new data and the refinement of existing data sources to continually improve data quality
·
· Foster culture of continuous engineering improvement through mentoring, feedback, and metrics
Basic Qualifications
· 3+ years of strong quantitative and qualitative experience in Logistics/Supply Chain, Transportation, Engineering or Business experience
·
· Bachelor's Degree in Engineering, Math, Statistics, Finance, Computer Science, Logistics/Transportation or related industry experience
·
· Proficiency with TABLEAU, Quicksight, Microsoft Excel to include making charts, data manipulation, pivot tables, creating macros, and visual basic knowledge
·
· Able to write SQL scripts for analysis and reporting (Redshift, SQL, MySQL)
·
· Experience in Statistical Software such as R, SAS, SPSS, MINITAB
·
· Experience using one or more - VBA, Python, MATLAB, Java, C++ programming languages
Preferred Qualifications
· Masters degree or higher in Engineering, Math, Finance, Statistics, Computer Science, or other technical field from an accredited university
·
·
· Experience with statistical analysis, regression modeling and forecasting, time series analysis, data mining, financial analysis, and demand modeling
·
· Experience processing, filtering, and presenting large quantities (100K to Millions of rows) of data
·
· Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
The role requires effective communication with colleagues from computer science, operations research and business backgrounds.
·
","['redshift', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'matlab', 'mysql', 'tableau', 'r', 'bi', 'python', 'spss', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java']","['regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'logist', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'time series', 'commun']",1.0,"['redshift', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerbi', 'python', 'spss', 'oracl', 'sa', 'java', 'regress', 'data mining', 'data', 'logist', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'time series', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Job Title
Business Analyst
Job
ID
780189
Phoenix,
AZ
85027
You will be a key liaison between the users, technology team and outside business partners.
You will focus on all customer facing applications.
You will be responsible in working closely with business users in determining and documenting their needs especially in communicating on non-technical levels.
You will design, test and implement packaged applications as well as custom development items including functional analysis and design, creation of test plans and user acceptance testing.
Job Responsibilities
Participate in packaged and custom application implementations projects.
Act as a liaison between business users and Information Technology team members and outside business partners to gather and document detailed business and technical requirements.
Conduct needs assessment with business users, understand and document such needs.
When changes to the requirements occur, conducts impact analysis and recommends follow-through actions.
Develop test conditions, case outlines, test plans, and detailed test scripts for a defined set of business factors.
Coordinate and conduct user acceptance testing, review test results with users to ensure solutions meet business requirements.
Communicate effectively and work co-operatively with IT team members, business users and outside business partners in order to complete assigned projects as efficiently as possible.
Identify issues and risks and provide alternative courses of action to achieve business and organization goals and objectives.
Establish functional expertise in specified application(s) and associated business processes.
Assist business users and other Information Technology team members and outside business partners in identifying and troubleshooting the production environment.
Build, develop, and grow relationships with business users, outside business partners and other stakeholders in order to establish mutual trust and provide a foundation for high level project partnership.
Job Qualifications
Bachelor Degree Business Administration, Computer Science or a related field
5+ years of experience in information technology
Experience with Business Intelligence and Analytics (Plus)
Experience in Product Management (Plus)
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Do you want your voice heard and your actions to count?
Were a team that accepts responsibility for the future by asking the tough questions and owning the solutions.
Data Control Business Analyst
Job Summary:
The role will work as a business analyst within the compliance track under the Business Solutions Team, specifically supporting AML, Sanctions Transaction Monitoring, Payments, and Cross Border Data Projects.
This candidate will provide the analysis and support from BST perspective for respective compliance driven projects or production requests.
As a project support analyst, you will need to balance project execution and production support to ensure appropriate deliverables are meant on time and with high quality.
First, you will support back office end users and IT management to help back office organization continually meet compliance production needs.
The successful candidate will serve as a centralized back office compliance representative, providing guidance to influence operating decisions to ensure regulatory compliance.
Responsibilities:
As a Business Analyst Lead who interfaces between with business users and IT for collaboration on reporting requirements, support, application improvements and regulatory driven projects
Conduct detail assessment and analysis of Compliance Project requirements, policy, processes and procedures
Ability to conduct /host the large Working Group sessions, document the processes, requirements, derive process maps, create and manage workflows
Experience in training of Relationship Analysts who collaborate with the business units and IT
Development and maintenance of End User policy and procedure and standard methodologies.
Coordination with various business lines and management regarding end user computing to effectively support business function
Strategic execution of Business Solutions supported systems to business line managers and IT for execution, integration and maintenance of compliance
Interact with IT where vital to develop a harmonized compliance solutions
Work with on-site and Off-shore IT to provide business units with compliance requirements
Provide and implement tactical and strategic governance and plan for Compliance environment.
Conduct Proactive reviews of Customer Onboarding Operations related user, customer and control processes to ensure conformance to applicable policy and standards.
Oversight of corrective action plan remediation in relation to AML, Sanctions & Payments across Markets and Securities Services Operations.
Ensuring that significant risks are appropriately and timely identified and intensified through appropriate channels.
Provide analytics and compliance support to the integrated partners
Qualifications
Bachelors degree with a specific focus on Economics, Business, Finance, or Accounting
Prefer Advanced Degree (MBA or Masters)
4 + years of demonstrated ability in corporate banking operations in any capacity (deposit, lending etc.)
Solid Understanding of core banking, AML / Sanctions / Regulatory, Data Analysis, IT Systems
Familiarity with the business offerings of Compliance, Core Banking, Payments, Loans
Track record of delivering to demanding standards of quality and accuracy
Strong organizational skills with ability to multi-task
Document Business Requirements, Functional Requirements, Testing coordination
Proficient in metrics/analytics assessment and reporting
Leading, organizing and prioritizing multiple tasks and responsibilities
Ability to work under tight deadlines and / or unexpected changes
Willingness to question/challenge existing processes and ensure a satisfactory outcome
Superb communication and relationship skills across all management levels
Analytical with attention to detail and strong problem solving skills
Proactive, able to take the lead in devising creative solutions
Efficient teammate
Strong MS Office Suite skills, , MS Visio, JIRA
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed.
They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities duties and skills required of personnel so classified.
A conviction is not an absolute bar to employment.
Factors such as the age of the offense, evidence of rehabilitation, seriousness of violation, and job relatedness are considered in all employment decisions.
Additionally, it's the bank's policy to only inquire into a candidate's criminal history after an offer has been made.
Federal law prohibits banks from employing individuals who have been convicted of, or received a pretrial diversion for, certain offenses.
","['ms office', 'jira']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'jira', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"SUMMARY
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for product execution throughout the product lifecycle, including conducting research, creating and aligning product strategy with corporate strategy, defining the product roadmap, requirements gathering and documentation, release management and readiness of their products, measuring the effects of these activities, and using metrics to feedback into the process.
This role has an additional critical function of working closely with other product managers to align roadmaps and works closely with other stakeholders to define the product strategies.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Communicate clear priorities and status of roadmap items to all stakeholders.
Responsible for maintaining relationships and understanding expectations.
Work closely with internal customers in order to understand customer issues and propose solutions.
Manage, coordinate, and establish priorities for complete product life-cycle including the planning, design, development, testing, implementation, and commercialization of business solutions.
Support the creation of business cases for future project proposals, highlighting how new business opportunities are expected to promote sustainable business growth.
Work with cross-company product managers to ensure strategic product roadmaps are successfully executed.
Implement key metrics for product features and analyze metrics to verify objectives are progressing as planned.
Initiate marketing strategies, maintain product development roadmaps, and execute product launch activities.
Participate in and foster a working environment where creativity, innovation, ownership, and teamwork are encouraged and rewarded.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
None
QUALIFICATIONS:
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Business/Marketing Degree with Computer Science minor, or equivalent work experience
7+ years of software product management/business analyst experience
Experience in an AGILE working environment
Industry experience in IT-enabled healthcare or animal health is highly desirable.
Exposure to project management/information sharing tools like JIRA, Confluence, Lucid Charts, Balsamiq, etc.
highly desirable.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None
COMPETENCIES (SKILLS AND ABILITIES)
Deep understanding of Agile product lifecycle; including planning, development, and implementation.
Exceptional communication, presentation, active listening, analytical, and financial skills.
Strong leadership capabilities with experience in managing cross-functional teams, especially in highly leveraged, fast growth environments.
Ability to think critically and creatively and to contribute in a team environment.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENT
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Pet friendly environment
Extensive computer work
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
",['jira'],"['analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['jira', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Production
/service/operations support, technical problem solving
Previous
experience in production/service/operations support with analytical and
resolution skills.
Strong
written & oral skills.
Ability to work w customer, third party
vendors to meet deliverables,-SLAs&KPIs.
Application of documented
processes to ensure consistent output and uses continuous improvement
approaches in all work efforts.
Will
function at times at Workflow coordinator, assisting in Root Cause Analysis,
and preventive maintenance.
Must
have EXCELLENT communication skills for both direct customer interaction as
well as all stakeholder comms.
Must
be very responsible in ensuring all agreed to deliverables are met.
Must be
fluent in ENGLISH.
on-line for immediate consideration, please send your updated resume and
contact info via email rohit.sheelvant@prolim.com or Contact (248) 876-0896 Ext
leading provider of end-to-end
IT, PLM and Engineering
They
understand business as much as technology, and help their customers improve
their profitability and efficiency by providing high-value technology
consulting, staffing, and project management outsourcing services.
Their IT
and PLM consulting offerings include; Advisory, PLM Software/Services, Program
Management, Solution Architecture Training/Staffing, Cloud Solutions,
Servers/Networking, Infrastructure, ERP Practices and QA Services.
Engineering
services include Data Translation, CAD/CAM/CAE, Process & Product
Engineering, Prototyping, and Testing/Validation within a wide range of markets
and industries.
","['erp', 'excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title: IT Healthcare Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ Months
50% - Project/task management - Provide operational support on numerous projects by engaging business operations, information systems personnel, and PMO, as necessary to ensure success.
Schedule/attend meetings, capture minutes and actions, and act as the primary IT representative in absence of IT administrator.
Understand expectations and commitments so that they may be documented and communicated to responsible parties.
40% - Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories and to identify opportunities for improvement.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
10% - Other duties as assigned.
Required Experience:
SDLC – Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience
STLC Experience
Microsoft Technology Stack (or equivalent) Experience
Preferred Experience:
Scrum Master and/or Project Management Experience
Release Train, SAFe Experience
TDD/BDD Experience
Lean, Six Sigma Experience
Required Skills:
Healthcare domain knowledge
Lifecycle Model (TFS/VSTS, Jira, Rally, etc…)
Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access)
Excellent verbal/written communication skills
Preferred Skills:
Healthcare domain specific knowledge (claims, encounters, EDI, EMR, EHR, HIPAA, etc…)
Intermediate Business Intelligence reporting/tools Experience (SSRS/SSIS, Power BI, Tableau, etc…)
Automated testing tools experience (Selenium, SoapUI, REST Assured, Postman, et al.)
","['ms office', 'power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'jira']","['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'jira', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for designing and analyzing business processes necessary to achieve the business goals and objectives.
Business Analyst is also responsible for providing subject matter expertise on process knowledge, improvement opportunities, and process performance analysis and measurement.
Through knowledge of NCU systems and consultation the Business Analyst will provide clear and concise documentation to business leaders, I.T.
Software Development, and Quality Assurance.
A Business Analyst is responsible for UAT (User Acceptance Testing) and to see projects and tasks through the full SDLC (Software Development Life Cycle).
Essential Job Functions
Participates in the design and enhancement of operational systems, business processes, and reports
Creates requirement documents, Agile or “BRDs” (Business Requirements Document) and “FSDs” (Functional Specifications Document , and recommendations
Assesses project and/or business needs and produces supporting data and reports
Charts existing business processes in order to define current business activities for the development of procedures and models
Manages projects related to suggested changes
Researches, reviews, and analyzes the effectiveness and efficiency of existing processes and develops strategies for enhancing or further leveraging these processes
Researches and compares vendors for procurement projects and presents findings and recommendations to leaders
Prepares recommendations or alternatives for improving processes
Develops and documents business processes including documenting business rules, flow charts, and inter-department work flow
Owns tasks and projects through full SDLC
Interfaces with IT Development and Qualiuty Assurance teams for requirement walk-throughs, design reviews, issue resolution, etc.
Prepares UAT test cases and coordinates UAT with business leaders
Reasonable and consistent attendance to fulfill requirements of the position
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities
Knowledge of flow-chart software (like Visio)
Knowledge of SQL query creation
Knowledge of processes, procedures, and systems used in business
Knowledge of the SDLC process
Knowledge of both Waterfall and Agile methodologies
Skill in operating equipment, such as personal computer, fax, copier, phone system
Skill in analytical and problem-solving techniques
Ability to demonstrate consistent precision and accuracy
Ability to use and facilitate online communication using e-mail and/or other technology based communication media
Ability to interact effectively with various stakeholders
Ability to understand how report results effect business decisions
Ability to continuously provide a high level of quality while working at high-paced velocity
Excellent customer service skills
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
Must be self-motivated as well as creative and efficient
Detail-oriented
Proven analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent time management skills
Effective interpersonal, communication, and organizational skills
Proficient with Microsoft Word and other application ins Microsoft Office suite
College degree from a regionally accredited university preferred
Minimum of 2-5 years’ analysis experience required
Experience working in a team-oriented environment
Experience working in a technology-driven enterprise preferred
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Summary
As a business analyst, you will play an integral role in facilitating this purpose by working across many departments to gather, process, and relay information.
Your primary role will be to analyze data received potential clients to help build your product and brand.
Through your creativity and ability to communicate interpersonal with multiple business contributors, you have the opportunity to advance and earn sustainable bonuses.
If you desire to work with people and operate as a facilitator and mediator to align desired outcomes, then this job could be perfect for you.
Job Responsibilities
Create product tests to determine improvements and assess effectiveness prior to public debut and release of new designs.
Maintain an organized database detailing important analytics, timelines, and goals for reference by executives and other staff members.
Transfer and translate information between departments including IT, marketing, and finance to maintain effective communication and facilitate information dissemination.
Execute occasional audits to assess departmental processes and identify potential improvements to advance organizational efficiency.
Research benchmarking data and develop strategic tactics to improve the overall function of the organization and gain the edge on competitors.
Job Skills & Qualifications
Required
Working experience or self employed
Ability to convert lead looking for a business opportunity
Ability to communicate effectively
Preferred
Experience with working with people
",[None],"['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Summary:
This individual will rapidly come up to speed as a subject matter expert to serve as the primary point person for CRMTools on the business team.
You will have the potential to convert to FTE and transition with the tool to the PVSI team, supporting the Small Business Relationship Banking users through the migration off CRMTools and onto CRV Digitized Banker Platform (DBP) solution.
Once the migration is complete this individual may be leveraged as the Small Business SME for CRV going forward on the production support team.
Resource must be independent self-starter with drive for excellence.
Detail oriented and comfortable in a world where change is rapid and normal.
REQUIREMENTS:
Ability to facilitate and lead meetings to reach conclusions, identify tasks, record actions, and achieve results
Ability to take initiative and work independently with minimal supervision in a matrixed environment where change is constant
Familiarity with waterfall and agile methodologies
Strong communication skills both in person and virtually
May be required to work an occasional evening or weekend to perform business validation for production install
Limited travel may be possible
May create standardize process and procedural documentation
Start your career off on the right foot with one of 'America's Top 500 Companies', as awarded by0r client is known as a place where people feel included, valued, supported and respected.
Innovative thinking and industry-leading technology allow their associates to thrive and grow in their careers.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'normal']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'normal']"
BA,"Position Information
Position Type Staff Augmentation Hours/Week 40
Billing Type Hourly Shift Day
Projected Start Date 07/13/2020 Start Time 8:00 AM
Projected End Date/Duration 6 Months from projected start date End Time 5:00 PM
Bid Limit Per Vendor 2 Number of Positions 1
Desired Career Level None Selected Minimum Education Level None Selected
Weekend None
Under limited supervision, the business systems analyst is responsible for analyzing complex business problems in order to assist with the identification, evaluation, and implementation of systems and procedures that are cost effective and meet customer requirements.
The business systems analyst is responsible for the development of both business and technical requirements that represent the best possible solution for a particular business problem.
The business systems analyst will accomplish this by forming a strong partnership with both business and technical resources on all assigned efforts and by acting as the interpreter between business and technical resources regarding business requirements and system capabilities.
Additionally, the business systems analyst will be expected to assist with the development and execution of any organizational change management activities related to their assigned projects, assist with the development and execution of user acceptance testing of new and improved products, and ensure all production system documentation is complete and thorough.
Responsible for documenting the technical requirements including high level and low level design documents, and assisting in the development of the test plans with QA The business systems analyst is also expected to become highly familiar with all supported applications and business processes.
Required Skills:
5 to 8 years of experience in analyzing complex business problems, gathering and documenting business and technical requirements and maintain production system documentation
Demonstrated ability to form strong partnerships with both business and technical resources
Demonstrated ability to analyze complex business problems and help determine if they might be solved by automated systems
Exposure to a wide variety of project management and software development methodologies
Ability to balance adherence to process with rapid delivery of benefit to the customer
Experience with all aspects of creating and reviewing technical system documentation such as architectural diagrams, process flows and data flow diagrams
Demonstrated expertise in the solicitation and documentation of business and technical requirements
Advanced experience with MicroSoft Office products such as Word, PowerPoint, Excel and Visio
Strong customer focus
Demonstrated skills in critical thinking and analysis, meeting facilitation, written and oral communications, and interpersonal interactions
Demonstrated ability to balance, prioritize and organize multiple tasks.
Demonstrated ability to work collaboratively in teams and across organizations
Demonstrated ability to synthesize feedback and adjust plans accordingly
Demonstrated ability to build strong relationships inside and outside the organization
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'supervis', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
t7GlmzNGEb
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"SUMMARY
TheSenior Business Analyst is responsible for product execution throughout the product lifecycle, including conducting research, creating and aligning product strategy with corporate strategy, defining the product roadmap, requirements gathering and documentation, release management and readiness of their products, measuring the effects of these activities, and using metrics to feedback into the process.
This role has an additional critical function of working closely with other product managers to align roadmaps and works closely with other stakeholders to define the product strategies.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.Other duties may be assigned.
Communicate clear priorities and status of roadmap items to all stakeholders.
Responsible for maintaining relationships and understanding expectations.
Work closely with internal customers in order to understand customer issues and propose solutions.
Manage, coordinate, and establish priorities for complete product life-cycle including the planning, design, development, testing, implementation, and commercialization of business solutions.
Support the creation of business cases for future project proposals, highlighting how new business opportunities are expected to promote sustainable business growth.
Work with cross-company product managers to ensure strategic product roadmaps are successfully executed.
Implement key metrics for product features and analyze metrics to verify objectives are progressing as planned.
Initiate marketing strategies, maintain product development roadmaps, and execute product launch activities.
Participate in and foster a working environment where creativity, innovation, ownership, and teamwork are encouraged and rewarded.
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES
None
QUALIFICATIONS:
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Business/Marketing Degree with Computer Science minor, or equivalent work experience
7+ years of software product management/business analyst experience
Experience in an AGILE working environment
Industry experience in IT-enabled healthcare or animal health is highly desirable.
Exposure to project management/information sharing tools like JIRA, Confluence, Lucid Charts, Balsamiq, etc.
highly desirable.
CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS
None
COMPETENCIES (SKILLS AND ABILITIES)
Deep understanding of Agile product lifecycle; including planning, development, and implementation.
Exceptional communication, presentation, active listening, analytical, and financial skills.
Strong leadership capabilities with experience in managing cross-functional teams, especially in highly leveraged, fast growth environments.
Ability to think critically and creatively and to contribute in a team environment.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENT
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Pet friendly environment
Extensive computer work
Covetrus is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.
",['jira'],"['analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['jira', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Working as a consultant you will be connected to work that matters, putting your expertise to its best use while developing skills for the future.
Most consultants work in a model where they have the flexibility and autonomy to choose projects aligning to their experience, skills and desired lifestyle.
Other opportunities exist in team-based, strategy and solutions work.
PURPOSE OF THE ROLE
This requires special attention to increasing both the profitability and the stability of the business.
You will combine your systems knowledge with your functional experience in accounting, information management, human capital, internal audit, and supply chain to help Clients ensure project success.
Respect for people and opinions and confidently offer your point-of-view with clients and among colleagues
A drive for proactively cultivating relationships with clients and colleagues
Optimism when faced with challenges and complex situations, coupled with the drive to solve client issues
Dedication to continuous improvement and development of your skillset and talents
A strong personal identification with RGPs values loyalty, integrity, focus, enthusiasm, accountability and talent
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ROLE
Lead business stakeholder engagement meetings, striving to understand the Clients processes and building trust among business groups
Define and document business requirements and functional specifications from business users and subject matter experts
Understand as-is business processes to effectively identify and document the to-be requirements
Identify root cause(s) of an issue to help determine the optimal solution(s)
Write test plans and/or perform User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and functional testing of new solutions
Perform business needs analysis and design workflows, including as is and to be process mapping
Collect timely feedback from stakeholder groups and ensure terms of requirements and specifications are being met through the solutions being built
DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND REQUIREMENTS
BA or BS in Business, Accounting or related field required; MBA preferred
5-plus years of Business Analyst experience
Exceptional communication skills and professionalism
Strong analytical skills and problem-solving ability
Experience in technical writing (business cases, project charters, etc.)
Experience in business process improvement efforts
Experience with SQL, Tableau, or related systems is a plus
Strong business acumen
Equal Opportunity Employer
","['tableau', 'sql']","['optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Details for Requisition No.
RPHL00024
Job Title / Designation:
Business Analyst
This position ensures that scope of work requested to enhance or modify existing application processes are clearly documented, communicated and validated.
Skills Required/Mandatory:
BA, SDLC, SQL
Skills Required/Nice to have:
Use Cases, Logical Model
Experience Required:
6
Phoenix
State:
AZ
",['sql'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['sql', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Sr Business Analyst, Sports Creative Services
General Summary
This role will primary support FOX Enterprise Media Services (EMS) department as a Business Analyst by participating in a functional and technical capacity in all phases of project life cycle and ongoing management, support, and maintenance of media asset management systems.
This candidate will lead multiple activities such as customer relations, business process reengineering activities and managing complex requirements, user experience and user interface needs, while serving as functional liaison to the user community.
This person continuously gains an understanding of media supply chain and how systems are used in support of business workflows, transferring knowledge between users and technical members of the team.
Knowledge and expertise managing projects with cross functional teams is critical to success of this role.
This position is located in Century City, CA.
Responsibilities
Project Initiation
Develops understanding of customer needs and applies it in researching potential solutions.
Participates in clarification, rationalization and documentation of project requests.
Participates in preparation of the business case, project charter, project cost justification, RFI, RFP, package selection recommendation and other project initiation documents.
Application Development
Analyzes and documents relevant business processes.
Conducts interviews with customers to define functional requirements.
Serves as intermediary between technical and non-technical teams to ensure items are developed to meet business needs.
Leads and/or participates during detailed design and/or configuration.
Participates in software selection process, where applicable.
Participates in integration testing, including development of test plans, test cases and scenarios and documentation of results.
Facilitates and/or conducts user acceptance testing.
Assists in the preparation of end user documentation, training materials, curriculum and schedule.
Conducts training classes, including train-the trainer, one-on-one and classroom style training.
Provides first line post implementation support to users regarding functional issues.
Participates in change management activities.
Application Support
Takes ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions and implementing system resolutions, including workarounds when needed.
Participates in functional analysis for production support activities.
Applies department change control policies & procedures.
Coordinates with other technology departments on integrated system support.
Administration
Communicates plans, status and issues to management on a regular basis.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures and industry best practices.
Departmental Responsibilities
Self-driven with ability to adapt quickly to constantly changing environment.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs ranging across project and support initiatives.
Comfortable presenting in front of large groups and to executive management.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can help drive cost savings and other efficiencies.
Other Responsibilities Required
Available to work nights and weekends as needed.
Some travel may be required.
qualifications
Stellar business analyst with proven skills in customer relations, backend functionality, and user experience.
Superior analytical skills, ability to translate business and functional requirements into actionable user stories.
Strong communication skills, including creation of project documentation, presentation materials, and showcasing to business and technical audiences.
Working knowledge of SDLC methodologies such as Agile Scrum and Kanban is required.
Industry experience in movie & television studios or live sports or broadcast television or telecom or OTT/VOD distribution is preferred.
Knowledge of features & functionality for media ingestion, transcoding, transformation, and distribution is desired.
Hands-on experience with media asset management systems and cloud computing is a plus.
Knowledge of data analysis, metadata taxonomy, and broadcast traffic & scheduling metadata systems is a bonus.
Experience configuring off-the-shelfsoftwareto support business needs including setting up of rules and variables.
Gains understanding of customers workflows and how systems are used in support of their workflows.
Take ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions, and implementing resolutions, including workarounds.
Support multiple business divisions in a functional capacity across all project phases.
Proficient with structured analysis, including process flow definition, and data flow diagramming.
Participates in integration testing, including development of test plans, test cases, and documentation of results.
Communicate plans, status and issues to project team and management on a regular basis.
Self-driven with ability to adapt quickly to a fast paced constantly changing environment.
Knowledge of Atlassian Jira/Confluence, Invision, Lucidchart, Microsoft Office, Slack, Quip, Trello is a bonus.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs ranging across project and support initiatives.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can help drive cost savings and efficiencies.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures, and industry best practices.
Available to work after hours, nights, and weekends as needed.
Education & Training
Master's or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics or equivalent.
At least 7 years of experience in business analysis, system analysis, or functional consulting.
At least 5 years of experience defining complex requirements, business rules, and user stories.
At least 5 years of experience developing, or participating in Agile software development.
","['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Review key documents to ensure data accuracy prior to completing funding requests.
* Review collateral documents that secure borrowing facilities to ensure data matches information provided by customers.
Update systems or spreadsheets to reflect documents received.
* Ship collateral documents to investors that will purchase loans.
* Provide exceptional customer service in responding to customer's questions or requests.
* Review current processes and propose improvements.Requirements* Ideal candidate will have previous experience as a Processer, Funder, Closer or Loan Servicing at a mortgage lender or financial institution.
* Associates Degree completed or in process preferred.
* Strong computer skills, including moderate Microsoft Excel skills.
* Ability to work in multiple systems or screens simultaneously.
* Past leadership or managerial experience a plus.
* Strong written and verbal communication skills.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data']"
BA,"BUSINESS ANALYST (MANAGED CARE) TEMPE, AZ
NEW position in TEMPE!
Combine your expert clinical knowledge and skill in managed care analytics.
Serve as the SME for this medical management area.
(Will relocate within the region)
Perform and lead various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives and implement process improvements.
Lead the support of business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
Lead the identification and analysis of user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Resolve issues and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations, including improvements and revisions to business processes and requirements
Evaluate risks and concerns and communicate to management
Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Oversee all changes to departmental policies and procedures, including communicating and implementing the changes
Serve as the SME on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance
Qualifications:
Must Have great rounded knowledge Managed Care and Clinical knowledge.
(UM, Prior Authorization, Claims, Billing, Coding, G&A, HEDIS)
SQL experience is a must (but 2nd to Clinical and Managed care)
*** This is not an IT or Data heavy role need the expert clinical knowledge.
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
6+ years of business process or data analysis preferably in healthcare
or
5+ years of HEDIS analysis.
Preferred Skills :
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
* NO REMOTE
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Under general direction, Senior Business Analyst, develops data-oriented insights and solutions for business groups including but not limited to, store operations, real estate and finance.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Provides insights and strategic direction to key stakeholder; applies methodologies to future strategic decisions, including but not limited to, capital purchases/investments & budgets
Designs and executes scenarios and analyses to evaluate impact of business decisions; including but not limited to Net Present Value (NPV) analysis, Risk analysis, valuation, capital budgeting, cost of capital; develops future market strategy; communicates findings to stakeholders
Researches and analyzes key business drivers, competitive environment, opportunities, trends, and operating metrics based on data; formulates business direction in collaboration with internal and external stakeholders; ensures insight can be leveraged for future business decisions
Solve difficult, non-routine analysis problems, applying advanced analytical methods as needed.
Develop financial models and statistical analysis, forecasting and optimization methods/models to provide business insights and solutions to key stakeholders; applies methodologies to future strategic decisions, including but not limited to store operations, finance, human capital management.
Interaction with team, stakeholders and in person meetings towards making business recommendations based on data with effective presentations of findings, visual displays of quantitative information
Stays current on the latest industry technologies, techniques, trends and strategies
Completes work in a timely and accurate manner while providing exceptional customer service
Other duties as assigned
Job Requirements
Qualifications:
This position requires a minimum of five year’s experience conducting operations, product, and financial analysis and developing insights using regression models and statistical analysis.
Excellent quantitative and problem solving skills are vital.
Proficient in popular modeling tool sets for cluster analysis and advanced predictive modeling is required.
The ability to frame solutions to complex problems is crucial.
Expert knowledge of Microsoft Office, Word, Excel and PowerPoint is needed.
Advanced in SQL with Experience writing SQL queries, performing basic conversion and transformations (e.g.
formatting date string), and obtaining statistical summaries by using windowing functions.
Advanced demonstrated skill with financial and statistical modeling.
Experience with statistical tools such as Python or SAS is preferred.
Experience with front-end reporting tools such as Microstrategy is preferred.
Experience working with senior level executive leadership is required.
Ability to communicate across all levels of the organization is necessary.
Business acumen with knowledge and understanding of business issues, priorities, goals, and strategy is necessary.
Domain knowledge in retail, store operations, automotive, or services is helpful.
The ability to multi-task, and manage multiple projects to meet various deadlines simultaneously is required.
The ability to work efficiently under pressure, accurately meet deadlines, present a professional demeanor and work well independently is essential.
Customer service skills, including the ability to manage and respond to different customer situations while maintaining a positive and friendly attitude are essential.
In addition, organizational and problem solving skills, a can-do attitude, and the ability to adjust to changing requirements are essential.
Educational Requirements:
Master’s in finance or MBA
CFA certified preferred
Work Days:
Normal work days are Monday through Friday.
Occasional Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.
Work Hours:
Normal work hours are 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m. Additional hours may be necessary.
Not ready to
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'net', 'python', 'sa']","['risk', 'regress', 'data', 'cluster', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'normal', 'statist', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'net', 'python', 'sa', 'risk', 'regress', 'data', 'cluster', 'financ', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'normal', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Position Purpose:
Perform and lead various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function and implement process improvements.
· Lead the support of business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
· Lead the identification and analysis of user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
· Resolve issues and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
· Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations, including improvements and revisions to business processes and requirements
· Evaluate risks and concerns and communicate to management
· Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
· Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
· Oversee all changes to departmental policies and procedures, including communicating and implementing the changes
· Serve as the subject matter expert on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance
· Ability to travel
QUALIFICATIONS:
Education/Experience:
· Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
· 6+ years of business process or data analysis preferably in healthcare or 5+ years of HEDIS analysis.
· Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
· Project management experience preferred.
You won’t be alone on your journey.
Interview preparation
Resume review and recommendations
LinkedIn review
Local job market information, trends, and insights
Access to networking events
Informational career centric seminars.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'busi', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'busi', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Performs analyses of the business goals, objectives and needs of the general business environment for appropriate FIS segment, division, group or line of business.
Performs research and analysis to support business operations and presents findings to manager or project leader.
Plans and designs business processes and make recommendations and changes in order to improve and support business systems and activities and/or to deliver greater effectiveness and efficiency.
Utilizes systems and data to resolve business issues in the most effective and productive manner.
Identifies and implements best practices and suggests how to improve current practices.
Calculates/estimates costs and benefits of alternative actions or solutions to establish their viability/return on investment.
Develops recommendations to solve problems and issues related to business operations.
Analyzes and documents business processes and metrics and identifies improvement opportunities.
May perform special projects upon request and on occasion.
May provide coaching and/or guidance to less experienced Business Analysts.
Other related duties assigned as needed.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any
related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Job duties are project-based and performed on long-term assignments at
Powered by JazzHR
6zjylWM9eB
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Summary:
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for recommending and supporting application solutions in Microsoft Dynamics 365.
They must understand and support business challenges and opportunities.
Responsibilities:
Analyze multiple business process issues and provide solution recommendations to Business Owners, Super Users, and End Users
Document and assist users in defining business requirements, process maps, and use cases
Investigate feature requests, clarify objectives, understand software functionality and recommend solutions using industry best practices
Verify data integrity, functional integrity testing, and data maintenance
Create and maintain business processes within Microsoft Dynamics
Ensure business applications comply with relevant standards and regulations
Develops solutions by collaborating with business stakeholders, end users, and IT peers and preparing or evaluating alternative workflow solutions
REQUIREMENTS:
5+ years of functional knowledge in Microsoft Dynamics 365
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to work effectively with a wide range of constituencies in a diverse workplace
Demonstrated ability to solve critical problems in a timely manner within a complex business system environment
Demonstrated facilitation skills with ability to communicate effectively
Knowledge in Microsoft Dynamics 365 including the following areas of focus:
Finance (General Ledger, A/R, A/P, Cash & Bank, etc.)
Project Management and Accounting (SIS Project Cost Module is a plus)
Inventory Management
Manufacturing Production
Bills of Materials and routings
Production scheduling
WIP management
Budgeting and Forecasting
Experience in manufacturing is a plus
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work independently and in collaborative group settings
Occasional travel to business locations will be required
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['r', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['r', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The role of the Payroll Applications Business Analyst is to work as a liaison between the business units, technology teams and support teams to create documentation on specific business needs to be developed and implemented for rsquo payroll and related software applications which include SAP and ADP.
This position works side-by-side with subject matter experts and users to understand the business requirements to be provided to IT who will translate them into a working set of functional requirements.
In addition, the BA has input into project timelines, task development, and implementation planning around business requirement and testing needs.
The Business Analyst is also responsible for creating test plans, test scripts and performing user acceptance testing for the changes.
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for understanding the client business environment, eliciting requirements, and providing consulting and solution advice to clients on implementation strategy based on industry knowledge and best practices.
The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.
Essential Duties and responsibilities:
Project Delivery Responsibilities:
Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
business rules, data mapping, and product integrations)
Architect solutions based on client’s needs by utilizing established ELM Solutions methodologies and tools, industry experience and best practices
Analyze client’s existing systems of record to create data conversion mappings into ELM Solutions core products
Document functional requirements and partner with the development team to translate into technical requirements
Gather and document reporting requirements
Complete the configuration spreadsheet based on client requirements
Coordinate and organize client product training
Support user acceptance testing and production support tickets
Act as the primary client advocate and problem solver throughout the implementation process
Review and validate deliverables from development team and quality assurance resources against requirements and provide feedback
Coordinate activities and communication of requirements with internal and external teams
Project Operations Responsibilities:
Assist the program manager in tracking project delivery
Assist program manager in identifying and challenging scope and work estimates that seem extraordinary, providing acceptable alternatives as needed
Communicate functional or scope risks against statement of work to program manager in a timely manner
Provide a successful and seamless hand-off of client to customer support
Other Duties:
Perform quality assurance tasks when needed
Understand project management and quality assurance best practices
Foster team spirit within the team and across teams within the department
Attend seminars and web events to maintain professional and industry knowledge
Job Qualifications
Education:
Bachelor’s degree required preferably in business, finance, accounting, MIS, computer science or a related field
Experience:
Minimum 2-4 years of experience in implementing and supporting technology solutions, gathering requirements, participating in client interviews and meetings, and providing value-add services preferably in corporate legal departments
Professional consulting experience is highly preferred
Experience implementing and integrating with ERP systems
Experience working with relational databases
Experience in gathering requirements related to data loads
Experience managing external clients
Experience with e-Billing or matter management systems a plus
Travel requirements:
Ability to travel up to 25%
All Locations:
USA-IL-Riverwoods-Lake Cook Rd, USA-NY-New York-Liberty St, USA-TX-Houston-Post Oak Blvd
","['erp', 'erp system']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"(Payment Domain)
Job Requirements:
â Proven business analyst experience
â Effective written, verbal, and presentation communication skills with ability to tailor to varying audiences.
Confidence and poise to present at all levels effectively.
â Ability to translate business requirements into functional specifications.
â Highly engaged, self-starter with ability to balance achieving results and fostering collaboration.
â Demonstrated experience in planning and orchestrating process improvement.
â Experience with project management tool suites including MS Project, Plainview, and JIRA.
â Demonstrated experience with Agile or Waterfall methodologies
â Demonstrated knowledge of all aspects of the System Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodology
â Experienced user of Microsoft Office Suite to include Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio.
â Experience with Agile tools such as Rally, JIRA, Version One, or others
â Certification of Capability in Business Analysis (CCBA) certification (Desired)
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'jira']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'jira', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: IT Business Analyst
Duration: Long Term
Minimum Qualifications for Submission and Consideration:
Candidates must have a minimum 3 years of project work experience related to system development
Candidate must have experience in child welfare
Education, Experience and Training:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or related field
Applied knowledge of Software Development Lifecycle
Specific Skills:
Strong expertise in facilitation and clear communication skills
Advanced business, technical and software documentation authoring skills
Organized, self-driven and able to manage stakeholders with diverse expectations and technical expertise
Ability to efficiently analyze and map operational processes with support for managing change
Problem solving that leads to reliable recommendations and clear expectations
",[None],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"ÂKey Responsibilities Include:
Responsible for end to end delivery of user stories from user story grooming till the production implementation
Comprehensive understanding of system development life-cycles
Work effectively Agile environments
Partner and communicate with technology departments and other related project management teams
Communicate effectively in a technical or business setting
Quickly adapt to a dynamic environment and react to changing priorities
Author clear and accurate business requirements and functional system design deliverables, along with other artifacts required by Systems Development Life Cycle (SDLC) expectations
Work on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires evaluation of various factors
Drive troubleshooting and documentation related to production incidents related to applications owned by the team
Translate complex technical designs and issues into business terminology and communicate with business stakeholders at various levels
Collaborate, manage and build relationships in a geographically dispersed business and team environment
Effectively drive results, provide feedback/direction, manage and build documentation in a virtual and distributed organization
Â
Required Qualifications
7+ yearsÂof business systems analysis experience, design experience, development, testing and end to end delivery
2+ years of Credit Card industry experience
2+ years of Agile experience
4+ years of SDLC (System Development Life Cycle) experience
2+ year of JIRA experience
5+ years of JAVA experience
Excellent verbal, written, and interpersonal communication skills
Ability to drive the requirements process with both technical and business partnersÂ
Â
Desired Qualifications
Knowledge and understanding of business requirement analysis and design including documentation of data and system architectures
Ability to facilitate or host complex design discussions and drive results
Experience with Agile Scrum (Daily Standup, Sprint Planning and Sprint Retrospective meetings) and Kanban
","['react', 'excel', 'jira', 'java']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['react', 'excel', 'jira', 'java', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Sr Business Analyst, Sports Creative Services
General
Summary
This role will primary support FOX
Enterprise Media Services (EMS) department as a Business Analyst
by
participating in a functional and technical capacity in all
phases of project
life cycle and ongoing management, support, and maintenance of
media asset
management systems.
This candidate will lead multiple activities
such as
customer relations, business process reengineering activities and
managing
complex requirements, user experience and user interface needs,
while serving
as functional liaison to the user community.
This person
continuously gains an
understanding of media supply chain and how systems are used in
support of
business workflows, transferring knowledge between users and
technical members
of the team.
Knowledge and expertise managing projects with cross
functional
teams is critical to success of this role.
This position is
located in Century
City, CA.
Responsibilities
Project Initiation
Develops understanding of customer needs and applies
it in researching potential solutions.
Participates in clarification, rationalization and
documentation of project requests.
Participates in preparation of the business case,
project charter, project cost justification, RFI, RFP,
package selection
recommendation and other project initiation documents.
Application Development
Analyzes and documents relevant business processes.
Conducts interviews with customers to define
functional requirements.
Serves as intermediary between technical and non-technical
teams to ensure items are developed to meet business needs.
Leads and/or participates during detailed design
and/or configuration.
Participates in software selection process, where
applicable.
Participates in integration testing, including
development of test plans, test cases and scenarios and
documentation of
results.
Facilitates and/or conducts user acceptance testing.
Assists in the preparation of end user documentation,
training materials, curriculum and schedule.
Conducts training classes, including train-the
trainer, one-on-one and classroom style training.
Provides first line post implementation support to
users regarding functional issues.
Participates in change management activities.
Application Support
Takes ownership of functional issues by identifying
underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions and
implementing
system resolutions, including workarounds when needed.
Participates in functional analysis for production
support activities.
Applies department change control policies & procedures.
Coordinates with other technology departments on
integrated system support.
Administration
Communicates plans, status and issues to management on
a regular basis.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures
and industry best practices.
Departmental Responsibilities
Self-driven with ability to adapt quickly to
constantly changing environment.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly
changing needs ranging across project and support
initiatives.
Comfortable presenting in front of large groups and to
executive management.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement
that can help drive cost savings and other efficiencies.
Other Responsibilities Required
Available to work nights and weekends as needed.
Some travel may be required.
qualifications
Stellar business analyst with proven skills in customer
relations, backend functionality, and user experience.
Superior analytical skills, ability to translate
business and functional requirements into actionable user
stories.
Strong communication skills, including creation of
project documentation, presentation materials, and
showcasing to business
and technical audiences.
Working knowledge of SDLC methodologies such as Agile
Scrum and Kanban is required.
Industry experience in movie & television studios
or live sports or broadcast television or telecom or OTT/VOD
distribution
is preferred.
Knowledge of features & functionality for media
ingestion, transcoding, transformation, and distribution is
desired.
Hands-on experience with media asset management systems
and cloud computing is a plus.
Knowledge of data analysis, metadata taxonomy, and
broadcast traffic & scheduling metadata systems is a bonus.
Experience configuring off-the-shelf software
to support business needs including setting up of rules and
variables.
Gains understanding of customers workflows and how
systems are used in support of their workflows.
Take ownership of functional issues by identifying
underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions, and
implementing
resolutions, including workarounds.
Support multiple business divisions in a functional
capacity across all project phases.
Proficient with structured analysis, including process
flow definition, and data flow diagramming.
Participates in integration testing, including
development of test plans, test cases, and documentation of
results.
Communicate plans, status and issues to project team
and management on a regular basis.
Self-driven with ability to adapt quickly to a fast
paced constantly changing environment.
Knowledge of Atlassian Jira/Confluence, Invision,
Lucidchart, Microsoft Office, Slack, Quip, Trello is a
bonus.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing
needs ranging across project and support initiatives.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement
that can help drive cost savings and efficiencies.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures,
and industry best practices.
Available to work after hours, nights, and weekends as
needed.
Education
& Training
Master's or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science,
Technology, Engineering, Mathematics or equivalent.
At least 7 years of experience in business analysis,
system analysis, or functional consulting.
At least 5 years of experience defining complex
requirements, business rules, and user stories.
At least 5 years of experience developing, or
participating in Agile software development.
","['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"D.B.
SR. BUSINESS ANALYST (MANAGED CARE)
TEMPE, AZ
NEW position in TEMPE!
Serve as the subject matter expert for this medical management area.
(Will relocate within the region)
-Serve as the SME on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance
Qualifications:
(UM, Prior Authorization, Claims, Billing, Coding, G&A, HEDIS)
**** This is not an IT or Data heavy role – need the expert clinical knowledge.
-Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
-6+ years of business process or data analysis preferably in healthcare or 5+ years of HEDIS analysis.
Preferred Skills :
Project management experience preferred.
Job Type: Full-time
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
HEDIS: 4 years (Required)
managed care work: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No
",[None],"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Responsibilities
• Analyzing business processes, organizational procedures, work flow, and information requirements
• Documenting business and functional requirements, and recommending implementation strategies
• May include reviewing state and federal policy and writing/reviewing structured English business rules
• Completing testing activities including developing test plans, executing tests, and tracking/reporting test outcomes
• Working collaboratively with business and technical partners to complete projects
• Creating and updating project work plans, completing project activities and communicating progress/outstanding issues and risks
• Planning, scheduling, facilitating, and documenting meetings with project teams and/or stakeholder groups
• Coordinating production migrations and validating correct implementation of deliverables, reviewing key indicators to locate and correct problems, follow up and tracking remediation of issues
• Preparing and delivering oral and written presentations for a wide variety of audiences on both technical and non-technical subjects
• Other duties as assigned
Desired Skills & Experience
• Superior communication and interpersonal skills to communicate effectively with business users to identify and prioritize needs, articulate business impact, and evaluate alternative business solutions
• Advanced listening, requirements elicitation, analysis, and problem solving skills
• Proficient analytical skills to evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, consolidate details and extract to functional requirements
• Demonstrated ability to develop and execute comprehensive test plans for projects of various sizes and complexity
• Advanced skills in interpreting and understanding program policies and procedures
• Advanced ability to develop and write technical documentation
• Organizational skills to prioritize projects/tasks and adapt to unplanned activities or changes in priorities
• Advanced listening, requirements elicitation, analysis, and problem solving skills
• High proficiency in MS Office Suite (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, Access)
• Ability to interact with all levels of the organization and ability communicate with technical and non-technical partners
• Ability to analyze business needs of the agency
• Ability to complete feasibility reviews and impact analysis
• Ability to make appropriate recommendations for automated solutions to business needs
• Ability to assess operational needs to establish priorities
• Ability to respond promptly to customer needs; take a customer-centric approach to problem solving; solicit customer feedback to improve service; respond to requests for service and assistance; meet commitments; and manage difficult or emotional customer situations
• Ability to prioritize and plan work activities; set goals and objectives; use time efficiently; and communicate activities and results as appropriate
• Ability to analyze complex issues, interpret, evaluate and arrive at logical conclusions
• Ability to review, analyze and resolve production problems
Preferred/Desired Candidate: - Bachelor’s Degree and five years experience performing business/systems analysis, application testing for mainframe or web based systems, data analysis, quality assurance, or help desk activities.
Relevant experience on highly complex systems with considerable level of customization and complex Business Rules.
This is a critical project and long term vacations will be denied.
One –three day requests will be considered.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Jr.
The position requires outstanding customer service and communication skills, proven analytical and solutions-driven mindset, ability to collaborate across multiple stakeholder groups, and strong detail-oriented problem-solving skills.
Responsibilities:
Help users solve their IT problems and provide targeted instructions to users to improve their skills and confidence in using computer systems and the Cobalt application to meet their business needs.
Promptly notify Service Desk management of issues that require management attention.
Validate documentation for accuracy and adherence to Service Desk standards.
Requirements
Master’s degree in Computer Science / Information Technology
0 to 2 years of experience as a business analyst
Written and Oral Communication
Collaboration and ability to influence others
Quality and accuracy
Attention to detail
Proactive and Persistent
Problem Solving and conflict negotiation
Planning, prioritization and monitoring
Powered by JazzHR
ToSzbmXhHs
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"OverviewJob RequirementsThe Business Analyst, Operational R & A, engages with business segments, senior leadership, IT groups and cross-functional teams to develop and implement analytics, KPIs and reporting to support Student Administrative Services.ResponsibilitiesJob Accountabilities1.
Work directly with department senior leaders and cross-functional leads to provide trend analyses that help provide strategic guidance and guide decisions for operational strategies to improve efficiencies and manage business KPIs.3.
Lead and develop business requirements and process documentation for ad hoc, on demand and standard reports used by multiple users.
This includes providing recommendations on report design and automation using best practices to meet business needs.
Monitor and maintain workforce management and planning processes.
Lead efforts to review and recommend changes to business processes to increase system effectiveness as necessary.
Specific goals or responsibilities will be documented in the incumbents' performance objectives as outlined by the incumbents' immediate supervisor or manager.
",['r'],"['segment', 'recommend', 'busi', 'kpi']",999.0,"['r', 'segment', 'recommend', 'busi', 'kpi']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
derJNQP9ka
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"Phoenix, AZ – IT – AZDES – DDD – Business Analyst/QA 68748
12 Months from projected start date
45/ hr on W2
*This is a re-posting of 67869.
Please ONLY submit new resources****
3443 N Central Avenue City Phoenix
State Arizona Zip 85012
Country UNITED STATES
***This is a re-posting of 67869.
Please ONLY submit new resources****
This posting will be closed on 2/6/2020 @ 3:00pm.
At that time, resumes will be pushed to the agency.
This posting is not open to sub vendor candidates at this time.
– AS A REMINDER – Candidates must be available to interview within 1 week of the posting close date.
Candidates must also be able to start by the target start date set down in the offer email.
Any non-local candidate must be willing to relocate by the targeted start date at NO Fee
50% – Develop test plans/scenarios/cases/scripts to ensure appropriate test coverage.
Provide direction to developers to implement solutions per requirements.
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria.
Conduct user acceptance testing with end users to ensure implemented solution meets expectations.
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability.
30% – Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
20% – Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement.
Identify candidates for test automation, document test flow and data requirements/dependencies, and implement using approved tools.
Required Skills
Windows Server Experience
SDLC – Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience
Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS Experience
Intermediate VSTS Experience
Intermediate STLC Experience
Intermediate .Net Applications, ETL Experience
Intermediate SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016 Experience
Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access) Experience
Nice-To-Have Skills
MS Project Experience
SSIS/SSRS Experience
.Net 4 Experience
Experience with Automated testing
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary
The Business Analyst will regularly interact with business and IT resources from various levels in the organization as well as directly with the primary vendor for transformational project within the client.
The candidate for this position must be adept with technology and business use of technology and should have experience eliciting business functional requirements and documenting these and feature level detail.
Experience and understanding of retail specific technology including POS systems is a plus.
Responsibilities:
Gather and document business, non-functional and operational requirements by analyzing transformation team objectives, business and user needs and documenting potential modifications to existing systems.
Create and/or review As Is/ To Be Process documentation.
Support inter-team relationships.
Partner with others in the formation and definition of scope and objectives through research and fact-finding activities.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources; reconcile conflicts, sort high-level information into details and distinguish user requests from underlying true needs
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
Skills Required:
Master’s Degree in Computer Science/Information Technology
0-2 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Microsoft Office, Visio, SQL, MicroStrategy or similar tool
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent, preferred
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements
Powered by JazzHR
KPAw6KUPAx
","['microsoft', 'sql']","['research', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'research', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job descriptionPosition Purpose: Perform and lead various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function and implement process improvements.
uf0b7 Lead the support of business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of various systems
uf0b7 Lead the identification and analysis of user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
uf0b7 Resolve issues and identify opportunities for process redesign and improvement
uf0b7 Perform detailed analysis on multiple projects, recommend potential business solutions and ensure successful implementations, including improvements and revisions to business processes and requirements
uf0b7 Evaluate risks and concerns and communicate to management
uf0b7 Coordinate with various business units and departments in the development and delivery of training programs
uf0b7 Develop, share, and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
uf0b7 Oversee all changes to departmental policies and procedures, including communicating and implementing the changes
uf0b7 Serve as the subject matter expert on the assigned function product to ensure operational performance
uf0b7 Ability to travel
Qualifications:
Education/Experience:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
5+ years of business process or data analysis strongly preferred in Healthcare or 5+ years of HEDIS analysis.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Requirements:
Candidate needs to come from a Banking/Financial background.
Main responsibilities: Gathering business requirements, defining requirements, working with the business, working with technical teams, general Sr.
IT Business Analyst experience.
GENERAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Establishes and implements quality assurance and compliance processes for IT.
Works closely with IT leaders to develop/implement and overall quality maturity roadmap and plan for each IT functional area.
Consults with development, testing, and production teams to develop, publish, and implement software quality assurance plans.
Reviews progress toward the software quality assurance plans regularly with IT leadership, technical teams, and internal customers to make modifications as necessary.
Establishes internal IT service quality control standards, policies, and procedures.
Monitors, evaluates, manages, and executes audit processes to ensure compliance.
Coordinates and facilitates quality assurance activities across projects with project managers.
Provides guidance and subject matter expertise to IT teams on quality assurance methodologies and processes, educates them on their responsibilities/accountabilities for the purpose of achieving on-time and quality deliverables.
Makes recommendations and directs improvements to the software development lifecycle process.
Documents non-compliance to policies, processes, and standards and assists in their resolution.
Analyzes and identifies trends in IT performance metrics.
Designs, monitors, and analyzes performance metrics program for quality improvement initiatives.
Conducts audits and analyzes findings to develop appropriate corrective action recommendations.
Provides training on established processes and policies.
Performs other related duties as required.
Job Type: Contract
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Banking or Financial: 2 years (Required)
Business Analysis: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Contract Length:
1 year
Contract Renewal:
Likely
",[None],"['recommend', 'account', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'account', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
KXtaXw15kA
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
yUijED0Wk7
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Service Now
Primary Responsibilities
Translate user requests into technical language that the
developer can understand.
Acts as liaison between the customer, product owner, project
manager, and the technical team.
Leading and scheduling meetings w/ product owners and
customers.
Working closely with business and IT teams to gather
requirements via user stories to support ongoing business needs
for Service Now configuration, implementation, and support.
Working with multiple projects simultaneously and completing
project activities in a way that minimizes project risks and
issues in a client services organization.
Gather and understand requirements from the process owners and
translate them into functional and technical requirements.
•
Proactively research and suggest enhancements to processes and
procedures.
Collaborate with ITSM, ITBM, ITAM, ITOM process owners to
assist with the design and development of IT solutions using
ServiceNow.
policies, procedures, and process throughout ServiceNow
development.
Assist with simplification and standardization of tools and
processes.
Take notes and send to stakeholders.
Provide excellent customer service.
Basic Qualifications
Must possess a minimum of 1 year of ServiceNow experience.
Must possess excellent written and oral communication skills.
Must have initiative and a positive attitude to lead meetings
with customers.
Must be able to translate technical terms into laymen's terms
and vie-versa.
Must enjoy providing excellent customer service.
Must be professional and courteous, as the BA is the first team
member to meet with the customer.
ServiceNow - CMDB, HAM, SAM, APM, TPM, EM, ITSM, ITBM, ITAM,
ITOM
Coding experience is a plus
Service Now certification is preferred
ITIL certification is preferred
",['excel'],"['risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Salesforce/Financial Business Analyst
Job Purpose:
The Financial Business Analyst works on key initiatives in support of the Sales Team customer lifecycle by interacting with other members of the Sales Management team to ensure effective coordination, planning, and execution of sales meetings, communication, process and sales enablement/knowledge.
Sales Operations Analyst helps define and track key sales processes and metrics.
The Sales Business Analyst is responsible for a timely and accurate response to the business needs and information request from the global sales and account management team.
Essential Functions:
Manage Salesforce Reports and Dashboards for the Sales Team.
Oversee the internal communication process for the Sales Staff and serve as the corporate conduit for all written sales communications to Executive staff.
Design and maintain the Sales Resource Center portal and ensure its ongoing utilization and relevance to the Sales team.
Design and enhance processes to be utilized by the Sales Team to improve their overall effectiveness (e.g., Account Plans and Sales to Account Manager Handoffs).
Coordinate efforts for the annual voice of the customer programs including oversight for outside vendors, system setup, internal team communications on the process, progress and follow-up action response planning and execution.
Sales Opportunity Support- oversees the entire process of submission efforts.
Other duties as assigned by management related to continual improvement of revenue generation and customer value delivery functions and effectively plan, coordinate and execute on projects independently.
Qualifications:
Experience and Education (minimums)
Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science, Finance or related field.
2-3 years’ experience in Sales Operations.
Proven Data Management Skills in a fast-paced work environment.
Experience with Salesforce.com Reports and Dashboards strongly preferred.
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
Able to identify process gaps and effectively communicate with a Salesforce Administrator on engineering new sales processes supported in CRM.
Proficient in MS Excel, MS Word, and PowerPoint.
Experience in managing large datasets quickly and effectively.
Strong ability to model data, and report forecast trends, churn and funnel metrics.
Strong written and verbal communication skills, excellent cognitive reasoning, analytical, planning and process development skills, strong business judgment, business acumen, and high level of initiative.
Comfortable interfacing with Executive Leadership, Legal, Finance, Deal Desk, Product, Marketing and all Sales roles in the organization.
Ability to rapidly gain a demonstrated knowledge and understanding of defined sales cycle.
Ability to respond effectively to multiple conflicting priorities, continuously prioritize and reprioritize deliverables and to respond in a dynamic work environment.
Interested in learning new technologies to support the business, including but not limited to Salesforce, Salesforce CPQ (Configure Price Quote), Salesforce App Exchange Products, and BI tools.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'bi']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'powerbi', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"You'll work closely with high profile stakeholders, analysing their requirements objectively for business requirements.
Ideally, you'll have a software engineering technical background able to come in and support so that you are about to hit the ground running, supporting a broad spectrum of applications languages.
Knowing object-oriented language is going to be key to your personal success on the team.
Teams they support Accounting, Finance, multiple different applications, focusing on upgrades, enhancements, technical issues, work on the backlog, etc.
This is a truly agile environment with 2 weeks sprints.
You'll be able to demonstrate the ability to be flexible and deal with a challenging environment.
Business Analyst role requirements Essentials At least 3 years' experience in a Business Analyst role 2 Years of Technical Experience, Object Orientated Programming (OOP) Knowledge with object oriented language PowerShell scripting is a huge plus Ability to read, interpret code (can be jr but prefers someone with 2-4 years of experience programming) Agile background and environment expertise in enterprise environments - financial client background is a plus since they support the accounting and finance department as well Problem solver with a leadership mentality Gathering requirements, working with business and IT to create solutions Working on Internal applications for the credit union A great personality, must love teamwork and be willing to get stuck in!
Their working culture is relaxed, supportive and no-nonsense, so if you're looking for a place to feel valued this could be it!
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Sports / Entertainment)
General Summary
This role will primary support Enterprise Media Services (EMS) department as a Business Analyst by participating in functional and technical capacities in all phases of the project life cycle and ongoing management, support, and maintenance of media asset management systems.
This candidate will lead multiple activities such as customer relations, business process reengineering activities and managing complex requirements, user experience, and user interface needs while serving as functional liaison to the user community.
This person continuously gains an understanding of the media supply chain and how systems are used in support of business workflows, transferring knowledge between users and technical members of the team.
Knowledge and expertise managing projects with cross-functional teams is critical to the success of this role.
Responsibilities
Project Initiation
Develops an understanding of customer needs and applies it to researching potential solutions.
Participates in clarification, rationalization and documentation of project requests.
Participates in the preparation of the business case, project charter, project cost justification, RFI, RFP, package selection recommendation and other project initiation documents.
Application Development
Analyzes and documents relevant business processes.
Conducts interviews with customers to define functional requirements.
Serves as an intermediary between technical and non-technical teams to ensure items are developed to meet business needs.
Leads and/or participates during detailed design and/or configuration.
Participates in the software selection process, where applicable.
Participates in integration testing, including the development of test plans, test cases and scenarios and documentation of results.
Facilitates and/or conducts user acceptance testing.
Assists in the preparation of end-user documentation, training materials, curriculum, and schedule.
Conducts training classes, including train-the-trainer, one-on-one and classroom-style training.
Provides first-line post-implementation support to users regarding functional issues.
Participates in change management activities.
Application Support
Takes ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions and implementing system resolutions, including workarounds when needed.
Participates in functional analysis for production support activities.
Applies department change control policies & procedures.
Coordinates with other technology departments on integrated system support.
Administration
Communicates plans, status and issues to management on a regular basis.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures and industry best practices.
Departmental Responsibilities
Self-driven with the ability to adapt quickly to constantly changing environment.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs ranging across project and support initiatives.
Comfortable presenting in front of large groups and to executive management.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can help drive cost savings and other efficiencies.
Other Responsibilities Required
Available to work nights and weekends as needed.
Some travel may be required.
qualifications
Stellar business analyst with proven skills in customer relations, backend functionality, and user experience.
Superior analytical skills, ability to translate business and functional requirements into actionable user stories.
Strong communication skills, including the creation of project documentation, presentation materials, and showcasing to business and technical audiences.
Working knowledge of SDLC methodologies such as Agile Scrum and Kanban is required.
Industry experience in movie & television studios or live sports or broadcast television or telecom or OTT/VOD distribution is preferred.
Knowledge of features & functionality for media ingestion, transcoding, transformation, and distribution is desired.
Hands-on experience with media asset management systems and cloud computing is a plus.
Knowledge of data analysis, metadata taxonomy, and broadcast traffic & scheduling metadata systems is a bonus.
Experience configuring off-the-shelf software to support business needs including setting up of rules and variables.
Gains understanding of customers workflows and how systems are used in support of their workflows.
Take ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying problems, analyzing potential solutions, and implementing resolutions, including workarounds.
Support multiple business divisions in a functional capacity across all project phases.
Proficient with structured analysis, including process flow definition, and data flow diagramming.
Participates in integration testing, including the development of test plans, test cases, and documentation of results.
Communicate plans, status and issues to project team and management on a regular basis.
Self-driven with the ability to adapt quickly to a fast-paced constantly changing environment.
Knowledge of Atlassian Jira/Confluence, Invision, Lucidchart, Microsoft Office, Slack, Quip, Trello is a bonus.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs ranging across project and support initiatives.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can help drive cost savings and efficiencies.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures, and industry best practices.
Available to work after hours, nights, and weekends as needed.
Education & Training
Master's or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Technology, Engineering, Mathematics or equivalent.
At least 7 years of experience in business analysis, system analysis, or functional consulting.
At least 5 years of experience defining complex requirements, business rules, and user stories.
At least 5 years of experience developing, or participating in Agile software development.
","['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Marketing Business Analyst Reports to : VP of Marketing with dotted line to VP of Sales
Job Type: Full Time
This role will support marketing & sales initiatives by conducting detailed analysis of internal and third party supplied sales and marketing research and data to assist management with refinement of sales and marketing strategies.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities
Track, monitor and provide actionable feedback on sales trends/ACV/distribution
Use customer data to perform analysis and compile reports to assist the sales team in understanding business trends
Create scorecards to support assortment, merchandising, pricing and shelving objectives
Evaluate effectiveness of programs and communicate strategy and best practices internally and externally to retail sales
Provide any necessary training to ensure stakeholders understand the data reports thoroughly
Assist Sales Team in customer presentation & scorecard assessments; tracks and evaluates customer plan results versus business plan and communicates issues and opportunities accordingly
Provide insights and analytics for customer-specific sales presentations
Assess competitive market activity and provide analytics around risks/opportunities.
Research competitive products by identifying and evaluating product attributes, market share, pricing.
Responsible for ensuring all 3rd party product data libraries are up-to-date and correct
Analyze key consumer, shopper and retailer trends and preferences
Assess performance of new launches as well as ROI of trade and marketing investment
Other duties as assigned
Skill Set:
In-depth knowledge of key tools and data platforms – Spins, Nielsen, IRI, Mintel and others
Pro in Excel use and PowerPoint deck creation
Great team player with outstanding written and oral communication skills
Good understanding of marketing, sales, trade marketing basics and tools
Financial Management skills - preferred
Pull, mine, analyze, interpret data with ability to tell a story and make recommendations based on data
Ability to thrive in fast-paced, constantly changing environment with minimal supervision
Excellent communication, organization, and problem-solving skills
Required
Education: Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited institution
Familiarity with Syndicated data (Nielsen, IRI, SPINS) mining, interpretation, and storytelling
3+ years of experience in category development, category management, buying, demand planning, business analytics, finance, sales or marketing required, CPG preferred
2+ years of experience in food and beverage retail or wholesale preferred.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
Food & Beverage: 2 years (Preferred)
Business Analytics: 3 years (Preferred)
Syndicated Data (IRI, Nielsen, SPINS): 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
English (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
https://bubbiesicecream.com/
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
t9EyNHh9Hj
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
mlrVfBfda3
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst - Service Now
Primary Responsibilities
Translate user requests into technical language that the developer can understand.
Acts as liaison between the customer, product owner, project manager, and the technical team.
Leading and scheduling meetings w/ product owners and customers.
Working closely with business and IT teams to gather requirements via user stories to support ongoing business needs for Service Now configuration, implementation, and support.
Working with multiple projects simultaneously and completing project activities in a way that minimizes project risks and issues in a client services organization.
Gather and understand requirements from the process owners and translate them into functional and technical requirements.
Proactively research and suggest enhancements to processes and procedures.
Collaborate with ITSM, ITBM, ITAM, ITOM process owners to assist with the design and development of IT solutions using ServiceNow.
Assist with simplification and standardization of tools and processes.
Take notes and send to stakeholders.
Provide excellent customer service.
Basic Qualifications
Must possess a minimum of 1 year of ServiceNow experience.
Must possess excellent written and oral communication skills.
Must have initiative and a positive attitude to lead meetings with customers.
Must be able to translate technical terms into laymen's terms and vie-versa.
Must enjoy providing excellent customer service.
Must be professional and courteous, as the BA is the first team member to meet with the customer.
ServiceNow - CMDB, HAM, SAM, APM, TPM, EM, ITSM, ITBM, ITAM, ITOM
Coding experience is a plus
Service Now certification is preferred
ITIL certification is preferred
",['excel'],"['risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Sports / Entertainment)
General Summary
This role will primary support Enterprise Media Services (EMS)
department as a Business Analyst by participating in functional
and technical capacities in all phases of the project life cycle
and ongoing management, support, and maintenance of media asset
management systems.
This candidate will lead multiple activities
such as customer relations, business process reengineering
activities and managing complex requirements, user experience,
and user interface needs while serving as functional liaison to
the user community.
This person continuously gains an
understanding of the media supply chain and how systems are used
in support of business workflows, transferring knowledge between
users and technical members of the team.
Knowledge and expertise
managing projects with cross-functional teams is critical to the
success of this role.
Responsibilities
Project Initiation
Develops an understanding of customer needs and applies it to
researching potential solutions.
Participates in clarification, rationalization and
documentation of project requests.
Participates in the preparation of the business case, project
charter, project cost justification, RFI, RFP, package selection
recommendation and other project initiation documents.
Application Development
Analyzes and documents relevant business processes.
Conducts interviews with customers to define functional
requirements.
Serves as an intermediary between technical and non-technical
teams to ensure items are developed to meet business needs.
Leads and/or participates during detailed design and/or
configuration.
Participates in the software selection process, where
applicable.
Participates in integration testing, including the development
of test plans, test cases and scenarios and documentation of
results.
Facilitates and/or conducts user acceptance testing.
Assists in the preparation of end-user documentation, training
materials, curriculum, and schedule.
Conducts training classes, including train-the-trainer,
one-on-one and classroom-style training.
Provides first-line post-implementation support to users
regarding functional issues.
Participates in change management activities.
Application Support
Takes ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying
problems, analyzing potential solutions and implementing system
resolutions, including workarounds when needed.
Participates in functional analysis for production support
activities.
Applies department change control policies & procedures.
Coordinates with other technology departments on integrated
system support.
Administration
Communicates plans, status and issues to management on a
regular basis.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures and
industry best practices.
Departmental Responsibilities
Self-driven with the ability to adapt quickly to constantly
changing environment.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs
ranging across project and support initiatives.
Comfortable presenting in front of large groups and to
executive management.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can
help drive cost savings and other efficiencies.
Other Responsibilities Required
Available to work nights and weekends as needed.
Some travel may be required.
qualifications
Stellar business analyst with proven skills in customer
relations, backend functionality, and user experience.
Superior analytical skills, ability to translate business and
functional requirements into actionable user stories.
Strong communication skills, including the creation of project
documentation, presentation materials, and showcasing to business
and technical audiences.
Working knowledge of SDLC methodologies such as Agile Scrum and
Kanban is required.
Industry experience in movie & television studios or live
sports or broadcast television or telecom or OTT/VOD distribution
is preferred.
Knowledge of features & functionality for media ingestion,
transcoding, transformation, and distribution is desired.
Hands-on experience with media asset management systems and
cloud computing is a plus.
Knowledge of data analysis, metadata taxonomy, and broadcast
traffic & scheduling metadata systems is a bonus.
Experience configuring off-the-shelf software to support
business needs including setting up of rules and variables.
Gains understanding of customers workflows and how systems are
used in support of their workflows.
Take ownership of functional issues by identifying underlying
problems, analyzing potential solutions, and implementing
resolutions, including workarounds.
Support multiple business divisions in a functional capacity
across all project phases.
Proficient with structured analysis, including process flow
definition, and data flow diagramming.
Participates in integration testing, including the development
of test plans, test cases, and documentation of results.
Communicate plans, status and issues to project team and
management on a regular basis.
Self-driven with the ability to adapt quickly to a fast-paced
constantly changing environment.
Knowledge of Atlassian Jira/Confluence, Invision, Lucidchart,
Microsoft Office, Slack, Quip, Trello is a bonus.
Ability to self-prioritize based on constantly changing needs
ranging across project and support initiatives.
Proactively seeks and escalates areas of improvement that can
help drive cost savings and efficiencies.
Adheres to department standards, policies, procedures, and
industry best practices.
Available to work after hours, nights, and weekends as needed.
Education & Training
Master's or Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Technology,
Engineering, Mathematics or equivalent.
At least 7 years of experience in business analysis, system
analysis, or functional consulting.
At least 5 years of experience defining complex requirements,
business rules, and user stories.
At least 5 years of experience developing, or participating in
Agile software development.
","['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['jira', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Agile, OOP, Client Facing - Phoenix, AZ - Must have a software / technical background - Mid to Senior- 100% remote during Covid-19 - plus benefits - Four-month contract to hireThe Role
You'll work closely with high profile stakeholders, analysing their requirements objectively for business requirements.
Ideally, you'll have a software engineering / technical background able to come in and support so that you are about to hit the ground running, supporting a broad spectrum of applications languages.
Knowing object-oriented language is going to be key to your personal success on the team.
Teams they support: Accounting, Finance, multiple different applications, focusing on upgrades, enhancements, technical issues, work on the backlog, etc.
This is a truly agile environment with 2 weeks sprints.
You'll be able to demonstrate the ability to be flexible and deal with a challenging environment.
Business Analyst role requirements
Essentials;
At least 3 years' experience in a Business Analyst role
2 Years of Technical Experience, Object Orientated Programming (OOP)
Knowledge with object oriented language
PowerShell scripting is a huge plus
Ability to read, interpret code (can be jr but prefers someone with 2-4 years of experience programming)
Agile background and environment expertise in enterprise environments - financial client background is a plus since they support the accounting and finance department as well
Problem solver with a leadership mentality
Gathering requirements, working with business and IT to create solutions
Working on Internal applications for the credit union
A great personality, must love teamwork and be willing to get stuck in!
Their working culture is relaxed, supportive and no-nonsense, so if you're looking for a place to feel valued this could be it!
Business Analyst - Agile, OOP, Client Facing - Phoenix, AZ - Must have a software / technical background - Mid to Senior- 100% remote during Covid-19 - plus benefits - Four-month contract to hire
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Roles / Responsibilities:
Data Migration profiles having expertise in (SQL Server, Excel Macros, Stored procedure)
Proficient in basic SQL and understanding of data relationships 5+ years business analyst role in technical projects that require backend/database buildout
Experience with agile project methodology and ability to work in fast pace, abstract environment
Knowledge of agile ceremonies, processes, and the tools to compliment Jira, Confluence, etc.
Strong leadership skills with the ability to work with other Client on work assignments, follow up and review of outcomes.
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
","['excel', 'jira', 'sql']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'sql', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: IT Business Analyst/Scrum Master
Duration: 12+ Months
The BA is responsible for all aspects of requirements management in an Agile project, including working with the Product Owner and other stakeholders to create and refine the Product Backlog for a new system.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Works with project stakeholders and Product Owners to create and maintain the Product Backlog.
Performs feasibility analysis, scopes projects, and works with the project management team to prioritizes deliverables, and negotiate on product functionalities.
Creates detailed Business Requirement Document (BRD) and translate it into functional specifications.
Collaborating with business users to fully surface their requirements; conducting interviews with key project stakeholders, document, and presenting the results.
Provides analytic support by coordinating data extraction from various databases and data interpretation.
Partners with development and analytic teams to provide reporting on software solutions.
Creates UAT testing scenarios with subject matter experts.
Participates in UAT.
Supporting traceability from requirements through to QA; assisting in the definition of test plans and testing strategies and in the creation of test cases.
Required Qualification:
Bachelor's Degree in Business or IT
Required Experience:
3+ years of experience working as a Functional, Data or Business Analyst
3+ years of experience in Access, Excel (Advanced), Visio, and MS Project
3+ years of customer interfacing experience – project oversight, customer presentation
Working knowledge of Agile development and best practices
Preferred Experience:
Experience with DevOps a plus
Required Skills:
Excellent knowledge and understanding
Excellent Communication (written + oral) Skills
Business/Customer facing skills
Ability to work independently and ability to multi task
Experience of SDLC and Agile development methodologies
Preferred Skills:
Experience with any or all of the following highly desirable: MS Dynamics, OnBase, Azure, DevOps and ERP implementations.
","['azur', 'erp', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['azur', 'erp', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Qualifications:
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis or data analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
RY3mCSr0nk
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Provide direction to developers to implement solutions per requirements.
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria.
Conduct user acceptance testing with end users to ensure implemented solution meets expectations.
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability.
30% - Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
20% - Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement.
Identify candidates for test automation, document test flow and data requirements/dependencies, and implement using approved tools.
Required Skills • Windows Server Experience • SDLC - Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience • Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS Experience • Intermediate VSTS Experience • Intermediate STLC Experience • Intermediate .Net Applications, ETL Experience • Intermediate SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016 Experience • Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access) Experience Nice-To-Have Skills • MS Project Experience • SSIS/SSRS Experience • .Net 4 Experience • Experience with Automated testing
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Agile, OOP, Client Facing - Phoenix, AZ - Must have a software / technical background - Mid to Senior- 100% remote during Covid-19 - plus benefits - Four-month contract to hire
The Role
You'll work closely with high profile stakeholders, analysing their requirements objectively for business requirements.
Ideally, you'll have a software engineering / technical background able to come in and support so that you are about to hit the ground running, supporting a broad spectrum of applications languages.
Knowing object-oriented language is going to be key to your personal success on the team.
Teams they support: Accounting, Finance, multiple different applications, focusing on upgrades, enhancements, technical issues, work on the backlog, etc.
This is a truly agile environment with 2 weeks sprints.
You'll be able to demonstrate the ability to be flexible and deal with a challenging environment.
Business Analyst role requirements
Essentials;
At least 3 years' experience in a Business Analyst role
2 Years of Technical Experience, Object Orientated Programming (OOP)
Knowledge with object oriented language
PowerShell scripting is a huge plus
Ability to read, interpret code (can be jr but prefers someone with 2-4 years of experience programming)
Agile background and environment expertise in enterprise environments - financial client background is a plus since they support the accounting and finance department as well
Problem solver with a leadership mentality
Gathering requirements, working with business and IT to create solutions
Working on Internal applications for the credit union
A great personality, must love teamwork and be willing to get stuck in!
Their working culture is relaxed, supportive and no-nonsense, so if you're looking for a place to feel valued this could be it!
Business Analyst - Agile, OOP, Client Facing - Phoenix, AZ - Must have a software / technical background - Mid to Senior- 100% remote during Covid-19 - plus benefits - Four-month contract to hire
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
0YXN47jmww
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Candidate must have prior experience working in a financial institution.
Type: Contract to hire
Phoenix Arizona 85016 (24 St and Camelback)
Position Summary:
The Business Analyst position reports directly to the Application Development Senior Manager and will support the upcoming Commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) Pension Administration System (PAS) implementation efforts.
Under the direction of the PAS Project Manager (PM), the Business Analyst discovers, synthesizes, and analyzes information to elicit business needs, document processes, develop test scenarios and to devise strategies and solutions that will be implemented in the PAS.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Leading business analysis and testing initiatives related to the Pension Administration System (PAS) Project and other assigned projects
Documenting to-be process definitions gathered during work sessions with SMEs and Product Owners
Creating project documentation including to-be process documents, requirements, user stories, test scenarios, test cases, etc.
Providing RFP documentation support as-needed
Providing expert IT project business analysis and advice to project stakeholders
Documenting major policy decisions and any other major project-related decisions made during work sessions
Assessing proposed PAS vendor solutions to determine which fit the business need, identify gaps and shortcomings in solutions and determine necessary workarounds and/or changes to the solutions proposed
Reviewing application designs and system test results
Acting as a liaison between the PAS vendor and subject matter experts
Performing user acceptance test training and coordination
Assisting with creation of test plans, developing test cases, conducting and coordinating business acceptance testing as well as regression testing
Providing other project support and task coordination throughout the project
Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
6+ years of Business Analysis experience required, ideally with a focus in pension and/or retirement related services, banking or financial services
Strong knowledge of pension benefit administration is preferred, including ability to analyze summary plan descriptions and understanding of pension benefit calculations; preferred
Experience with business process flows/procedures, system requirements, user story development, test planning, test case development and test execution; required
Experience working within Agile / Scrum strongly preferred
Knowledge of Project Management practices and/or experience in Project Management strongly preferred
Experience with data analysis required
Excellent MS office skills including Excel, Visio, PowerPoint and MS Project required
Experience with Agile software development planning and tracking tools such as Jira preferred
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'jira']","['regress', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'jira', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"You will partner with Product Managers and other Business Analysts to research, understand, and define how specific product features and improvements should be delivered in a SaaS software development environment.
This role will* document findings into requirements, use cases and / or specifications that will be used for development and testing phases,* provide relevant acceptance test criteria and work closely with Developers and QA to ensure they have correctly interpreted the specifications,* work closely with the Product Managers to monitor and manage the progress of feature deployments,* work with Customer Care and Client services support team members, interacting with internal users to identify root causes for issues.This individual must be a self-starter who has experience working with Agile development teams and is a strong communicator who can work with business stakeholders to understand business needs to align initiatives appropriately into releases.
* Define and maintain the infrastructure for creating workflow orchestrations and data transformations within the connectivity platform* Working API Management and related technologies to allow the creation of and the support of data workflows and transformations to and from Kyriba, third party and customer applications.
* Defining and maintaining the lifecycle of API's in the API Management and developer portal in support of an open development platform.
* Perform research to establish requirements that will best meet client needs* Write detailed specifications for developers to execute* Track all work in JIRA* Execute user acceptance tests of functionality delivered by development teams* Communicate project status regularly to product owner* Track and report status and other metrics against goals on an ongoing basis* Work with remote QA teams to develop testing plans* Ensure completion of operational and technical documentation prior to software release for each application or system* Work flexible hours with teams in multiple countries* Establish and adhere to project management best practicesQualificationsThe successful candidate will have proficiency in many of the areas defined below:* At least 5 years of experience working with data connectivity between third party systems including ERP's, banking development platforms, treasury or finance applications.
* Experience working with data transport methods and protocols (SFTP, HTTP, OAuth and APIs in general) including the administration and management of APIs using development portals.
* Knowledge and experience with the Azure platform and toolsets is highly beneficial.
* Modern ETL techniques using cloud-based tools and connectors.
* Experience working with cloud-based platforms (e.g.
AWS, Azure)* Familiarity with SQL databases and SQL in general.
","['sql', 'aw', 'azur', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud']","['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",999.0,"['sql', 'aw', 'azur', 'erp', 'jira', 'cloud', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Provide direction to developers to implement solutions per requirements.
Execute testing based upon documented test cases/scripts and ensure applications tested meet customer defined business requirements per documented user acceptance criteria.
Conduct user acceptance testing with end users to ensure implemented solution meets expectations.
Document and track software defects as well as issues with performance and usability.
30% - Identify, evaluate, and document business needs and objectives, operational processes and procedures, problems and requirements.
Understand the business case, and gaps in documented business process (as is vs. to be).
Perform requirements elicitation/documentation/management, as well as use case documentation (standard, alternate, and error) to assist developers in creation of solutions to meet business objectives.
Leverage understanding to document meaningful user acceptance criteria for user stories.
Capable of facilitating communication between stakeholders from all levels of the organization while objectively identifying and resolving conflict.
20% - Identify and document processes and procedures related to Business Analysis and Quality Assurance standards, including opportunities for improvement.
Identify candidates for test automation, document test flow and data requirements/dependencies, and implement using approved tools.
Required Skills • Windows Server Experience • SDLC - Agile (Scrum, Kanban) Experience • Intermediate Visual Studio/TFS/VSTS Experience • Intermediate VSTS Experience • Intermediate STLC Experience • Intermediate .Net Applications, ETL Experience • Intermediate SQL Server 2008 R2 & 2016 Experience • Intermediate MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access) Experience Nice-To-Have Skills • MS Project Experience • SSIS/SSRS Experience • .Net 4 Experience • Experience with Automated testing
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'tf', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Position Title: Business Analyst (EDI)
Duration: Full Time
Requirements
Need a BA who is into EDI integration.
Business Analysis-L3 (Mandatory).
As a Business Analyst, you are responsible for interfacing with clients and to gain understanding of requirements/processes through meetings and discussions.
You are responsible across areas like requirement definition, execution and evaluation of functional tests, review, testing and analysis.
You are expected to be a subject matter expert in a chosen area/function.
Minimum work experience:5 - 8 Years
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"RSS Project Business Analyst
Requisition # 10036062-WD
Job Type Day
Tempe, Arizona
Date Posted 07/01/2020
Your potential.
Your opportunity.
Do you want your voice heard and your actions to count?
Project Business Analyst
Job Summary
Collaborating with the Director of RSS Project Shared Services group, and the Business Analyst Center of Excellence, the Project Business Analyst-VP works with partners from the business units and related third parties in support of efforts and projects focused and aligned with Finance Management of the Americas (FMA), Transformation and America’s Risk Management goals and objectives to drive operational efficiencies and scalability, reduce risk, support product implementations, develop and enhance business process management including but not limited to system and technology capabilities, vendor services and tools, data migration and integrity, and project lifecycle support of systems implementations, data solutions, and process redesign and implementation.
Responsibilities
Work with business partners to elicit high-level requirements and collect business needs.
This may include helping to define the business problem and primary objectives of new projects.
Clearly articulate and document business requirements in detail following prescribed project methodology.
Assesses the risks of various solutions and prioritize challenging business demands.
Lead ongoing relationship with business partners to drive satisfaction with operations and technology.
Coordinate project delivery by participating in design reviews and walk-throughs to communicate systems designs and validate proposed solutions.
Obtain key inputs from enterprise architecture teams and identifies solution interdependencies.
Engage with Domain Experts to incorporate usability and user interface needs when designing or purchasing systems.
Proactively resolve customer satisfaction issues.
Participate in and support contract negotiation, maintain relationships, and monitor vendor performance against SLAs.
Develop test plans and scripts, traceability matrices.
Qualifications
Excellent verbal and written communication skills at all levels of the organization.
Demonstrated critical thinking and analytical skills.
Advanced negotiation and interpersonal skills.
Multi-tasking ability and flexibility.
Ability to understand the long-term big picture and short-term perspectives of situations.
A true teammate and collaborator, translating prior knowledge and experience into strong and productive relationships internally and externally.
A respected business partner who adds value to the broader team.
A reputation for integrity, accuracy, consistency, big picture orientation and business acumen.
Excellent time leadership skills.
Demonstrated capability in both Waterfall and Agile methodologies.
Demonstrate a hands-on approach to develop insightful, improved, impactful analytics.
Experience with OFSAA LRM, Profitability, 2052a reporting PeopleSoft GL, Hyperion, Axiom is preferred.
Strong use case, business process mapping and other tools.
Bachelor’s degree in any Finance field required.
Advanced degrees are preferred.
Professional certifications a plus.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed.
They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities duties and skills required of personnel so classified.
A conviction is not an absolute bar to employment.
Factors such as the age of the offense, evidence of rehabilitation, seriousness of violation, and job relatedness are considered in all employment decisions.
Additionally, it's the bank's policy to only inquire into a candidate's criminal history after an offer has been made.
Federal law prohibits banks from employing individuals who have been convicted of, or received a pretrial diversion for, certain offenses.
Job Project Management
Shift Day
Schedule Full Time
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Position : Business Analyst (Financial Domain)
Responsibility:-
Requires a bachelor's degree in business or other equivalent experience.
Minimum 3 years leading and implementing change initiatives preferably within a financial services environment, or equivalent work experience.
Fully capable of handling business line initiatives with minimal support.
Has demonstrated priority setting, problem solving, negotiating, and conflict management skills.
Functional, technical, and operational organization skills required, including the ability to develop strong alliances at all levels within the organization.
Sound oral, interpersonal, and written communication skills.
Sound decision making skills that demonstrate originality, flexibility, and resourcefulness.
Ability to manage multiple priorities and commitments concurrently.
Demonstrated computer skills utilizing applicable PC applications to include Microsoft, Web, and bank related applications.
Stay abreast with industry trends.
The highest level of integrity, customer focus, and partnership is a minimum standard requirement.
Must be a self-starter and can work independently.
Ability to coordinate and direct activities of others
",['microsoft'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
dBxjllT0OW
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you an autonomous self-starter who is inquisitive and pride yourself on
being a true polished professional?
Not afraid to be humble yet a constant
collaborative leader within your space?
If these depict you in a nutshell, plan
on joining an Extremely Stable and Financially Sound Growing Organization!
The Senior Business Analyst Financialwill have an impact in the strategy
and goals of the data-oriented processes within all areas of the business.
Drive strategic plans regarding budgets, investments, and purchases.
Research
and analyze data related to competition, trends, operations, and formulate
targeted plans for future business decisions.
Develop statistical and financial
forecasting to provide the best predictions and potential solutions.
is what is promoted every day.
Their consistent growth, as well as, the loyalty
work.
Work Schedule:Normal work hours Monday through Friday, 8 am to 5 pm with
occasional additional hours and/or Saturdays and Sundays may be necessary.
Position will
determined.
RELOCATING TO PHOENIX in the future as it will be required to eventually work
Therefore,_this_will_NOT_be
near_future.
Background Profile:
MBA or Master of Finance Required
Certified Financial Accountant (CFA) - Preferred
5+ years Financial Business Analyst experience
5+ years experience with financial, product and operations analysis,
which includes statistical analysis and regression models
Advanced problem-solving, predictive modeling experience, and cluster
analysis using modeling tool sets
Expert level proficiency with MS Office, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Advanced SQL experience, including writing SQL queries, conversion,
transformations, and windowing
Proven experience with statistical and financial modeling
Ability to communicate and collaborate with all levels of an organization
including C-Suite
Strong business acumen with ability to multi-task managing multiple
things at one time while meeting timely deadlines
Outstanding customer service skills while maintaining a positive,
friendly attitude are crucial
Compensation & Benefits:
Competitive salary
Pet Insurance
Short/Long Term disability
Tuition Assistance Program
Excellent Training & Regular Performance Reviews
Permanent Resident Status REQUIRED - U.S.
Citizenship or Green Card
C2C/Visa s or Need for Sponsorship will not be considered
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'c']","['regress', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'cluster', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'normal', 'statist']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'c', 'regress', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'cluster', 'financ', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'normal', 'statist']"
BA,"Business Analyst (Retail)
Job Title
Business Analyst (Retail)
Job
ID
27358817
Scottsdale,
AZ
85260
Full-time, direct-hire opportunity with compensation up to $80,000 + Benefits.
You will focus on the continuous delivery of transformational applications to consumer-facing locations while looking to create value for stakeholders and customers.
You will be responsible for the end-to-end product requirement / feature life-cycle process from idea to full implementation.
Also, you will gather, document, and prioritize the needs and requirements of the business users and sponsors to drive continuous innovation and improvement.
Establish functional expertise in specified application(s) and associated business processes.
Conduct analysis activities associated with process definition & design and business operations optimization.
Identify issues and risks and provide alternative courses of action to achieve business and organization goals and objectives.
Conduct impact analysis and recommends follow-through actions and develop product backlog and orders the items to best achieve goals and missions.
Build, develop, and grow relationships with business users, outside business partners and other stakeholders.
In addition, you will describe business requirements to the design and build teams and monitor progress to ensure a complete and on-time build.
You will translate business requirements / features in the form of user stories and discussion with acceptance criteria to the Development, UX/UI and QA teams.
And, develop acceptance criteria for the business requirements and ensure the design and development teams understand items for release.
Collaborate with UX/UI to create innovative user experience designs and review progress, monitoring quality and accepts requirements with Development / QA.
Conduct User Testing to ensure solutions meet the business requirements
And, you will drive the successful introduction of releases into production and deliver references for users by writing and maintaining user documentation.
You work with the Help Desk on supporting new or updated features and with the Training team on the development of materials for training and implementation.
And develop plans for execution and implementation of new processes and communication.
Qualifications & Requirements
Bachelor's Degree Business Administration, Computer Science or a related field
4+ years of experience as a Business Systems Analyst
Experience with customer-facing retail and POS applications
Highly motivated, self-directed, results driven and the ability to perform job functions in an independent manner
Skilled in working with cross-functional teams to affect collaboration, resolution of issues and community building across multiple functions
Problem solving skills including demonstrated ability to analyze issues and to work effectively with cross functional groups to participate in problem solving
Experience with Business Intelligence and Analytics and ability to use SQL for analysis (Plus)
Excellent communication, presentation and interpersonal skills are essential, including the ability to accurately analyze problems, explain solutions, and present technical solutions to end-users in a non-technical manner
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"For more information, please visit www.firstam.com
Job Summary
The Business Analyst works with business departments, drives process improvement through seeking out and identifying opportunities and business process definition by defining and documenting processes and procedures.
This role will support Docutech’s web-based electronic document delivery, signing, eClose and eVault technology platform – Solex.
The Solex team is focused on expanding the usability and feature set of the application as well as designing out the longer-term product roadmap that will see the platform expand to new product offerings.
Preferred Experience:
Experience in mortgage origination, mortgage servicing or mortgage technology preferred
2-5 Years Directly Related Experience in a Business Analyst role
Essential Functions:
Defines business process requirements, researches alternatives, prepares presentations, drives solutions, gains consensus, tests to confirm, and implements solutions for a specific business need.
Analyzes and gathers customer requirements to develop and implement customized solutions and provide alternative solutions.
Provides informal training as part of implementation process.
May provide formal training and support directly to customers.
Working with business partners and SMEs, creates documentation of business processes, training procedures, and standard operating procedures.
Generate and create reports; research and analyze data and report trends to management/ business partners.
Knowledge and Skills/Technology Used
Ability to analyze a situation, interview, formulate questions, and probe for deeper knowledge/ understanding
Data management skills
Has basic knowledge of general business, production, and/or operation environment and general cost benefit awareness
Good written and oral communication skills in order to define parameters to meet business requirements
Presentation skills
Standard MS skill set
Typical Education
Generally requires BS Degree or equivalent work experience
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
The candidate will work remotely during the COVID-19 epidemic.
Summary:
The successful candidate for this position will report to the Business Systems Manager.
You will be responsible for systems analysis and requirements gathering in the implementation of projects that involve applying technology to satisfy business needs.
You will liaise with internal/external stakeholders to analyze, document, communicate and validate business and system requirements for application or platform development.
The ideal candidate would have a keen interest in technology and would love to interact with people to solve business problems and develop cutting-edge applications.
Key Responsibilities:
Collaborate with internal stakeholders, customers and vendors to gather the requirements for development of applications or processes
Document the requirements in the form of user stories and maintain a backlog of system requirements
Assist Project/Program Managers conducting day-to-day team activities to meet deadlines and schedules
Provide technical direction and support to the project teams during design, development, testing and implementation of systems
Perform thorough analysis and documentation of findings and present to management and/or customer
Work with the development team to resolve production issues and performs root cause analysis
REQUIREMENTS:
BS degree
At least 5-8+ years of Business Analysis experience in a SDLC environment
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Experience in Agile and/or Waterfall SDLC methodologies
Experience in configuration management, release management and quality management processes
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills to solve complex business problems
Experience with requirements gathering, elicitation and user story creation
Experience with creating process flow diagrams and activity diagrams is desired
Familiarity with an Agile environment
Knowledge Kanban methodology is a plus
Familiarity with a SQL and .NET environment is a plus
Experience with communicating with clients/end users
Scrum Master Certification, preferred but not required
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Proudly dedicated to serving the federal government.
Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry.
You are:
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for business process and system analysis, design/translating business requirements to technical requirements, testing, troubleshooting, and implementation of components in an enterprise SAP environment.
The SAP Business Analyst will work closely with architects, developers, technical services (i.e.
BASIS, Middleware, Portal) and business analysts to perform business analyst functions and responsibilities .
The SAP Business Analyst is involved in maintenance, enhancement and/or development work of SAP modules and those that interface with other applications.
The SAP Business Analyst has a range of skills and knowledge of the technologies used and applications supported.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide change management and training support.
The SAP Business Analyst is required to participate in pager/on-call support.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide estimates of software development cost and schedule.
The Work:
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members and executives on and across the project team.
Provide SAP application support in a timely manner.
Analyze, design, troubleshooting, and test break/fix requests and enhancements to SAP modules.
Provide change management and training support for SAP enhancements.
Identify, track and resolve issues and risks affecting the SAP application.
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members to gather and interpret functional user/system requirements into system specifications.
Design SAP components to functional and technical programming standards.
Provide support toward installation of application releases into production as directed.
Coordinate and participate in structured peer reviews / walkthroughs.
Create operational documentation.
Perform system, interface, and batch monitoring as required
Meet service commitments for assigned deliverables and proactively provide work status.
Continuously develop industry knowledge and associated skills.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
HBraK3iAJq
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Founded in 1986 and headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts, PCG has over 2,500 professionals in more than 60 offices worldwide.
To learn more, visit httpswww.publicconsultinggroup.comtechnology-consulting Responsibilities bull Serve as business analyst and subject matter expert on project engagements.
bull Identify and recommend client business process improvements.
bull Facilitate and manage software development life cycle activities, such as requirements sessions.
bull Coordinate the user acceptance testing process.
bull Communicate andor translate business challenges to IT and assist in developing solutions.
bull Serve as liaison between various stakeholder groups and other third-party vendors.
bull Create artifacts and formal deliverables relative to project initiatives.
bull Contribute to project work plans, and other formal project management deliverables relative to project initiatives.
bull Prepare other written reports and materials for clients.
bull Identifies, documents, resolves andor escalates issues to the appropriate level.
Qualifications bull Commitment to exceptional client service.
bull Ability to work independently with minimal supervision.
bull Uses sound judgment in completing tasks and to seek guidance when needed.
bull Dedication to accomplishing goals and challenges presented by clients and management.
bull Ability to interact with various levels of management and with clients.
bull Working knowledge of business analysis methodology and software development life cycle.
bull Ability to follow, critically evaluate, and improve upon current processes.
bull Excellent business writing skills and ability to make presentations to various audiences.
bull Strong Microsoft Office applications skills including MS Project, MS Visio, and MS Excel.
All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.
VEVRAA Federal Contractor.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['supervis', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Identify ways to enhance performance management and operational reports related to new business implementation processes
Develop and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Lead problem solving and coordination efforts between various business units
Assist with formulating and updating departmental policies and procedures
Qualifications:
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2-4 years of business process or data analysis experience, preferably in healthcare.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Benefits and Payment Configuration
Compliance Coding/Prepay Compliance (Payment Integrity)
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2+ years of business process analysis, preferably healthcare (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) or claims payment/analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Knowledge of managed care information systems and experience in benefits, pricing, contracting or claims preferred.
Knowledge of provider reimbursement methodologies preferred.
Previous structured testing experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
8Ea7TclDFR
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Job ID 1184294
Category Data Analytics
Schedule Full-time
Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Qualifications:
Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis or data analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Benefits and Payment Configuration
Compliance Coding/Prepay Compliance (Payment Integrity)
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) or claims payment/analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Provider Data
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (documenting business process, gathering requirements) experience in healthcare industry and/or working in a data driven environment.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel, Project, and Visio preferred.
Knowledge of data migration, software enhancement/planning, and Agile preferred.
Member & Provider Solutions
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) experience in healthcare industry and/or customer service or enrollment functions.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Visio preferred.
Knowledge of data integration, software enhancements/planning and Agile preferred.
Experience managing projects with a high reliance on technology preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The scope of responsibilities will include:
Product feature analysis, planning, and execution through the entire product lifecycle.
This would include gathering and prioritizing product requirements, requirement analysis, working with development teams as product owner to lead implementation using agile methodology, and working closely with all the stakeholders to make sure all their business requirements are met.
Effectively collaborate and communicate product road map, project status, and issues to accounting operations, executive management, and other stakeholders as necessary.
Be the liaison between Finance, Product and Business Units and be the primary representative of Finance Technology and Product in the region.
Building and integrating new products in the regions as well as enablement of Finance infrastructure as part of launch in new countries
Occasional travel may be required (estimate at less than 10%)
Basic Qualifications:
BS/BA or higher degree
6-8 years of relevant product management or finance experience including experience in payments, banking, credit union, or other financial systems, preferably knowledgeable with accounting and systems integration of such systems.
Business or systems analyst experience in order to demonstrate the ability to perform data analysis and research within data files and other data sources.
Strong business acumen and ability to work through complex and ambiguous business requirements from finance, tax, treasury, legal, compliance, and regulatory perspective.
Understanding of basic accounting and financial reconciliation including comfort with multi-currency environment is a strong plus.
Strong system and data flow knowledge.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies.
Experience with top tier ERP systems and/or previous SAP experience a strong plus.
Strong communication skills - including ability to listen to the needs of others and comprehend complex matters, articulate issues in a clear and concise manner, and present effectively in both oral and written presentations to all levels in the organization.
Team-oriented approach – can effectively lead a project or participate as an effective team member as well as work cross-functionally with other organizations.
Willingness and ability to work independently, think creatively, and ability to pivot depending on changing priorities and deadlines
Affinity for a high-performance, fast paced and project-oriented work environment
","['erp', 'erp system']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Semiconductor
Managing operations projects for IOTG Vision, Markets & Channels Transportation & Cities, and Segment Teams.
Must have strong MS Office ,SharePoint and communications skills.
Operations and Planning
Manage the team budget to ensure budget targets are met including tracking, assisting with invoicing of Purchase Orders within quarter, and assisting finance to provide spending reports as needed.
Coordinate team Strategic Planning processes to ensure deadlines are met including consolidating documentation.
Processes include LRP, PLAN and POR as well as ad hoc internal strategic projects and initiatives.
May also include consolidating data and presentations into a final report or PowerPoint.
Specific tasks, though not all inclusive, include:
Provide weekly budget updates, update the BTI/Disc tracking sheets
Track and report discretionary through PowerBI and flag over/under spending trends
Consolidate and publish month 1 & 2 budget / Coordinate PLAN/xPOR/LRP with VMC
Ops and create and publish final results.
Track and follow-up on Open Purchase Orders
Provide and update Segments Strategic Objectives / Strategic Objectives measurements
Monitor and close HAT/HC tracking delta's or project assignments
Facilitate workspace planning for cubes and lab space
Attend VMC Cross Ops meetings.
Publish pass downs and action items including key
deadlines (external reqs, POR inputs, etc)
Qualifications
Manage the team master calendar including coordination of meetings, attendees, agenda
and presenters.
Schedule, plan agenda, coordinate guest speakers, minutes, quarterly review/tracker of Sabbatical, Diversity, Training Compliance, Ethics Case Studies.
Communications
Communications and Presentation Development: 5-20 / As required, develop communications for internal team and stakeholders to maintain alignment of programs and progress such as Quarterly Report Outs, Org Announcements, internal and external presentations including keynotes.
Specific tasks, though not all inclusive, include:
Manage SharePoint and Teams sites access, design, audits, etc.
Coordinate the Ops Review with VMC Ops and work with the team to own the content management
Publish Quarterly Status Report
available collaterals, key KPIs)
Compile and publish draft 1H and Year End team summary roll-up
Coordinate overall hiring activities with Admin and team / Manage Segments Intern asks and reqs through central ops.
Minimum Educational Requirement: Bachelors degree in administration, science or engineering or other closely related field.
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'powerbi']","['data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'powerbi', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Business Analyst Job in Scottsdale
Job Ad
At P.F.
The ideal candidate is very analytical and data driven!
This role will work closely with and support various departments including Accounting, HR, FP&A and Marketing with reporting analytics and insights.
Design and build reports and conduct analyses using Workday, Tableau, Excel
Fully engage in Tableau data visualization and dashboard creation
Work closely with partners in other functions, including Marketing, HR, Finance, and IT
Consult with business and technical teams to develop requirements
Collaborate on design decisions and implement enhancements
Collaborates with business partners to prioritize requests/needs
Provide necessary analytics including summaries and recommendations at the appropriate level, in order to make relevant and timely decisions.
Develop reporting solutions to standardize monthly and weekly analytics and reporting needs.
Support ad-hoc analysis as required by leadership and key stakeholders.
Education and Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree required, Business, Analytics or Finance preferred
1-3 years’ analytical experience preferred
Accounting, HR knowledge preferred
Knowledge of Workday Required
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Basic understanding of Workday’s data model
Basic understanding of Tableau Desktop, Tableau Server
Self-motivation and a strong sense of ownership
Excellent problem solving and analytical skills
Driven to achieve successful results
Openness to learning new technology/systems
Able to quickly adjust to changing priorities
Ability to work independently, yet function as an integral part of a dynamic team
Strong organization and project management skills
Solid analytic skills with proven ability to work with data and derive conclusions and implications as well as communicate key findings.
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel and other Microsoft applications
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Identify ways to enhance performance management and operational reports related to new business implementation processes
Develop and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Lead problem solving and coordination efforts between various business units
Assist with formulating and updating departmental policies and procedures
Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2-4 years of business process or data analysis experience, preferably in healthcare.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Benefits and Payment Configuration
Compliance Coding/Prepay Compliance (Payment Integrity)
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2 years of business process analysis, preferably healthcare (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) or claims payment/analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Knowledge of managed care information systems and experience in benefits, pricing, contracting or claims preferred.
Knowledge of provider reimbursement methodologies preferred.
Previous structured testing experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Professional
Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Identify ways to enhance performance management and operational reports related to new business implementation processes
Develop and incorporate organizational best practices into business applications
Lead problem solving and coordination efforts between various business units
Assist with formulating and updating departmental policies and procedures
Education/Experience:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2-4 years of business process or data analysis experience, preferably in healthcare.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Benefits and Payment Configuration
Compliance Coding/Prepay Compliance (Payment Integrity)
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
2+ years of business process analysis, preferably healthcare (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) or claims payment/analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Knowledge of managed care information systems and experience in benefits, pricing, contracting or claims preferred.
Knowledge of provider reimbursement methodologies preferred.
Previous structured testing experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Professional
Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Education/Experience:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis or data analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Senior IT Business Analyst Independent Contractor
Depending on client needs, an engagement period may require a full or part-time commitment.
Summary of Key Responsibilities:
Conducts analysis and design phases of the project
Performs secondary assessment of client needs
Conducts client interviews and document findings
Performs gap analysis
Identifies and documents current and future state analysis, business process designs, and recommendation strategies
Provides input into the development of the project
Presents status and recommendations to the Project Manager
May interface with clients as directed
Documents requirements for software enhancements, testing the enhancements and engaging user acceptance testing
Able to communicate user requirements to IT development and delivery teams
Assist in problem resolution as needed to ensure that the customers receive prompt, efficient service in accordance with project deliverables
Experience in SaaS applications desirable
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree Preferred
Knowledge and Experience
Process Mapping
Business Analysis and Requirements Gathering
Gap Analysis Process Definition / Process Design
IT project development processes
Good Business Acumen
Skills
Presentation Delivery
Recommendation Writing
Clear and Informative Communication
Organizational skills
Interpersonal Skills
Abilities
Ability to balance multiple tasks/priorities independently and consistently meet deadlines
Ability to lead by influence and impact business decisions/processes
Ability to travel between AZ and CA
Ability to travel to and work in multiple client locations
Software Tools
MS Project, MS Project Server and MS Office Suite
",['ms office'],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Professional
Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Education/Experience:
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis or data analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Project management experience preferred.
Benefits and Payment Configuration
Compliance Coding/Prepay Compliance (Payment Integrity)
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) or claims payment/analysis experience.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access preferred.
Provider Data
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (documenting business process, gathering requirements) experience in healthcare industry and/or working in a data driven environment.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel, Project, and Visio preferred.
Knowledge of data migration, software enhancement/planning, and Agile preferred.
Member & Provider Solutions
Bachelors degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (i.e.
documenting business process, gathering requirements) experience in healthcare industry and/or customer service or enrollment functions.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Visio preferred.
Knowledge of data integration, software enhancements/planning and Agile preferred.
Experience managing projects with a high reliance on technology preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Hii All,' Pls Find the JD fOR THE BELOW Profile Product manager Sr.Business Analyst Finance ( Preferrably Banking Sector ) Locations San Jose,CA ,Scottsdale,AZ Global Finance Product (GFP) is responsible for designing, developing, and managing the integration of global products that enable the movement of funds through the PayPal financial systems.
This GFP Finance Product Manager role will focus on integration projects across various PayPal products including Credit Card and Bank Integrations.
Responsibilities bull Work collaboratively with cross-functional teams including product management, finance, engineering, regional business units, and partners to define the reconciliation and financial requirements for issuing and tokenization products.
bull Work with portfolio product managers and partners to understand settlement, clearing, and reconciliation specifications to define the financial accounting and reconciliation capabilities in PayPal payments platform.
bull Work with treasury, accounting, tax, analytics, and other finance subject matter experts to define business processes and rules to automate finance operational processes.
bull Manage entire product development lifecycle including discovery, prioritization, design, development, user acceptance testing, pilot testing, and product launch.
bull Effectively collaborate and communicate product roadmap, project status, and issues to executive management and various stakeholders.
Desired Skills and Experience bull 8 - 10 years of relevant product management experience including experience in payments, banking, credit union, or other financial systems, preferably knowledgeable with accounting and systems integration of such systems.
bull Experience in card issuance andor acquiring at a bank, network, processor or consultancy with focus on settlement, clearing, and reconciliation processes is a plus.
bull Understanding of basic accounting and financial reconciliation including comfort with multi-currency environment is a strong plus.
bull Strong system and data flow knowledge.
Ability to learn and adapt to new product flows and software technologies.
bull Strong work ethic, including the ability to work independently, but also knows how to have fun while doing it!
bull BSBA or higher degree, preferably in computer science or engineering.
MBA desired.
Job Descriptions for Product ManagerBusiness Analyst, Scottsdale, Arizona, USA - 50hour PayPal is seeking a seasoned Product Manager with experience in Payments and Finance domains to join its Finance Analytics Data Services (FADS) organization in Scottsdale, AZ as the International Finance Product Manager within the Global Finance Product (GFP) team.
This specific role will focus on majorly Bank and Credit Card product Integration as well as should have ability to learn and adapt to new product flows, flexible to take up other related product as necessary for enablement of Finance infrastructure as part of PayPalrsquos launch in new countries.
The scope of responsibilities will include Product feature analysis, planning, and execution through the entire product lifecycle.
This would include gathering and prioritizing product requirements, requirement analysis, working with development teams as product owner to lead implementation using agile methodology, and working closely with all the stakeholders to make sure all their business requirements are met.
Effectively collaborate and communicate product road map, project status, and issues to accounting operations, executive management, and other stakeholders as necessary.
Be the liaison between Finance, Product and Business Units and be the primary representative of Finance Technology and Product in the region.
Building and integrating new products in the regions as well as enablement of Finance infrastructure as part of PayPal launch in new countries Occasional travel may be required (estimate at less than 10) Basic Qualifications BSBA or higher degree 6-8 years of relevant product management or finance experience including experience in payments, banking, credit union, or other financial systems, preferably knowledgeable with accounting and systems integration of such systems.
Business or systems analyst experience in order to demonstrate the ability to perform data analysis and research within data files and other data sources.
Strong business acumen and ability to work through complex and ambiguous business requirements from finance, tax, treasury, legal, compliance, and regulatory perspective.
Understanding of basic accounting and financial reconciliation including comfort with multi-currency environment is a strong plus.
Strong system and data flow knowledge.
Ability to learn and adapt to new technologies.
Experience with top tier ERP systems andor previous SAP experience a strong plus.
Strong communication skills - including ability to listen to the needs of others and comprehend complex matters, articulate issues in a clear and concise manner, and present effectively in both oral and written presentations to all levels in the organization.
Team-oriented approach ndash can effectively lead a project or participate as an effective team member as well as work cross-functionally with other organizations.
","['erp', 'erp system']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",2.5,"['erp', 'erp system', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Primary Responsibilities and Activities
Maintain close working relationships with Global Human Resources stakeholders to understand business objectives, anticipate demand, and rapidly respond with working solutions.
Assist in change management and the proactive adoption of the Oracle Cloud platforms through the development of strategic, targeted employee facing communications at all levels of the organization that demonstrate the value to Cloud best practices over current state work processes.
Provide functional and technical support to the corporate HR, benefits and payroll functions to include configurations, security support, system tuning and user management.
Maintain documentation and provide training to end user groups on existing functionality and newly developed enhancements.
Responsible for QA services & regression testing for all applicable Oracle HCM patches and upgrades.
Design, develop, configure and test systems functionality changes, such as but not limited to creating flexfields, modifying fast formulas, building payroll elements and table setup.
Help define testing scenarios and develop test scripts.
","['oracl', 'cloud']","['regress', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['oracl', 'cloud', 'regress', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
nSxHFtYaY9
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
OZktintv21
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"This role is currently 100 remote and WILL switch back to office environment when COVID-19 ramps down must be able to work in office at that time.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Summary
Responsible for analyzing, communicating and validating requirements for changes to business processes, policies and information systems.
Essential Functions
Complete documentation for business requirements that guide application development efforts, working closely with the Development team and Business teams to ensure successful implementation of business requirements
Assist with the development and maintenance of the business requirements process used to define requirements for systems projects, assist with the definition of project scope and create appropriate scope documentation
Work under the guidance of senior team members to provide ongoing support to manage application SLAs, resolve problems and fulfill service requests that do not require application
Work under the guidance of senior team members to support regulatory compliance activities development
Communicate project status and escalates issues
Regular attendance and timeliness are required due to the production-based nature of the business and client requirements
Non-Essential Functions
Provide proactive feedback to management concerning potential problems and recommendations for improvement.
Recommend process improvements for efficiencies and best practices
Perform other duties as assigned
Supervisory Responsibilities/Accountabilities
This position does not have Supervisory Responsibilities/Accountabilities
Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree in Technology, Computer Sciences or related field preferred
One or more years of experience in business analysis of product or software development
Proven abilities to document project risks, requirements and assumptions required
Ability to analyze and develop business scenarios
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite programs, SQL and Sharepoint knowledge
Ability to demonstrate excellent critical thinking, problem solving, balanced judgment and decision making skills
Must be able to prioritize, be organized and pay attention to detail
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Working Conditions
Work is generally performed within an indoor office environment utilizing standard office equipment
PhysicalRequirements
While performing the collection duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk, type, see, and hear while sitting at a computer terminal for extended periods of time.The employee frequently is required to multi-taske.g., talk and type simultaneously.
The typing aspect of the job requires the employee to reach with hands and arms; and use hands and fingers to handle/feel the keys.
The job requires extensive use of keyboards and computers
Position Type/Expected Hours of Work
Some flexibility in hours is allowed, but the employee must be available during the department’s scheduled hours and guidelines, which may include at least one or two evening and/or weekend shifts.
EEO/Veteran/Disabled
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst - Infrastructure
New Jersey, Camden
Job Code
32403
1
Sr. Business Analyst - Infrastructure
Responsibilities:
· Works with business partner to elicit high-level requirements and capture business needs.
· Works closely with team personnel and business partners to identify and maximize opportunities to use information and technology improve product, service and/or program business processes.
· Clearly articulates and documents business requirements.
· Reviews technical documents with IT project staff to ensure business requirements are adequately reflected in technical planning documents.
· Responsible for hardware and software asset management tracking across the enterprise from an end user computing standpoint.
· Analyze discrepancies by providing audit reports; researching discrepancies and recommending adjustments to address and/or capitalize on trends.
· Prepare routine reports and audit around the following areas: Monthly Microsoft patching, Hardware and Software Asset Management, and Contract Management around software licensing, software renewals and hardware leasing.
· Assist with developing communication plans and documentation that is directed towards level 1, level 2 technicians as well end user environment.
· Helps to manage ongoing relationships with business partners and to drive satisfaction within IT.
· Helps to manage ongoing relationships with vendor partners and monitor their performance against SLA’s.
· Reviews and suggests ways to improve the overall business processes.
· Abel to deal with Enterprise wide projects.
· Acts as a mentor to junior business analysts.
· Reviews and suggests ways to improve the overall business processes.
· Creates and executes test scripts.
Requirements:
Experience in Program and Vendor Management
Must be a self-starter, able to work independently and take initiative to find solutions for business requirements.
Strong Analysis and Reporting skills.
(Within Excel – pivot tables; V-Lookups; etc.)
Expertise in Business Planning and Management.
Strong Communication and Presentation skills.
Seasoned in Customer Focus and Relationship Building.
Information and Technology Proficiency.
Outstanding Problem Solving and Decision Making abilities.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"My client in Philadelphia, PA is looking for a Mid Level Business Analyst to join their growing team!
Title: Business Analyst (2-5 years of experience, not a Sr. Business Analyst role
Type: 5 month Contract to Hire
Rate: DOE
The primary objective of the Business Analyst is to translate business strategies and priorities into requirements within a scrum agile process.
The analyst will work with the product manager and stakeholders to identify and document business problems and solutions to ensure team alignment.
Partner with UX architect and product manager to develop scrum ready stories and visual assets.
Finally, the BA will participate in scrum ceremonies to enable the development process.
Essential Duties and responsibilities
Education: Bachelors Degree
Experience: 2-5 Years of business analysis experience working with technology solutions
5+ years working on a customer facing Internet based product
Bachelor of Arts or Science degree required or equivalent of 5 years' experience
2+ years' experience with business analysis and/or working with content and search platforms.
2+ years' experience using agile methodologies to plan, define and build solutions.
Strong analytical skills in measuring opportunities and product performance
Full understanding of content and search platforms
Publishing experience preferred, but not required
Strong written and oral communication skills with the ability to communicate with a variety of audiences (technical and non-technical)
Excellent execution, prioritization, and organization skills
Ability to adjust, respond, and manage a changing list of priorities to meet deadlines
Ability to think strategically while considering tactical implications.
Occasional travel required
If interested please send resumes to jason.weinstein@mondo.com
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Contribute to requirements for processes, tasks and information requirements
Preparation of system requirements statements, test plans and other documentation
Engage with internal and external stakeholders, developing close working relationships enabling the provision of support during the business analysis and user testing process
Lead system testing and develop relevant test and training documentation
Display strong emotional intelligence with well-developed self-awareness.
Problem solving and discretion to self-manage work plans.
Qualifications
Associate / Bachelor’s degree
Possess good oral and written communications skills
Ability to Relocate
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Perform Gap analysis on such.
* Engage with customers on a periodic basis to analyze their usage of the product, determining areas for improvement to inform future feature spec development.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"As the creator of the world's first electronic stock market, its technology powers more than 100 marketplaces in 50 countries, and 1 in 10 of the world's securities transactions.
To learn more, visit: http://www.nasdaq.com
Manages on going contractual relationships and the operational delivery of services to clients for an account or group of accounts.
As a business analyst within the Index and Reference data team, you will be responsible for helping to define the technical requirements for index calculation and analytics services.
This requires a background and training in financial and economic metrics with a strong technical foundation and solid written and verbal communications skills.
The role will operate as part of the development team and interface with subject matter experts to insure clear requirements definition and communications between the business and technology.
Your role and responsibilities
Work with project managers, systems developers, and designers during the requirements and software development process to define and refine deliverables in line with business objectives
Utilize a technology and finance background to facilitate conversations on financial analytics and index generation
Familiarity with infrastructure and services in one or more cloud environments such as AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud a plus
Experience in requirements definition and writing required
Appreciation for systems and application architecture to the degree needed to facilitate conversations and requirements between the business and technology teams
Experience working in Agile and DevOps work environments
Financial Industry experience preferred.
Strong work ethic in a mission-critical 24x7 diverse environment with multiple vendor/customer relationships.
You will need the following skills and experience
Degree in technology or financial (economics, finance) disciplines
4-6 years experience working as a business analyst or product manager in the financial information or metrics space
Strong organizational skills, ability to structure and plan projects and deliverables
Owner mentality - ownership of outcomes and deliverables.
Strong analytical, problem solving and decision making skills.
Ability to identify and manage conflict effectively.
Strong skills in both verbal and written communication.
Ability to function effectively as a member of a team, strong collaboration skills
","['aw', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'cloud']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['aw', 'azur', 'google cloud', 'cloud', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Hi All,
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"The ideal candidate has experience working within the Healthcare Industry, specifically in enrollment.
Business Analyst Responsibilities:
Responsible for EDI file conversion, including the following daily tasks
Identify workable items and separate records based on business processing logic
Review data against a checklist of steps to ensure that records pass validation criteria.
Review failed records with the business to manually manipulate extract data and separate into files
Review failed records and identify root cause / resolution
Work with technical teams to troubleshoot data / file format issues.
Business Analyst Qualifications:
BA/BS Degree in a Business-related field or equivalent experience
Preferred-Understanding of the Enrollment function within the Healthcare industry.
Ability to work and coordinate reporting, process, and analytics for Operations team.
1 - 3 years’ experience in healthcare.
Detail oriented and organized.
Must be able to analyst and focus on data for long periods of time.
Must be able to find error patterns based on business processing logic.
Proficient in Microsoft Applications.
An1
Corp1
",['microsoft'],"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job Profile Summary
CAI is hiring!...
Duties & Responsibilities
Gathering, documenting and tracking business requirements;
Assisting with development and review of system design;
Identifying, tracking and documenting action items;
Assistance and management in the development of use and test cases;
Providing oversight for test cases and monitoring and reviewing of test results;
Monitoring and reporting on testing activities in all project phases;
Facilitate and document project meetings, as needed;
Identify, manage and trace requirements by type throughout the entire project life cycle;
Manage scope, define assumptions, constraints and dependencies for the design and testing of the requirements;
Prepare, review and monitor compliance of all projects;
Prepare, execute, monitor and report on testing activities/status in each testing phase;
Validate post implementation with Requirements Traceability Matrix (RTM) and manage defect identification, tracking and resolution;
Assist in the preparation of training materials
Identify and communicate potential project risks and issues for Department review;
Prepare and post updated documentation; and
Other duties as outlined in the RFP or as necessary to meet the goals and objectives established in this RFP.
Qualifications
Experience/Education Required
Minimum of six (6) years of experience in HHS IT systems procurement planning, implementations and certification
Physical Demands
Ability to safely and successfully perform the essential job functions consistent with the ADA and other federal, state and local standards
Sedentary work that involves sitting or remaining stationary most of the time with occasional need to move around the office to attend meetings, etc.
If you have questions, or would like to speak with a Recruiter directly, send an email to the contact person below and note the job identification number in the subject line.
Ryan McHenry
Senior Technical Recruiter
717-612-3012
Ryan.mchenry@cai.io
www.cai.io
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Candidate must have exceptional organizational skills, ability to understand priorities, require minimal direction, ability to adapt to changing business needs/priorities, ability to work with and manage several cross functional business partners.
· Strong analytical capabilities.
· Excellent MS Office skills to include: Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access and SQL.
· Advanced Excel skills: pivot tables, v look-up
· Strong communication/interpersonal skills (written and verbal) as well as the ability to quickly form meaningful working partnerships.
· Excellent organizational skills and attention to detail.
· Work well under pressure.
Manage multiple priorities, be proactive, and deliver quality results under aggressive deadlines.
· Strong team player.
Proven effectiveness in fast-paced, demanding, client-driven environment.
· 1-3 years experience
Desired Skills
· Ability to report/analyze data using various database interface tools as well as Excel analytics, MS Access and some SQL
· Knowledge of inventory management
· Pharmaceutical / Consumer Products background a plus
· SAP knowledge
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"The Center for Research and Innovation located in Philadelphia, administers research for numerous commercial and grant funded entities.
In addition, ACR CRI conducts research in cardiology, neurology, pediatrics, and other body systems and also has led validation efforts for advancing new software and Artificial Intelligence algorithms.
As aBusiness Analyst at ACR you will be supporting the Center for Research and Innovation project portfolio.
Improve systems/processes by studying current practices and designing modifications.
Prepare process and systems, streamline alternatives and recommendations to stakeholders.
Conduct business process/systems analysis through user story workshops or otherwise.
Document use cases, business/system/functional requirements, requirements traceability matrix and test cases.
Use the SCRUM methodology to document requirements - Epics, Themes, User Stories and Personas.
Verify user stories are delivered per acceptance criteria.
Mockup requirements where necessary to help Developers and business understand the requirements
Document business processes by creating workflow diagrams and flow charts
Plan and oversee SDLC process, release artifacts, release notes and user guides for the product
Develop patterns and concepts within the application which may be re-used for future features
Collaborate with stakeholders, developers and UX/UI designers to perfect the user experience using user-centric wireframes/mocks
Act as a communication bridge between business and IT.
Qualified candidates will possess the following:
Bachelor’s degree in Information systems or related field;
Experience working in Agile environment using SCRUM methodologies;
Competent with Microsoft Project, Visio, and Office software;
Salesforce experience and certifications are a PLUS.
Organizational and analytical skills;
Ability to clearly communicate ideas and solutions;
Ability to clearly communicate ideas and solutions;
Strong oral and written communication skills, including presentation skills;
To learn more about ACR’s rewarding employee experience, culture, and benefits, visit: https://www.acr.org/About-ACR/Work-With-Us
ACR offers a rewarding employee experience: innovative culture, professional growth potential, competitive compensation and an exceptional benefits package, including a defined contribution pension plan, 403(b); generous paid time off package; insurance plans with the leading providers; flexible spending; tuition reimbursement; training opportunities; and wellness reimbursement.
","['microsoft', 'salesforc']","['recommend', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'salesforc', 'recommend', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The candidate will provide technical support on the overall AxiomSL platform development and implementation of regulatory reporting.
This Business Analyst' main responsibilities/duties include but not limited to:
· Work with business users to collect data and information on system performance, and define business requirement documentation.
Evaluate current systems and develop strategic plans.
· Analyze complex business requirements, translate them into functional specifications design, conduct system functional specification analysis with acquired business requirements and expectation, document and maintain/update FSD through the entire development life cycle.
· Perform the strategic implementation and preparation of the regulatory reports to the Federal Reserve on a monthly basis in the Axiom platform.
· Create functional requirements including data sourcing CDEs, GL Account mapping, Interseries Recon reports and Axiom user training manual.
· Develop business validation rules for each reporting line item based on the Axiom conditions and Fed instructions.
· Coordinate and assist IT team members with data extraction, transformation, loading process and develop pseudo logics for coding.
· Coordinate and support User Acceptance Testing (‘UAT’), cooperate with the QA and business users, help to define the test methodology and scripts.
· Employ data querying and analytical techniques to support the understanding of data and creation of management reports and actionable intelligence.
· Prepare testing components and validate the testing results and support risk control.
Identify delivery risks and mitigating actions during dry run and production events as well as escalate data quality issues to the management team.
· Update Issue Log with data quality and data sourcing issues identified during IT development.
· Communicate with the Finance team and Reg reporting group to ensure that all the regulatory reporting requirements are properly addressed on all levels of system.
This Business Analyst position requires the candidate to have at least a bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Business Administration, Management, Finance or related discipline.
Master’s degree is highly preferred.
The candidate must have excellent work experience in enterprise system analysis, business requirement analysis and FSD, Testing Plan and UAT testing, and be proficient with MS Excel, MS Project, VBA and SQL.
Plus effective verbal and written communication skills.
Attn: Steven Huo
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
Flexible Schedule
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
www.jagolink.com
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business analyst and subject matter expertise on project engagements with emphasis on Agile development methods
Facilitate and manage software development lifecycle activities such as requirement gathering sessions
Ability to validate results of SQL queries with end users exploring discrepancies between report results and what is expected
Manage daily project functions and client interactions
Develop query scripts to access data stored in data warehouses, proprietary databases, relational databases or ODBC compliant databases using tools such as Toad, iSQL, and SQL Developer
Assist in the development and generation of reports from data stored in data warehouses, proprietary databases, relational databases or ODBC compliant databases
Ensure correct functionality across all environments, data sets, and business processes
Fully replicate and document found bugs or defects for application staff to review and correct to meet production deadlines
",['sql'],"['end user', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'end user', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"•This data-driven team will identify and execute transformational opportunities to drive organizational efficiency, eliminate waste, and amplify a high-performance culture.
The position will have responsibility for:
•Develop and track goal attainments on a business scorecard
•Identify and report on key performance metrics
•Identify and implement process improvements
•Prepare and present insightful business cases for new initiatives
•Perform ad hoc research and analysis projects
Essential Duties & Responsibilities (other duties may be assigned):
•Gain a deep understanding of the business including key products, SG&A spend areas, and corporate strategy
•Anticipate opportunities and risks in the initiatives and effectively communicate them.
•Work across multiple layers to ensure data and messaging of results are accurate
•Analyze financial and business performance against business metrics and document pertinent highlights that enable management to determine progress against strategic/business plans
•Support and partner with teams in planning, measuring, reporting and improving performance of operations and reducing cost
•Build and maintain sound and reliable business relationships across the organization.
Qualifications
•Undergraduate degree in Finance or Accounting; MBA preferred MBA
•Experience in project management or financial roles, preference accounting, data management and/or F&PA
•Proven project management skills and experience with process evaluation and design preferred.
•Strong skills with Microsoft Excel, Word and PowerPoint.
Preferred:
•High level of self-initiative and the ability to prioritize, respond to work demands in a flexible manner and produce timely, high quality work products.
•Strong financial and accounting acumen with a demonstrated ability to provide insights and guidance.
•Strong interpersonal skills and confidence to interact with all levels of personnel within the organization.
Must possess excellent ability to communicate ideas and analysis effectively to influence business decisions and display confidence and maturity in dealing with all levels of the organization.
•Distinctive problem solving and analysis skills, ability to distill complex and diverse business problems into simple, effective solutions (commercial, operational, organizational)
•Ability to work independently and effectively with prudent judgment and discretion at all times.
•Ability to build reports and analyze large amounts of data.
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']",2.5,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
telVN6hfzi
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"A business analyst is someone who analyses an organization or business domain (real or hypothetical) and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology.
A Business Analyst (BA) participates in the analysis and design efforts for various projects and business processes of low to medium complexity; Establishes a common understanding of the business environment in which a project or solution must be defined, designed, created, deployed, used, and supported; Applies knowledge and facilitative expertise to gather and define requirements
Responsibilities
• Work with business users to understand their business functions and processes in order to help them define project requirement documents.
• Conduct internal walkthroughs with the project team and ensure comprehension.
Ensure requirements are being met as the project team progresses through the software development process.
• Follows documentation and development standards.
• Provide/confirm detailed estimates for assigned work units and provide communications for deviations from estimates.
Proactively works with project managers to ensure appropriate time is allocated to assigned tasks.
• Assist with change management activities supporting production deployment to Developers, Quality Control Analysts, and Environment Management personnel.
• Track and resolve simple to intermediate defects.
• Review and understand detailed business and high-level functional requirements including security and audit.
Participate in design reviews.
• Support test planning and participate in testing reviews.
• Assist in production support activities by determining the nature, impact, and extent of the problem.
• Assist with change management activities supporting production deployment to Developers, Quality Control Analysts, and Environment Management personnel.
Qualifications
• Education: Associates/Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Communications, Business or related area
• Proven ability to be flexible and work hard, both independently and in a team environment with changing priorities
• 0-3 years working as a Business Analyst in a technical environment gathering and documenting requirements for technology projects.
• Application familiarity and/or insurance industry/business knowledge preferred
• Willingness to work outside of normal business hours
• Some experience working with the project team following a software development lifecycle preferred; Exposure to Agile a plus.
• Excellent English oral / written communication skills
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'normal']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'normal']"
BA,"About TherapyNotes
TherapyNotes is the national leader in web-based behavioral health practice management and electronic health records software for private practices, psychologists, therapists, counselors, social workers and psychiatrists.
The software as a service solution integrates patient scheduling, medical records, billing and electronic claims to streamline the way mental health professionals manage their practice.
The Business Analyst (BA) works with appropriate departmental stakeholders and staff to understand business priorities and translate business requirements into technical specifications for the development team.
Responsibilities
Gather input from internal stakeholders and customers, defining user stories and acceptance criteria, coordinating project efforts across multiple development and business teams, and conducting user and competitor research
Work with business stakeholders and external customers to gather business requirements for future development projects
Ensure that the software development team has complete and accurate technical specifications so they can deliver timely, high quality product releases
Collaborate with technical leads to deliver complete and accurate technical specifications to the development team
Collaborate with UX designers to create screen mock-ups and workflows
Participate in backlog grooming, team retrospectives, and other Agile ceremonies and team meetings
Coordinate with product management to triage, plan, and prioritize feature requests, bugs/defects, and other development items reported by TherapyNotes customers
Willingness to perform other duties as required, and maintain an enthusiastic can do attitude
Requirements
5+ years of professional experience (technical and/or healthcare related experience is preferred)
3+ years experience performing software systems business analysis in an Agile development environment (preferably in a healthcare software setting)
Proven analytical and problem solving skills including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer and internal business needs, and translate same into well-defined, actionable planning and development projects
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with the ability to articulate complex design and functionality concepts to business stakeholders, external customers, and technical personnel such as software developers and quality assurance engineers
Expertise in creating user stories and acceptance criteria
Experience with Balsamiq and/or any other UI/UX mock-up tools
Proficiency in Jira, Confluence, and/or other collaboration software systems
Strong plus: understanding of healthcare and medical billing language/jargon (e.g: electronic claims, electronic remittance advice, ePrescribe, patient responsibility, HIPAA)
Strong plus: experience managing and mentoring other business analysts
Strong plus: PMP certification and/or significant experience managing Agile software projects
Benefits
TherapyNotes offers careers that provide you with the freedom to do amazing work, interact with great people, and offer fantastic learning and growth opportunities.
If you are looking to join a supportive team, use your leadership experience, and build great products, please submit your application.
Perks and Benefits
Competitive salary
Comp time and flexible work hours
Full health, life, disability, and dental insurance
Personal development/training budget
Open, collaborative work environment
TherapyNotes, LLC is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer.
All candidates whom have been given a conditional offer of employment with TherapyNotes, LLC must also undergo a criminal background check.
","['excel', 'jira']","['research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Position Overview
Responsibilities
Effectively gather requirements through the use of live sessions and tools
Professionally develop requirements and high-level system design documentation
Create, document, and execute system test plans / procedures / scripts
Diagram solutions in visual/diagram format, break down business needs/tasks into viable features and requirements, then communicate with developers to design applications
Involved with the Business Requirements Assessment, Design, Build Consulting, Migration/Test Consulting, and Training
Provide business expertise to customers and internal teams
Work with the development team to ensure understanding of business requirements
Support business development efforts
Development of statements of work, cost estimates and schedules
Requirements
Bachelors degree from a four year college or university or equivalent work experience
3 - 5 years of business analysis including development of business functional requirements, high-level design specifications, system test plans, and related documentation.
Experience in translating between business and technical requirements with the ability to articulate needs to ensure the defined solution is on target for stakeholders
Capacity to think creatively to provide solutions to various challenges and problems as they present themselves
Strong interpersonal, client interface skills with demonstrated success working with customers
Must possess excellent oral and written communication skills and problem-solving abilities
Well-developed organizational skills; detail-oriented, highly motivated and self-starter skills
Ability to work on multiple projects simultaneously
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite products: Word, Visio, PowerPoint, Access, Excel, Project
Proven capacity to excel in a fast-paced, multi-faceted, team environment
Desired Skills (not required to be considered for the position)
Experience in Accounting or related financial field
Exposure to any of the following technologies is a plus; ASP, ASP.Net, VB Script, JavaScript, Java, and JSP as well as distributed technologies
System design experience
FileNet or other ECM (EMC/Documentum, etc.)
is a plus
Experience with workflow based applications
Experience in Business Process Management and/or Records Management is a plus
Software-as-a-service (SAAS) and/or Cloud industry experience a plus
Full life cycle software development in a large enterprise utilizing n-tier architecture
","['java', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'javascript', 'cloud']","['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'visual']",1.0,"['java', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'javascript', 'cloud', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'visual']"
BA,"You will be required to work directly with users to collect system specifications and then work with a development team to incorporate those specifications into existing systems.
The ideal candidate will have:
1-3 years of professional experience as a business analyst or CRM admin or a recent college graduate with a degree in information technology or computer science.
Degrees in similar analytical areas of study will also be considered.
Experience with Microsoft Dynamics CRM or Salesforce is preferred.
Working knowledge of SQL Server or academic study of SQL is preferred.
Good communication skills and the ability to work as part of a team are essential.
Experience in the Financial Services or Insurance industries is a plus.
Key job responsibilities include:
Maintenance and updates of existing Microsoft Dynamics CRM system
Creation and maintenance of CRM reports
Working with users to collect system specifications and solve any system issues
Documentation of business processes
User training and assistance
Job Type: Full-time
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
No weekends
www.coventry.com
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"BTS strives to provide these functions in a holistic manner including helpdesk support, system connectivity, and operational support.
BTS is constantly growing and expanding to meet the changing demands of one of the most successful insurance organizations in the world.
Responsibilities
This position will work and consult with various teams and key business stakeholders to gather business requirements to bridge the needs of the business with the use of a web-based claim application.
This includes determining client and organizational needs, system and operational requirements, downstream system impacts and legal compliance obligations.
Key Accountabilities:
Works with end users and internal staff to develop and translate business requirements for project deliverables Guidewire Suite
Answers developer and end user questions through the development life cycle
Completes functional testing on assigned projects and defects
Establish and maintain positive customer relationships to manage priority and expectations of their overall issues and deliverables
Clarifies and escalates issue gaps through the change control process
Provides end-user training, product presentations and feature demo's
Suggests improvements in processes used for requirements gathering, design specifications, and software implementations
Assume responsibility for identifying, documenting and maintaining functional requirements and perform testing activities within the construct of Agile development methodology
Manage project scope definition and drive requirements gathering by conducting meetings and teleconferences with key stakeholders.
Provide recommendations to improve the business processes/workflows through system efficiencies
Creates and maintains System Documentation such as upgrade guides and other release documentation
Manage post implementation business requirements for maintenance and enhancement requests
Willingness to travel - 10%
Qualifications
Minimum Qualifications (Education/Experience/Certification/Skills):
3-7 years Business Analyst/P&C/functional experience
3-7 years Business Analyst/WC/functional experience (strongly preferred)
An understanding of data modeling and analysis
Must have demonstrated the capability of meeting the key accountabilities, or have the ability to learn/perform them
Software Development Life Cycle experience
Bachelor's degree with emphasis in related field or equivalent experience
Excellent problem solving and analytical skills
Strong interpersonal and communication skills, both oral and written
Agile methodology preferred
Guidewire Insurance Suite (Policy, Claims or BillingCenter)
Working Conditions and Physical Requirements Application Systems/Administrative Roles (The conditions described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job, with or without accommodations):
Ability to sit at a desk and work on a computer for extended periods of time
May occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.
Vision abilities required by this job include close vision and ability to adjust focus.
Responsibilities This position will work and consult with various teams and key business stakeholders to gather business requirements to bridge the needs of the business with the use of a web-based claim application.
This includes determining client and organizational needs, system and operational requirements, downstream system impacts and legal compliance obligations.
Key Accountabilities: - Works with end users and internal staff to develop and translate business requirements for project deliverables Guidewire Suite - Answers developer and end user questions through the development life cycle - Completes functional testing on assigned projects and defects - Establish and maintain positive customer relationships to manage priority and expectations of their overall issues and deliverables - Clarifies and escalates issue gaps through the change control process - Provides end-user training, product presentations and feature demo's - Suggests improvements in processes used for requirements gathering, design specifications, and software implementations - Assume responsibility for identifying, documenting and maintaining functional requirements and perform testing activities within the construct of Agile development methodology - Manage project scope definition and drive requirements gathering by conducting meetings and teleconferences with key stakeholders.
- Provide recommendations to improve the business processes/workflows through system efficiencies - Creates and maintains System Documentation such as upgrade guides and other release documentation - Manage post implementation business requirements for maintenance and enhancement requests - Willingness to travel - 10%
","['excel', 'c']","['data', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'c', 'data', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Position: 6+ Months (Contract)
Rate: $Open
Requirements
Responsibilities:
Manage client's priorities of projects and requests.
Knowledge of business analysis, quality assurance, and workflow tools and/or practices
Knowledge of business case development and presentation
Proficient with Microsoft Office Tools such as Word, Visio and PowerPoint
High Level Business Objective, Business Requirements Document, Functional Requirements Document and Technical Requirements Document
Benefits
","['powerpoint', 'microsoft']",['busi'],999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
12+ month Contract Position in Philadelphia, PA
Skill Requirements:
Experience gathering software requirements
Experience writing functional and technical specifications
Experience creating test plans and test cases
Experience leading meetings, coordinating deliverables, and resolving issues
Experience interfacing with databases and writing SQL statements
Proven experience interfacing with customers and development teams
Able to translate complex information into common terms
Strong organization, facilitation and administration skills
Strong written and oral communications skills including presentation skills
Strong problem-solving skills and organizational/data management skills
Strong ability to understand, analyze and solve business problems
Strong computer skills with proficiency in MS Office and MS Visio
Must be a self-starter, able to work independently and take initiative to find solutions
Excels in building relationships with the business users, Retailers and partner organizations
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"King of Prussia, Pennsylvania
Skills : Business Analysis,Must be from Healthcare Industry
The main function of a business systems analyst is to analyze science, engineering, business and all other data processing problems for application to electronic data processing systems.
A typical business systems analyst is responsible for analyzing user requirements, procedures and problems to automate or improve existing systems and review computer system capabilities, workflow and scheduling limitations.
Job Responsibilities:
Gather requirements from business units and translate those to programmers and developers.
Confer with clients regarding the nature of the information processing or computation needs.
Prepare cost-benefit and return-on-investment analyses to aid in decisions on system implementation.
Interview or survey workers, observe job performance or perform the job to determine what information is processed and how it is processed.
Must have Experience in Healthcare Inndustry
10-15% Travel InvolvedBusiness Analysis,Must be from Healthcare Industry
",[None],"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Entry level
Professional
Type of job
Full-time
Area of Expertise
IT/Cyber
Your job
Open job details
Published on 06/24/2020
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Philadelphia, Pennsylvania
Skills : agile,ETL,MySQL,MSAccess
Important Note: Looking for talented candidates who do not require sponsorship now or in near future for employment visa status.
Job Details:
Elicit and decompose project objectives and solutions into epics, features, and user stories and continually mature the backlog against the visionary themes and strategies, focusing on value-driven delivery.
Prioritize the backlog to drive iterative content, using MOSCOW and other ranking techniques.
Develop feature/user story maps and feature delivery plans, in collaboration with the system architect.
Memorialize deliverables in appropriate requirements, flows, and design and architecture materials.
Lead refinement sessions with the team to document detailed user stories.
Collaborates with other teams to prioritize features and stories with external dependencies
Proactively communicate and collaborate with product managers, stakeholders, scrum team, systems team, to analyze information and functional requirements, advocate the development process through to implementation, and ensure the delivered product meets business needs
Act as a user proxy with an intimate knowledge of related user workflows and needs.
Perform acceptance testing for user stories and features
Required Skills:
3+ years’ experience as a product owner, systems analyst or business analyst
3+ years working in an Agile environment (Kanban, SAFE, Scrum)
Experience with Software delivery tools ( CA/Rally, Confluence)
Experience working with Batch ETL’s and MS Access, MySQL data solutions
Technical proficiency with APIs, JavaScript, messaging architectures and frameworks, and web solution patterns is a plus
Technical Proficiency in Understanding & troubleshooting complex IT Networking is a plus
Experience with CRM platforms (Salesforce) is a plus
Experience with implementing/supporting solutions in the AWS cloud platform is a plus
Industry experience in Underwriting/Pricing/Rating/Finance is a plus
Benefits:
Top industry pay
Excellent growth and advancement opportunities
agile,ETL,MySQL,MSAccess
","['excel', 'salesforc', 'mysql', 'aw', 'javascript', 'cloud']","['etl', 'financ', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'sql', 'aw', 'javascript', 'cloud', 'etl', 'financ', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you keen at understanding customer needs and then taking clear action to address those needs?
Successful candidates possess a can-do attitude, as well as a strong set of technical, communicative, and interpersonal skills.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.
",[None],['commun'],999.0,['commun']
BA,"Position Purpose
This individual will be responsible for defining new supplier capabilities required to support new products and services, identifying suppliers who can meet these requirements and help to develop contract language to support these relationships.This role offers the opportunity to learn how to manage supplier relationships.
Initially, this role will focus on strategic sourcing initiatives followed by assignments in pricing, planning, inventory management and accounting.This opportunity is designed for cross-organizational/cross-functional exposureto enable hands-on contributions and learning beneficial to long term career development.
Primary responsibilities:
Project Management
·Support and execute sourcing projects as submitted by Sales to ensure timely and complete project execution
Effectively gather project requirements from Sales and obtain pricing from qualified sources of supply
Clearly communicate timelines and project status to Sales, NPD and directly to customers as needed, effectively managing expectations
Sourcing Strategies
Analytical support, execution, and analysis of complex packaging sourcing projects
Work with Sales, Quality, NPD and Supply Chain to qualify new sources of supply
Routinely aid in the development and implementation of regional buying strategies
Cost Management
Identify areas of opportunity for cost reduction
Monitor and manage PAF increase along with other cost issues
Monitor and manage rebate programs with suppliers
Manage product costs with a focus on reducing total landed cost
Supplier Management and Development
Routinely meet with current suppliers to bring new and improved product solutions forward
Effectively manage supplier performance and drive continuous improvement
Aid in developing new suppliers as improved performance and/ or alternative solutions are required
Routinely meet with suppliers and drive process solutions that will improve performance throughout the supply chain
Maintain Supplier Capability matrix for the region
Contract Management
Maintain contract database
Minimum Requirements
Education and Experience
B.S./A.
in Economics, Business Administration,Accounting or Finance
Recent internship or entry level corporate experience a plus but not required
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Highly effective and efficient organizational skills
Proficiency with Microsoft Office 365 (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook) and intranet/internet
Knowledgeable in CRM systems and Project Management systems
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Strong verbal and written communication skills with the ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization
Excellent presentation skills
Ability to address issues and deploy effective problem-solving techniques that address root cause
Collaborative decision-maker with the ability identify and scope an issue, collect data and consider all alternatives that will allow the organization to quickly implements appropriate actions
Possess a winning attitude, team-player with a strong sense of ethics, honesty, integrity, and commitment to excellence
Excellent interpersonal skills
Comfortable stepping outside of “comfort zone,” with a willingness to step up and own challenging and complex problems
Displays intellectual curiosity and a passion to grow; always looking to learn more and improve skills
Responsive to internal and external customers and displays a sense of urgency
Equal Opportunity Employer:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, national origin, gender, age, religion, disability, sexual orientation, veteran status or marital status.
*Management retains the discretion to add to or change the duties of the position at any time.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Title
Business Analyst
29-Jun-2020
The Insurance Operations
This allows for the development of an overarching sales strategy through which the specialty risk appetite and product offerings can be profitably optimized and expanded.
The Opportunity
Future focused and always one step ahead
The Business Analyst is a self-starting role that will support a portfolio of change management initiatives across the various business units within the organization.
As the link between business functions and IT, these individuals will be accountable for evaluating and understanding existing processes to provide solutions that ensure realization of business value.
In this position you will:
Manage business partner expectations by leading the analysis of business and IT requirements across the organization's value chain.
Evaluate information and data gathered from multiple sources, identify impacts and decompose high-level information into details.
Facilitate business model design sessions with SMEs and document existing and future procedures, systems, and workflows.
Work with product owners to drive the alignment, assessment, and prioritization of identified demands within the respective business change.
Collaborate with Product Owner to define and manage project scope, anticipating issues while proactively recommending solutions.
Work with business and technical partners to design digital flow for application implementations.
Document business requirements / user stories and support population and curation of the platform backlog.
Prepare release notes, help test functionality including development of test cases for UAT and business training.
Support business platform questions and issues as well as raise system bugs and work with technical teams to resolve.
Requisition Number
3935BR
Qualifications
Qualifications:
Successful candidates will possess the following experience/skills/capabilities:
Bachelor's degree
5+ years experience in Business Process and IT Systems Analysis including requirements definition
Strong attention to detail with the ability to provide data-driven recommendations
Able to manage their time successfully to deliver the desired outcome without heavy oversight
Excellent written & oral communication, presentation, and stakeholder management skills
Experience in meeting operational deadlines in a fast-paced environment and capable of working independently or in teams
Knowledge of insurance policy administration, policy lifecycles, and workflows a plus
Experience writing user stories and working within an agile operating model
Expertise in a variety of Business Analyst methodologies, tools, and techniques.
State
Pennsylvania
Employment Type
Full Time
City
Philadelphia
Country
United States of America
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst I
Type: Contract
The Contractor position in Sales Strategy & Insights group will be a key role within National Sales & Operations' (NSO), and responsible for fostering an insight driven sales culture through analyses and tools that support channel strategy and drive a best in class customer & employee experience.
The ideal candidate will combine their knowledge of data driven sales mechanics, complex data architecture environments, high impact performance reporting, and analyses to demonstrate the ROI on all key sales enablement initiatives.
Continuous analyses and insights on program performance as well as development of decision-making tools will drive innovation and enhancements.
This position offers the opportunity to work closely with a variety of cross functional teams within the Sales organization as well as with Marketing, product, and Enterprise Business Intelligence (EBI).
Required Skills:
Generally, requires 3-5 years of experience in advanced analytics, information systems implementation, data-driven sales & marketing, and/or statistical modeling/forecasting, applied research methods.
Strategic thinker, with a demonstrable understanding of marketing & sales mechanics.
Critical thinker who is able to define approaches to solving a business problem, understand the data and validate the findings.
Ability to turn insights into powerful visualizations using tools such as Tableau.
Strong technical acumen and experience.
Proven track record of turning data into insights.
Demonstrated ability in handling and navigating large and complex data sets and databases.
Experience with SQL, Oracle, relational databases, and other access and storage technologies (Hadoop, etc.).
Outside the box thinking with a proactive approach to problem solving.
Understanding of advanced analytic techniques, BI tools, and data visualization software (IBM Cognos and Tableau preferred).
Base knowledge of financial applications such as Essbase.
Knowledge of the net promoter system (NPS) a plus.
Experience with Tableau and AWS a plus.
Strong project management, communication, and strategic thinking skills.
65601-1
","['cogno', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'net', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'oracl']","['data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['cogno', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'net', 'aw', 'hadoop', 'oracl', 'data', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"* Learn and understand existing systems and business processes; develop andmaintain a robust awareness of how the business operations work and helpstakeholders explore technology possibilities to more effectively execute in theirroles.
* Elicit, analyze, and document business and functional requirements from endusers to achieve their desired results for system features or process changes.
* Assist with identifying, modeling, and implementing future-state business systemprocesses to align with functionality of the new LIMS software.
* Facilitate and participate in design brainstorming sessions with development andBI resources to determine how the future-state should function from a systemperspective, while ensuring the design brings maximum value to the businessgiven known constraints.
* Analyze and develop interim and future-state business system processdocumentation that articulates exactly what changes are required.
* Help business stakeholders envision the future and how their work will need tochange to support the future.
Work in partnership with stakeholders to improvethe business processes impacted by the technology changes.
* Approach problem solving and system design from end user experienceperspective, using user-centered design principles and encouraging intuitive andstreamlined UIs/workflows when possible.
* Assist with functional requirements specification using system analysis techniquesand methods.
* Assist with creation of test plans and detailed test cases to validate that functionalrequirements are met.
When appropriate, lead user acceptance testing (UAT)efforts to ensure the software implementation meets the needs of business endusers.
* Assist with systems integration design to deliver maximum efficiency and businessvalue, while considering information flow and data requirements.
* Lead teams of users through support meetings, reviewing key points of concernsand escalating where necessary.
* Review and validate deliverables with appropriate business and technologystakeholders.
* Train end users to ensure they understand all process and procedural changes.Collaborate with training staff to create appropriate training materials and and deliverthe training.
* Post-implementation, evaluate progress made against the business objectives forthe project to show the extent to which they were fulfilled.
Suggest follow-upprojects and initiatives as needed to fully realize the intended objectives.
* Works on routine assignments per written procedures, where ability to recognizedeviation from accepted practice is required.Qualifications* 4 to 8 years of relevant experience or equivalent* Bachelors' degree or equivalent experience* 4 to 8 years of experience performing business analysis and supporting major business applications.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Digital Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ month contract
Job Details:
Must haves:
Digital Marketing background
Business Analysis
Jira/Confluence
Adobe (AEM, Target, Campaign, etc)
KEY ACCOUNTABILITIES:
Stakeholder Analysis and Change: Identifies partners from all areas of the business, and actively builds and manages relationships according to individual partner needs and levels of influence
Business Analysis Planning: Selects the appropriate analysis approach to a piece of work
Business Needs Identification: Engages with the business at an early stage to assess and define business needs.
Drives reuse of existing capabilities over new / enhanced development.
Identifies capability gaps.
Solution Evaluation: Analyses capability gaps and proposes solutions aligned with digital strategy.
Articulates supporting reasoning
REQUIRED SKILLS & EXPERIENCE
Requirements management specifically with Agile Methodology e.g.
BDD using JIRA
Multi-channel digital marketing platforms (web CMS, mail, social)
Pharmaceutical business domain knowledge is desirable but not essential
Proven experience of successfully deploying a variety of business analysis tools/techniques to enable business change
Experience of virtual collaboration to lead, shape and develop innovative solutions
Strong interpersonal skills: Presentation, Communication, Facilitation, Influencing
",['jira'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"The position is based out of PA.
Candidate must be local to Philadelphia or agree to move to Philly once offer is made.
Payer experience will be highly preferred.
Payer experience will be highly preferred.
The Business Systems Analyst role on the BTS - Data Warehouse team requires experience in creating Business Requirement Documents, Functional Requirement Documents and Mapping documents for the development of ETL applications.
This role requires extensive SQL experience in writing complex queries across multiple tables, data analysis and profiling skills for the creation of the mapping documents and further discussion with data modelers for the necessary table designs.
The ideal candidate should have all the above skills at expert level along with strong verbal and written communication skills to work with various stakeholders, gather and formulate business requirements and translate the same to the technical team.
Candidate with prior healthcare and data warehousing experience are preferred.
The Business Systems Analyst role will also be required to support testing and production releases.
This may include weekend and off hours support.
Candidate must be local and available for a face-face interview.
Extensive experience in multiple and diverse environments and applications.
Knowledge and experience in all major functions, issues, and considerations of the subject matter.
Resource has played a leadership role in establishing standards, policies strategy and best practice.
Ability to discuss industry and marketplace trends and directions and site relevant case studies.
Resource has had an influence on wide or high-impact decisions and initiatives and has a theoretical background and understanding of the subject matter.
Capable of managing diverse and complex suite of projects simultaneously.
Experience managing cross-functional projects/project teams.
",['sql'],"['data warehousing', 'data', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['sql', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Ideal candidates must possess a solid understanding of the technology and platforms available in the P&C Insurance industry, specifically billing systems, knowledge of the insurance vertical and its rating and policy administration solutions.
Must be skilled in working within a business group to understand and interpret workflow and business rules.
Effective oral & written communication skills are essential, position will entail drafting process design, business rule, and requirements documents.
Must be able to plan and direct analysis of complex business problems to be solved with automated systems.
Primary duties include:
Identify and analyze client’s business functions in order to develop clearly defined requirements for billing systems.
Document use cases, process flows, data flows and report mock-ups
Consulting with clients, business unit management, systems analysts and programmers on the business needs and objectives and to design and develop automated business systems to fulfill those needs
Writing and maintains functional specifications for new or modified business systems as well as tracking and documenting changes to those specifications
Developing, coordinating, and implementing plans to test business and functional processes during system development and quality assurance testing
Creating or assists others in the writing of user documentation, instructions, and procedures
Preparing time and cost estimates for completing projects
Other Duties as Assigned
Minimum Requirements:
Experience using Microsoft products: Windows, Office Suite (Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Outlook)
Experience using standard project and business tools including Microsoft Project, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, SharePoint
Excellent problem-solving and analytical skills
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Understands communication channels and escalates appropriately
Bachelor’s degree (B.
A.)
from four-year college or university; or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience
5+ years as an IT Business Analyst Property & Casualty insurance industry
Experience with property and casualty billing systems is required
Independent, self-motivated
Ability to Travel
Insurance Certification, i.e.
CPCU a Plus
DRC is seeking candidates from the Philadelphia Area.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"About ConcertAI
ConcertAI is the leading provider of precision oncology solutions for biopharma and healthcare, leveraging the largest collection of research-grade Real-world Data and the only broadly deployed oncology-specific AI solutions.
ConcertAI has emerged as one of the highest growth technology companies in Real-world Data and AI, backed by industry leading private equity companies: SymphonyAI, Declaration Partners, Maverick Ventures, and Alliance|Bernstein.
Role Summary
They manage projects of diverse scope and complexity and serve as the liaison between business, analytics, technology and external clients.
Responsibilities
Analysis of business processes, assessment of the scope and impact of the business needs, identification and documentation of functional requirements and tracking deliverables against the production schedule
Manage and oversee the support and enhancement of several key data sets and systems distributing the data
Provide support regarding documentation, research, analytics and Quality Assurance
Work with the project management team to prioritize deliverables, and negotiate on product functionalities
Create detailed Business Requirement Document (BRD) and translate it into functional specifications
Provide analytic support by coordinating data extraction from various databases and data interpretation
Participate in Integration Testing and User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and Functionality Testing
Requirements
Experience in managing projects utilizing standard project management disciplines and tools, and proficient knowledge of Excel
Strong interpersonal skills and self-motivation
Ability to maintain a high level of professionalism and autonomy along with a project management style that promotes progress through teamwork in a collaborative environment
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
BA/BS in Technology, Business or related field
Learn More About ConcertAI
ConcertAI is transforming how healthcare is delivered and dedicated to improving patient outcomes in oncology by offering innovative solutions on how data and intelligence is used to solve healthcare problems.
Learn more about ConcertAI at www.concertai.com or on LinkedIn .
",['excel'],"['busi', 'research', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'busi', 'research', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Serves as a liaison between the business community and the IT organization in order to provide technical solutions to meet user needs.
Possesses expertise in the business unit(s) they support, as well as, an understanding of the IT organizations systems and capabilities.
Analyzes business partners operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions.
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications.
Educates the IT organization on the direction of the business.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
Possesses an understanding of technological trends and uses this knowledge to bring solutions to business units supported to enhance the enterprises competitive edge.
May make recommendations for buy versus build decision.
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business Administration, or other related field.
Or equivalent work experience.
Typically has 3 - 6 years of relevant technical or business work experience.AN
AN1
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Minimum Requirements:
Education - Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics, Management or closely related field
Knowledge - Knowledge of basic accounting principles and proficiency in Microsoft Office, particularly Excel, required (knowledge of pivot tables, formula building, etc.)
Skills - Self-starter, highly motivated and detail-oriented.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including the ability to translate complex analysis to all levels of the organization in a simple fashion
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience - 1 to 2 years related experience.
Tableau and data visualization experience
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
finance or business analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
Job Title: Business Analyst - SQL
Salary Range: $55k-$70k
Requirements: SQL
The ideal candidate will have SQL experience professionally or in a college environment as well.
1.
Great benefits package!
2.
3.
Tons of growth potential!
What You Will Be Doing
In addition, you will assist in the maintenance and development of system reports, data updates, user administration, and workflows.
- Maintenance and updates of existing CRM/SalesForce system
- Creation and maintenance of Salesforce reports
- Documentation of business processes
What You Need for this Position
Must-have skills:
1) 1-3 years of professional experience as a business analyst or CRM admin or a recent college graduate with a degree in information technology or computer science.
Degrees in similar analytical areas of study will also be considered.
Plus skills to have:
1) Experience with Microsoft Dynamics CRM or Salesforce is preferred.
2) Working knowledge of SQL Server or academic study of SQL is preferred.
3) Salesforce Admin Certification is a plus.
4) Experience in the Financial Services or Insurance industries is a plus.
What's In It for You
For your hard work and dedication, you will be rewarded with a competitive base salary ($55k-$70k) and benefits package including but not limited to:- Health/dental/vision
- Life insurance
- FSA/HSA- Matching 401k
- Generous PTO
- Training
- Many more!
-
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['data', 'information technology', 'busi']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Operations Business Analyst.
Fulltime Role
Should have experience on FI Trade Processing, Client Trade Processing and IMPACT.
Overview
Also support implementation and migration planning with data analysis
Key roles and responsibilities:
Supporting the sign off and adoption of those requirements within an agile development framework
Data and process analysis and mapping to identify improvement opportunities and proposed solutions both strategic and tactical
Definition of test cases and scenarios as well as supporting test execution
Running project meetings and ensure risks and issues are effectively escalated and monitored: Creation of status reports, to assist in communicating updates to management, is also required.
Demonstrate a strong Control and Risk awareness to identify, escalate, control and mitigate
Process Reengineering - Definition of future state business process to ensure consistency and gain maximum benefit from technology deliveries.
Skills Required
4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services
Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning theClient IMPACTapplication in business analyst or project management role
Experience of Fixed Income products and processes including settlement and regulatory reporting in the North American market
Knowledge ofBNYM Repo Edgeand other collateralize lending applications a plus
Proven Business analysis skill set: Requirement definition, Business Process Mapping BPMN 2.0, Problem solving, data analysis
Experience working within an Agile development lifecycle
Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups
Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills
Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment.
in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required
Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome
Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using various desktop and project management tools such as Microsoft Project, PitchPro, Excel
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst II may also have some supervisory and leadership responsibilities within the Enterprise Execution Team.
Principal Duties Transform the business and IT by rapidly delivering the best designed solutions as prioritized by the companyrsquos strategic and productivity goals Organizes and plans the best approach to the business need and guides the business and IT in achieving the best solution including management of complex projects with multiple points of integration and risks Conceptually engineer solutions in a variety of systems, platforms and tools ndash choosing the right option for the problem by balancing complexities, risks, speed-to-market and other factors Brings depth of mortgage subject matter expertise, technical knowledge and analytical skills to all tasks and projects Compiles complex situations, problems, systems and solutions into clear communication and materials for a variety of audiences and levels across the executive, technical, and business teams Enterprise analysis activities ndash major contributor in project review and prioritization process ndash providing key insight to possible solutions, downstream impacts, risks, and level-of-effort cost Leads the analysis and documentation on the business need impacts other systems and processes and plansorganizes work for others Performs complex data collection and analysis needed to compile cost-benefit analysis as part of the project rationalization Leader in writing use cases, specifications, business requirements and test conditions along with needed process flows and works with the stakeholders to reach approval Performs hands-on development efforts using rapid application development (citizen developer) frameworks for prototype, testing or production use Own and manage large pipeline of complex projects while maintaining rapid pace of deliverables and solutions Research and gain insight into regulatory changes and requirements that impact the business Education and Experience Requirements Bachelorrsquos degree or equivalent preferred 4+ years of combined experience in mortgage or IT supporting mortgage originations Knowledge, Skill and Ability Requirements Understanding and proven experience applying knowledge of downstream and upstream impacts and risks (such as regulatorycompliance concerns, capital marketspooling considerations) in a mortgage origination business Able to quickly learn, access complex problems and conceptualize solutions to be deployed through technology or process improvements Creative problem-solver who combines analytical skills with technical proficiencies to deliver quality results Driven and self-motivated, must be able to provide large output working independently as well as part of team Performs well in a fast paced team environment and managedrive multiple requests to successful completion in a prompt and professional manner while communicating issuestatus to appropriate stakeholders Skilled in using Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), utilizing portions from both Waterfall and Agile methodologies Proven track record of delivering complex projects and documentsrequestschanges combined with the ability to be proactive in identifying opportunities for the process and systems changes along with requirements traceability Proven ability to effectively leadmanagedrive requirementrequest meetings, across various business units, with no management oversight needed Proven ability to clearly articulate, effectively author and present complex requirement documents, including the benefit analysis, both verbally and written Ability to act as effective leader betweenamong business departments, senior management and ITconsultantstechnology Ability to manageparticipatelead user acceptance testing and provide training on the new featureprocess Ability to multi-task and adapt to shifting priorities, demands and tight timelines using analytical and problem-solving skills Proven ability in authoring and analyzing lsquoProcess Flowrsquo diagrams ndash knowledge and experience working in Blue Works is a plus Enjoy learning and working in a challengingchanging environment
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"This role provides business analysis and support on third party applications, such as STARLiMS, Microsoft Dynamics GP and CRM, and Microsoft SQL reporting services.
","['microsoft', 'sql']",['busi'],999.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
AML Oversight Business Analyst / Project Manager responsible for writing and managing business requirements for large Technology releases and small enhancement (SI) releases.
Schedule walkthroughs, prepare audit ready documentation and obtain functional lead approval for Technology Scoping Items (SI) and Major release BRDs.
Management of a Release SharePoint containing audit ready documentation.
Review global BRDs and engage with operations and other functional teams to determine impact to NAM Cards
Manage BRD developments meetings and provide status updates
Partner with the AML Global team on all regular Global enhancement releases with development of business requirements
To become over time an SME on KYC platform functionality and related requirements
Network and build strong effective relationships with key partners including Technology (Compliance Tech and GCT), Global AML PMO, Global AML, Operations, Compliance, IA and CRS/Brands Risk teams
Build solid cross-functional relationships
Must be a strong values driven leader and a collaborative team member able to engage associates from all levels of the organization
Must take initiative and have a ability to influence to drive deliverables to meet milestone dates
Qualifications:
5+ years doing at least one of the following: Project Management, Risk, Operational Risk, Risk Operations or Business Analyst
Ability to develop technical Business requirements based on guidance from Technology and Business subject matter experts
Some Project Management experience with multiple stakeholders and functional areas within and outside the Cards Business
Ability to plan & work independently on required deliverables and deadlines
Demonstrated ability to manage and plan in a transitioning environment (developing & establishing business as usual)
Able to communicate both conversationally and via presentation clearly the information and actions needed by management at multiple levels
Ability to influence to reach consensus across multiple teams with different points of view
A good understanding of the Credit Card product and the backend systems that support the product life cycle
Ability to understand difficult technology solutions and concepts and be able to explain to Senior Management in a concise but thorough way
Bachelor's Degree in related field; advanced degree preferred
Strong knowledge of Share point and MS Office including Visio and Project a MUST
Working knowledge of SAS, SQL, Client Quality Center a plus
Nunzio Belfiore
Senior Recruiter
646-668-4341
nbelfiore@tsrconsulting.com
","['ms office', 'sql', 'sa']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'sa', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"THE ROLE
The ideal candidate will possess:
Bachelor’s degree
Microsoft Access/Word/Excel skills
Ability to impact operations and effect change without being confrontational
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive
Extremely organized and resourceful with strong time management skills
Proficiencies in analysis, teamwork and process improvement
The person who secures this role will:
Be responsible for supporting the Corporate Manager’s oversight and operational functions
Determine operational objectives by studying business functions, gathering information and evaluating output requirements
Construct workflow charts and diagrams, study systems capabilities and recommend operational efficiencies
Recommend controls by identifying problems and writing improved procedures
Define project requirements by identifying milestones, phases and elements; forming project teams
Monitor project process by tracking activity, resolving problems and recommending actions
Understand and communicate the financial and operational impact to any changes
Be involved in payment processing for suppliers in various currencies
Participate in financial account reconciliations and transaction monitoring
Record the financial transactions in bookkeeping software, spreadsheets or databases
Maintain source documentation for all journal entries recorded
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Technical Business Analyst
OVERVIEW:
The Business Analyst will be responsible for connecting the dots between the needs and goals of all stakeholders, troubleshooting, and interfacing between internal clients and developers, translating for each group as necessary.
This individual is responsible for the documentation of requirements as defined by the business users and client stakeholders.
ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Understand services (micro/web/API) and good at documenting technical requirements attention to detail to do some swim lane flow/sequence diagram.
Write and update swagger documentation for REST web services
Interacting with business users, lead engineers’ architects, and making sure to capture the requirements.
Facilitate the collaborative process of gathering and assessing architectural significant requirements, constraints, and trade-off analysis to inform solution architectures and serve as an expert in the technical field of knowledge.
Serve as a resource and knowledge expert to Applications Development Manager in the project areas
Must be a strong technical leader, an independent, critical and analytic thinker, have excellent communication skills and rapidly adapt to changing business and customer demands
SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor’s Degree or Equivalent Field of Study
Work experience in an environment that’s done services (micro/web/API) that will separate the BA from others.
Experience in writing and updating swagger documentation for REST web services
SQL experience would be a bonus
Someone who has worked hard core with engineering teams in the past (not just commercial off the shelf/configuring applications)
Familiarity using Excel, Visio, PowerPoint, etc.
EEO STATEMENT:
Any decision affecting employment, compensation, promotion, or transfer will be based solely on personal qualifications and merit, regardless of sex, race, color, religion, gender identity, sexual orientation, marital status, national origin, disability, age, results of genetic testing, service in the military, pregnancy, childbirth or other related medical conditions or any other factor protected under applicable law.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql']","['sequenc', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'sql', 'sequenc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"They are currently seeking an IT Project Manager/ Business Analyst to support the clients Business Intelligence/ Visualization business area.
Individuals filling this role are expected to be capable of leading one or more projects within the corporate environment.
Will include collaboration and integration other application, infrastructure, and project teams, and will be delivered through internal and external IT resources, including outsource vendor partners.
This is a contract with the option to hire.
Responsibilities
Lead projects which often require cross-functional resources, vendor resources, outsourcing partners, and integration and interaction with business key users and project sponsors.
Create and track project plan, ensuring adherence to project management quality standards.
Responsible for assigning individual responsibilities, identifying appropriate resources as needed, and developing a schedule to ensure timely completion of the project.
Support the gathering of business requirements
Provide support for the development of testing use cases
Provide strong facilitation and communication skills to help drive project progress.
Follow up with project team members to ensure key activities are being performed.
Identify approaches to address project gaps.
Step in where necessary and support the completion of project activities.
Conduct regular project meetings, documenting status of project including technical, schedule and financial issues that may be present.
Identify and document key support activities that may be required post implementation.
Assist and review all startup and planning documents.
Manage the scope, risks, issues, deliverables, and schedule of individual project tasks.
Manage (e.g., tracks, updates, reviews) the dashboard and executive reports using metric data.
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree (or equivalent experience) in a technical, quantitative, or business discipline
3+ years' Corporate Project Management including Agile Methodologies experience
Business Intelligence/ Visualization knowledge and implementation experience required
Strong knowledge and understanding of IT processes
Strong Analytical background and capable of gather business requirements from end user and technical team.
Strong written and verbal communications skills (English)
Strong interpersonal and networking skills
Experience in managing external vendor relationships
Experience in managing outsourced vendor partners
Strong MS Project, MS-Office, including SharePoint, Outlook, PowerPoint, Word, and Excel skills
Strict attention to detail
Communication, listening and interpersonal skills (English, oral & written)
Flexibility - adaptation to the changing needs and priorities in the work environment
Work under pressure
Ability to identify, analyze, organize and solve issues and problems in a timely and effective manner
Team approach / cooperation - work with others, and through others to meet goals, accomplish work, and resolve problems
Customer service oriented - understand and anticipate the needs of users
Effectively deal with change and resistance to change
Strong work ethic ability to foster trusting relationships, demonstrate a sense of responsibility in job performance, show commitment to quality of work, exhibit discipline and dedication to complete work, and display a sense of teamwork and respect, enabling collaboration to meet goals
Experience with JIRA
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'jira']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'jira', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Role: Operations Business Analyst
Duration : Full time/Long term contract
Key roles and responsibilities:
Supporting the sign off and adoption of those requirements within an agile development framework
Data and process analysis and mapping to identify improvement opportunities and proposed solutions both strategic and tactical
Definition of test cases and scenarios as well as supporting test execution
Running project meetings and ensure risks and issues are effectively escalated and monitored: Creation of status reports, to assist in communicating updates to management, is also required.
Demonstrate a strong Control and Risk awareness to identify, escalate, control and mitigate
Process Reengineering - Definition of future state business process to ensure consistency and gain maximum benefit from technology deliveries.
Skills Required
4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services
Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning the Client IMPACT application in business analyst or project management role
Experience of Fixed Income products and processes including settlement and regulatory reporting in the North American market
Knowledge of BNYM Repo Edge and other collateralize lending applications a plus
Proven Business analysis skill set: Requirement definition, Business Process Mapping BPMN 2.0, Problem solving, data analysis
Experience working within an Agile development lifecycle
Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups
Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills
Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment.
in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required
Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome
Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using various desktop and project management tools such as Microsoft Project, PitchPro, Excel
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The ideal candidate has a Healthcare background and excellent communication skills.
Exposure to both Agile and Waterfall methodologies is a plus.
This role would be supporting the Middle Office.
Experience with medical management, pharmacy management, or network management is preferred.
This role could touch on IT, Finance, Accounting, Operations, and Legal
Business Analyst Required Skills:
Ability to take initiative / Self-Motivator
Advanced facilitator who can work with Sr.
Leadership
5-7 years of proven experience
Ability to quickly adapt to changing project landscape
Requirement Elicitation
Skillset to foster elicitation from varying business areas/stakeholders
Ability to ask questions while analyzing business/system needs to produce requirements
Ability to adapt technique as situation dictates
Need to have experience leading JAD sessions, personal interviews, use-case/scenario creation
Thorough knowledge of the SDLC
Communication
Ability to communicate at all levels of a business organization - oral & written
In addition to the expected documentation, candidate needs to have experience with providing a breakdown of detail concisely whether it’s to a core team or management
Ability to translate information to differing stakeholders
Demonstrate how they handle competing priorities and maintain tight deadlines
Demonstrated ability to be a team-player
Business Analyst Preferred Skills:
Background in Finance, Actuarial, or Billing
Demonstrated Leadership Ability
Mentor Experience In/Out of work
Healthcare and enrollment experience
Corp1
",['excel'],"['financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.?
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.?
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.Manage and motivate teams of professionals with diverse skills and backgrounds.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Maintain long-term client relationships and networks.
Cultivate business development opportunities.Full time employment, Monday - Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am - 5:30 pm.MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:Bachelor's degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Conducts various types of research and analysis to support the business operations to an internal business segment, division, group or line of business.
Assists management to resolve business issues in an effective and productive manner.
Designs, documents and re-engineers business processes and publishes business metric results.
Mortgage Business Analyst/AIVA Trainer
You will work alongside other business analysts and report directly to the product manager.
To succeed in this role you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to non-technical users.
GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
Evaluates business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Stays up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Performs requirements analysis.
Document and communicate the results of your efforts.
Gathers critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Ensures solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Performs user acceptance testing.
Manages projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
Updates implementing and maintaining procedures.
EDUCATIONAL GUIDELINES
A Bachelor's degree or equivalent combinations of education, training and work experience.
GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES
An understanding of mortgages and mortgage documents is required
Strong Mortgage processing or loan closings background preferred
Knowledge of general business operations, operations, and structure analysis principles
Excellence in standard office software, such as MS Office (Excel, Outlook, etc.
), Visio, etc
Excellent documentation, planning, organizational, and time management skills
The ability to influence stakeholders & work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions
A track record of following through on commitments
Excellent verbal and written communication skills to audiences of various levels in the organization and at client organizations (e.g., executive, management, individual contributors)
Willingly shares relevant knowledge and expertise to other resources
Excellent analytical, conceptual, decision-making, problem-solving, interpersonal, team, customer service, negotiation, conflict management and time management skills
Ability to estimate work effort for project sub-plans or small projects and ensure the project is successfully completed
Ability to work independently while delivering high-quality work and meeting planned deadlines
Is resourceful and proactive in gathering information, sharing ideas, and suggesting new solutions both internally and to clients (as applicable)
JOB FAMILY LEVEL
Entry-level role.
Basic skills with moderate level of proficiency.
Has general understanding of principles in business analysis and process modeling.
Generally performs single-function tasks that tend to be of small to moderate size and scope.
Works under close to moderate supervision with limited latitude for independent judgment.
Consults with senior peers on non-complex projects to learn through experience.
Typically requires one-to-three years of experience in an analytical and/or problem-solving role.
","['ms office', 'excel']","['supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Summary
Duties and Responsibilities
Gather, document, and present to appropriate constituencies the models and process strategies that will drive the effective use of enterprise technology.
Facilitate communication and interaction between the business and IT.
Understand business requirements and translate them into specific software requirements.
Evaluate proposed application projects including evaluating, analyzing, interpreting, and reporting the functional and economic aspects of such projects.
Coordinate assessment of current and future enterprise systems with IT and, if appropriate, coordinate development of new business requirements.
Work with constituencies to analyze and redesign processes to streamline transaction processing and align processes and transactions to support strategic decision making.
Design and execute the test scripts and test scenarios.
Provide oversight of and responsibility for testing related improvements to Enterprise Systems.
Ensure application product knowledge and documentation remains current and in-depth with all appropriate business users to enable the successful use of the tools.
Evaluate the types of analysis that will inform strategic decision-making at multiple levels of responsibility, including the senior management, department managers, and corporate IT.
Collaborate with PMO team to continuously improve project management, business analysis, and quality assurance processes and standards.
Fill project manager and quality assurance roles on smaller projects as required.
Other duties as assigned.
Education and Experience
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, or related field from an accredited college or university.
3+ years of experience as Business Analyst on complex projects
5+ years business experience
Specialized Knowledge and Skills
Proven ability to analyze and document complex business processes and recommended solution options.
Team experience including working closely with business professionals as well as technical resources and acting as a bridge between two groups including liaison with vendors.
Experience in developing creative solutions to technology challenges.
Ability to make effective decisions under pressure and work in a fast-paced environment.
Solid technical background with understanding and / or hands-on experience in software development life cycle and web technologies.
Ability to facilitate requirements meetings.
Strong documentation skills (eg requirements, test scripts, project status, management presentations, etc.)
Ability to interface with senior managers / business / technology professionals.
Microsoft Office proficient Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Independent worker who takes initiative to identify and react to new opportunities and projects.
Excellent client-facing and internal communication skills.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Solid organizational skills including attention to detail and multi-tasking skills.
Preferred Experience with the following:
Healthcare claims data
Configuring and implementing enterprise applications such as ERP (SAP, Dynamics) CRM (SalesForce.com), Document Management / Collaboration (SharePoint), and Business Intelligence (SSRS, Tableau)
Microsoft Visio and Microsoft Project
Data conversion and systems testing
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'erp']","['data', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'erp', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"PurposeFunction The Junior Process Engineer - IT is a core member of an agiledevelopment team.
The Junior Process Engineer communicates with business stakeholders, developers, QAUAT testers, and project managersscrum masters.
Leads requirement definition and analysis of initiatives utilizing operational excellence best practices and will be responsible for the implementation of change, from initiation through to planning and execution.
Works with business partners to refinegroomcreate features andor stories that can be developed and delivered.
Primary Duties Responsibilities Drive and facilitate requirements definition for prioritized work efforts by collecting information, performing analysis, and defining business requirements via user stories and business acceptance criteria.
Responsible for understanding the business and making recommendations for improvement.
(40) Owns the translation of the business vision into language that can be consumed by development resources.
(35) Acts as a contact for questions on currentfuturepast work for business and IT resources.
(15) Assists in the planning, execution, and analysis of user acceptance testing.
Demonstrated experience capturing business requirements, defining business acceptance criteria, and interfacing with IT development teams.
Knowledge of mortgage insurance life cycle is a plus.
Knowledge and experience with both agile and waterfall development methodologies is preferred.
Knowledge and experience creating mock-ups, wireframes or prototypes is a plus.
Demonstrated process mapping, data analysis, and facilitation experience is required.
Skills and Abilities Ability to elicit and document the ""what "" and ""why "" of a business request, separately from the ""how "" Ability to elicit and document current and future state business and technical process flows Ability to provide best practice feedback on UI functionalitydesign Ability to break a problem down into smaller chunks that can be delivered separately (i.e features and stories) Comfortable with continuous discovery and analyzing work in increments, rather than all at once up front Strong collaborator Ability to articulate ideas to both technical and non-technical addressees Excellent communications skills written, verbal, group presentations Strong facilitation and presentation skills Flexibility to partner with and negotiate with various personality types at all levels within and outside the organization Ability to drive end-to-end process walkthroughs to baseline processes and identify changes impacts Comfortable operating in an environment with a considerable amount of ambiguity Experience in developing wireframes andor prototypes to obtain customer feedback Experience working with developers to implement visually appealing designs Experience with sharepoint is a plus
",['excel'],"['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Gather business information & document for process improvement.
Analyze, define, & interpret bus needs & issues by documenting & validating business & technology requirements.
Provide data analysis & reports.
Identify test scenarios & create test cases for successful implementation of projects.
Interact directly with clients.
Travel/relocation to various unanticipated locations throughout U.S. for long & short term assignments at client sites.
Requires Bachelors or foreign equivalent in Computer Science, Engineering (any), Business Administration, Management (any), or related.
Will also accept 2 years experience in job offered or as a Computer Software Professional in lieu of Bachelors.
EOE
recblid jeg6snd51j2zeqdjxy5pxh0yoqwp8g
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Very competitive hourly compensation provided.
Looking for only local consultants.
Collaborate with Solution Design team to write Swagger specifications for REST APIs in YAML, which is a contract between systems describing every detail of the API endpoints and operations for each endpoint, operation parameters input and output for each operation, error codes descriptions authentication methods, etc.
Write API payloads in JSON, which is a sample of transmitted data used to illustrate the communication (expected request response) between front end and back end systems.
Analyze third party XML API specifications using SOAP UI tool.
Create back end user stories in Jira (or appropriate tool in use) that include API Payloads including request and response body, Error codes messages, Implementation details, Acceptance Criteria, Sequence diagrams, End points, Requirements check list.
Create front end user stories in Jira (or appropriate tool in use) that include User Interface (UI) Design, Product Requirements, Business Rules, API interactions with UI design, API system integration descriptions, Handling Error codes, Acceptance Criteria, End points, Requirements check list.
Groom front end and back end user stories in Jira (or appropriate tool in use), resulting in detail so clear that engineers can develop with ease.
As required, capture the test data requirements to support unit and in sprint quality assurance testing, and create test data Jira tickets.
Provide end-to-end test plan, identifying functionality that is available for testing based on development sprint schedule.
Display expertise in knowledge of Xfinity Mobile functionality, systems architecture and systems integration.
Consistent exercise of independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance Regular, consistent and punctual attendance.
Must be able to work nights and weekends, variable schedule(s) as necessary.
Strong understanding of Ecommerce platform and ability to provide options to meet business requirements and hurdles based on platforms capabilities Flexibility to handle project scopes changes preferred Other duties and responsibilities as assigned.
Skills Define and document system specification artifacts that include, User stories traceability to requirements API interactions documentation with user interface System APIs Digital Workflows Use Cases Data Mapping Definitions Sequence Diagrams Call Flows Work with users to develop acceptance criteria for the systemapplication.
Mentor developers on how things work in the business domain.
Assume the role of ldquoProduct Ownersrdquo Wear different hats designer, tester, facilitator, product owner, etc Create a shared understanding of what the product is supposed to do.
Education Level Bachelorrsquos degree or Equivalent Field of Study Certifications (CBAP, PMP) Years of Experience Generally, requires 5-7 years related experience
",['jira'],"['sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['jira', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job DescriptionYou will serve as a critical member of the team as the Sr. Business Analyst where you will be responsible for leading all analytical work that will inform and drive strategic decisions critical to the relaunch and growth of a business channel.
You will assess pricing, conduct competitive and market analysis, identify insights throughout the customer journey, develop key performance indicators, track leading data attributes and create ongoing reports providing data as well as recommendations to senior management on opportunities to continue to improve results and the customer experience.
Additionally, you will support the development of new partnerships or programs and conduct ad hoc analysis.
* Partnerships, programs and new products: Provide analysis needed to support Sales strategies and make data-based decisions.
* Sales/Marketing: Partner with Marketing, Sales Operations and IT to identify key insights and behavioral trends throughout the customer journey that link lead generation/Sales efforts to business results.
* Market assessment: Conduct assessments of market dynamics, consumer insights and competitive activity to inform and drive sales/marketing strategies, product position and strategic partnership selection.KPI's and Financials* KPI's: Identify and visualize key indicators that influence profitability highlighting opportunities to eliminate fallout along the digital journey ultimately resulting in increased sales and reduced costs per unit.
* Financials: Provide key data, forecasts and monthly reports necessary to drive decision-making and continuous improvements.
Partner with Finance to provide key metrics necessary for P&L's and forecasts.Data* Customer and other data: Work with Sales Operations, Marketing and IT to develop business requirements and support technology solutions needed to store and mine key data attributes.
Develop business requirements for key reporting and analysis.
* You have at least 5+ years of hands-on working experience in analytics or data science interacting with cross-functional business partners to understand and address business needs.
* You have a strong database skills and experience with data visualization tools preferred.
* You have strong database skills, particularly with SQL.
* You have prior experience working on a Direct to Consumer business in Financial Services is preferred.
* You have exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking with the ability to source, distill and analyze large amounts of data to draw meaningful conclusions and strategic implications.
* You have advanced skills in Excel and Access.
* Rest and Relaxation.
* Health Benefits.
Multiple medical plan choices, including HSA and FSA options, dental, and vision.
* Prepare for your Future.
)* Paid Parental Leave.
An opportunity for all new parents to embrace this exciting change.
* Employee Assistance and Discount Programs.
* Pet Insurance.
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be responsible to review, analyze, document and evaluate business systems and user needs.
Elicit and document business requirements for the proposed system.
Map workflows and data dependencies of existing legacy systems
Identify gaps between legacy systems and the proposed system requirements/specification.
Translate and simplify requirements.
Requirements analysis and verification
Assist solution provider with business and use case development/verification.
Assist quality assurance with test case development and/or review test cases for accuracy, completeness and relevance.
Review and provide technical, constructive feedback of technical documents provided by the solution provider and city resources.
Participate in Detailed Design Review sessions.
Participate in project management meetings.
Report to technical Project Manager.
Bachelor’s Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience
Microsoft Access and/or SQL experience strongly preferred
Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills
Understanding of systems engineering concepts
The ability to conduct and produce cost/benefit analysis
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive
Ability to work independently and with others
","['microsoft', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"* PENDING PGCB APPROVALResponsibilitiesCore Service StandardsCLEAN: Must make the property shine and look impeccable while maintaining a neat CLEAN and crisp personal appearanceSAFE: Must make guests feel SAFE and comfortable through creating a worry free, carefree experience.Fast: Provide FAST and efficient service with accuracy.
Meet service time requirements and anticipate guest needs.FRIENDLY: Greet each guest with FRIENDLY welcomes, making eye contact and smiling.
Use H.E.A.R.T.
steps to ease guest concerns.
Say thank you to departing guests.FUN: Work passionately as a team to create a FUN experience both for everyone who works and plays hereSpecific Responsibilities and Duties* Performs analysis on marketing programs and initiatives.
* Assist in the development of the annual budget and the preparation of monthly financial and operational reports.
* Acts as an integral part of the financial/strategic planning team by providing analytical expertise and consulting support to operating departments and upper management.
* Develops and implements analytical tools and processes and analyzes operational performance data to identify trends.
* Performs other duties as assigned.QualificationsJob Requirements (skills, knowledge, and abilities)* Must be 18 years of age or older* Good writing and communication skills, able to comfortably communicate at all levels of the organization* Ability to clearly communicate complex ideas to co-worker and internal clients.
* Must be technically skilled and have and have experience using data analysis tools such as Microsoft Office products including Excel, Word, and Access.
* Must be able to quickly learn other software* Must be able to obtain and maintain the job required license determined by the State Gaming Agency.Educational Requirements* Bachelor's degree in Accounting, Finance, business, Economics, Marketing, or Mathematics or technical field and strong analytical and communication skills required.
* You will work in an smoking environment.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'clean', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'clean', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
fTiyutZrve
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This Analyst is desired to have a financial/accounting background with a hard working attitude.
Possesses expertise in the business unit(s) they support, as well as, an understanding of the IT organization’s systems and capabilities.
Analyzes business partner’s operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions.
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.
-Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications.
Educates the IT organization on the direction of the business.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
-Possesses an understanding of technological trends and uses this knowledge to bring solutions to business units supported to enhance the enterprise’s competitive edge.
May make recommendations for buy versus build decision.
-Basic Accounting knowledge -Strong Excel skills- Pivots, VLookups, tables, MACROS -Ability to update database files and communicating with a variety of people throughout the organization -They need to have strong communication skills, and be hard working -Responsible for reporting and business/financial analytical responsibilities About Tech USA: Tech USA is a comprehensive provider of staffing and workforce solutions throughout the Infrastructure and Information Technology Industries, including Education, Healthcare, Financial, Government, Engineering, and Cyber Security.
Tech USA is an equal opportunity employer.
",['excel'],"['analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Duration: 9+ months
Responsibilities:
Meet with clients to analyze their individual needs, determine priorities, provide estimates and determine project scope.
Manage project scope, schedule and quality.
Lead requirements gathering sessions; investigate, document and analyze key client organizational processes.
Identify needs and develop customized solutions.
Maintain an effective client follow-up system to ensure clients are contacted in regards to project progress and overall satisfaction.
Coordinate and execute client training.
Perform and organize ongoing support for customers such as report building, data quality, new integrations, etc.
Contribute to the development of a strategic customer roadmap.
Requirements:
Related university degree or college diploma required and/or an acceptable equivalent of education and experience.
Ideally 2-3 years of Business Analyst experience which includes:
High energy, creativity, resourcefulness and entrepreneurial spirit
Ability to absorb technical information and convey the same information into non-technical terms to the customers
JIRA experience needed
The software platform leverages Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence to make sure the right people end up in the right job.
The Group reported 2018 global revenues of EUR 13.2 billion.
",['jira'],"['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills.
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"SUMMARY
The IT Business Analyst will have an important role in the development and support of critical lease processing systems.
The successful applicant will need to bring a good balance of analytical and problem-solving skills to the team.
PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES
• Analysis and Solution Definition:
• Understands the business issues and data challenges of client's organization/industry.
• Identifies client organization's strengths/weaknesses and suggests changes.
• Reviews requirements, specifications, processes related to proposed solution.
• Has the ability to understand business processes and relate them to automation
• Develops functional specifications and system design specifications for projects.
• Technical Recommendation and Testing:
• Leads testing efforts.
• Develops test scripts and conducts testing
• Ensures issues are identified, tracked, reported on and resolved in a timely manner.
• Works with client personnel to identify required changes.
• Communicates needed changes to the development team.
• Project Execution:
• Assists in enforcement of project deadlines and schedules.
• Takes input from supervisor and appropriately applies comments/feedback.
• Communicates and applies project standards.
• Communication:
• Assists in the facilitation of team and client meetings.
• Delivers informative, well-organized presentations.
• Understands how to communicate difficult/sensitive information tactfully.
• Technical Understanding:
• Aptitude to learn new platform and configuration tools
• Provides support to LEAF applications and maintains the relevant knowledge base
• Works with software vendors to leverage outside support & services as needed.
• Problem Solving:
• Pushes creative thinking beyond the boundaries of existing practices/mindsets.
• Able to investigate issues and establish a root cause analysis.
• Works with users to understand what is not working, and more importantly, why.
• Does try to fix issues until all issues are identified and solutions are evaluated.
**Job Requirements:**
KNOWLEDGE AND SKILL REQUIREMENTS:
• Bachelor degree required in Computer Science and/or Business Administration
• 2-4 years of overall experience in an IT environment serving in a business analysis or project management capacity
• Self-motivated with the willingness to learn and dig enthusiastically into new subjects/projects
• Strong analytical and troubleshooting skills
• Strong documentation skills
• Prior experience configuring business application software
• Knowledge of leasing or financial applications is a plus
• Other programming and database skills a plus
**Posting Title:**
IT Business Analyst
**Address 2:**
2005 MARKET ST, 14 FL
LEAF-PHILADELPHIA
**Employment Type:**
Full Time
**Address 1:**
ONE COMMERCE SQ
**Auto req ID:**
14605BR
**City:**
PHILADELPHIA
**Zip Code:**
19103
**State:**
PA
**14605BR**
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status or any other legally protected status.
",[None],"['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Summary:
Responsible for monitoring KPIs and gathering necessary information and data to provide analysis for call center needs.
Must be able to identify and expedite issues through the proper channels.
Essential Job Functions:
Provide intraday, daily, weekly, and monthly reporting and analysis on KPIs to further illustrate performance.
Analyze & report on key call center metrics to gauge trends and forecast performance.
Identify major incidents as they happen and work with business partners to address and correct them.
Determine the impact of the major incidents.
Identify pain points in the intraday environment and work towards a solution.
Track events that will either hinder or increase KPIs.
Work with leaders to effectively deploy and analyze initiatives.
Create and maintain documentation regarding all analysis and reporting.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential function satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Education and/or Experience:
1-3 years’ experience in Analytics, preferably in a fast-paced call center environment.
Bachelor’s degree preferred in analytics, statistics, finance, or any analytical related fields, and/or 2 plus years relevant work experience.
Engineer Degrees also considered
Proficiency with Microsoft Office tools (Excel, PowerPoint, Word etc.)
Ability and willingness to learn new software applications.
Skills in complex problem solving, judgment, critical thinking and decision making.
Ability to be highly organized with an emphasis on accuracy and timeliness.
Ability to organize information and have attention to detail and accurately follow procedures.
Ability to work alone with minimum supervision and with others in a team environment, occasionally under time pressure and on several tasks at the same time.
Ability to effectively communicate orally and in writing with co-workers, management team, and other departments within the organization.
Ability to QC your own work and be able to work rotating evenings and/or weekends if work demands.
Desired skills but not necessary:
Working knowledge of SAS, SQL, SAP Business Objects or similar relational databases.
Demonstrate analytical skills in data mining, data manipulation, report development and visualization.
Prior Project Management experience
#CB
If you seek a sense of community, top training, opportunity for advancement, a comprehensive benefits package and reward and recognition program, look no further.
Employment contingent upon successful completion of background investigation.
Smoke-free workplace.
Drug-free work environment.
Excellent benefits package including medical, dental, vision and 401(k).
All resumes are held in confidence.
Only candidates whose profiles closely match requirements will be contacted during this search.
LENDER NMLS ID:2767
Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Must Have:
Process Modelling experience
Stakeholder management
Strong facilitation skills
Previous Financial Institution experience is required
5+ years business analysis experience
Experience in working with the Agile methodology will be an asset
Experience with Jira/Confluence for Requirements and Testing (in Jira)
Nice to Have
Client Experience
Key Attributes:
The ideal candidate will be a highly experienced Business Analyst with the knowledge/experience to propose changes that align Business Analysis within an Agile/blended delivery model to the latest industry best practices.
Exceptional communication, influencing and partnership skills are mandatory.
Ability to coach/train/mentor other BA team members in best practices.
Work on highly complex projects or programs with minimal management supervision.
Accountabilities:
Define and document requirements for the shared capabilities keeping goals, strategy and shared capabilities in mind
Ability to remain flexible with multiple/shifting priorities and function under deadlines with minimal supervision
Actively communicate and work effectively with partners (internal and external) to ensure that end-to-end processes, business risks, impacts and constraints are understood and documented
Identifying and escalating any risks/conditions that may impact timeline, cost or alignment with the overall vision.
Prepare and deliver presentations to communicate findings, with recommendations, to senior business representatives.
Superior communication skills, both written and verbal
Excellent relationship management abilities
Customer focused
Good organizational knowledge and ability to understand and articulate inter-process impacts
Superior time management skills
Extremely self-motivated and team-oriented - works well with other team members and keeps all relevant individuals, including management, up to date in a timely manner
Strategic skills such as business diagnosis and assessment, market analysis
WHY GTT:
Flexible work-life Balance, GTT’s exceptional employee driven culture.
1⁄2 day on Friday during summer, few days remote option.
Excellent base salary, One of industries TOP commission structure, three-week vacation.
20 years of referenceable past performance with fortune 500 clients
","['excel', 'jira']","['risk', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'risk', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Primary Function
The Business Analyst II works with the business and IT and leads the team in delivering the best solutions using the latest Agile methodologies.
These solutions will take the form of technology products and process improvements.
The Business Analyst II analyzes the business need, defines the best solution, and facilitates the successful implementation of complex solutions through hands-on work, interfacing with development resources and creating other materials to support the process.
The Business Analyst II may also have some supervisory and leadership responsibilities within the Enterprise Execution Team.
Principal Duties
Transform the business and IT by rapidly delivering the best designed solutions as prioritized by the companys strategic and productivity goals
Organizes and plans the best approach to the business need and guides the business and IT in achieving the best solution including management of complex projects with multiple points of integration and risks
Conceptually engineer solutions in a variety of systems, platforms and tools choosing the right option for the problem by balancing complexities, risks, speed-to-market and other factors
Brings depth of mortgage subject matter expertise, technical knowledge and analytical skills to all tasks and projects
Compiles complex situations, problems, systems and solutions into clear communication and materials for a variety of audiences and levels across the executive, technical, and business teams
Enterprise analysis activities major contributor in project review and prioritization process providing key insight to possible solutions, downstream impacts, risks, and level-of-effort / cost
Leads the analysis and documentation on the business need impacts other systems and processes and plans/organizes work for others
Performs complex data collection and analysis needed to compile cost-benefit analysis as part of the project rationalization
Leader in writing use cases, specifications, business requirements and test conditions along with needed process flows and works with the stakeholders to reach approval
Performs hands-on development efforts using rapid application development (citizen developer) frameworks for prototype, testing or production use
Own and manage large pipeline of complex projects while maintaining rapid pace of deliverables and solutions
Research and gain insight into regulatory changes and requirements that impact the business
Perform and manage vendor/outsource opportunities and analysis write and review RFI/RFP and responses, work with other groups on due diligence, support ongoing relationship analysis and performance monitoring
Ability to plan, organize, and manage other team member
Accomplishes others duties as assigned
Ability to travel ~20%
Education and Experience Requirements
Bachelors degree or equivalent preferred
4+ years of combined experience in mortgage or IT supporting mortgage originations
Knowledge, Skill and Ability Requirements
Understanding and proven experience applying knowledge of downstream and upstream impacts and risks (such as regulatory/compliance concerns, capital markets/pooling considerations) in a mortgage origination business
Able to quickly learn, access complex problems and conceptualize solutions to be deployed through technology or process improvements
Creative problem-solver who combines analytical skills with technical proficiencies to deliver quality results
Driven and self-motivated, must be able to provide large output working independently as well as part of team
Performs well in a fast paced team environment and manage/drive multiple requests to successful completion in a prompt and professional manner while communicating issue/status to appropriate stakeholders
Skilled in using Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), utilizing portions from both Waterfall and Agile methodologies
Proven track record of delivering complex projects and documents/requests/changes combined with the ability to be proactive in identifying opportunities for the process and systems changes along with requirements traceability
Proven ability to effectively lead/manage/drive requirement/request meetings, across various business units, with no management oversight needed
Proven ability to clearly articulate, effectively author and present complex requirement documents, including the benefit analysis, both verbally and written
Ability to act as effective leader between/among business departments, senior management and IT/consultants/technology
Ability to manage/participate/lead user acceptance testing and provide training on the new feature/process
Ability to multi-task and adapt to shifting priorities, demands and tight timelines using analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven ability in authoring and analyzing Process Flow diagrams knowledge and experience working in Blue Works is a plus
Enjoy learning and working in a challenging/changing environment
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
4xewTqz3yB
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Grow with the best.
Join a smart, creative, and inspired team that works behind the scenes to support operational excellence.
Your Opportunity
Overall, the Business Analyst, Oracle HR/HCM is the liaison to the various stakeholders involved in the HR /Learning business process to ensure the underpinning system functionality and flows effectively and efficiently meets the various stakeholder needs, both from a day-to-day support and continuous improvement perspective.
Your Key Responsibilities
Work closely with the business users to capture and refine business decisions and requirements to a sufficient level of detail for system solutions to be developed.
From within IT, work as an integral member of the development team to translate, refine and validate business requirements throughout the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) from design through to testing.
Perform in-depth internal testing of system changes to prepare the system for business user testing.
Engage business users as appropriate to validate and refine requirements and functional solution designs.
Monitor and respond in a timely manner to incidents, process exceptions and service interruptions; Utilize in-depth understanding of the system functionality, flows, dependencies, and known problems, to provide Tier 1 diagnostics and troubleshooting, and escalate to Tier 2 functional/technical analysts, as required.
Maintain a solid understanding of the HR Learning roadmap for enhancements and legislative patches, and work with the business and internal IT stakeholders to plan for internal upgrades to Oracle.
Perform service delivery activities following pre-defined processes/procedures.
Identify opportunities to reduce or prevent incidents occurring such as educating/training end-users, or functional/technical changes.
Plan, prepare and execute functional, and system testing and assist in issue resolution; develop test cases as required.
Partnering with designated Business Process Leads to analyze current state business processes, identify pain-points, and developing recommendations for process/system improvement.
Serving as project lead on small or medium initiatives.
This can include:
Conducting stakeholder workshops to elicit requirements.
Developing process models and other project deliverables using Microsoft Office tools such as Visio, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.
Assisting with technology assessment and selection.
Researching, recommending, configuring, and implementing system solutions.
Working with stakeholders to develop business practice and policy documentation.
Supporting cross-functional programs and projects that may include HR, IT, HSSE, Project Delivery, and other user communities.
Facilitating formal user acceptance testing and participating in testing activities such as test case creation, execution, and issue resolution.
Being an advocate for business process management.
Assisting IBA personnel with day-to-day operational issues.
Your Capabilities and Credentials
Understanding of the underpinning system functionality and flows that have been configured in Oracle HCM Cloud.
Good understanding of HR principles, concepts and processes.
Experience performing business analysis and capturing business requirements in a structured systematic manner.
Experience preparing test plans/cases/scripts.
Strong customer service orientation.
Strong verbal and written communication skills with a professional demeanor.
Strong interpersonal, organizational, time management, problem solving, and a keen attention to detail.
Strong system troubleshooting skills.
Understanding of ITIL (IT Infrastructure Library) practices would be an asset.
Highly self-motivated and directed.
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment.
Experience using Microsoft Office tools such as Word, Excel, Visio and PowerPoint
QA testing tools such as HP Quality Center
Fluency in French is considered as an asset.
Education & Experience
Post-secondary degree, ideally related to Business or Management Information Systems.
1-3 years of related experience
Typical office environment working with computers at a desk for long periods of time.Periodic off hours work required to support production issues that may arise during support system implementations.
Job: Application and Systems Administration
Other Locations: Canada-Alberta-Calgary, United States-Colorado-Broomfield, United States-Pennsylvania-Philadelphia, United States-Colorado-Denver, United States-Arizona-Chandler
Employee Status: Regular
Job Level: Entry Level
Travel: No
Schedule: Full-time
Req ID: 2000016I
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"How will you make an impact?
The Business Analyst III is responsible for ensuring that business and technology needs are properly documented, analyzed and aligned relating to a wide variety of systems including LIMS, Inventory Management Systems, and more.
The Business Analyst III bridges the gaps in understanding between IT and business function needs by combining business relationship management skillsets with solution architecture.
What will you do?
Participate in the development, implementation, installation, and testing of applications software.
Analyze user project proposals to include identifying potential problem areas and recommend optimum approaches for project path.
Contribute through code/algorithm development and other means, for the development of tools and interfaces between application programs and for the development of debugging programs.
Investigate user problems and needs, identify their source, and determine possible solutions.
Provide system level support for applications.
Investigate, recommend and install new applications.
Maintain confidentiality with regard to the information being processed, stored or accessed by the network.
Document programming problems and resolutions for future reference.
Participate in the development of training materials and assist in conducting training and workshops in parallel processing and use of large computer systems.
How will you get here?
Education:
A Bachelor's degree in Management Information Systems, Business, Marketing, Finance, Economics, Supply Chain or related field; MBA, CPA or PPM preferred
Minimum Requirements:
Implementation experience with any of the following: LIMS, Inventory Management Systems, CRM Systems, Finance Systems e.g.
ERP.
Exposure to Good Manufacturing Practices (GMP), or healthcare industry experience (i.e.
clinical) preferred
Ability to work autonomously with minimal direction; a bias for action and perseverance
Excellent presentation and communication skills, both written and verbal
Significant experience with as many of the following: Transportation Management Systems, Warehouse Management Systems, EDI/XML, Customs Brokerage Systems, Integration Tools, SharePoint, and Financial Systems.
.NET, Web, and Java development skills.
MS SQL Server and SQL Reporting Services skills.
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Travel (0-25%, includes global travel)
","['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'java']","['analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'java', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The combined, 300-person organization provides conflict-free recordkeeping services to 16,000 plans and 750,000 eligible participants representing more than $23 billion in assets under administration.
About PCS Retirement
PCS Retirement, LLC is The Nation's Premier Fiduciary Retirement PlatformSM.
PCS makes it possible for advisors to extend sophisticated wealth management solutions and generate better outcomes for retirement plan sponsors and participants.
Since 2001, PCS has been a partner to the fiduciary financial advisor for qualified retirement plans, providing transparent, conflict-free retirement solutions with no hidden fees.
PCS offers a comprehensive retirement platform, including front-end business development tools, easy-to-use technology, and analytics to help advisors personalize and integrate retirement plans as part of their broader offering without conflict and with the highest level of service.
The result: Better solutions for advisors—and the clients who trust them.
To learn more, visit www.pcs401k.com.
Overview:
This is an excellent opportunity for a self-starter interested in utilizing analytical and organizational skills in a fast-paced environment in a diversified position.
Responsibilities:
• Analyze and model business processes for review and change
• Lead process improvement and design using LEAN methodologies
• Develop and deploy process frameworks
• Proficiency with data analysis, demonstrating an ability to manipulate and transform raw data into information useful for process improvement efforts
• Root cause analysis of issues encountered to determine pro-active methods to prevent recurrence whether through automation or client intervention
• Planning and organizing workflows for operational processes
• Be involved in creating policies, procedures and control mechanisms for operational processes
• Perform other duties and special projects as assigned
Qualifications
Requirements:
• Certification in LEAN methodology strongly preferred
• Retirement plan operations experience is a plus
• Ability to handle multiple deadlines
• Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills
• Strong attention to detail
• Proven ability to comprehend technical systems and processes
• Project management experience is a plus
Additional Information
EEOC: All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
ADA REQUIREMENTS (ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS):
Physical Requirements (maximum hours per shift are noted):
Sitting……………………………………………………………………………….... 8 hours/day
Standing……………………...…………………………………………………….….
1 hour/day
Walking…………………………………………………………………………...…… 1 hour/day
Reaching………………………..…………………………… 0 hours/day; 8 ft, higher or lower
Use of Telephone……………………………………………………………........... 8 hours/day
Working under pressure…………………………………………………………….
8 hours/day
Working rapidly for long periods …………………………………..……….…… 2-3 hours/day
Use of keyboard/computer, printer, fax, copier…………………………...……… 8 hours/day
Position requires close work; finger dexterity; good vision, hearing and oral communication.
May occasionally work longer than 8 hours/day.
COGNITIVE OR MENTAL REQUIREMENTS:
The following cognitive or mental requirements are necessary on a daily basis:
• Critical thinking
• Reading
• Writing
• Mathematics
• Drawing conclusions from written or computer generated materials.
• Analyzing data or report information
• Conduct research
• Implementing recommendations by coordinating persons and/or other resources
• Clear verbal articulation
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
383pMLKQAL
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst Project Manager in Wilmington, DE 19803 Interview Logistics phone then face to face Required Skills Set Years of Experience 7+ years of experience as a business analyst andor project manager Education Required Bachelors Degree or Equivalent Work Experience Must have commercial (sales and marketing) pharma experienceexposure Testing strategy experience ndash vendo
",[None],"['logist', 'busi']",1.0,"['logist', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you a fit?
Salary: $80,000 - $100,000
Competitive Base Salary Between $80k and $100k!
401k!
Bonuses!
Job Details
Strong Excel background -- pivot tables, macros, etc.
Experience with XML / XSLT / JSON would be ideal
An actuarial / accounting / finance / business intelligence / business analysis background
Good client-facing ability and willingness to interact with customers
Ability to communicate with engineers
APIs / Web Services experience would be preferred
Interested in hearing more?
",['excel'],"['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Position : Business Analyst
Duration: 12 Months
JD:
Experience in using MS Work and Visio.
candidate with good SDLC processes understanding.
Preferred office timings would be 7.30 am EST 4.30 pm EST.
( to maintain overlap for client users from Germany/Switzerland.)
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
idrtVRrpO0
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Business Analyst
The primary function of the Business Analyst is to work closely with the Product Owner within the Scrum Team to facilitate the development and path forward for each product by translating business needs into technical requirements.
This individual will become a subject matter expert on the products and systems they support and the data processes in which they were derived.
Responsibilities
· Learn systems, processes, and business rules for the products supported
· Work with Product Owner to translate business requirements into documented technical requirements for the development team to consume
· Act as a point of contact for requirements and/or functional related process questions
· Identify and document process pain points and opportunities for improvement through information gathering and critical thinking
· Review solutions for missed requirements
· Proactively help define reporting/data analytics requirements
· Assist in defining table relationships and mapping
· Create/Maintain rules library and other pertinent documentation
· Help execute test cases and smoke test implementations, as necessary
· Perform ad-hoc data mining
Required Skills and Experience
· Computer Science or Engineering degree preferred
· Deep understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle
· Extensive experience in a fully Agile environment
· High proficiency in Azure DevOps
· Experience writing functional specifications including acceptance criteria, user stories, features, etc.
for the development team
· Easily understand business and technical terminology
· Able to communicate with all audiences from highly technical to non-technical associates
· Strong documenting skills to capture all requirements
· Able to translate high-level business objectives into creative technical solutions to satisfy the business intent
· Strong problem-solving capabilities
· Able to read schema and flat file formats
· Understand table relationship within databases and across other DBs/Servers
· SQL – Able to develop and run SQL queries to pull ad-hoc data
· Visio – Able to create process flows
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $65,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year
Pay may depend on skills and/or qualifications
Experience:
business analyst: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
","['azur', 'db', 'sql']","['data mining', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['azur', 'db', 'sql', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities Resolve Tier I issues.
Collaborate with technical developers to provide Tier II support.
Continuous improvements by leading JD Edwards integration and upgrade projects.
Lead business requirements gathering and documentation.
Qualifications 5+ yearsrsquo Oracle JD Edwards EnterpriseOne experience, with a focus on Accounting, Finance modules, required.
Real Estate module andor industry experience preferred.
Strong with SQL Server, including queries, statements.
Strong documentation skills including functional requirements, designs, presentations, and process flows.
","['oracl', 'sql']","['financ', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['oracl', 'sql', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Operations
Sales Analysis
Performance Metrics
Marketing
Responsibilities
Prepare reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends
Create informative, actionable, and repeatable reports that highlights relevant business/sales trends and opportunities
Work with Sales Directors to perform market research analysis to support strategic sales objectives
Analyze, transform, and resolve lead generation challenges
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree (Computer Science or Business Administration preferred)
Experience working with Microsoft O365 Applications
Working knowledge of Excel (VLOOKUP, Pivot Tables, etc.)
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Strong problem-solving skills
Demonstrated ability to effectively prioritize assignments and multi-task
Ability to work both independently and on a team
Experience with Salesforce a plus!
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc']","['research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Required Skills Set:
Years of Experience: 5-7
Education Required: Bachelors Degree or Equivalent Work Experience
Experience working with all digital channels, including web, mobile, apps and social media required
Experience working with BPM service development and Web Service integration.
Experience working with Elastic Path, AWS and other cloud Ecommerce Platforms
Experience with applications using Docker and Kubernetes
Experience working in Java Sprint Framework experience
Experience working with Apache Solr and Apache Shiro
Experience working with ActiveMQ and other JMS to integrate
Heavy experience working with hypermedia APIs and integrating front end platforms with them
Additional Required Skills:
Certifications (CBAP, PMP)
Core Responsibilities:
1.
Define and document system specification artifacts that include,
User stories & traceability to requirements
API interactions documentation with user interface & System APIs
Digital Workflows
Use Cases
Data Mapping Definitions
Sequence Diagrams
Call Flows
2.
3.
4.
Wear different hats: designer, tester, facilitator, product owner, etc
5.
Physical Environment and Working Conditions:
Must be able to work on site in Philadelphia after coronavirus restrictions are lifted
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $57,461.00 - $102,553.00 per year
","['kubernet', 'java', 'solr', 'aw', 'docker', 'cloud']","['sequenc', 'data']",1.0,"['kubernet', 'java', 'solr', 'aw', 'docker', 'cloud', 'sequenc', 'data']"
BA,"NEED LOCAL CANDIDATES.
Responsibilities:
AML Oversight Business Analyst / Project Manager responsible for writing and managing business requirements for large Technology releases and small enhancement (SI) releases.
Schedule walkthroughs, prepare audit ready documentation and obtain functional lead approval for Technology Scoping Items (SI) and Major release BRDs.
Management of a Release SharePoint containing audit ready documentation.
Review global BRDs and engage with operations and other functional teams to determine impact to NAM Cards
Manage BRD developments meetings and provide status updates
Partner with the AML Global team on all regular Global enhancement releases with development of business requirements
To become over time an SME on Major Global Bank platform functionality and related requirements
Network and build strong effective relationships with key partners including Technology (Compliance Tech and GCT), Global AML PMO, Global AML, Operations, Compliance, IA and CRS/Brands Risk teams
Build solid cross-functional relationships
Must be a strong values driven leader and a collaborative team member able to engage associates from all levels of the organization
Must take initiative and have a ability to influence to drive deliverables to meet milestone dates
Qualifications:
5+ years doing at least one of the following: Project Management, Risk, Operational Risk, Risk Operations or Business Analyst
Ability to develop technical Business requirements based on guidance from Technology and Business subject matter experts
Some Project Management experience with multiple stakeholders and functional areas within and outside the Cards Business
Ability to plan & work independently on required deliverables and deadlines
Demonstrated ability to manage and plan in a transitioning environment (developing & establishing business as usual)
Able to communicate both conversationally and via presentation clearly the information and actions needed by management at multiple levels
Ability to influence to reach consensus across multiple teams with different points of view
A good understanding of the Credit Card product and the backend systems that support the product life cycle
Ability to understand difficult technology solutions and concepts and be able to explain to Senior Management in a concise but thorough way
Bachelor's Degree in related field; advanced degree preferred
Strong knowledge of Share point and MS Office including Visio and Project a MUST
Working knowledge of SAS, SQL, Client Quality Center a plus
142693
www.rmscorp.com
","['ms office', 'sql', 'sa']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'sa', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"You may choose to add Dental,Vision, Life and AD&D insurance coverage, as well as Short Term and Long Term Disability Insurance.
* When you need a breakWe offer Vacation and Paid Holidays.
You will analyze, design, test and implement systems, which enable the business community to achieve their goals and objectives, is critical to the success of this role.What You Can Look Forward to:* Responsible for gathering, specifying, prioritizing and documenting requirements for mobile, Airgas.com and Airgas SupplySync punchout platforms, including owning the documentation process (creation, communication, approval).
* Responsible for developing and documenting functional designs for the software, gathering the appropriate approvals, and reviewing design with the software development team, business and quality assurance team members.
* Responsible for translating users' business requirements into detailed functional designs for development, testing and implementation.
* Evaluate and produce documentation, including use cases, business requirements document, functional specifications, and end user training documents.
* Interact with cross-functional teams, including IT and eCommerce (Product Management, QA, Merchandising, Analytics, Marketing, etc.
)* Responsible for managing the development of site user documentation.What You'll Bring to the Team:* Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related fields with a minimum of 2 years of experience in an analyst role, gathering, documenting business requirements.
* Experience with requirements specification and development, including process/functional design requirements gathering, use case development and process flow diagrams.
* Experience leading user workshops, defining requirements, writing use cases, and designing workflow processes.
* Strong understanding of Airgas' business or related business/eCommerce industry* Should have ability to professionally manage multiple demands for time and resources.
* Able to communicate effectively in both technical and business environments; demonstrate excellent written and oral communication skills; work in a collaborative, innovative, flexible and team-oriented environment.
A Recruiter will contact you with next steps if you are selected for an interview.For further information about Airgas, please visit www.airgas.comEOE AA M/F/Vet/DisabilityQualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or disability
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"LOC_1300_MKT-Wanamaker Building Req ID: 56801
Shift: Days
Employment Status: Regular - Full Time
Job Summary
Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, the recruitment process for this position has been placed ON HOLD.
Prior experience with identity management required, including a strong background in access management (federations, SSO, two-factor, self-service password reset), identity governance (account provisioning, managing identities, attestations, connectors and workflows), and privileged access management.
Experience with Oracle Identity products (OIM, OAM), Active Directory, and SQL is a plus.
A person in this position will be required to work with teams throughout the organization to capture requirements and understand strategic business needs, as well as working alongside the IAM team to support advanced system configuration changes and maintenance required for the application lifecycle.
Job Responsibilities
Performs routine operational support, maintenance and system configuration as defined in departmental operating procedures.
Demonstrates ability to diagnose and resolve business issues and to recommend areas for process improvement or innovation.
Works directly with and provides oversight to clients, internal and external, to elicit, analyze and document business and functional requirements through requirements workshops, interviews or meeting sessions with Project Sponsors, SMEs and other Stakeholders to diagnose and resolve complex technical, management, and business issues.Identify and document business and technical requirements using standard templates
Performs 24/7 on call support if applicable.
May be required to travel for mandatory certifications.
May be designated a “Health Care Worker”
May be required to represent I.S.
Required Education and Experience
Certifications commensurate with job role
Required Education: Bachelors of/in Computer Science, Information Systems, Business, or other Health Care related field
Required Experience: Relevant experience (>5 years) within a healthcare environment.
Relevant Information Systems analyst experience (>5 years)
Preferred Education, Experience & Cert/Lic
Excellent communication and teamwork skills including conflict resolution
Advanced critical thinking, problem-solving and troubleshooting skills.
Proficient skills in Microsoft Office products.
Ability to facilitate meetings with senior leaders and cross functional groups
Advanced documentation skills
Demonstrated ability to build relationships and work collaboratively.
Additional Technical Requirements
VEVRAA Federal Contractor/Seeking priority referrals for protected veterans.
Talent Acquisition
2716 South Street, 6th Floor
Phone: 866-820-9288
Email:TalentAcquisition@email.chop.edu
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'oracl', 'sql']","['analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'oracl', 'sql', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be serve as the key point person to several departments, including - Risk, Operations and Internal Audit - on rollouts and projects.
Develop and enforce data policies and process improvements to support data integrity
Provide analysis of contract-level risk, finance, and liquidity data points for data quality improvement
Utilize SQL, Excel, and Qlik to validate, test, and perform analysis for regulatory reporting
Use business analysis to translate business and technical requirements to support data governance initiatives
Support organizational initiatives to enhance processes and procedures for the Data Management Business Intelligence & Basel Compliancy effort
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Business/Finance/MIS
3 + years data analysis experience is preferred within financial services industry
Ability to build partnerships across the organization
Background in Finance and Accounting
Strong technical abilities
Experience validating data
Over time, office locations, specialty practice areas and service offerings will be added to address ever changing constituent needs.
Employing the Future (TM)
","['excel', 'sql', 'qlik']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'qlik', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Req ID: 94814
Role/ Responsibilities:
- Coordinate activities and communications with business users, vendors and internal IT groups.
- Will handle multiple tasks and shifting priorities in a rapidly growing environment.
- Identify, assess, and document business needs and requirements.
Must be able to quickly establish credibility while working in new subject area.
- Assist in the development of test scenarios, test execution and test results validation.
- Assist business SMEs with requirements definition and application options for new requirements.
- Drive toward on-time, quality deliverables in a complex and dynamic business environment, while actively managing stakeholder expectations.
- Conduct requirements reviews to improve the quality of requirements deliverables.
- Hold and lead meetings with IT, Business and vendor teams to review requirements, address open issues/questions, close gaps.
- Engage in prioritization and problem-solving with technical resources in order to deliver robust solutions as quickly as possible.
- Represent business interests and ensure that all technical designs meet or exceed business needs.
Basic Qualifications:
- 5 plus years of experience as a Business Analyst in P&C (Property and Casualty)Insurance Industry.
Preferences:
- Strong understanding of SDLC Methodologies, including Agile and Scrum Methodologies.
- Knowledge of Commercial Insurance lines including Commercial Automobile, GL and Property.
- Experience managing vendor and/or consulting teams.
-Proficient in the use of MS Office, SQL/data reporting tools, ticketing/problem tracking systems.
- Excellent problem solving skills.
- Excellent oral and written communication skills.
- Experience defining and following SDLC guidelines.
- Proven record of flexibility and team participation.
","['ms office', 'excel', 'c', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'c', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Digital Business Analyst
You may choose to add Dental,Vision, Life and AD&D insurance coverage, as well as Short Term and Long Term Disability Insurance.
When you need a break…We offer Vacation and Paid Holidays.
You will analyze, design, test and implement systems, which enable the business community to achieve their goals and objectives, is critical to the success of this role.
What You Can Look Forward to:
Responsible for developing and documenting functional designs for the software, gathering the appropriate approvals, and reviewing design with the software development team, business and quality assurance team members.
Responsible for translating users' business requirements into detailed functional designs for development, testing and implementation.
Evaluate and produce documentation, including use cases, business requirements document, functional specifications, and end user training documents.
Interact with cross-functional teams, including IT and eCommerce (Product Management, QA, Merchandising, Analytics, Marketing, etc.)
Responsible for managing the development of site user documentation.
What You'll Bring to the Team:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related fields with a minimum of 2 years of experience in an analyst role, gathering, documenting business requirements.
Experience with requirements specification and development, including process/functional design requirements gathering, use case development and process flow diagrams.
Experience leading user workshops, defining requirements, writing use cases, and designing workflow processes.
Should have ability to professionally manage multiple demands for time and resources.
Able to communicate effectively in both technical and business environments; demonstrate excellent written and oral communication skills; work in a collaborative, innovative, flexible and team-oriented environment.
Must be flexible, adaptable and able to learn quickly in various technical and creative environments, while delivering quality work amidst tight deadlines.
What’s Next:
A Recruiter will contact you with next steps if you are selected for an interview.
EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or disability
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Technical Business Analyst in Philadelphia, PA 19103 Interview Logistics Phone Interview WebEx Interview Required Skills Set Years of Experience 5-7 Education Required Bachelors Degree or Equivalent Work Experience Experience working with all digital channels, including web, mobile, apps and social media required Experience working with BPM service development and Web S
",[None],"['logist', 'busi']",1.0,"['logist', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
About the Role
This role is a technical role where the analyst will be responsible for creating the Business Requirements Documents for reports and dashboards.
This person must have an understanding of data warehousing concepts, market leading business intelligence capabilities and good report design.
Key responsibilities for the Business Analyst include:
Understand business concepts and translate them into report and dashboard requirements through creating Business Requirement Documents
Identifying and interpreting patterns within reports and dashboards
Writing SQL queries to query the data warehouse and find the necessary data the user is requesting
Work closely with business partners to capture their requirements, write the Business Requirements Document and obtain sign off for the BRDs.
Work closely with the data modelers, data engineers, report developers and QA team to ensure that the reports and dashboards contain accurate and complete data.
About You
Ideal characteristics in a candidate include:
Exceptional analytical skills
Strong oral and written communications skills,
Meticulous and detail-oriented
Must be a problem solver, critical thinker, self-motivated and possess integrity and a strong work ethic
Must be able to ask deeper questions, not just be an order-taker
Ability to work independently on concurrent tasks and adhere to deadlines
Ability to easily adapt to changing priorities
Ability to meet high expectations for precision and accuracy
High degree of initiative and intellectual curiosity
Required qualifications from an ideal candidate are:
3+ years' experience performing business analysis in a data warehouse, data mart, or business intelligence environment
Deep knowledge of database structures, normalization and de-normalization
Deep knowledge of data warehouse concepts
Deep knowledge of enterprise reporting tool capabilities.
Preferably MicroStrategy
Strong report design skills
Ability to work both independently as well as a team
Ability to communicate highly technical concepts in business terms
Experience working in an Agile environment
Experience in a financial services industry preferred
For more information please contact Janice DiCicco at 860-979-0912 or jdicicco@itechsolutions.com
Since 1995, iTech Solutions Inc., has been providing IT Consulting and Direct Hire Services to the Insurance, Financial, Communications, Manufacturing and Government sectors with local offices in Connecticut, Minnesota, Colorado, Massachusetts, Tennessee, North Carolina, and New Jersey / Pennsylvania area.
Employer will not sponsor applicants for any employment visas, at hiring or in the future, including but not limited to H-1B visas.
Corp-to-Corp or subcontract personnel will not be considered for this position.
",['sql'],"['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Position: Salesforce Business Analyst
Duration: Long Term Contract
Must Have Skills
Should have experience in Payer and Provider
Healthcare / Insurance Domain
10+ years' experience
",['salesforc'],"['busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role Summary
Concerto HealthAI is seeking a Business Analyst to track and develop project tasks, documents and understands data processing rules and ensures that data processing rules are incorporated into data sets and reports.
They manage projects of diverse scope and complexity and serve as the liaison between business, analytics, technology and external clients.
Responsibilities
Analysis of business processes, assessment of the scope and impact of the business needs, identification and documentation of functional requirements and tracking deliverables against the production schedule
Manage and oversee the support and enhancement of several key data sets and systems distributing the data
Provide support regarding documentation, research, analytics and Quality Assurance
Work with the project management team to prioritize deliverables, and negotiate on product functionalities
Create detailed Business Requirement Document (BRD) and translate it into functional specifications
Provide analytic support by coordinating data extraction from various databases and data interpretation
Participate in Integration Testing and User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and Functionality Testing
Requirements
Experience in managing projects utilizing standard project management disciplines and tools, and proficient knowledge of Excel
Strong interpersonal skills and self-motivation
Ability to maintain a high level of professionalism and autonomy along with a project management style that promotes progress through teamwork in a collaborative environment
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
BA/BS in Technology, Business or related field
",['excel'],"['research', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
T3yrZSJ8N9
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"About the position
The New Business Analyst/Associate Proposal Writer/Project Coordinator will be responsible for executing a diverse range of responsibilities within the scope of creating, organizing, developing, and producing proposals and other formally requested client correspondences.
You will be working directly with the Project Development Manager and Senior Management in an array of duties and your success is dependent on building a strategic partnership and becoming aligned with the team.
The candidate must be capable of rising to the challenge of working for a preeminent organization that serves national clients.
You will work internally across departments and externally with clients and vendors, so it is imperative to always demonstrate the highest level of professionalism.
Duties and Responsibilities
Develop proposals by assembling information including project nature, objectives/outcomes/deliverables, implementation, methods, timetable, staffing, budget, standards of performance, and evaluation; writing, revising, and editing drafts including executive summaries, conclusions, fee schedules and organization credentials
Gather proposal information by identifying sources of information; obtaining quotes from vendors/partners, coordinating submissions and collections; identifying and communicating risks associated with proposals
In conjunction with business development professionals, ensure compliance, completeness, and consistent messaging throughout the proposal
Research and respond to RFP content and amendments, legal documents, class action settlement agreements
Perform data collection and administrative tasks, including contacting partners, outlining requirements, and organizing and distributing information
Research and compile information from a variety of internal and external databases such as tracking opportunities, vendor information and CRM
Assist with the archiving of proposal content and upload to appropriate internal databases or servers as part of proposal closeout procedures in a timely and quality and manner
Regularly perform self-check of work products to eliminate repeat errors and demonstrate continuous improvement in work products continuously
Meet proposal deadlines by establishing priorities and target dates for information gathering, writing, review, and approval; entering and monitoring tracking data; coordinating requirements with contributors; contributing proposal status information to review meetings; and transmitting proposals
Translate and synthesize information into proposals that targeted audiences can understand, while maintaining the technical accuracy and completeness of the intended response
Maintain quality results by using templates; following proposal-writing standards including readability, consistency, and tone; maintaining proposal support databases
Closely collaborate with the Business Development Team
Assist in the hand-off of active projects/cases to the Operations Team
Provide support to the Operations Team with change orders and supplemental cost estimates
Improve proposal-writing results by evaluating and re-designing processes, approach, coordination, and boilerplate, implementing changes
Continually work towards strengthening industry knowledge and all relevant applications
Communicate regularly and effectively with all colleagues, including staff in different domestic and international time zones
Exhibit a very organized approached and superior attention to details
Meet regularly with managers to provide feedback and facilitate communication
Adhere to all business processes while performing tasks
Able to take on new tasks and responsibilities as needed
Perform other work-related duties as assigned by management
Qualifications
Bachelors’ degree in related field or discipline
Must have proven working experience in proposal writing and preparing cost estimates
Minimum of 3-5 years of experience and a demonstrated track record of accomplishments
3-5 years of the following experience:
Translating solutions into effective business proposals
Analyzing various business products and services
Coordinating proposal development
Applying layout and other desktop publishing skills
Editing content for clarification and consistency
Adhering to proposal schedule deadlines
Understanding proposal databases
Basic understanding of accounting principles
Aggressive problem diagnosis and creative problem-solving skills
Demonstrate a high degree of productivity while handling multiple tasks simultaneously
Ability to perform comfortably in a fast-paced, deadline-oriented work environment
Excellent written and verbal communication, research and reading comprehension skills
Ability to be flexible to adapt and act quickly when urgent matters require it
Able to work effectively with diversified individuals of various ethnic backgrounds and professional competencies
Project a positive, professional image toward clients, vendors and staff in all interactions and situations
Maintain the highest level of confidentiality
Problem analysis and resolution skills at both a strategic and functional level
Financial, insurance, and legal industry experience preferred
Excellent computer skills including all MS Office 365 applications.
(Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, Teams, OneDrive) required
Additional Information
http://www.angeiongroup.com
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"job summary:
Looking for banking business Analysts with Agile experience and strong process modeling skills for six month contracts with probable extensions .
...
CANDIDATE PROFILE DETAILS:
Degree/Certifications Required: Business analysis accreditation preferred * Post-secondary education and/or equivalent work experience
Years of experience: 5yrs+
Reason for request/why opened: New projects
Best Vs Average Candidate ( Background ) :
Business analyst with work experience in the banking Fi industry ( Large org )
MUST HAVE:
- Process Modelling experience
- Stakeholder management
- Strong facilitation skills
- Previous Financial Institution experience is required
- 5+ years business analysis experience
- Experience in working with the Agile methodology will be an asset
- Experience with Jira/Confluence for Requirements and Testing (in Jira)
NICE TO HAVE 1.)
Previous client experience
education: No Degree Required
",['jira'],"['probabl', 'busi']",1.0,"['jira', 'probabl', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst,
Machine Learning & Artificial Intelligence
Youll be tackling deeply meaningful human and societal healthcare challenges from under-diagnosis of rare diseases to the selection of best treatment therapies for cancer patients with the aid of cutting-edge AI and Machine Learning Products.
What the Product Business Analyst role will entail:
Requirement Gathering: Arranging meetings with clients and stakeholders, understanding their requirements and co-ordinating with Product Managers to prioritise them
Requirement Analysis: Analysing the requirements and mapping technical dependencies
Requirement Documenting: Creating and maintaining the product backlog for each product
Supporting Scrum: Supporting the scrum processes, running the sprint planning meetings.
Product QA: Providing acceptance criteria for product requirements, working with both the developers and QA team to ensure the requirements are fully met and validated
Demos: Providing demos to the stakeholders at the end of each sprint
User-tests: Co-ordinating and facilitating UAT testing with stakeholders to ensure the product meets user expectations
Pre-sales: Creating content for client project proposals, product marketing materials and other client collateral / deliverables
Operations: Supporting the day-to-day operations of the project and providing status updates to management when requested
Technical Skills: Understands the main technical components and technical processes behind a digital product.
Ease of communicating with technical team members and brainstorm solutions to technical problems.
Familiar with the software development process.
(Prior engineering education / experience is a plus)
(Prior experience working with marketing / sales / consultancy / strategy teams is a plus)
Analytical / Critical Thinking: A methodical and structured thinker, and precise communicator
Data Analysis: Experience and comfort dealing with data, and experience with analytic tools (Excel, Tableau etc.)
to extract business insights from data.
(Knowledge of SQL is a plus)
Healthcare / Clinical Experience (Optional): Already familiar or eager to learn the Pharma and Healthcare industry dynamics.
(Prior clinical experience and/or heath data experience is a plus)
Innovation focus: Passion for developing cutting-edge tech products.
Familiar with tech trends
Methodical, Systematic, Process-Oriented: Ability to perform day-to-day project management
Detail-Oriented: A high level of attention to detail and focus on high quality deliverables
Nice-to-work-with: Has a friendly and positive attitude
The Team
You will join this high-profile team to work on ground-breaking problems in health outcomes across disease areas including Oncology, Neurology, Chronic diseases such as diabetes, and a variety of very rare conditions.
The Machine Learning & Artificial Intelligence Analytics team work hand-in-hand with statisticians, epidemiologists and disease area experts across the wider global RWE Solutions team, leveraging a vast variety of anonymous patient-level information from sources such as electronic health records.
The data encompasses IQVIAs access to over 530 million anonymised patients as well as bespoke, custom partnerships with healthcare providers and payers.
The Business Unit: Real-World & Analytics Solutions (RWS) Technology
Real-World Solutions (RWS) is a market-leading, fast-growing and highly successful business, focusing upon delivering tangible business results to clients across healthcare value chain internationally, working with key decision-makers and business managers.
RWS teams help clients lever complex clinically rich patient-level healthcare datasets to understand healthcare treatment patterns and outcomes to make more informed decisions, and deliver results.
The solutions are delivered to a variety of clients across life-science, government, payor or provider organizations.
The CoE also curates the largest collection de-identified Real-World Data in the world, from different patient care settings in 18 countries worldwide the RWES Tech CoE is at the forefront of Big Data in healthcare.
Through its mission and skills, the RWES is transforming the way clients create new insights and deliver improved healthcare research and patient outcomes.
Making a positive impact on human health takes insight, curiosity, and intellectual courage.
It takes brave minds, pushing the boundaries to transform healthcare.
Forge a career with greater purpose, make an impact, and never stop learning.
Applicants who require reasonable accommodation to submit an application for employment or otherwise participate in the application process should contact IQVIAs Talent Acquisition team at workday_recruiting@iqvia.com to arrange for such an accommodation.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Summary:
The Marketing Business Analyst reports directly to the VP of Marketing Business Analytics and is responsible for gathering the necessary information and data to provide analysis for marketing needs.
Essential Job Functions:
Analyze & report on the performance of key marketing metrics to gauge trends, benchmarks, and performance of Marketing Campaigns
Derive value by analyzing customer data and identifying marketing opportunities
Partner with internal customers including Call Center and finance colleagues in developing marketing analysis and reports
Execute recurring / Ad hoc direct marketing analysis and dashboards
Creates and maintains documentation regarding all analysis and reporting
Other duties may be assigned
Other Related Duties:
Performs other related duties as assigned Supervisory Responsibilities: This position has no supervisory responsibilities
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.
Strong working knowledge of SAS, SQL and Oracle (or similar) relational databases
Strong in Tableau software development
Experience with marketing analytics and database
Proven analytical skills in data mining, data manipulation, report development and visualization
Proficiency in initiating, establishing and maintaining relationships with the business community
Experience with BI report development tools such as Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Tableau, Business Objects, or other data visualization tools
Ability to transform data into a story
Attention to details, ability to QC your own work
Desired but not necessary:
Prior project management experience
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Economics, Finance, Computer Science or related analytical fields
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to think creatively in complex situations
Proficiency with Microsoft Office tools (Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)
Must be flexible and comfortable in a fast paced environment with shifting priorities, projects and timelines
#CB
If you seek a sense of community, top training, opportunity for advancement, a comprehensive benefits package and reward and recognition program, look no further.
Employment contingent upon successful completion of background investigation.
Smoke-free workplace.
Drug-free work environment.
Excellent benefits package including medical, dental, vision and 401(k).
All resumes are held in confidence.
Only candidates whose profiles closely match requirements will be contacted during this search.
LENDER NMLS ID:2767
Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Overview
As a part of the Corporate Systems team, you will lead projects that include upgrades and enhancements to existing platforms as well as the opportunity to work directly with end users on all-new applications and process improvements.
You will have the freedom to think outside the box with the ability to customize or build solutions that will directly impact the usability of the systems to meet business needs.
Manage the development and support of home-grown applications created to meet unique and evolving business requests.
Build integrations with other systems (both third party and internally developed) in order to streamline and improve business processes
You’ll design, manage and implement solutions such as
Developing web applications to expedite State Apportionment and M-1 Adjustment processes for monthly and annual Tax reporting.
Directly influencing plans related to future systemic upgrades/enhancements
Bachelors degree in Business Administration (specialization in Accounting or Finance preferred), or a related technical discipline required
Minimum of 3 years of experience providing application implementation and support services to end users or working within or in support of finance &/or accounting domains & their associated systems required
Prior experience supporting accounting users or working within an accounting role a strong plus
Strong Project Management skills and proven history of great communications with stakeholders across various levels of the organization.
Strong SQL & T-SQL Skills
Experience with SSIS, DTS, Informatica, Scribe or other integration enabling tools a plus
Experience with BI Reporting Platforms (i.e.
Qlikview) and/or Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services a plus
","['microsoft', 'dt', 'sql', 'bi']","['financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'dt', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"REQUIREMENTS
Analyze business requirements by validating logic, feasibility and testing assumptions and make actionable for development.
Provide functional guidance to the client through the successful development and integration of new systems.
Provide clients with research and insight relating to software applications and technology, operations processing, reporting, and performance measurement.
Develop and maintain project plans, status memos, procedural and operational documentation.
SKILLS & ABILITIES
Experience designing, developing and implementing technology solutions in the investment services industry.
Experience working in or managing systems implementation and development projects that impact multiple departments.
Proven record of analyzing business processes and developing practical solutions that drive efficiency, improve client service, and reduce risk.
Ability to assess and document business needs: systems, data, integration, workflows, output, and the economic impact of each.
Strong analytical and business skills.
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills.
KNOWLEDGE & EXPERIENCE
Strong functional, technical, and operational expertise of the investment management industry.
Fundamental knowledge of front, middle, and back-office operations in investment management organization, with a strong understanding of institutional client reporting.
Understanding of multi-currency portfolio accounting.
Experience writing business requirements, functional requirements and test plans.
Basic knowledge of SQL preferred.
MBA, CFA charter holder or candidate, CIPM designee, or candidate is strongly preferred.
Willingness to travel is required.
EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience.
Specialty: Economics, Finance, Accounting, or Management.
(Preferred)
5+ years of relevant marketing industry experience
Prior experience in Investment Management or Consulting is required
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $61,603.00 - $160,895.00 per year
Experience:
business analysis: 5 years (Required)
Back Office/Operations: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Required travel:
50% (Required)
Application Question:
Please describe your approach and philosophy to a new project?
Please elaborate.
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Multiple locations
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
www.Meradia.com
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"4 years of experience in technical/software engineering project /program management;
Banking experience is a plus but not required
Experience with both agile and waterfall development methodologies;
CSM certification a plus but not required
Skilled in project management tools such as JIRA
Ability to work with and influence cross-functional teams, including driving process improvement and change management
Ability to effectively communicate to stakeholders at a technical, business, operational and executive level
Ability to work in an extremely fast-paced, demanding programs
",['jira'],['busi'],999.0,"['jira', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Salesforce Business Analyst/tester
Duration : 6+ Months Contract
Note : Candidate has to travel to Baltimore, MD as well.
Requirements
Job Requirement:
1.
Certified administrator
2.
Preferred sales cloud consultant certification.
3.
Should have experience in writing stories , usecases for atleast 2 or 3 salesforce projects
4.
Should have created requirements, stories on 2 integration projects with multiple systems.
5.
Should have good communication skills.
6.
Experience in creating test scripts and agile stories.
7.
Higher education experience optional
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst II may also have some supervisory and leadership responsibilities within the Enterprise Execution Team.
Principal Duties
Organizes and plans the best approach to the business need and guides the business and IT in achieving the best solution including management of complex projects with multiple points of integration and risks
Brings depth of mortgage subject matter expertise, technical knowledge and analytical skills to all tasks and projects
Leads the analysis and documentation on the business need impacts other systems and processes and plans/organizes work for others
Performs complex data collection and analysis needed to compile cost-benefit analysis as part of the project rationalization
Leader in writing use cases, specifications, business requirements and test conditions along with needed process flows and works with the stakeholders to reach approval
Performs hands-on development efforts using rapid application development (citizen developer) frameworks for prototype, testing or production use
Research and gain insight into regulatory changes and requirements that impact the business
Perform and manage vendor/outsource opportunities and analysis "" write and review RFI/RFP and responses, work with other groups on due diligence, support ongoing relationship analysis and performance monitoring
Ability to plan, organize, and manage other team member
Accomplishes others duties as assigned
Ability to travel ~20%
Education and Experience Requirements
Bachelor(TM)s degree or equivalent preferred
4+ years of combined experience in mortgage or IT supporting mortgage originations
Knowledge, Skill and Ability Requirements
Understanding and proven experience applying knowledge of downstream and upstream impacts and risks (such as regulatory/compliance concerns, capital markets/pooling considerations) in a mortgage origination business
Creative problem-solver who combines analytical skills with technical proficiencies to deliver quality results
Driven and self-motivated, must be able to provide large output working independently as well as part of team
Performs well in a fast paced team environment and manage/drive multiple requests to successful completion in a prompt and professional manner while communicating issue/status to appropriate stakeholders
Skilled in using Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), utilizing portions from both Waterfall and Agile methodologies
Proven track record of delivering complex projects and documents/requests/changes combined with the ability to be proactive in identifying opportunities for the process and systems changes along with requirements traceability
Proven ability to effectively lead/manage/drive requirement/request meetings, across various business units, with no management oversight needed
Proven ability to clearly articulate, effectively author and present complex requirement documents, including the benefit analysis, both verbally and written
Ability to act as effective leader between/among business departments, senior management and IT/consultants/technology
Ability to manage/participate/lead user acceptance testing and provide training on the new feature/process
Ability to multi-task and adapt to shifting priorities, demands and tight timelines using analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven ability in authoring and analyzing ~Process Flow(TM) diagrams "" knowledge and experience working in Blue Works is a plus
Enjoy learning and working in a challenging/changing environment
",[None],"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Determines business requirements by working with business clients and in discussions with Business Architecture, IT and Vendors (or cross-functional technical teams) documents and captures the appropriate business system application impacts.
Define business system requirements.
Performs investigation, evaluation and documentation of system design findings.
Tracks systems performance and reviews problem logs.
Evaluates and analyzes coded data elements and recommends changes needed.
Assures that users understand business system functions.
Consults with management and other functional areas to identify divisional needs, systems business requirements, as well as resolving business problems.
Performs complex systems testing, capable of providing test scenarios, system debugging and understands how to gather data independently for analysis.
#LI-DR1
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"I look forward to hearing from you soon!
Role: Business Analyst with Microsoft Dynamics
Duration: 6 Months +
Mandatory Skills
Microsoft Dynamics 365, Reporting services
Desired Skills
RESTful, SOAP web service development
Skill/Experience/Education
Mandatory- Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience - At least 4 years’ experience with Microsoft Dynamics 365 CRM system including comprehensive knowledge of system configuration.
At least 3 years in Database/Reporting Software, Microsoft Power BI.
At least 2 years in Microsoft Power Platform.
Strong competency in database/reporting software
Ability to manage across multiple tasks
Roles and responsibilities
Resource has worked with all basic components of the subject matter and can identify relevant standards, policies and practices.
Individual has a strong understanding of the operational issues and considerations and can site examples of usage in different environments.
Resource will gain technical expertise and make recommendations for solutions which may impact the overall outcome of the project/assignment.
Resource has the ability to work with clients/users to identify and scope their requirements.
This level should typically be used for a mid-level, fully proficient resource.
Formulates and defines scope (requirements) and objective based on user needs and thorough understanding of business processes.
Works with stakeholders on process improvement projects designed to improve results.
Gathers and analyzes information and provides recommendations to address and resolve root causes.
Evaluates/researches business problems and their relationship to technology.
Experience supporting business process re-engineering efforts.
Ability to dialogue and negotiate with all levels of stakeholders.
Organizes and presents ideas in a convincing and compelling manner.
Possesses effective verbal and written communication skills.
Understands the value of process-centric approach to business analysis Tackles complex business/systems problems and conveys this information to stakeholders (includes technical teams for translation into solution design).
Identifies process, technology and organizational role changes necessary to support business goals and objectives.
Powered by JazzHR
lHb7PnC2AF
","['microsoft', 'power bi', 'bi']","['analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Requirements drafting, workshops, SDLC documentation, UAT Testing etc.
FUTURE DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
• Support search, development and submission of state and federal regulatory filings.
• Respond to regulatory information requests to ensure consistency, accuracy and timeliness.
• Provide assistance in coordination, research and preparation of in-depth regulatory evaluation for current assets and businesses.
• Manage compliance reporting responsibilities and respond to inquiries from state and federal regulatory agencies
• Assist in managing annual code of conduct attestation and remediation
• Communicate state and federal requirements to internal and external clients
• Assist in the identification, analysis, and resolution of compliance issues.
• Maintain and review regulatory documentation necessary to maintain corporate standards
• Assist in developing, producing and conducting compliance training programs
• Assist health plans in managing relationships with regulatory agencies and seek to resolve policy issues which may negatively impact service to members
• Perform research and development position papers, support letters, memoranda and varied documents to assist regulatory approaches and new legislative
• Ensure to develop projects complying with all state, local and federal regulatory programs
• Arrange and manage reporting tools to appraise stakeholders and management regularly of project milestones, status and potential challenges
DESIRED QUALIFICATIONS/NON-ESSENTIAL SKILLS REQUIRED
• Fluency in English, additional languages are desirable
• Innovative thinker
• Proven ability to work cross-functionally and cross-regionally across multiple business units
• Excellent presentation, facilitation and communication skills, both written and oral, are required to synthesize key issues, and communicate/persuade constituencies towards specific actions and initiatives
• Well organized, highly motivated, process driven and results oriented with the ability to prioritize and collaborate in a multi-tasking environment
#CGIPhillyMetro
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.
Your future duties and responsibilities
Required qualifications to be successful in this role
",['excel'],"['research', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills.
* Proficiency in business applications, data usage, and management* Ability to liaison between lines of business and the development team, while working with a wide range of stakeholders and collaborating with your team* Ability to work collaboratively in teams and develop meaningful relationships to achieve common goals* Some level of vendor system management and SaaS provider exposure* Good understanding of on-demand/pay-as-you-go services* Understanding of infrastructure as code and automation, understanding of technology accounting* Coordinating the delivery of both functional and technical environments and manage the customer (users and stakeholders) needs and prioritizations
",[None],"['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title:IT Business Analyst 1//SIMNJP00055666
Duration: 8 months+
You want to change and actively participate?
You are responsible for translating collaboration requirements into system requirements.
This contains:
• Develop the IT Requirements in close collaboration with the business and other internal IT service teams
• You develop user stories for sprints
• Develop solution proposals in close cooperation with internal and external partners in international teams
• You agree specifications and solutions with relevant stakeholders in the business (e.g., business owner, key user)
• Evaluate change requests and support implementation, deployment, and roll-out
• They comply with the Q, ISEQ and DP Regulations
If you are interested in healthcare and you want to help the SharePoint Collaboration Team implement the business's global collaboration needs, you are the right person or the right person for this position.
• You have a degree in Computer Science or Business Administration or have acquired a comparable qualification
• You have relevant professional experience in IT
• You have very good SharePoint know-how (2013) and first experience with O365 and Nintex
• You have in-depth knowledge in the field of medical technology
• With your analytical and methodical skills, you manage the backlog product with global requirements and dependencies
• As a team player with strong customer orientation, you work successfully with the involved stakeholders (key user meetings, training coordination, communication, .
Thanks,
Amit Sehdev
Direct: 510-402-1061 | Fax: 510-623-5055 | Amit@apninc.com
",[None],"['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"REQUIREMENTS: Bachelor’s degree (or foreign equivalent) in Computer Science, Engineering or a related technical field; and five (5) years of experience performing technical business analysis, including designing database models and wireframes using Balsamiq Wireframes and Gliffy; of which three (3) years of experience includes utilizing Oracle, SQL Server, MySQL, PostgreSQL, Redshift, and CouchDB databases; supporting software applications on AWS and Azure cloud platforms; performing project management in an Agile environment; and performing change management using ITIL-Foundation.
In lieu of Bachelor’s degree, employer will accept an additional two (2) years of experience in technical business analysis.
","['postgresql', 'redshift', 'sql', 'mysql', 'aw', 'azur', 'oracl']",['busi'],1.0,"['postgresql', 'redshift', 'sql', 'aw', 'azur', 'oracl', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES Provide exploratory analysis to understand data elements/ correctness data domain
Develop sample KPI(TM)s for both product and quality and demo to multiple stakeholders
Build domain knowledge on various areas such as IP Video, HSD, xFi, etc.,
Capture and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, business process descriptions, task and workflow analysis
Work with developers and SME's to establish roadmaps for data streams
Help prioritize data engineering needs for syndicated partners
Evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, and reconcile conflicts and develop recommendations to change procedures based on learnings
Work with internal and external customers to insure the reliability, accuracy, and functionality of data changes and/or enhancements.
All requirements will flow through you from syndicated partners
REQUIREMENTS
Programming expertise with Scala, Java, Python etc.
Experience with full scale cloud environments such as AWS/AZURE etc.
Strong SQL knowledge, good communication, coordination skills
Bachelor's degree in quantitative field or equivalent education/experience
Must have experience with Media and Entertainment industry
2+ years of experience in large faced-paced, development environment
Thorough understanding of operational procedures and systems
PREFERRED SKILLS
Hands on experience with very large data sets
Knowledge of Big Data technologies such as SPARK, Hadoop etc.,
Understanding of real-time data feeds, data lakes, visualizations etc.,
Strong desire to develop and deliver data driven decision making
Master(TM)s degree in quantitative area preferred (Data Science, Math, Science)
","['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java']","['big data', 'data', 'kpi', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['scala', 'spark', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'java', 'big data', 'data', 'kpi', 'exploratori', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Req ID: 97344
Project Deliverables:
Project will be converting their legacy reports within SQL and SSRS to Cognos 11
Role Responsibilities:
- Help client evaluate the current and future sourcing for the approximately 168 150 reports deemed Non- Guidewire
-Through a joint analysis phase (partnering with client) Make recommendations to combine or eliminate reports where possible.
Recommendations for new reports may come out of this phase as well.
- Help determine the final inventory for this project.
- Analyze, define and document workflows of both the current state and to-be processes to facilitate software development and process improvement activities
- Coordinates the functional requirements with business management and technical solutions with systems personnel to determine the most cost-effective solution.
Makes recommendations in the form of proposals or white papers
- Leads the analysis, planning, design, and evaluation of key projects to help departments achieve their goals
- Collaborate with team members to analyze, create and implement business process improvements (and metrics) that increase value add for customers and improve morale, quality, delivery and cost
- Guide teams to manage organizational change through careful consideration of stakeholder needs and interests, strategic relationships and persuasive communications
- Facilitates the improvement in productivity of all assets (people, equipment, materials, and time) through identification and implementation of best practices
- Support development of project work plans / schedules, deliverables and meetings
- Maintain project information in master document repository
- Liaise between the business, IT, and project manager, when applicable, to provide guidance and information
- Instructs cross-functional teams in adapting to and understanding improvement processes and oversee process improvement projects
- Formulate proposals for new systems and information needs by analyzing existing systems, processes and procedures and defining technical / process improvements
Basic Qualifications:
- 5 plus years as a Business Analyst
- 2 plus years developing in Cognos.
Preferences:
- Prior Lead experience with the capability of taking ownership and leading the development team as against an individual contributor.
","['cogno', 'sql', 'ssr']","['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['cogno', 'sql', 'ssr', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job title : Business Analyst with Stibo
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"The Marketing Business Analyst reports directly to the VP of Marketing Business Analytics and is responsible for gathering the necessary information and data to provide analysis for marketing needs.
Qualifications:
Strong quantitative and analytical skills required
Forecasting or modeling experience required
Proficiency with database tools, processes and data manipulation
Understanding of statistics concepts (e.g., hypothesis testing, regression analysis)
Thorough knowledge of MS Office Suite (i.e., Excel, Access, Word and PowerPoint) is necessary and familiarity SQL and SAS/Tableau or other coding language
Minimum 3 years working experience in data analysis or statistical modeling.
Basic understanding of data warehousing principles/architecture
Experience in a Marketing Analytics environment is highly preferred.
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including the ability to effectively present to senior management
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Economics, Finance, Computer Science or related analytical fields
Proven ability to think creatively in complex situations
Must be flexible and comfortable in a fast paced environment with shifting priorities, projects and timelines
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['regress', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'regress', 'data', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Master’s Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and Analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional Organisational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
HLADSSjERu
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Possesses expertise in the business unit(s) they support, as well as, an understanding of the IT organizationrsquos systems and capabilities.
Analyzes business partnerrsquos operations to understand their strengths and weaknesses to determine opportunities to automate processes and functions.
Assists in the business process redesign and documentation as needed for new technology.
Translates high level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and manages changes to such specifications.
Educates the IT organization on the direction of the business.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
Possesses an understanding of technological trends and uses this knowledge to bring solutions to business units supported to enhance the enterprisersquos competitive edge.
May make recommendations for buy versus build decision.
Must have 3 - 6 years of relevant technical or business work experience.
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"C2C candidates will not be accepted.
bull Assist in developing requirements, strategy, scope and priorities.
bull Analyze and document businessdata requirements and produce detailed functional specifications and data lineage.
bull Analyze and document process flows and develop target state processes.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz']"
BA,"Develops business requirements and functional specifications for medium to large sized projects.
Collects and defines requirements, translates into functional design, test planning, and user documentation processes.
Provides advice to internal business groups on process improvement projects by analyzing business process flows and identifying changes.
May also provide guidance in this area to less experienced business analysts.
Gathers and analyzes information and provides recommendations to address and resolve business issues for a specific business group.
Actively influences software development process improvement initiatives.
",[None],"['recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Technical Business Analyst
Wilmington, DE
Technical Business Analysts are empowered, decisive, communicative, tech-savvy, and highly available to their teams.
Some of the things you will be doing:
● Work with the Technical Product Owner to create and maintain a backlog and roadmap.
● Develop user stories, process diagrams, and other models to clarify the desired solutions.
● Consolidate ideas and feedback from multiple business stakeholders and serve as the single authoritative source for product direction for the development team.
● Facilitate grooming sessions to estimate and refine stories.
● Work within the development team to implement, test, and deliver the solutions you have defined.
● Communicate with and train stakeholders to ensure successful adoption of these solutions.
● Perform other duties as requested and assigned.
What technical skills, experience and qualifications do I need?
● Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or related field
● Minimum of 5 years’ experience performing business analysis for technology applications
● Exceptional interpersonal and negotiation skills with the ability to communicate effectively with technical staff, non-technical staff, all levels of management, and clients.
● Detail-oriented and highly organized with outstanding problem-solving skills.
● Comfort with working in a fast-paced, changing environment.
● Experience with Scrum (or another agile methodology)
● Expertise with agile project management software (Version 1, Rally, Jira)
● Experience with Visio is a plus
● CSM or CSPO certification a plus
",['jira'],"['commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Section 1: Position SummaryAscensus is the largest independent retirement and government savings services provider in the United States, helping over 11 million Americans save for the future.
This role is a key position within a newly created team responsible for the delivery of process innovation and continuous improvement initiatives across the Ascensus organization.
The Project Manager role will be key in delivering business analysis, project planning, re-engineering and governance focused on continuing to strengthening Ascensus position in the marketplace.Section 2: Job Functions, Essential Duties and Responsibilities* To identify and deliver service improvement activity across the business through employing process improvement methodologies and the application of innovative thinking.
* Ability to work well under pressure with multiple priorities and deadlines* Computer fluency - MS Project, Excel, Visio, Powerpoint* Project Management Methodology experience* Demonstrated success in managing the business and financial aspects of projectsWe are proud to be an Equal Opportunity EmployerAscensus is a place to have a career, not just a job.
Ascensus also takes affirmative action to employ, and advance in employment, qualified women, minorities, and covered veterans.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']",['busi'],999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'busi']"
BA,"Key responsibilities may include:
Identifying business/functional requirements by working with key client personnel or end-users
Evaluating software applications/IT environments, analyzing gaps between current/desired states
Designing and executing use & test cases for custom application development projects
Discovering and documenting business and IT processes, workflows and requirements
Assisting the sales/ client-facing teams with activities for on-boarding clients
Preferred Skills
Strong knowledge in the area of requirements definition and software development lifecycle methodology
Significant experience with Word, Excel, MS Project, PowerPoint and Visio
Basic project management experience
Strong writing, problem solving, communication and client-facing skills
Able to utilize a business analysis strategic roadmap and project archetypes for guiding the organization towards increased business agility and reduced IT rework.
Proven techniques for defining and/or improving requirements
With proven techniques for collaborating to define requirements and specifications with Business Architects and IT professionals
Powered by JazzHR
VP5xg7DG5N
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: Veeva Business Analyst
Primary Skills
A New IQVIA CRM system is to be built for the Oncology user group in AZ.
AZ is looking forward for a person who can work on different sets of data such as Alignment, targeting, Employee, Customer, Sampling etc and identify which integrations need to flow into new CRM application.
The person should be able to work with different team to ensure this integrations get built into the new CRM and ndicate if there are any gaps, checking the data sets, validating etc. ""
Secondary Skills
2) Ensure that the similar integrations get built on the new IQVIA CRM application.
3) Validation on Data requirements, fit gap analysis.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be responsible for the development and enhancement of the customer’s ERP application (Infor Syteline), identifying systems and process improvements, documenting business requirement and creating technical specifications, and solving problems using a technical, hands-on approach resulting in improvement of business process design.
This is a full-time position, with competitive compensation, health benefits, 401k retirement program, and PTO.
Develop and enhance Syteline ERP applications with new or improved reporting, processes, and/or functionality.
Drive matters to resolution with a strong focus on system/process improvement, execution of business objectives, and stakeholder satisfaction.
Responsible for writing reports, query routines, and designing new applications.
Data mining, data analysis, develops reports and queries for production, finance, sales, etc.
Works with ERP structure and data to drive reports and application via SQL server.
Analyzes technical and business requirements and translates them into system specifications.
BS in Computer Science, Information Systems, or IT related field
Demonstrated ability to build sound relationships and clearly communicate expectations with stakeholders
Expert knowledge of SSRS, SSIS, and other reporting tools
Minimum 2 years’ experience developing and customizing ERP applications.
Experience with Infor Syteline is strongly preferred.
Experience with business process re-engineering and workflow analysis.
Experience in software development processes.
Knowledge of system design and understanding of database design.
Ability to learn and work in a fast-paced, agile team environment and manage multiple priorities.
Strong analytical aptitude.
Ability to provide excellent customer service, with attention to detail and maintaining confidentiality.
","['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'ssr']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'ssr', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst formulates and defines project scope based on business objectives and technology capabilities through a combination of research, fact-finding, understanding of applicable business systems and industry standards.
Provides analysis of business and user needs, documents requirements, and revises existing logic as necessary.
Participates in process and systems analysis and considers the business implications of the application of technology to the current business environment.
Important notes:
Requirement gathering- a must
Documentation of use cases very important
Having at least 5 years of financial domains Mortgage, banking world – 7 years overall
Passionate about Agile Scrum Methodology
User acceptance testing
Essential Job Functions:
Defines and documents customer business functions and processes.
Some PM experience helpful but looking for a Sr Technical BA
Display expertise in knowledge of (BPM) business process management platform.
Understanding of (BPM) process design and execution.
Experience Software Development Life cycle (SDLC) methodologies, Waterfall and Agile methodology for Project Management.
Experience with Agile principles & scrum ceremonies; Jira & Confluence tools.
Experience with JIRA for requirements and UAT management
Ability to manage project timeline, identify risks/issues, manage stakeholder expectations and share project status updates with Management
Consults with functional unit management and personnel to identify, define and document business needs and objectives, current operational procedures, problems, input and output requirements, and levels of systems access
Acts as a liaison between departmental end-users, technical resources (architects, data analysts, developers, operation specialists), consultants and others in the analysis, design, configuration, testing and maintenance of systems to ensure optimal operational performance
Develop, document and facilitate User Acceptance Testing to ensure fulfillment of requirements and successful project implementation
Analyzes the feasibility of, and develops requirements for, new systems and enhancements to existing systems; ensures the system design fits the needs of the users.
Tracks and fully documents change for functional and business specifications; writes detailed universally understood procedures for permanent records and for use in training.
Identifies opportunities for improving business processes through information systems and/or non-system driver changes; assists in the preparation of proposals to develop new systems and/or operational changes.
Conducts change impact analysis to assess the potential implications of changes and documents business rules, functions and requirements.
Participates in QA and user acceptance testing and testing of new system functionality.
Obtains detailed, in-depth and expert knowledge of the assigned business processes and creates requirement documents for development and testing.
Consistently challenges the IT and business teams to improve all aspects of their processes.
Position Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree from a Four (4) year College or University.
5+ years of diverse financial services / mortgage banking experience preferred
Experience with Agile Software Development Life cycle (SDLC) methodologies, particularly documentation of Use Cases is preferred.
Business analysis skills are required.
Ability to interface with all levels of the business to define business and functional requirements.
Support business and IT teams, including requirements gathering and project management for new development and integration projects with little or no direction.
Strong communication skills are required.
",['jira'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Hi,
Title SAP EWM Business Analyst
Position Contract to Hire ( 4 Months Contract and then Hire )
Salary- $Open(Best Possible)
Required Skills:
5 years of experience working in a functional Business Analyst role
3 years of experience with the functionality side of EWM is required
Experience implementing SAP EWM
Lead the business requirements collection and documentation for end-to-end business processes for projects and enhancements
Lead design and oversee development for projects and enhancements
Lead requirements, artifacts, and project documentation, and working with vendors and partners
Work closely with the development team to ensure clear understanding of functional and technical requirements
Proactively work to identify, communicate, and resolve project issues and risks that interfere with the success of a project
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you a self-driven person looking to advance your career as a high-impact player on a team?
This position is alsoeligible for a bonusprogram.
Job Summary:
This role is to place a skilled SAP resource at a particular facility to participate in all critical project, readiness, and support activities.
Throughout the project this will encompass supporting business, functional, data, technical, and change management tasks.
This individual will serve as a liaison with the core project team based in headquarters and represent the site in build, test, deployment, support, and sustainment discussions.
This role will require 15%-25% travel.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Building Phase:
Contributes to the SAP solution for the specific facility during the Build Phase of the project becoming familiar with the defined future-state and interim-state processes and business requirements, liaising between the facility and the core project team based at headquarters on a variety of topics, and contributing to the change impact assessment being conducted by the Change Management team.
Gathers certain configuration values from the facility, identifying end-to-end business scenarios for testing, identifying non-functional performance requirements, and helping to conduct any site-specific testing.
Participates in data cleansing and construction for the facility and assisting with data verification.
Assists with a technical requirements assessment– including a procurement and implementation plan.
All other duties as assigned.
Additional Phases:
Ensures site readiness though helping to coordinate and participate in“day in the life” testing, testing the hardware based in the facility, helping to identify users for User Acceptance Testing, and helping to prepare those users with relevant background information to successful execute the testing.
All other duties as assigned.
Post Testing Phase:
Contributes to facility contingency planning, change readiness assessments, and helping to review site-specific training materials.
Leads the SAP project through gathering site-specific cutover activities, helps to construct the site-specific Hypercare and transition plans, participates in cutover and validation, and supports the live solution during Hypercare.
Works with the Change Management team to help prepare the site for the upcoming changes, to include super-user training, participating in functionality“road shows”, participating in solution“playbacks”, and having discussions with the resources at the facility.
Supports all Go-Lives at all facilities with their knowledge.
This will include providing Hypercare support, helping to resolve tickets, creating any net new required documentation, and gathering site-specific lessons learned.
All other duties assigned.
After Implementation
Serves as an expert assisting the business and helping ongoing SAP support, serving as a“first line of defense” for ongoing functional/technical or process issues.
This could include troubleshooting production issues, providing resolutions and conducting root cause analysis.
For any expansion, continuous improvement, and other changes, this role would again act as the liaison between the facility and the project leadership, bringing forth any site-specific requirements and participating in design, build, test, deploy, and support activities.
Cross-trains on all processes and functionality across the facilities.
All other duties as assigned.
Education and Experience:
BS/BA in Business, Information Systems, Supply Chain, Logistics or Engineering and a minimum of 3 years of experience using SAP ERP, with S/4HANA experience strongly preferred.
Must have functional expertise in the in-scope“Plan to Manufacture” areas (Demand Planning, Sales and Operations Planning, Production Planning and Detailed Scheduling, Material Requirement Planning, Quality Planning, Quality Inspection, Quality Notifications, Batch Management, Batch Traceability, Plant Maintenance, Production Execution, Shop Floor Integration, and Inventory Management) in the SAP IBP, PPDS, PP, QM, SDM (smart Dairy Management by msg) and MII software components and modules.
This role must gain company-wide functional expertise by possessing a deep and comprehensive knowledge of both enterprise-wide business processes and of SAP ERP (S/4HANA preferred) functionality and related tools/systems.
Strong knowledge of enterprise-wide master data and transaction data objects.
Knowledge of key integration points and adjacent software components.
Experience working in a dairy transformation environment is preferred, but not required.
SAP ERP (S4HANA strongly preferred) full-scale, full-cycle implementation project experience supporting the enablement of enterprise-wide business processes within SAP software is preferred.
Skills and Competencies:
Strong management and leadership skills required.
Ability to be detailed-oriented while still maintaining a big picture perspective.
Must have a solid understanding of corporate-wide functions, specifically how technology supports business processes.
Excellent business acumen.
Highly collaborative work style.
Strong interpersonal skills with the ability to build successful professional working relationships.
Ability to work effectively in a cross-functional, fast-paced project environment.
Exceptional written and oral communication skills.
Ideal candidate must have excellent documentation skills, presentation skills and meeting facilitation skills.
Creative and analytical.
Strong problem solving and conflict resolution skills.
Can do attitude.
Ability to react under pressure to any given situation that may arise, in a professional manner and with positive results, in support of a multi-location, 7 X 24 environment.
Ability to be the liaison between technology and the business.
Ability to work independently, with limited direction, to achieve expected results.
Basic to intermediate Microsoft Office skills, to include MS PowerPoint and MS Excel.
Excellent project management skills.
Female/Minority/Veteran/Disabled
""VERVRAA Federal Contractor""
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'net', 'erp']","['data', 'logist', 'cleans', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'net', 'erp', 'data', 'logist', 'cleans', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Position:
Mortgage Business Analyst- AIVA Trainer
Conducts various types of research and analysis to support the business operations to an internal business segment, division, group or line of business.
Assists management to resolve business issues in an effective and productive manner.
Designs, documents and re-engineers business processes and publishes business metric results.
AIVA Trainer, Business Analyst
You will work alongside other business analysts and report directly to the product manager.
To succeed in this role you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to non-technical users.
GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES
Stays up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Performs requirements analysis.
Document and communicate the results of your efforts.
Gathers critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Performs user acceptance testing.
Manages projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
Updates implementing and maintaining procedures.
EDUCATIONAL GUIDELINES
A Bachelor's degree or equivalent combinations of education, training and work experience.
GENERAL KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES
An understanding of mortgages and mortgage documents is required
Strong Mortgage processing or loan closings background preferred
Knowledge of general business operations, operations, and structure analysis principles
Excellence in standard office software, such as MS Office (Excel, Outlook, etc.
), Visio, etc
Excellent documentation, planning, organizational, and time management skills
A track record of following through on commitments
Excellent verbal and written communication skills to audiences of various levels in the organization and at client organizations (e.g., executive, management, individual contributors)
Willingly shares relevant knowledge and expertise to other resources
Excellent analytical, conceptual, decision-making, problem-solving, interpersonal, team, customer service, negotiation, conflict management and time management skills
Ability to estimate work effort for project sub-plans or small projects and ensure the project is successfully completed
Ability to work independently while delivering high-quality work and meeting planned deadlines
JOB FAMILY LEVEL
Entry-level role.
Basic skills with moderate level of proficiency.
Has general understanding of principles in business analysis and process modeling.
Generally performs single-function tasks that tend to be of small to moderate size and scope.
Works under close to moderate supervision with limited latitude for independent judgment.
Consults with senior peers on non-complex projects to learn through experience.
Typically requires one-to-three years of experience in an analytical and/or problem-solving role.
Philadelphia, PA
Time Type:
Full time
","['ms office', 'excel']","['supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Hi, Please send me your updated resume on rajesh()mastek(.
)com, if you are interested in this position.
Should have experience on defining business requirements of wealth management platform.
Should have experience on working on business architecture of wealth management domain.
Should have experience in requirement management tools i.e.
rally, design tools i.e.
visio.
Should have experience in working in offshore-onsite model.
If you are not the intended recipient of this e-mail please notify the sender immediately and then delete it (including any attachments) from your system
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Title: Automation and Warehousing Business Analyst/Solution Architect
JD:
Automation and Warehousing Business Analyst/Solution Architect:-
· Inspects, troubleshoots and repairs SGV equipment daily.
· Coordinate problem resolution with Engineering, Operations and Controls Technicians.
· Set-up and configure SGV hardware and software.
· Assists Engineers to develop SGV function and design specifications.
· Conduct SGV training for team members as needed.
· Works with MS Windows operating system.
(i.e.
Word, Excel and Access)
· Strong understanding of E-One operating system and DSI.
· Ability to configure database tables using E-One.
· Reviews SGV performance reports to determine nature and scope of problem.
· RF equipment operation and understanding.
· Server knowledge and understanding in order to troubleshoot issues.
· Communicate with and develop vendor relations.
· Works closely with Warehouse Group Leads and Inventory Specialist.
· Utilizes Pallet-Pro to ensure pallet dimensions are within specifications.
· 24/7 remote support of the SGV operation.
· Observes all safety rules and uses the proper PPE at all times.
· Follows necessary GMP, FDA and ISO regulations.
· Performs other duties as necessary when directed to do so.
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'hardwar']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'hardwar']"
BA,"*Business Analyst - LIfe Science (Regulatory)**
+ Log in
*Share this**
Find similar career opportunities
*Business Analyst - LIfe Science (Regulatory)**
*City:** Plymouth Meeting, Pennsylvania, United States
*Position ID:** J1219-0099
*Employment Type:** Full Time
Requirements drafting, workshops, SDLC documentation, UAT Testing etc.
DESIRED QUALIFICATIONS/NON-ESSENTIAL SKILLS REQUIRED
• Fluency in English, additional languages are desirable
• Innovative thinker
\#CGIPhillyMetro
*Skills:**
+ Communication (Oral/Written)
+ Multi-tasking
**
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned** .
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Participate in the elicitation, documentation, analysis and validation of business processes, systems, and solution requirements.
Research components of solutions to problems.
Produce visualization, user experience and configuration elements of solution design.
Document requirements specifications using high-maturity methods, processes and tools.
Support requirements management and change management processes.
Support aspects of the business cycle, including proposals, feasibility studies, and implementations.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
YTnHhIsVws
",[None],"['research', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['research', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Position: SFDC Business Analyst
JD:
Primary Skills
A New IQVIA CRM system is to be built for the Oncology user group in AZ.
AZ is looking forward for a
person who can work on different sets of data such as Alignment, targeting, Employee, Customer, Sampling etc and identify which integrations need to flow into new CRM application.
The person should be able to work with different team to ensure this integrations get built into the new CRM and ndicate if there are any gaps, checking the data sets, validating etc. ""
Secondary Skills
2) Ensure that the similar integrations get built on the new IQVIA CRM application
3) Validation on Data requirements, fit gap analysis
Any Specific Required Skill PM/BA
VEEVA CRM
Data analysis
Good communication skills working with multiple teams
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"ARE YOU READY TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE FUTURE OF HOW LOGISTICS AND SUPPLY CHAIN COMPANIES INCLUDING 3PLS, DIGITAL FORWARDERS, SHIPPERS AND SAAS PROVIDERS INTEGRATE WITH TRADING PARTNERS?
Chain.io is one of the fastest growing logistics technology software companies and has developed an industry leading serverless logistics integration software platform for 3PLs, Digital Forwarders, Shippers and SAAS providers who need to integrate with trading partners.
Clients connect their ERP, TMS, WMS, BI platform or other systems to Chain.io’s cloud based logistics integration software platform and Chain.io handles communicating with the world.
Whether their client’s system communicates in legacy EDI, flat files, XML or the latest and greatest JSON APIs, Chain.io has the solution to solve the problem.
Once a client is connected to Chain.io’s platform, they have access to best practice based integration solutions for sharing purchase orders, ASNs, status updates, documents, invoices, and more.
Chain.io handles all the complexities of transforming messages to the trading partners’ preferred formats.
The Chain.io Platform is the Key to a Client’s Success
Chain.io’s team of supply chain experts has spent decades learning industry best practices inside logistics, retail and software companies to build the ideal software platform.
Chain.io then took that knowledge and built an industry-best integration platform from the ground up to solve the unique challenges of the supply chain industry.
The platform reduces complexity and allows a client to configure connections for common integrations like Purchase Orders, Bookings, ASNs and Invoices with a simple point and click interface.
With pre-built interfaces to common TMS’s, booking platforms, accounting tools, and eCommerce shopping carts, integrations can be set up in as little as 10 minutes.
Challenges and Issues that the Chain.io Platform Solves
Companies building EDI and API Integrations on their own - All of Chain.io’s customers benefit from the common integrations they’ve built to many industry leading solutions.
By running on Chain.io’s cloud platform, clients can leverage the technology to quickly onboard new customers and trading partners without the typical integration project headaches.
Custom Integrations - Chain.io’s microservice architecture allows them to build single use integration endpoints and even fully customized business processes.
Chain.io Headquarters, Compensation and Benefits Overview
Headquarters at 1518 Walnut Street in Philadelphia and is situated in one of the best areas of Philadelphia / Rittenhouse Square and can be easily accessed from SEPTA trains to Suburban Station, SEPTA buses and PATCO.
PTO overview - you are required to use at least 10 days per year with a soft ceiling of 20 days (very flexible if you need to go over).
You will perform detailed requirements analysis, data mappings, document processes, and perform some user acceptance testing.
To succeed in this role, you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to both technical and non-technical users.
Familiarity with supply chain and logistics operations, systems and EDI standards required.
Evaluate supply chain business processes, anticipating requirements, and capturing technical solutions.
Perform requirements analysis to create Statements of Work, User stories, and other technical documentation.
Review or create customer document specifications
Create data transformation mapping documents.
Document and communicate the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicate your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gather critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and produce useful documentation.
Work closely with Project Management and Development team to provide timely updates.
Ensure solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Perform user acceptance testing.
Configuration, communication setup and testing.
Monitor deliverables and ensure timely completion of tasks/projects.
Execute post implementation support on completed projects.
You will report to the VP of Solutions.
Qualifications
● A minimum of 3+ years Supply Chain experience in business analysis or an IT related field.
● Experience analyzing EDI specifications a plus
● Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
● Advanced technical skills, including familiarity with a wide variety of data file types such as XML and JSON.
● Excellent documentation skills.
● Team player willing to collaborate with others to achieve desired outcome.
● Fundamental analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
● Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
● A history of leading and supporting successful projects.
Additional Information
● Please submit your resume by clicking “I’m Interested”
● Phone Interview by Michael C. Bertoni - Chief Recruiting Officer for Chain.io
● Phone Interview with Chain.io VP of Solutions
● Interview with VP of Solutions and CEO / Founder of Chain.io
● Offer
","['erp', 'bi', 'excel', 'cloud']","['logist', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['erp', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'cloud', 'logist', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title
07-Jul-2020
To learn more, visit www.td.com.
Auto req ID
274724BR
Department Overview
Position is in response to enterprise wide Wire Modernization.
Operations, Project, and industry skills / knowledge related to Wire Operations strongly preferred.
Country
United States
Job Requirements
Leads Requirements Management / work packages for Tier 3-4, low to moderate risk and regulatory projects with multiple stakeholders and across multiple LoB
Advanced to expert knowledge of business analysis, project delivery practices and standards across the project life-cycle
Gains/acquires sound to advanced understanding of business and user interaction with technology throughout project delivery
Works independently as the senior or lead business analyst and coaches and guides members within area of expertise
Identifies and leads problem resolution for complex issues at all levels
Contributes to the communication and change management activities across multiple stakeholders
Must be eligible for employment under regulatory standards applicable to the position.
Hours
Standard Business Hours
The Sr Business Analyst plans, manages, leads and oversees the end-to-end delivery of requirements throughout the life-cycle of the project in alignment with the business and/or enterprise needs and strategies.
Provides leadership and works collaboratively with stakeholders including business, technology and finance partners to support project benefits and changes to business processes, policies and systems across single or multiple Lines of Business (LoB).
Inclusiveness
Include your full name, best way to reach you, and the accommodation needed to assist you with the application process.
EOE/Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
Province/State
Maine, New Jersey, South Carolina
City
Lewiston, Lexington, Mount Laurel
Qualifications
Undergraduate degree required
Business Analysis Accreditation is an asset
5+ years related business analysis experience required
Domestic & International Wire (including FX) processing with focus on Operations strongly preferred
Excellent communications, problem-solving and decision making skills.
Knowledge of inbound and outbound wire payment channels including customer facing channels for Commercial, Small Business and Retail customers strongly preferred
Travel - 25% travel locally and to Canada strongly preferred
151 Corley Mill Road, Bates Mill #3 (140 Mill Street), Mt Laurel - 6000 Atrium Way
Business Line
Job Category - Primary
Operations & Underwriting
Job Category(s)
Operations & Underwriting
**Province/State (Primary)
New Jersey
ProvState 2
Maine
ProvState 3
South Carolina
City (Primary)
Mount Laurel
City(s) 2
Lewiston
City(s) 3
Lexington
Job Family
Business Analysis
Time Type
Full Time
Employment Type
Regular
",['excel'],"['risk', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job title: Business Analyst/Data Domain ExpertÂ
Duration: 1+ year
Â
HERE IS WHAT YOU WILL DO:<b>
â Build extensive knowledge on each data domain.
Do plenty of exploratory analysis to understand data elements/ correctness
â Build sample KPI's that might be useful broadly for both product and quality and demo to partnersÂ
â Build domain knowledge on various areas such as IP Video, HSD, xFi etc.,
â Serve as a liaison between internal departments, and external customers to coordinate the reliability, accuracy, and functionality of data changes and/or enhancements.
All requirements will flow through you from syndicated partners
â Work with developers and technical SME's to establish roadmaps for data streams
â Help prioritize data engineering needs for syndicated partners
â Capture and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, business process descriptions, task and workflow analysisÂ
â Evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, and reconciles conflictsÂ
HERE IS WHAT YOU NEED TO BE QUALIFIED:Â
Bachelor's degree or equivalent education/experienceÂ
Master's degree preferred (Economics, Finance, Data Science, Business Administration, Marketing)Â
Must have experience with Media and Entertainment industry
Programming knowledge essential, ideally with Scala, Java, Python etc.,
Good SQL knowledge, good communication, coordination skillsÂ
Up to 2 years of experience
Thorough understanding of operational procedures and systemsÂ
Knowledge of public cloud environments such as AWS/AZURE etc.,
","['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java']","['data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['scala', 'aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'python', 'azur', 'java', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"Position can be remote.
Primary Function
The Business Analyst II may also have some supervisory and leadership responsibilities within the Enterprise Execution Team.
Principal Duties
Organizes and plans the best approach to the business need and guides the business and IT in achieving the best solution including management of complex projects with multiple points of integration and risks
Brings depth of mortgage subject matter expertise, technical knowledge and analytical skills to all tasks and projects
Leads the analysis and documentation on the business need impacts other systems and processes and plans/organizes work for others
Performs complex data collection and analysis needed to compile cost-benefit analysis as part of the project rationalization
Leader in writing use cases, specifications, business requirements and test conditions along with needed process flows and works with the stakeholders to reach approval
Performs hands-on development efforts using rapid application development (citizen developer) frameworks for prototype, testing or production use
Research and gain insight into regulatory changes and requirements that impact the business
Perform and manage vendor/outsource opportunities and analysis – write and review RFI/RFP and responses, work with other groups on due diligence, support ongoing relationship analysis and performance monitoring
Ability to plan, organize, and manage other team member
Accomplishes others duties as assigned
Ability to travel ~20%
Education and Experience Requirements
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent preferred
4+ years of combined experience in mortgage or IT supporting mortgage originations
Knowledge, Skill and Ability Requirements
Understanding and proven experience applying knowledge of downstream and upstream impacts and risks (such as regulatory/compliance concerns, capital markets/pooling considerations) in a mortgage origination business
Creative problem-solver who combines analytical skills with technical proficiencies to deliver quality results
Driven and self-motivated, must be able to provide large output working independently as well as part of team
Performs well in a fast paced team environment and manage/drive multiple requests to successful completion in a prompt and professional manner while communicating issue/status to appropriate stakeholders
Skilled in using Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), utilizing portions from both Waterfall and Agile methodologies
Proven track record of delivering complex projects and documents/requests/changes combined with the ability to be proactive in identifying opportunities for the process and systems changes along with requirements traceability
Proven ability to effectively lead/manage/drive requirement/request meetings, across various business units, with no management oversight needed
Proven ability to clearly articulate, effectively author and present complex requirement documents, including the benefit analysis, both verbally and written
Ability to act as effective leader between/among business departments, senior management and IT/consultants/technology
Ability to manage/participate/lead user acceptance testing and provide training on the new feature/process
Ability to multi-task and adapt to shifting priorities, demands and tight timelines using analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven ability in authoring and analyzing ‘Process Flow’ diagrams – knowledge and experience working in Blue Works is a plus
Enjoy learning and working in a challenging/changing environment
",[None],"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Hi,
Title – SAP EWM Business Analyst
Position – Contract to Hire ( 4 Months Contract and then Hire )
Salary- $Open(Best Possible)
Required Skills:
5 years of experience working in a functional Business Analyst role
3 years of experience with the functionality side of EWM is required
Experience implementing SAP EWM
Lead the business requirements collection and documentation for end-to-end business processes for projects and enhancements
Lead design and oversee development for projects and enhancements
Lead requirements, artifacts, and project documentation, and working with vendors and partners
Work closely with the development team to ensure clear understanding of functional and technical requirements
Proactively work to identify, communicate, and resolve project issues and risks that interfere with the success of a project
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Enterprise Solution Designer
Exp: 12+yrs
Â
Minimum Qualifications:
â Minimum 3 years writing IT requirements experience in a complex work environment
â Proficiency in documenting Use Cases, Requirements, Activity Diagrams and Sequence Diagrams in a technical environment
â Experience conducting/participating in JAD/RAD/AGILE /Waterfall scrum sessions
â Understanding of SOA and experience writing requirements in a SOA environment
â Strong analytical, critical thinking and problem solving skills
â Ability to work and deliver under the pressure of deadlines and commitments to the customer
â Demonstrates professionalism in all areas of work
â Demonstrates superior verbal and written communications skills
â Proficient at time management and meeting deadlines and flexible with changing priorities
Â
Detailed job designs:
Â
Ã The Solution Designer is a member of the Business Sales Technology team engaged on projects as the requirements and analysis phase of the SDLC is concluding, and technical analysis, design and planning is beginning.
The resource must be able to:
Ã Communicate and collaborate with numerous stakeholder groups including executive sponsors, end users, and business analysts, to system analysts, technical architects, software engineers, quality assurance testers and system administrators, ultimately brokering and influencing many different points of view to consensus and clarity.
Ã Quickly assess requirements in various documented artifacts for gaps and ambiguity before a technical design can be fully depended upon.
Ã Understand the technical domain, its enterprise architectures, shared services and common components along with their associated roadmaps, and how each may or may not affect detailed technical design and planning for a set of functional requirements in the later stages of the SDLC.
Ã Produce, describe and present technical design artifacts, include UML diagrams, particularly class diagrams, activity diagrams, sequence diagrams & deployment diagrams.
Â
JOB SUMMARY:
Â
The Solution Designer will be responsible for interfacing withÂbusiness stakeholders to understand their needs, working with various architecture and development teams to create a solution to the business need utilizing application and services infrastructure, and then working with impacted development and testing team(s) to ensure successful delivery of the proposed solution.
Projects will include working with business needs for existing and future products and services leveraging various technology stacks and integrations specifically related to the Business Sales Technologies.
The successful candidate will have excellent communication skills, both written and verbal, and a background in architecture and business/system analysis.
Proven experience in requirements gathering techniques, use case definition, architecture diagramming, sequence diagrams, test planning/execution and system requirement analysis.
Â
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS OF POSITION INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO THE FOLLOWING: *
â Collaborate with business units requesting systems changes to clarify and document business requirements and business process flows
â Partner with Architecture and Development teams to identify feasible solutions and Services that meet the business need
â Document requirements, use cases, architecture diagrams, and sequence diagrams
â Conduct user interviews, JAD sessions, and other forums to define and capture requirements and design of the solution
â Collaborate with technical architects, and development and testing teams to ensure that use cases and system requirements are understood and actionable
â Utilize requirements management tools to maintain traceability between requirements, design elements, and development work
â Present solutions to business requesters, technical architects, development and testing teams
â Make informed decisions and choices based upon priority, business necessity and bottom line impacts
â Assess work effort, provide timelines for completion of work and deliver within set expectations
â Creates regular status reports
Â
Creating and Delivering Solutions
â Solves moderately complex problems; takes a new perspective on existing solutions
â Proven ability to successfully handle multiple projects at one time and drive successful outcome with little supervision
â Responds to demands created by diverse tasks, complicated assignments and/or fluctuating volume of assignments by putting in time and effort necessary to complete the work
â Ability to produce the desired result in accordance with specified standards and department metrics
â Completes work assignments accurately and without substantive errors
â Assures that all aspects of each work assignment are present and properly organized
â Assumes responsibility for quality assurance of their own work
â Owns the project and problem resolution
Â
Working Relationships
â Make informed decisions and choices based upon priority, business necessity and bottom line impacts
â Proven ability to understand business need and key business drivers and translate into technical solutions
â Identifies issues, assesses and communicates risks and mitigations; recognizes and engages escalation efforts as needed
â Ability to develop, maintain and strengthen partnerships with others
â Utilizes resolution skills to negotiate ""win-win"" solutions
â Contributes to the achievement of team goals; team player
â Keeps others fully informed using all available means demonstrating responsiveness and follow-through to customer needs
",['excel'],"['risk', 'sequenc', 'end user', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'sequenc', 'end user', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"· 15+ to 18 years of Techno Functional Business Analyst experience in Med Devices industry with MDR (Medical Devices Regulatory) experience
· Must have technical ability to analyse the data from various source feeds like ERP, PLM or any other desperate source applications
· Must have experience in data analysis, UDI (Unique Data Identification), data quality, cleansing
· Nice to have master data management knowledge
· Good in EXCEL, Documentations of requirements and SDLC experience and working with technical teams
· Must have experience in design thinking and collecting business requirement and good written and Oral communication
","['excel', 'erp']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'erp', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
Cru1EAlESh
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
bEpJTYEwYD
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Hi,
Title –Sr.
SAP PTP Business Analyst
Position – Contract to Hire ( 4 Months Contract and then Hire )
Salary- $Open(Best Possible)
Required Skills:
5 years of experience with SAP implementation in a Business Analyst capacity
3 + years of experience with SAP PTP processes/configuration and integrations with third-party solutions
Experience in supply chain
Lead the SAP systems requirements for supply chain with emphasis on PTP and SAP integrations, with demand planning/forecasting solution
Analyze current needs, anticipate future needs, and provide solutions for integrating business operations on SAP
Design and help with implementation of the SAP programs to meet the current and future business needs, including adding upgrades, installing new systems, or creating custom programs
Define and document all appropriate solution requirements needed for the functional business processes, including working with a third-party integrator to provide oversight on the documentation
",[None],"['forecast', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['forecast', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Hi,
Title Sr. SAP PTP Business Analyst
Position Contract to Hire ( 4 Months Contract and then Hire )
Salary- $Open(Best Possible)
Required Skills:
5 years of experience with SAP implementation in a Business Analyst capacity
3 + years of experience with SAP PTP processes/configuration and integrations with third-party solutions
Experience in supply chain
Lead the SAP systems requirements for supply chain with emphasis on PTP and SAP integrations, with demand planning/forecasting solution
Analyze current needs, anticipate future needs, and provide solutions for integrating business operations on SAP
Design and help with implementation of the SAP programs to meet the current and future business needs, including adding upgrades, installing new systems, or creating custom programs
Define and document all appropriate solution requirements needed for the functional business processes, including working with a third-party integrator to provide oversight on the documentation
",[None],"['forecast', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['forecast', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business AnalystA professional and friendly job-seeker is needed for a Business Analyst position in Philadelphia, PA!
*MUST HAVE SQL EXPERIENCE**
Responsibilities of the Business Analyst include:
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems
Exploring reporting opportunities, developing and monitoring associated data, and identify opportunities for stronger reporting
Supporting project team through all iterations of technical elaboration and development
Effectively communicating complex analytical concepts to non-technical stakeholders to drive data driven decision making
Performing other duties as assigned.
Requirements of the Business Analyst:
Bachelor(TM)s Degree
Experience creating Business Requirement Documents, Functional Requirement Documents and Mapping documents for the development of ETL applications
Extensive SQL experience in writing complex queries across multiple tables, data analysis, and profiling skills for the creation of the mapping documents and further discussion with data modelers for the necessary table designs.
Strong verbal and written communication skills to work with various stakeholders, gather and formulate business requirements and translate the same to the technical team.
Preferred experience with Source-to-Target mapping, health insurance knowledge, and general data warehousing
Support testing and production releases.
Able to work weekend and off-hours support
#LI-CW1
#LI-Remote
",['sql'],"['data', 'optim', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['sql', 'data', 'optim', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Proudly dedicated to serving the federal government.
Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry.
You are:
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for business process and system analysis, design/translating business requirements to technical requirements, testing, troubleshooting, and implementation of components in an enterprise SAP environment.
The SAP Business Analyst will work closely with architects, developers, technical services (i.e.
BASIS, Middleware, Portal) and business analysts to perform business analyst functions and responsibilities .
The SAP Business Analyst is involved in maintenance, enhancement and/or development work of SAP modules and those that interface with other applications.
The SAP Business Analyst has a range of skills and knowledge of the technologies used and applications supported.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide change management and training support.
The SAP Business Analyst is required to participate in pager/on-call support.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide estimates of software development cost and schedule.
The Work:
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members and executives on and across the project team.
Provide SAP application support in a timely manner.
Analyze, design, troubleshooting, and test break/fix requests and enhancements to SAP modules.
Provide change management and training support for SAP enhancements.
Identify, track and resolve issues and risks affecting the SAP application.
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members to gather and interpret functional user/system requirements into system specifications.
Design SAP components to functional and technical programming standards.
Provide support toward installation of application releases into production as directed.
Coordinate and participate in structured peer reviews / walkthroughs.
Create operational documentation.
Perform system, interface, and batch monitoring as required
Meet service commitments for assigned deliverables and proactively provide work status.
Continuously develop industry knowledge and associated skills.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Job Title : Financial Business Analyst
Duration : Long Term
Must Have ::,Broadridge Impact, Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing
Key roles and responsibilities
Partner with Finance subject matter experts to determine detailed Finance requirements
Identify opportunities for process and control improvements
Work with Operations to identify inconsistencies between Finance and Operations requirements
Work with Technology to conduct gap analyses between Finance requirements and the existing FTPS platform (including new build items)
Resolve all inconsistencies and document agreed upon end-to-end requirements and processes
Support the adoption of those requirements and processes within an agile development framework
Define test cases, support test execution and validate output
Define migration strategy including conversion controls
Provide training to new hires
Skills Required
4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services
Strong Fixed Income Accounting knowledge (including Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing)
· Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning the Broadridge IMPACT application in a business analyst role
· Experience in Fixed Income products and processes including accounting, controls and financial regulatory reporting in the North American market
Proven Business analysis skill set: requirement definition, business process mapping, problem solving, data analysis
Experience working within an agile development lifecycle
Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups
· Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills
· Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required
Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome
Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using Microsoft Office applications
Qualifications
Broadridge Impact, Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing
Additional Information
com or 7 3 2 659 1016
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
pkmPXDlDhR
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
56rsW1iv3G
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
zCWjTosfQy
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Position/Title: Information Services Business Analyst, Data and Analytics
Reports to: Sr. Director – Information Services
A. Overview
This summary provides a listing of the knowledge, skills and abilities that are critical components of the position for Information Services Business Analyst, Data and Analytics.
B.
General
This is an FLSA exempt, not eligible for overtime, staff position that will report to Sr. Director – Information Services.
C. Duties and Responsibilities
· Engage with business units across the organization to capture operational reporting and data analytics requirements (e.g.
daily operational dashboard);
· Help internal customers to identify, define and document business problems, uncover opportunities and develop innovative solutions;
· Work with SaaS solution providers to determine data sources and efficient extraction methods;
· Work with cloud-based vendors to develop and implement a data warehouse/data mart solution;
· Provide high-quality and trusted operational business reporting – determine best reporting format(s);
· Determine optimum data delivery methods aligned with business timing including alerts and dashboards (i.e.
data timeliness, quality and consistency);
· Implement data management best practices and standards (e.g.
DMBOK - Data Management Book of Knowledge);
· Develop and implement data classification standards and supporting policies.
Leverage technology capabilities and SaaS application designs to enable standards;
· Develop an analytics platform to inform insights-driven decision-making at all levels of the organization;
· Implement user-driven/desktop operational reporting and analytics tools.
· Other duties as assigned by the Sr. Director of Information Services.
D. Qualifications
· Post-secondary education in business or technology;
· 5-10 years of business experience; 3-5 years experience as a business analyst in a data management or report development related role;
· Commercial airline or aviation industry experience preferred but not required;
· Strong critical-thinking and relationship building skills;
· Proven facilitation and problem-solving skills with customer-centric focus;
· Strong oral and written communication skills;
· Ability to work under pressure in a team environment;
· Embraces opportunities for continuous learning and innovation;
· Strong knowledge of data management principles (e.g.
DAMA DMBOK Framework and Knowledge areas);
· Technical skills and working knowledge for designing, developing and managing data bases/data warehouses and cloud-based business intelligence environments with software solutions such as MS SQL, MS Power BI, and Tableau;
· Knowledge of capabilities and application of advanced technologies including AI; (artificial intelligence) and ML (machine learning);
· Business Analyst designation such as IIBA Certified Business Analyst Professional (CBAP) an asset;
· Data Management certification such as DAMA Certified Data Management Professional (CDMP) an asset;
· Some travel may be required;
· Pass drug and alcohol background checks, pre-employment DOT drug test, and
criminal history records check (CHRC);
· Must possess a valid driver’s license and passport;
· Eligible to work in the United States.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $85,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Day Shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Experience:
business analysis in data management: 3 years (Required)
Business Management: 5 years (Required)
CBAP or CDMP Certification: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
http://www.goeasternair.com
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
","['power bi', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'cloud']","['classif', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'sql', 'tableau', 'cloud', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Title: Senior Business Analyst
The Senior Business Analyst provides strategic business analysis services to business partners.
The focus of this position is to work closely with the business units to gain in-depth understanding of customer's business strategy, processes, services, roadmap and the context in which the business operates.
This role will be key to understanding the documenting capabilities needed to address business challenges.
The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for reviewing assigned business processes from end-to-end to identify and address operational, financial and technological risks.
Identify opportunities to improve efficiency.
Responsibilities will include a full range of activities from leading small to mid-size projects to assisting other project managers on larger more complex projects related to operational business functions that affect team members and providers at the market level.
Principal Duties
Lead or participate in multiple projects by completing and updating project documentation; managing project scope; adjusting schedules when necessary; determining daily priorities; ensuring efficient and on-time delivery of project tasks and milestones; following proper escalation paths; and managing customer and supplier relationships
Provide leadership to team members and peers by collaborating with others; articulating ideas and viewpoints to senior management, peers and others; identifying and initiating projects; managing resources; driving the resolution of issues; and holding self and team accountable for results
Identify, create and facilitate process design changes by conducting business and systems process analysis and design at a complex level; focusing on quality improvement and data management; ensuring data is reliable and valid; developing process improvements or re-engineering and recommending elimination; integrating new systems and processes with existing ones; and partnering with internal and external customers to ensure systems provided meet the long-term business strategies
Engage in conceptualizing solutions in a variety of systems, platforms and tools – choosing the right option for the problem by balancing complexities, risks, speed-to-market and other factors
Active participant in Project review and prioritization process – adding insight to possible solutions, downstream impacts, possible risks, and level-of-effort / cost
Analyze and document how the business need impacts other systems and processes
Perform data collection and analysis needed to compile cost-benefit analysis as part of the project rationalization
Write use cases, specifications, business requirements and test conditions along with needed process flows and works the stakeholders to reach approval
Perform hands-on development efforts using rapid application development (citizen developer) frameworks for prototype, testing or production use
Performs others duties as assigned
Ability to travel ~10%
Education and Experience Requirements
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent preferred
6+ years of combined experience in mortgage or IT supporting mortgage originations
Knowledge, Skill and Ability Requirements
Implements a thorough understanding of mortgage origination and systems involved in all assignments
Able to quickly learn, access complex problems and conceptualize solutions to be deployed through technology or process improvements
Creative problem-solver who combines analytical skills with technical proficiencies to deliver quality results
Works well in a fast paced team environment and manage/drive multiple requests to successful completion in a prompt and professional manner while communicating issue/status to appropriate stakeholders
Ability to mentor other Business Analysts
Skilled in using Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC), utilizing portions from both Waterfall and Agile methodologies
Proven track record of delivering documents/requests/changes combined with the ability to be proactive in identifying opportunities for the process and systems changes along with requirements traceability
Ability to effectively lead/manage/drive requirement/request meetings, across various business units, with minimal management oversight
Ability to clearly articulate, effectively author and present complex requirement documents, including the benefit analysis, both verbally and written
Ability to act as effective leader between/among business departments and IT/consultants/technology
Ability to participate/lead user acceptance testing and provide training on the new feature/process
Ability to multi-task and adapt to shifting priorities, demands and tight timelines using analytical and problem-solving skills
Proven ability in authoring and analyzing ‘Process Flow’ diagrams – knowledge and experience working in Blue Works is a plus
Enjoy learning and working in a challenging/changing environment
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Transaction Advisory Services - Capital Transformation - Operational Transaction Services (Manager), Ernst & Young U.S. LLP, Philadelphia, PA.
Serve as an Operational Transaction Services professional to prepare and execute mergers and acquisition plans to maximize synergies and financial benefits from transactions.
Provide operationally focused support and advice across the transaction life cycle (including carve-out, due diligence and integration), whether supporting an acquirer or seller.
Focus on enhancing value, accelerating implementation and managing operational transaction risk.
Support and advise on operational aspects, from carve-out readiness and support, operational due diligence, synergy assessment and delivery, day-one readiness assessment and 100-day planning, to support the integration process.
Manage and motivate teams of professionals with diverse skills and backgrounds.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Maintain long-term client relationships and networks.
Cultivate business development opportunities.
Full time employment, Monday – Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am – 5:30 pm.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience.
Alternatively, will accept a Master’s degree in Business, Finance, Accounting, Computer Science, Engineering or related field and 4 years of work experience.
Must have 18 Months of experience in business integrations, divestitures, or carve-outs including experience with quantitative and qualitative analysis.
Must have 3 years of experience in conducting assessments of technology, finance, operations, manufacturing, or supply chain infrastructure.
Must have 18 months of experience in the integration or separation of client operations.
Must have 1 year of experience in synthesizing approaches in complex integration or divestiture conflicts.
Requires domestic and international travel up to 80% to serve client needs.
Employer will accept any suitable combination of education, training or experience.
This particular position at Ernst & Young in the United States requires the qualified candidate to be a ""United States worker"" as defined by the U.S. Department of Labor regulations at 20 CFR 656.3.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
",[None],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
These are full-time permanent roles that not only offer a great salary and room for growth, but an excellent benefits package.
The IT Business Analyst will serve in two primary functions:
Supporting existing systems
Responsibilities:
Liaison between software developers and the business units
Capacity to “own” larger projects/implementations in the future
Building and reporting on trends
Required Skills:
3-6 years of IT experience supporting multiple locations
Ability to understand complex technology problems and/or processes with the goal of finding a solution or teaching others
Use of various technology platforms with demonstrated understanding of them
Experience managing projects
Experience working with industrial automation, productivity tracking, or other production technology a plus
Experience with project management tools, techniques and process a plus
Bachelor’s Degree, preferably in Computer Sciences, MIS, or Industrial Engineering or equivalent experience
Strong follow-up skills
Excellent organizational, customer service, and problem-solving skill.
If you are a result-driven IT Business Analyst seeking a wonderful career opportunity, then please send your resume for immediate and confidential consideration.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $70,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year
",['excel'],['busi'],1.0,"['excel', 'busi']"
BA,"POSITION SUMMARY
Professional Services is the companys implementation arm for the accounting systems of AFSVision.
Defined disciplines within Professional Services include batch interfaces, data conversion, system implementation & configuration, general ledger interfaces, loan accounting upgrades, repeatable small projects for clients.
Within the disciplines, Professional Services is responsible for definition, design, construction, implementation, testing thru live and post live support.
Perform advanced business related tasks and analysis associated with Professional Services projects.
This may include aspects of project administration.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
· Responsible for all of, or certain aspects of, a Professional Services project, such as a merger/acquisition, new client implementation, upgrade, interface development or interface on-going client support.
This may include leading an individualized projects or being the lead for the business side of a conversion, upgrade or interface project.
· Perform preliminary project analysis functions.
This may include file analysis and client procedure analysis.
· Gathering and analyzing business requirements and preparation of functional business documents as it relates to a conversion or upgrade project.
These may include data mapping documents, conversion strategy documents, upgrade validation and reconciliation documents, test script development, system administration value design and general ledger design.
· Gathering and analyzing business requirements and preparation of functional business documents as it relates to an interface project.
This may include functional requirements, field mapping, test scripts, use cases.
· Leading an interface production support effort.
This would include issue analysis, new enhancements and related testing of interface results.
· Assist technical team members in understanding business objectives as it relates to their coding efforts.
· Assign to team member subordinates appropriate project tasks within your realm of responsibility.
This may mean taking on certain detailed project tasks yourself.
· Ensure team members understand their responsibilities and monitor their efforts.
Provide guidance as necessary
Discuss open project issues under your area of responsibility.
· Interact with clients as necessary to resolve questions and project issues.
· Provide updates to project management as necessary and work with project management to prioritize and resolve project issues.
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS
Competencies:
· Works independently as well as in a team environment.
Able to direct and/or instruct members of a project team or mentor an individual.
· Requires little or no additional assistance to complete all tasks in a timely, efficient manner.
Must be self-motivated and have a strong ability to multi-task.
· Maintains focus on project priorities, deadlines, and needs.
Understands and follows project methodology.
Is able to prepare project documents with little or no assistance.
· Ability to determine and communicate the impact and scope of change across a project.
· Takes an active role in communicating project needs and has the ability to identify and resolve most issues that arise during a project.
· Assumes an active leadership role and leadership role as assigned.
· Basic understanding of advanced concepts associated with banking and lending.
· Has a good working knowledge of MS Office products, especially MS Access and Excel
· Has a good working knowledge of Professional Services processes and software.
· Able to work hours in excess of normal core working hours, including travel up to 25% as required.
· Ability to interact with Professional Services management, staff and clients in a professional and efficient manner.
· Solid communication and interpersonal skills.
Education:
· Bachelors degree, preferred in accounting or finance or related commercial banking experience.
Experience:
· 5 + years experience working in commensurate commercial banking experience, preferably in commercial loan accounting or commercial lending.
· Competency with MS Office Suite, particularly MS Word, MS Excel and MS Access, MS PowerPoint.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']"
BA,"Section 1: Position Summary
Section 2: Job Functions, Essential Duties and Responsibilities
To identify and deliver service improvement activity across the business through employing process improvement methodologies and the application of innovative thinking.
To work with key business stakeholders to build a continuous improvement environment to support an ongoing program of change
To lead and facilitate improvement based workshops to drive ideas and solutions
To support the delivery of better value and greater efficiency through the identification and elimination of unnecessary complexity within business processes and identification of better ways of working
To identify trends and process variations as part of establishing a continuous improvement monitoring system
To assist in the development and implementation of a best-in-class continuous improvement strategy
To take ownership of change initiatives from evolution/efficiency identification and prioritization with product owners through to project delivery via internal governance and controls
To elicit requirements and drive process change using staff interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, business analysis and workflow analysis
To work with other team members and business services departments to devise new support material based on the revised processes, to include training, reporting, systems enhancements and end-to-end process maps (current and future state)
To actively monitor project risks to foresee/identify potential problems and proactively identify solutions to address in advance
To ensure the business impact and project objectives/dependencies are identified, reported on and managed at all times
To complete post implementation reviews to ensure successful delivery has been achieved and to ensure that improvements can be made for future projects
Section 3: Experience, Skills, Knowledge Requirements
RPA (Robotics Process Automation) experience
Project Management experience related to Bot/Robotic Technology
Minimum accredited Lean Six Sigma Green Belt, preferably Black Belt
Minimum 3-5 years proven continuous improvement analytical experience from a similar role,
including project management and business analysis
3 years minimum project management experience, 5+ years business experience Financial Services and Retirement industry preferred
Demonstrated experience managing or implementing Customer Relationship Management, e-commerce or Business Process Management initiatives
Bachelors Degree or equivalent work experience required, Advanced Degree or certifications a plus
Excellent interpersonal, communication, analytical and problem solving skills
Must be self-motivated, detail oriented and be able to work well within given timeframes and standards
Well rounded individual who can lead operations, service, or marketing related projects.
Ability to work well under pressure with multiple priorities and deadlines
Computer fluency MS Project, Excel, Visio, Powerpoint
Project Management Methodology experience
Demonstrated success in managing the business and financial aspects of projects
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This includes understanding GAAP accounting, reference data requirements, controls along the transaction lifecycle and reporting requirements downstream feeds.
Also expected to support implementation and migration planning including conversion controls.
Key roles and responsibilities Partner with Finance subject matter experts to determine detailed Finance requirements Identify opportunities for process and control improvements Work with Operations to identify inconsistencies between Finance and Operations requirements Work with Technology to conduct gap analyses between Finance requirements and the existing FTPS platform (including new build items) Resolve all inconsistencies and document agreed upon end-to-end requirements and processes Support the adoption of those requirements and processes within an agile development framework Define test cases, support test execution and validate output Define migration strategy including conversion controls Provide training to new hires Skills Required 4+ years of experience working in consulting andor financial services Strong Fixed Income Accounting knowledge (including Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing) Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning the Broadridge IMPACT application in a business analyst role Experience in Fixed Income products and processes including accounting, controls and financial regulatory reporting in the North American market Proven Business analysis skill set requirement definition, business process mapping, problem solving, data analysis Experience working within an agile development lifecycle Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) influencing skills Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support adapt within a changing environment in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using Microsoft Office applications Thanks, and Regards Alex Wilson +1-732 993 6323 alexnam-it.com mailtoalexnam-it.com
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Must have knowledge of products and systems process in order to define and document business systems requirements for business unit.
Ensure systems deliverable is met.
Provide consultation as required through project life cycle.
Collaborate with business leaders, IT groups and vendors to ensure issues communicated clearly and accurately.
The Business Systems Analyst will take a leadership role in working with and liaising with business partners to provide research, analysis and documentation of business process improvement opportunities and business requirements.-Effectively identify, define and document detailed business and system requirements with the involvement of business subject matter experts utilizing the system development life cycle (SDLC) methodology.
Translate requirements into functional specification, including process flow and data model documents.-Integrate technical solutions with the business environment, recognizing systems interdependencies, reusability and ensuring seamless delivery.-Ensure system deliverables meet business requirements by participating in identifying, designing and testing solutions.
Ensure requirements integrity by managing changes to requirements.-Contribute to the development of project plans by providing input to project charters, project deliverables, cost/benefits analysis, time line estimates, scope and control.-Assist with the prioritization of initial feature development and ongoing change requests.-Assist in translating requirements into test conditions and expected results for product, performance, and user acceptance testing.-Serve as a resource for the Business Readiness team during evaluation of training and performance support needs and the design of the training and performance support products.
Provide product, project, operational and business overview, to management in the form of meetings and presentations.
Influence and drive change with cross-functional teams to ensure comprehensive project coverage.- Takes ownership of configuration of system during projects; identify opportunities for improvements in the ongoing processes.-Ability to work independently on assigned tasks; recognizes when help is required and is comfortable asking for assistance.- Ability to work closely with vendors to follow best practices when configuring system-Understands business process across multiple groups and builds scalable solutions-Communicates clearly with technical team members and Works with developers on items that require technical resolution.-Builds positive relationships with the business, both users and managers, and understands their current processes.-Support various Finance and reporting system related projects from a business owner perspective, including concept development, requirement identification, user acceptance testing, and production implementation from a process and operational standpoint-Continuously evaluate BU Operational systems and processes to identify and implement continuous improvement initiatives to stream-line existing processes and improve reporting through better utilization of systems.-Flexibility and attitude to achieve tight deadlines-Flexibility to adapt to changing priorities/deadlines including the ability to multi-task and juggle many competing priorities and deadlines-Proficient use with MS Tools (Visio, MS Projects, Word, Excel and PowerPoint)qualifications:CANDIDATE PROFILE DETAILS:Degree/Certifications Required: BachelorsYears of experience: 5-6yrs*Reason for request/why opened: New and inflight projects ( working on major initiatives )Best Vs Average Candidate ( Background ) :Background: Financial industry / large organization.
Looking for someone who can be aggressive and find their own way (can manage self in a fast-paced environment) and has worked on multiple projects with multiple different teams.MUST HAVE:1.)
Bachelor's Degree (IT is a plus)2.)
Requirement gathering 5-6 yrs.3.)
Project Delivery 3+ yrs.4.)
Documentation Skills - Write system use cases, scenarios, Test Plans 5-6 yrs.5.)
MS Office Tools (PowerPoint, Excel, Word) 5+ yrs.6.)
MS Project Experience 3+ yrs.7.)
SharePoint Support + Administration Experience 1-2 yrs.NICE TO HAVE1.)
Good Working knowledge of SharePoint, be able to provide ongoing SharePoint Site Administration support (can set up pages and sites)2.)
Jira3.)
Knowledge of MQ messaging and Infrastructure4.)
Knowledge of Payment Products - Wires5.)
Knowledge of PAYplusskills:Skills needed for submittalsAny upcoming vacation plans?-Yes or noBachelor's degree in a technical field such as Computer Science, Business Administration, Project...-Yes or noHas this candidate worked as a former client Contractor via SOW?
-Yes or noIs this candidate required to give notice - -Yes or noCreate comprehensive test scenarios, cases and scripts-yearsExperience in project delivery- yearsHands on experience with MS Office suite of tools (Excel, Word, Outlook, PowerPoint)-yearsMS Project- yearsRequirement Gathering-yearsSharePoint Support + Administration Experience- yearsPrevious Client experience-Yes or NoJIRA-yearsKnowledge of MQ messaging and Infrastructure-Yes or noKnowledge of Payment Products - Wires-Yes or noPAYplus (Wires Application)-yearsEqual Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"New businesses are making their way into the market rapidly and this in turn is increasing the competition.
With growing competition and hunger to be the best in industry, there is a need for consistent performance and perseverance to achieve the success in business.
Business Analyst jobs are for those individuals who can play a major role in making things right for the business.
Responsibilities :
Evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Improve systems by studying current practices; designing modifications
Recommend controls by identifying problems; writing improved procedures
Define project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget
Monitor project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
Maintain user confidence and protect operations by keeping information confidential
Required Skills :
Work Well Under Pressure
Communication
Problem Solving
Critical Thinking
Relationship Building
Masters in Computer science/IT
0-3 years of experience
Powered by JazzHR
aHsFrSSaep
",[None],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Participate in the elicitation, documentation, analysis and validation of business processes, systems, and solution requirements.
Research components of solutions to problems.
Produce visualization, user experience and configuration elements of solution design.
Document requirements specifications using high-maturity methods, processes and tools.
Support requirements management and change management processes.
Support aspects of the business cycle, including proposals, feasibility studies, and implementations.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
Sjanw07mPg
",[None],"['research', 'busi', 'visual']",2.0,"['research', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"The selected candidate will be responsible for synthesizing market requirements and working with the development team to deliver an effective solution to meet such requirements.
He/she will also work closely with internal stakeholders such as BAU teams, solution implementers, support personnel, and training/documentation teams-making sure their needs are part of the resulting solution delivery process.
The role will interact with clients by gathering requirements, evaluating potential solutions, considering client specific concerns, and distilling this information into a solution design and will play a pivotal role helping to drive product strategy, design, and development to meet market demand.
SSGS gives asset owners and managers access to the essential financial tools they need to deliver effective investment solutions.
What you will be responsible for
•Actively engages and executes assignments for large and complex business solutions initiatives across Model Office.
•Supports the development of approaches and plans for resolving staff resource constraints/contentions, and creates plans/strategy for building and maintaining subject matter expertise within the business solutions team.
•Promotes business requirements analysis best practices, tools and controls to improve processes and quality of service..
•Assists in development and maintains ongoing repository of business process workflow documentation.
•Drives the creation of business case documentation and requirements analysis for Model Office.
•Partnering with Information Technology ensures proper communication of business requirements to ensure smooth implementation workstreams.
•Develop data and functional requirements and assist in the creation of related estimates
•Participate in information delivery and business intelligence strategy sessions
•Complete data analysis, profiling, and data mappings
•Interface with data experts, data sourcing resources
•Assist in the data validation process
•Write queries
•Assist in the development the conceptual/logical data models with appropriate business
•contexts
•Perform data gap analysis on complex financial data
•Employ analytical, conceptual, and creative thinking skills to improve outcomes
•Study, evaluate, and document current and future business processes while staying aligned
Qualifications:
•Bachelor’s degree in Business, Accounting, Finance, MIS, Information Technology, or related field of study or equivalent, MBA a plus.
•Proven related financial services experience.
•Proven experience with business requirements analysis to meet critical business needs, must display an ability to drive tasks through to completion.
•Demonstrated record of leading others to achieve goals.
•Strong written and oral communication skills, ability to interact and influence peers, managers and senior leaders.
•Excellent interpersonal, communication, facilitation, presentation and negotiation skills.
•Project leadership and project management skills considered a plus.
•Very strong relationship management with demonstrated ability to work across business lines.
•Results oriented ownership mentality.
•Self-motivated, self-assured, and self-managed.
Bachelor's degree in Business, Accounting, Finance, MIS, Information Technology, or related field of study
•Ability to articulate basic project methodology concepts using either SDLC or Agile
•Ability to write SQL code for strong data analysis through queries, data profiling, and data validation exercises
Work, Live and Grow.
Details vary in locations, but you may expect generous medical care, insurance and savings plans among other perks.
You’ll have access to flexible Work Program to help you match your needs.
You will have tools to help balance your professional and personal life, paid volunteer days, matching gift program and access to employee networks that help you stay connected to what matters to you.
Discover more at StateStreet.com/careers
",['sql'],"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['sql', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Summary:
The Senior Marketing Business Analyst reports directly to the VP of Marketing Business Analytics and is responsible for gathering the necessary information and data to provide analysis for marketing needs.
Essential Job Functions:
Analyze & report on the performance of key marketing metrics to gauge trends, benchmarks, and performance of Marketing Campaigns
Derive value by analyzing customer data and identifying marketing opportunities
Partner with internal customers including Call Center and finance colleagues in developing marketing analysis and reports
Execute recurring / Ad hoc direct marketing analysis and dashboards
Creates and maintains documentation regarding all analysis and reporting
Plays a key role in educating the Business on reporting and analytics solutions
Manages and maintains current report catalog including automating manual reports as well as improvements to existing reports.
Manages reporting for additions, modifications or deletions to data and the reporting environment.
Other duties may be assigned
Other Related Duties:
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Supervisory Responsibilities: This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required.
Strong working knowledge of SAS, SQL and Oracle (or similar) relational databases
Experience with marketing analytics and database • Proven analytical skills in data mining, data manipulation, report development and visualization
Proficiency in initiating, establishing and maintaining relationships with the business community
Experience with BI report development tools such as Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS), Tableau, Business Objects, or other data visualization tools
Ability to transform data into a story
Attention to details, ability to QC your own work
Desired but not necessary:
Prior project management experience
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Economics, Finance, Computer Science or related analytical fields
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Proven ability to think creatively in complex situations
Proficiency with Microsoft Office tools (Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)
Must be flexible and comfortable in a fast paced environment with shifting priorities, projects and timelines
Language Skills:
Strong written skill desired.
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or government regulations.
Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals.
Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists.
Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.
#CB
If you seek a sense of community, top training, opportunity for advancement, a comprehensive benefits package and reward and recognition program, look no further.
Employment contingent upon successful completion of background investigation.
Smoke-free workplace.
Drug-free work environment.
Excellent benefits package including medical, dental, vision and 401(k).
All resumes are held in confidence.
Only candidates whose profiles closely match requirements will be contacted during this search.
LENDER NMLS ID:2767
Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'ssr', 'oracl', 'sa', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Support Analyst will provide the Sales Call Center support for daily tasks and functions related to Call Center Reporting and Client/Lead Management.
The BA will oversee the reporting, lead management, monitoring and tracking of all outbound Call Center activities.
Ensures proper analysis, timely delivery, operational and cross functional impact, communication, and risk management
Business Analyst Job Function:
Responsible for monitoring Outbound Telemarketing Campaigns and gathering necessary information and/or data to provide analysis for call center/Sales needs.
Must be able to identify and expedite issues through the proper channels.
Monitor Call Recordings- Ensure that all calls are reflecting the true call result given, and relay any discrepancies
Provides analytical support for special projects: Including Outbound Campaign KPI monitoring and Individual Performance based reports
Work with Key Departments to ensure all functions within the Call Center are operating; Identify these key departments based on the problem/issue to ensure proper resolutions.
Assist in the transition from Interaction Intelligence based Dialing system to Sales Force Based Dialing System.
Business Analyst Qualifications:
Proficiency with Microsoft Office Excel, Business Objects
Knowledge of Sales Force Systems
Skills in complex problem solving, judgment, critical thinking and decision making.
Ability to be highly organized with an emphasis on accuracy and timeliness.
Ability to organize information and have attention to detail and accurately follow procedures.
Ability to QC your own work
Must be able to work rotating evenings and/or weekends if work demands.
Performs any other related duties as required or assigned
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"""This role is currently work-from-home and will move to the office environment after the COVID-19 restrictions are lifted.
must have reliable internet, computer and android or iphone for remote access
Responsibilities:
"" AML Oversight Business Analyst / Project Manager responsible for writing and managing business requirements for large Technology releases and small enhancement (SI) releases.
""
Schedule walkthroughs, prepare audit ready documentation and obtain functional lead approval for Technology Scoping Items (SI) and Major release BRDs.
""
Management of a Release SharePoint containing audit ready documentation.
""
Review global BRDs and engage with operations and other functional teams to determine impact to NAM Cards
"" Manage BRD developments meetings and provide status updates
"" Partner with the AML Global team on all regular Global enhancement releases with development of business requirements
"" To become over time an SME on KYC platform functionality and related requirements
"" Network and build strong effective relationships with key partners including Technology (Compliance Tech and GCT), Global AML PMO, Global AML, Operations, Compliance, IA and CRS/Brands Risk teams
"" Build solid cross-functional relationships
"" Must be a strong values driven leader and a collaborative team member able to engage associates from all levels of the organization
"" Must take initiative and have a ability to influence to drive deliverables to meet milestone dates
Qualifications:
"" 5+ years doing at least one of the following: Project Management, Risk, Operational Risk, Risk Operations or Business Analyst
"" Ability to develop technical Business requirements based on guidance from Technology and Business subject matter experts
"" Some Project Management experience with multiple stakeholders and functional areas within and outside the Cards Business
"" Ability to plan & work independently on required deliverables and deadlines
"" Demonstrated ability to manage and plan in a transitioning environment (developing & establishing business as usual)
"" Able to communicate both conversationally and via presentation clearly the information and actions needed by management at multiple levels
"" Ability to influence to reach consensus across multiple teams with different points of view
"" A good understanding of the Credit Card product and the backend systems that support the product life cycle
"" Ability to understand difficult technology solutions and concepts and be able to explain to Senior Management in a concise but thorough way
"" Bachelor's Degree in related field; advanced degree preferred
"" Strong knowledge of Share point and MS Office including Visio and Project a MUST
"" Working knowledge of SAS, SQL, Client Quality Center a plus
","['ms office', 'sql', 'sa']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'sa', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Finance Business Analyst
Contract
Exposure to accounting and risk management
Through with concepts of Pricing, Valuations, Incomes â i.e Yeild, PV Calculations, Discounting Cash flows, Zero coupons, etc.
Having worked on Middle office Projects as Business analysts on any Post trade platform â preferably Impact
Â
Finance Business Analyst
Contract
Overview
This includes understanding GAAP accounting, reference data requirements, controls along the transaction lifecycle and reporting requirements / downstream feeds.
Also expected to support implementation and migration planning including conversion controls
Key roles and responsibilities
Partner with Finance subject matter experts to determine detailed Finance requirements
Identify opportunities for process and control improvements
Work with Operations to identify inconsistencies between Finance and Operations requirements
Work with Technology to conduct gap analyses between Finance requirements and the existing FTPS platform (including new build items)
Resolve all inconsistencies and document agreed upon end-to-end requirements and processes
Support the adoption of those requirements and processes within an agile development framework
Define test cases, support test execution and validate output
Define migration strategy including conversion controls
Provide training to new hires
Skills Required
4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services
Strong Fixed Income Accounting knowledge (including Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing)
Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning the Broadridge IMPACT application in a business analyst role
Experience in Fixed Income products and processes including accounting, controls and financial regulatory reporting in the North American market
Proven Business analysis skill set: requirement definition, business process mapping, problem solving, data analysis
Experience working within an agile development lifecycle
Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups
Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills
Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required
Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome
Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using Microsoft Office applications
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential function satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Ability to work in a fast paced, challenging environment, among high demands and changing priorities
Proven written and oral communication and ability to interface with senior management
Strong attention to detail
Ability to analyze quantitative and qualitative information and translate into insight
Self-motivated
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelors degree with demonstrated academic achievement (Math, Science, Finance/Economics degrees preferred)
Advanced Excel skills (financial analyses/modeling)
Proficient in Word and PowerPoint
English: Fluent
Previous work/academic experience that entailed problem solving, data driven analysis, statistical analysis, scenario modeling and report generation a strong plus
Language Skills:
Ability to read and comprehend instructions, correspondence, memos, and work place policies.
Ability to analyze, interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, procedures and governmental regulations.
Ability to write professional correspondences.
Ability to write routine business reports.
Mathematical Skills:
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to carry out detailed written and/or verbal instructions.
Ability to solve problems involving concrete variables in standardized situations.
Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations:
None required
Physical Demands:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit and talk or hear.
The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; and reach with hands and arms.
The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.
Work Environment:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.
Employers Rights:
You may be asked by your supervisors or managers to perform other duties.
#CB
#GD
Summary
The Business Analyst, Decision Support is responsible for working with Call Center management to improve overall operations through rigorous quantitative analysis
Essential Job Functions may include:
Conducts ad hoc analyses to help senior management with effective decision making and performance management
Supports the timely and accurate documentation of business processes and analyze downstream impact
Supports the creation and update of capacity models
Supports the creation of the production forecast
Enhances job knowledge by participating in educational opportunities; reading professional publications; maintaining personal networks; participating in professional organizations.
Other Related Duties:
Performs other related duties as assigned.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no direct supervisory responsibilities.
Role may indirectly mentor/coach other finance resources.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'econom', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Position: IT Business Analyst III Department: Reports to: IT Application Delivery Manager
The Analyst designs and maintains systems that allow PLM to best manage its relationships with brokers and insureds through account intelligence and innovative services using technical tools such as: Microsoft Dynamics CRM and Customer Service, Broker Portal, Insured Portal, and customer communications/messaging platform.
This person will identify, analyze and resolve issues and opportunities in a timely and accurate fashion as well as hold responsibility for monitoring customer intelligence and data quality.
As a liaison between the Business and IT, the primary role of the Business Analyst is to translate general business requirements into formal business and functional requirements.
The Business Analyst also supports IT development and testing, plans and executes User Acceptance Testing, and supports the training the business team on integrating the capability into its work processes.
• Stays current on the latest insurance processes and related IT advancements to automate and modernize business processes
• Conducts detailed as-is and to-be analysis and works with business stakeholders and IT to integrate systems into such processes
• Gathers critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports
• Collects business and functional requirements; constructs workflow charts, diagrams, and use cases
• Performs quantitative and qualitative analyses where necessary to support process design leading to optimal efficiency and quality; develops reports and business intelligence analyses to ensure successful ongoing operations, management, and control
• Conducts meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings
• Develops test strategy and plans for projects and participates in the planning, execution and documenting results of functional testing
• Assists in the development and delivery of training for end users in new applications and business processes
• Performs project management as requested working independently or in conjunction with an outsourced or vendor project manager
• Serves as liaison with vendor delivery staff, monitoring deliverables and ensuring timely and quality completion according to requirements
• Other duties as requested
Standards of Performance:
• % of Requirements with First Time Approval/Signoff
• % of Projects with Documented Test Plans
• % On-time Delivery for Projects and Tasks
• # of Tickets within 90 Days Post Implementation
• % User Satisfaction
• % of Business Processes Documented
• % Innovation Score
Skills:
• Excellent analytical and conceptual thinking skills
• Proficient in P&C insurance industry operations, processes, and business terminology
• Ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine solutions
• Fundamental analytical and conceptual thinking skills
• Experience writing traceable business and functional requirements documents
• Demonstrated knowledge of SDLC and agile methodologies
• Familiarity with BABOK and its methodologies
• User experience and use case design and documentation
• SQL Querying experience
• Innovative mindset and ability to invoke change
• Experience with gathering reporting and data requirements
• Excellent oral communications and written documentation skills
• A track record of following through on commitments.
• Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
• Experience leading and facilitating teams
• A history of leading and supporting successful projects
• Experience with business intelligence tools and analytics
• Competency in Microsoft applications
• Competency in Microsoft Visio or other flowcharting tool
• A bachelors degree in business, MIS, or related field or an MBA
• A minimum of five years experience in business analysis with at least three in insurance
","['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Finance Business Analyst
Fulltime role
Should have experience on FI Trade Processing, Client Trade Processing and IMPACT.
Overview
This includes understanding GAAP accounting, reference data requirements, controls along the transaction lifecycle and reporting requirements / downstream feeds.
Also expected to support implementation and migration planning including conversion controls.
Key roles and responsibilities
Partner with Finance subject matter experts to determine detailed Finance requirements
Identify opportunities for process and control improvements
Work with Operations to identify inconsistencies between Finance and Operations requirements
Work with Technology to conduct gap analyses between Finance requirements and the existing FTPS platform (including new build items)
Resolve all inconsistencies and document agreed upon end-to-end requirements and processes
Support the adoption of those requirements and processes within an agile development framework
Define test cases, support test execution and validate output
Define migration strategy including conversion controls
Provide training to new hires
Skills Required
4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services
Strong Fixed Income Accounting knowledge (including Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing)
Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning theClient IMPACTapplication in a business analyst role
Experience inFixed Income productsand processes including accounting, controls and financial regulatory reporting in the North American market
Proven Business analysis skill set: requirement definition, business process mapping, problem solving, data analysis
Experience working within an agile development lifecycle
Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups
Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills
Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required
Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome
Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
Knowledge and experience using Microsoft Office applications
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Details:
Job Title : AML Oversight Business Analyst
Employment Type : W2 hourly
Job Duration : 12 + months
Responsibilities:
AML Oversight Business Analyst / Project Manager responsible for writing and managing business requirements for large Technology releases and small enhancement (SI) releases.
Schedule walkthroughs, prepare audit ready documentation and obtain functional lead approval for Technology Scoping Items (SI) and Major release BRDs.
Management of a Release SharePoint containing audit ready documentation.
Review global BRDs and engage with operations and other functional teams to determine impact to NAM Cards
Manage BRD developments meetings and provide status updates
Partner with the AML Global team on all regular Global enhancement releases with development of business requirements
To become over time an SME on CitiKYC platform functionality and related requirements
Network and build strong effective relationships with key partners including Technology (Compliance Tech and GCT), Global AML PMO, Global AML, Operations, Compliance, IA and CRS/Brands Risk teams
Build solid cross-functional relationships
Must be a strong values driven leader and a collaborative team member able to engage associates from all levels of the organization
Must take initiative and have a ability to influence to drive deliverables to meet milestone dates
Qualifications:
5+ years doing at least one of the following: Project Management, Risk, Operational Risk, Risk Operations or Business Analyst
Ability to develop technical Business requirements based on guidance from Technology and Business subject matter experts
Some Project Management experience with multiple stakeholders and functional areas within and outside the Cards Business
Ability to plan & work independently on required deliverables and deadlines
Demonstrated ability to manage and plan in a transitioning environment (developing & establishing business as usual)
Able to communicate both conversationally and via presentation clearly the information and actions needed by management at multiple levels
Ability to influence to reach consensus across multiple teams with different points of view
A good understanding of the Credit Card product and the backend systems that support the product life cycle
Ability to understand difficult technology solutions and concepts and be able to explain to Senior Management in a concise but thorough way
Bachelor's Degree in related field; advanced degree preferred
Strong knowledge of Share point and MS Office including Visio and Project a MUST
Working knowledge of SAS, SQL, HP Quality Centre a plus
","['ms office', 'sql', 'sa']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'sa', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Working here means being entrepreneurial, thinking big and working together to make the impossible a reality.
A broad pipeline of next-generation medicines is focused principally on four disease areas - breast, ovarian, lung and hematological cancers.
As well as other tumor types, these are being targeted through four key platforms - immunotherapy, the genetic drivers of cancer and resistance, DNA damage repair, and antibody drug conjugates, underpinned by personalized healthcare and biomarker technologies.
This individual will serve as:
A strategic thought partner to the business, involved in identification, tracking, and interpretation of territory, district, and regional data sources (leading and lagging)
A local expert in caveats and limitations for each data source and its interpretation, as well as proactive identification of needed data sources
A fully embedded resource who can adapt local insights to district, regional, or national level and back the other way
A coach and mentor who would elevate the full teams understanding and interpretation of their data and their business
Key responsibilities:
Manage the data analysis for assigned Franchise for the region: partner with the CBD to determine the data needs for the CBD/DSMs and field teams.
Develop weekly/monthly/quarterly trackers & reports based of off this need.
Update these trackers and disseminate to the leadership team.
Embed performance and insights conversations on a regular basis with each regional and district team.
Deepen understanding of utility and caveats for each data source, and what insight and action each data set can best inform.
Collaborate across partner region teams and with national I&A teams to share local, district, & regional insights, as well as to understand national trends and how they may relate to local performance and trends
Participate on weekly leadership calls: Work with CBD & DSMs to develop agendas and disseminate prior to call in order to ensure the team is prepared to engage and participate & their needs are met.
Support analytical preparation, integration & alignment for business review discussions
Essential requirements:
5 years of Oncology field sales experience
Fluency / Expertise with MS Excel & PowerPoint
Ability to travel frequently throughout Region
Excellent communication skills and business acumen
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"* Schedule walkthroughs, prepare audit ready documentation and obtain functional lead approval for Technology Scoping Items (SI) and Major release BRDs.
* Management of a Release SharePoint containing audit ready documentation.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"ARE YOU READY TO CONTRIBUTE TO THE FUTURE OF HOW LOGISTICS AND SUPPLY CHAIN COMPANIES INCLUDING 3PLS, DIGITAL FORWARDERS, SHIPPERS AND SAAS PROVIDERS INTEGRATE WITH TRADING PARTNERS?
Chain.io is one of the fastest growing logistics technology software companies and has developed an industry leading serverless logistics integration software platform for 3PLs, Digital Forwarders, Shippers and SAAS providers who need to integrate with trading partners.
Clients connect their ERP, TMS, WMS, BI platform or other systems to Chain.io’s cloud based logistics integration software platform and Chain.io handles communicating with the world.
Whether their client’s system communicates in legacy EDI, flat files, XML or the latest and greatest JSON APIs, Chain.io has the solution to solve the problem.
Once a client is connected to Chain.io’s platform, they have access to best practice based integration solutions for sharing purchase orders, ASNs, status updates, documents, invoices, and more.
Chain.io handles all the complexities of transforming messages to the trading partners’ preferred formats.
The Chain.io Platform is the Key to a Client’s Success
Chain.io’s team of supply chain experts has spent decades learning industry best practices inside logistics, retail and software companies to build the ideal software platform.
Chain.io then took that knowledge and built an industry-best integration platform from the ground up to solve the unique challenges of the supply chain industry.
The platform reduces complexity and allows a client to configure connections for common integrations like Purchase Orders, Bookings, ASNs and Invoices with a simple point and click interface.
With pre-built interfaces to common TMS’s, booking platforms, accounting tools, and eCommerce shopping carts, integrations can be set up in as little as 10 minutes.
Challenges and Issues that the Chain.io Platform Solves
Companies building EDI and API Integrations on their own - All of Chain.io’s customers benefit from the common integrations they’ve built to many industry leading solutions.
By running on Chain.io’s cloud platform, clients can leverage the technology to quickly onboard new customers and trading partners without the typical integration project headaches.
Custom Integrations - Chain.io’s microservice architecture allows them to build single use integration endpoints and even fully customized business processes.
Chain.io Headquarters, Compensation and Benefits Overview
Headquarters at 1518 Walnut Street in Philadelphia and is situated in one of the best areas of Philadelphia / Rittenhouse Square and can be easily accessed from SEPTA trains to Suburban Station, SEPTA buses and PATCO.
PTO overview - you are required to use at least 10 days per year with a soft ceiling of 20 days (very flexible if you need to go over).
You will perform detailed requirements analysis, data mappings, document processes, and perform some user acceptance testing.
To succeed in this role, you should have a natural analytical way of thinking and be able to explain difficult concepts to both technical and non-technical users.
Familiarity with supply chain and logistics operations, systems and EDI standards required.
Evaluate supply chain business processes, anticipating requirements, and capturing technical solutions.
Perform requirements analysis to create Statements of Work, User stories, and other technical documentation.
Review or create customer document specifications
Create data transformation mapping documents.
Document and communicate the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicate your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gather critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and produce useful documentation.
Work closely with Project Management and Development team to provide timely updates.
Ensure solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Perform user acceptance testing.
Configuration, communication setup and testing.
Monitor deliverables and ensure timely completion of tasks/projects.
Execute post implementation support on completed projects.
You will report to the VP of Solutions.
Qualifications
● A minimum of 3+ years Supply Chain experience in business analysis or an IT related field.
● Experience analyzing EDI specifications a plus
● Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
● Advanced technical skills, including familiarity with a wide variety of data file types such as XML and JSON.
● Excellent documentation skills.
● Team player willing to collaborate with others to achieve desired outcome.
● Fundamental analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
● Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
● A history of leading and supporting successful projects.
Additional Information
● Please submit your resume by clicking “I’m Interested”
● Phone Interview by Michael C. Bertoni - Chief Recruiting Officer for Chain.io
● Phone Interview with Chain.io VP of Solutions
● Interview with VP of Solutions and CEO / Founder of Chain.io
● Offer
","['erp', 'bi', 'excel', 'cloud']","['logist', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['erp', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'cloud', 'logist', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst with Veeva & MedComm
Duration: Long Term Contract
Work very closely with Business Partners to help them in business processes Liaise with Business teams to understand processes and document precisely for NewCo Review SIT scenarios to ensure the proposed SIT scripts are encompassing of all Business requirements
Work closely with the country/regional PoCs for DPOC and MI to resolve any questions that may arise
Ensure all VVMC and IRMS training is accurate for NewCo Help with the communications to VVMC and IRMS users Help develop a support model for VVMC and update the existing model for IRMS for NewCo Develop any business SDLC documents, like SOPs, BCPs, etc.
Should have basic knowledge on Veeva Medcomms Should have basic knowledge on Medical Information Request Management Experience in SDLC documentation
Experience in working with HP ALM Conduct and lead UAT testing by and handling daily calls with UAT team in analyzing the defects and working with dev team to get them resolved Should have excellent communication skills
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title – Functional Business Analyst ( Insurances )
Position – 6+ Months
Note : Candidate has to do Some travel to Skillman, NJ as well.
Requirements
Requirement :
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Business, or equivalent experience
6+ years as a Functional Business Analyst
2+ years working in Insurances Domain.
Strong problem solving and analytical skills
Proven communications and writing ability
Ability to work in a fast‐paced, high volume environment; willingness to do what it takes to meet critical deadlines
Experience working in and leading cross-functional teams (including virtual teams)
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Client: FrontierBPM
Job Title: Pegasystems Business Analyst
Length: 12 months plus
Pay Rate: Market Rate â depends on experience
H1âs and TN-visa candidates are OK.
I would prefer if the candidate can interview in-person, but if you find on out-of-state candidate that will relocate I am ok with that.Â
Responsibilities:
Â Act as a Pegasystems subject matter expert on a project, assisting senior management and key business stakeholders on evaluating current business critical core workstreams, by performing current state assessments against target state to identify people, process, technology, and information gaps relative to these workstreams; elicit and document business requirements.
Â Engage in multiple deployments with minimum supervision and manage deliverables independently.
Â Develop and maintain a customer-focused relationship with business stakeholders and other IT areas by exhibiting a high level of collaboration, timely communication and responsiveness.
Qualifications:
Â Minimum of 8 years of experience as a Business Analyst with a primary focus on Pegasystems suite of tools.
Â Must have at least one Pega certification.
Â Expertise in business process design, business requirements elicitation and documentation,
Â Experience using Pega PRPC and Direct Capture of Objectives (DCO) is a must.
Â Any experience with BPEL (Business Process Execution Language) is a plus.
Â Solid understanding of all phases of the Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC).
Â Experience working in both Waterfall and Agile/SCRUM environments.
Â Experience working on a development project that includes an on/off shore model iterative model is a plus.
Â Experience with pharmaceutical or clinical systems is a plus.
Â Understanding of process engineering methodologies and/or Business Process Management (BPM) and process management principles.
Â Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
Â Strong interpersonal skills and proven track record in working with all levels of an organizationâs technical and business departments.
Â Self-starter, assertive, enthusiastic and ability to multitask in order to complete all project deliverables within a timely manner.
Â Bachelorâs degree is required.
Thanks & regards,
Rajeev (Raj) Agarwal
Sr. Account Manager
Desk: 972-232-4173 Ext: 110<b>E-mail: rajeev@Technocraftsol.com
www.technocraftsol.com | www.xpedantic.com
3974 Brown Park Drive, Suite F Hilliard, Ohio-43026
Partner with XPedantic
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"This includes understanding GAAP accounting, reference data requirements, controls along the transaction lifecycle and reporting requirements / downstream feeds.
Also expected to support implementation and migration planning including conversion controls.
Key roles and responsibilities • Partner with Finance subject matter experts to determine detailed Finance requirements • Identify opportunities for process and control improvements • Work with Operations to identify inconsistencies between Finance and Operations requirements • Work with Technology to conduct gap analyses between Finance requirements and the existing FTPS platform (including new build items) • Resolve all inconsistencies and document agreed upon end-to-end requirements and processes • Support the adoption of those requirements and processes within an agile development framework • Define test cases, support test execution and validate output • Define migration strategy including conversion controls • Provide training to new hires
Skills Required • 4+ years of experience working in consulting and/or financial services • Strong Fixed Income Accounting knowledge (including Mortgage Backed Securities, CMOs, TBAs, Asset Servicing, Fixed Income Financing) • Prior experience of implementing or decommissioning the Client IMPACT application in a business analyst role • Experience in Fixed Income products and processes including accounting, controls and financial regulatory reporting in the North American market • Proven Business analysis skill set: requirement definition, business process mapping, problem solving, data analysis • Experience working within an agile development lifecycle • Experience working with geographically distributed and culturally diverse work-groups • Excellent communication, presentation (both oral and written) & influencing skills • Strong partnership record and ability to build effective business relationships required to leverage parts of the organization as required.
• Effective change management skills.
Ability to support & adapt within a changing environment in matrix and multi-year type project structures where strong influencing skills are required • Proven ability to drive decisions and execute outcome • Proven ability to achieve quality results in a high-pressure, rapidly changing environment requiring flexibility / adaptability to changeable directives.
• Knowledge and experience using Microsoft Office applications
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will serve as a critical member of the team as the Sr. Business Analyst where you will be responsible for leading all analytical work that will inform and drive strategic decisions critical to the relaunch and growth of a business channel.
You will assess pricing, conduct competitive and market analysis, identify insights throughout the customer journey, develop key performance indicators, track leading data attributes and create ongoing reports providing data as well as recommendations to senior management on opportunities to continue to improve results and the customer experience.
Additionally, you will support the development of new partnerships or programs and conduct ad hoc analysis.
What you will do:
Analytics and Scenarios:
Pricing Analysis: Conduct detailed pricing analysis and monitor competitive pricing on an ongoing basis developing a recommendation on a pricing framework for the business.
Partnerships, programs and new products: Provide analysis needed to support Sales strategies and make data-based decisions.
Sales/Marketing: Partner with Marketing, Sales Operations and IT to identify key insights and behavioral trends throughout the customer journey that link lead generation/Sales efforts to business results.
Market assessment: Conduct assessments of market dynamics, consumer insights and competitive activity to inform and drive sales/marketing strategies, product position and strategic partnership selection.
KPI’s and Financials
KPI’s: Identify and visualize key indicators that influence profitability highlighting opportunities to eliminate fallout along the digital journey ultimately resulting in increased sales and reduced costs per unit.
Financials: Provide key data, forecasts and monthly reports necessary to drive decision-making and continuous improvements.
Partner with Finance to provide key metrics necessary for P&L’s and forecasts.
Data
Customer and other data: Work with Sales Operations, Marketing and IT to develop business requirements and support technology solutions needed to store and mine key data attributes.
Develop business requirements for key reporting and analysis.
Data automation, scaling and reliability: As business grows, support any efforts associated with analytical infrastructure needs and data modeling/mining.
Reporting: Design and deliver critical reports that provide a clear understanding of business drivers and opportunities for improved business results or an enhanced customer experience.
You hold a Bachelors Degree in a quantitative or technical field such as Finance, Accounting, Economics, Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics or MIS.
You have at least 5+ years of hands-on working experience in analytics or data science interacting with cross-functional business partners to understand and address business needs.
You have a strong database skills and experience with data visualization tools preferred.
You have strong database skills, particularly with SQL.
You have prior experience working on a Direct to Consumer business in Financial Services is preferred.
You have exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking with the ability to source, distill and analyze large amounts of data to draw meaningful conclusions and strategic implications.
You have advanced skills in Excel and Access.
You possess exceptional communications and presentation skills and the ability to communicate findings and recommendations to all of levels of the organization.
Rest and Relaxation.
Health Benefits.
Multiple medical plan choices, including HSA and FSA options, dental, and vision.
Prepare for your Future.
Paid Parental Leave.
An opportunity for all new parents to embrace this exciting change.
Employee Assistance and Discount Programs.
Pet Insurance.
This role can be based anywhere in the United States.
EEO Statement
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, age, race, color, religious creed, marital status, sexual orientation, national origin, ethnicity, ancestry, citizenship, genetic information, disability, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.
If you are a person with a disability and need assistance in the application process please send an e-mail message to recruitment@radian.biz.
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Summary: The objective of this project is to perform process assessment and process solution design for operations within following focus areas for wholesale lending (syndicated/bilateral loans):
Negative rates
LIBOR transition
Loan IQ implementation
JD:
Consulting bend of mind with excellent communication; should be able to create and present findings to senior client stakeholders
Experience in front to back evaluation of processes, especially wholesale lending processes
Business level understanding (not technical) of platforms like Loan IQ / ACBS is significant advantage e.g.
experience of creating business user test scripts
Understanding of key regulatory drivers in the industry e.g.
LIBOR is an advantage
Skillset:
Excellent verbal and written communications skills and English proficiency
Ability to facilitate meetings and reviews involving internal and external participants.
Excellent time management skills.
Ability to work under pressure and with minimal supervision.
Eye for process improvement and innovation
Commitment to be part of the team and to support others in making the wider team a success.
Ability to manage rapid change in a diverse and fast-paced environment.
Determination and drive to continually follow-up and validate information.
Must take initiative in building a network of contacts within the organization, interfacing with multiple IT groups and business units.
Independent decision-making skills.
Works independently with functional and business units.
Must have:
7-15 Years process assessment and solution identification experience
7-15 Years Knowledge of wholesale lending (syndicated/bilateral loans) industry
Great analytical skill to understand the issue and providing resolution
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Master’s Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and Analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional Organisational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
oCL7liFkzy
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
GoK1lgGKAr
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This includes but is not limited to processing and quality control verifications on all daily trading activity, reconciling client holdings and producing daily trade confirmations.
Other duties include monthly fee assessment, production and distribution of client level reports, procedural documentation and implementation, responding to client requests, problem research and resolution.
Describe the role:
The successful candidate will work closely with colleagues in San Antonio New York, Nashville, London, & Taiwan.
• Understands the business problems / needs from business executives, product managers, operations managers and business users
• Analyzes and documents detailed business requirements including data and non-functional requirements
• Produces test cases and assists Quality Assurance team in testing developed code prior to User Acceptance Testing
• Communicates business requirements to development staff and coordinates the project implementation effort
• Uses a combination of SQL, ACCESS, Excel, and other general IT skills to assess problems and design solutions
• Ensures traceability between business and functional requirements
• Conducts gap analysis and downstream impact exercises for system changes
• Develops and maintains a detailed understanding of business processes and applications, customer needs and priorities
• Makes suggestions on business process improvements to promote business growth and efficiency
• Builds and maintains relationships with key business, IT stakeholders, team members, vendors, and other departments involved in the projects, and manages expectations
• Working with Systems Support teams to resolve user issues
Key Responsibilities Include
• Gathering requirements for new project implementation
• Ability to analyze existing systems along with peers and put together requirements for new features or enhancements
• Build knowledge of business requirements, data models, user interfaces and navigation specifications that bridge business need with systems design/deliverables
Functional Responsibilities Include
• Independent interaction with business users and IT groups to understand requirements
• Collaboration with onshore/offshore developers.
Technical Skills:
• Knowledge of Defined Contributions, Fund of Fund, and Collective Investment Trust
• Strong data analytical and problem-solving skills
• Experience with Structured Query Language (SQL) – needs the ability to query data
• Knowledge of relational databases and concepts
• Ability to understand and interpret complex data relationships and queries
• Able to actively participate in data design/modelling discussions.
• Experience with Jira, SharePoint, and ServiceNow a plus
• MS Office
• Word - Basic knowledge is sufficient
• Excel - Used frequently.
Basic knowledge and experience required.
Strong knowledge and working experience advantageous.
Ability to write VBA macros to aid data analysis
• PowerPoint - Used quite often.
Working experience advantageous
• Visio - Used quite often.
Experience advantageous.
Also, an aptitude for converting hand-drawn diagrams into clear electronic versions
• Access - Experience not required although working understanding of databases potentially useful as role develops
Business Skills:
Understanding of Securities industry and financial instruments are desirable
• Corporate Actions
• Fund Accounting
• Recon
• Portfolio Management
Ability to understand algorithms for performance calculations
Special Knowledge:
Knowledge of mutual funds, financial or business operations including: banking, securities, and bookkeeping- preferred.
San Antonio, Texas
","['ms office', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'jira', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst Lackland AFB, TX (San Antonio) Full-time Job Summary The Business Analyst will serve as a liaison among NAFI stakeholders in order to elicit, analyze, communicate, and validate requirements for changes to business processes and information systems.
Responsibilities Maintain an understanding of business problems and opportunities in the context of contract requirements.
Conduct the elicitation and management of business and system level requirements in an Agile Scrum framework, utilizing industry standard tools to manage requirements.
Conduct scoping, requirements elicitation, business modeling, requirements management, and feasibility and cost benefit analysis.
Recommend solutions that enable NAFI to achieve its goals distinct from financial analysis, project management, quality assurance, organizational development, testing, training documentation development.
Validate that solutions delivered meet the business needs of NAFI.
Produce business analyst technical and functional documents, including case tools based on PMI standards.
Perform other qualified duties as required.
Required Skills Knowledge of DoD or other federal Government contracting, FAR, and related termsregulations.
Knowledge of Government contracts, correspondence, reports, and records.
Knowledge of Project Management Institute (PMI) standards.
Ability to understand and proofread complex system requirements and specifications.
Possesses interpersonal skills to maintain communications and positive relationships with diverse stakeholders, including in a virtual setting.
Attention to detail and ability to handle multiple tasks independently.
Demonstrated proficiency with Microsoft Office (e.g., Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Project).
Qualifications and Education U.S. citizenship required.
Five (5) years of Government project management experience or comparable work experience required.
BA or BS in an associated IT discipline preferred.
Ability to obtain and maintain a U.S. Government National Agency Check with Law and Credit (NACLC) clearance, as required.
Ability to successfully pass employment background andor drug testing checks required.
Valid state Driver's License with acceptable driving record required.
Prior military service or experience working closely with a U.S. military customer, preferred.
PLEASE NOTECandidates interested in relocating to San Antonio, TX (Lackland AFB area - 78236) will be considered.
EEODrug Free Workplace Statement All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status.
All offers of employment will be contingent on applicant passing a pre-employment drug screen.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"(1.)
To maintain the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage.
(2.)
To participate and facilitate the walkthrough' to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements.
(3.)
To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (4.)
To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Best technology is when it brings people together, but it exceeds its best when people together are high tech.
Business Analyst (BA)
Online Training (Remote Training + Real-time exp) available.
Ø Trainees will receive immediate response to any training related queries, either technical or otherwise.
Ø Training sessions are conducted by real-time instructor with real-time examples.
Ø Every training session is recorded and posted to the batch after each weekend class.
1.
2.
Training and Placements for all Valid EAD’s.
3.
Good online training virtual class room environment.
4.
Highly qualified and experienced trainers.
5.
Professional environment.
6.
Special interview training
7.
Training for skill enhancement.
8.
Study material and Lab material provided.
9.
10.
100% Job Assistance and Guidance.
BUSINESS ANALYST COURSE (BA)
1.
INTRODUCTION TO BUSINESS ANALYSIS
2.
PROJECT DEFINITION AND PLANNING
3.
REQUIREMENTS ELICITATION
4.
REQUIREMENTS ANALYSIS
5.
REQUIREMENTS DOCUMENTATION AND MANAGEMENT
6.
BA INVOLVEMENT IN DESIGN AND DEVELOPMENT
7.
BA INVOLVEMENT IN TESTING
8.
RECAP AND SELF-ASSESSMENT
Other Key Points:
Ø Guaranteed Placements with Fortune 500 clients.
Ø H1B Sponsorship for student's visa.
Ø Salary hike for every 6 months on the project.
If you are interested or if you know anyone looking for a change, please feel free to call or email me for details or questions.
I look forward to seeing resumes from you or your known and highly recommended candidates.
Thank You.
---
Thanks & Regards
Sophia B
| Human Resources |
| (Direct) 571-417-7479
",[None],"['recommend', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title
Business Analyst
City
San Antonio, TX
State
TX
Area code
210
Postal Code
78208
Experience
4 years
Skill
Life insurance Domain must
Tax Term
W2
Skills
Experience in Product Setup and Policy Admin System Management
Experience in Insurance Business Process and operations
Thorough understanding of Transactions and Policy Value processing
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Title : Business Analyst]
Resource with 8+ Years of experience in Cards and Payment Processing experience
Ability to work with the customer and define the Business requirement
Document the Business requirement as Stories
Work with the Development team through the course of Design, Development and System Testing
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Develop a thorough understanding of Supply Chain, Production, Inventory and Financial Reporting and Control Processes to play a lead role in both preparing for an ERP implementation and executing an ERP Implementation.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES: ·
Analyze existing Production and Inventory Management system, identify opportunities for rapid improvement, and implement changes through process mapping and training material.
Coordinate and lead process migration to Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) system.
· Interact with users to determine project requirements for new ERP System.
Implement ERP solutions for operations area through process mapping and development of procedures.
Provide routine production support through ERP business solutions.
Resolve issues and develop business solutions to ensure ERP integration with other existing systems with HR, Payroll, Finance.
Assess and continually improve ERP capability per implementation guidelines; optimize system capabilities with business processes.
ADDITONAL DUTIES:
Conduct analysis sessions during implementation of ERP; report timely progress to stakeholders, identify issues and lead resolution efforts.
· Ensure minimum business disruptions and aid customers during ERP integration.
Provide expert technical input, project management, and additional support through system transition and ERP installations, customizations and upgrades.
MEASURES OF PERFORMANCE:
Document and manage Sales & Operations information flows to maximize ERP efficiency in conjunction with business practices.
Design and conduct master data migration from current systems to new ERP system.
Lead and support ERP System training, through the development of training material and leading scheduled and ad hoc training sessions.
Developing and maintaining knowledge expertise in ERP.
QUALIFICATIONS / EXPERIENCE
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business (Accounting) and/or Information Systems from a recognized post-secondary institution; equivalent work experience with software’s and ERP systems will be considered.
Experience in an ERP implementation with Sage experience preferred, but not required.
Experience with software implementations, operational accounting, product distribution and fulfillment, warehouse management, manufacturing, or other applicable business processes.
Experience managing software implementation projects including balancing budget, timeline, scope, and resource availability.
Experience with Project Management.
Excellent communication skills, both written and oral.
Experience with training staff and development training material desired.
EDUCATION:
A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business (Accounting) and/or Information Systems from a recognized post-secondary institution; equivalent work experience with software’s and ERP systems will be considered.
","['erp system', 'erp', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
Xju6ylTYvt
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Candidates must be W2 consultants and no Subcontractors will be considered.
Serves as a liaison between IT and the business line and to analyze business and user needs, document requirements, and resolve complex system problems primarily.
Coordinates development and support for new and existing applications.
Possesses a sound understanding of business systems and industry requirements.
Develops and documents business and functional requirements definition, testing, implementation and support for new and existing systems.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:
• Functions as the liaison between the business line, operations, and the technical areas throughout the project cycle.
• Plays a key role in the planning, testing, and implementation of system enhancements and conversions.
Ensure system enhancements follow the appropriate IT guidelines, meet or exceed user requirements, and are completed in a timely fashion.
• Identifies system requirements, documents business needs and determines development impact to current system processing.
Works with programmers and users to ensure accuracy of requirements.
• Partners with the technical areas in the research and resolution of system and process problems.
• Works with programming resources to ensure development work is completed to specification.
• May be required to perform Quality Assurance activities
Job Requirements:
• Minimum 3-5 years’ experience as Business Analyst
• Experience with Quality Assurance Testing with mobile and web applications
• Significant experience in communication and presentation
• Keen sense of project plan and timing, pays attention to details, ability to drive solutions
• Excellent verbal and written communication, consulting and presentation skills
",['excel'],"['research', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst
Job Type: Contract(W2 Only)
Roles and responsibilities:
Understand and gain knowledge on Standards and Policies and applicable regulatory requirements
Gain working knowledge on Target operating model
Act as a Point of Contact for all the layers of SDM and address all the queries raised by the enterprise users
Manage the SDM services requests, triage and track through remediation
Manage operational aspects of the program including Knowledge management, Onboarding of new resources, Planning and Delivery on time
Escalate issue/queries to SME when required and report them the status periodically
Support other Key projects rollouts and expansion of additional capabilities happening under SDM area
Collaborate and manage the global team to deliver project objectives
Develop and present periodic metrics on the SDM service requests and Support functions
Essential Skills
Candidate is expected to have work experience in data management, data modeling, data governance.
.
Must have good communication skills both written and verbal, must have understanding of data projects running end to end.
Should have team leading skills.
Desirable Skills
SQL, Project Management experience, Technical Project Management
",['sql'],"['data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Coders Data is an incorporated consulting team of designers, developers, and engineers that builds harmonious human experience.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Good experience of relational database systems & using SQL/stored procedures to extract data.
Expertise in processing large datasets for data transformation like data cleansing, scrubbing, profiling.
Interpreting, filtering, cleaning and analyzing data using advanced Excel, Access and SQL.
Working with data structures and algorithms.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
","['excel', 'sql']","['statist', 'data', 'clean', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'statist', 'data', 'clean', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
As a business analyst, you will play an integral role in facilitating this purpose by working across many departments to gather, process, and relay information.
Through your creativity and ability to communicate interpersonally with multiple business contributors, you have the opportunity to advance and earn sustainable bonuses.
If you desire to work with people and operate as a facilitator and mediator to align desired outcomes, then this job could be perfect for you.
Job Responsibilities
Create product tests to determine improvements and assess effectiveness prior to public debut and release of new designs.
Maintain an organized database detailing important analytics, timelines, and goals for reference by executives and other staff members.
Execute occasional audits to assess departmental processes and identify potential improvements to advance organizational efficiency.
Research benchmarking data and develop strategic tactics to improve the overall function of the organization and gain the edge on competitors.
Job Skills & Qualifications
Required
Bachelor's degree
At least 2 years of experience in analysis, reporting, and QA/QC
Ability to use Microsoft Office, particularly Excel, to synthesize analytical and statistical data
Ability to communicate effectively
Preferred
Experience with statistical software like SAS and Python
Experience with forecasting and product pricing
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sa', 'python']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sa', 'python', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist']"
BA,"Basic Job Information
Joborder Id : 987656500
Title : Business Analyst
Position Type : Full Time
No of Opening : 1
Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: Full Time
Business Analysis, Documentation, Testing
6+ years of Business Analysis, Requirement Gathering and testing experience
Excellent project documentation ( Flow Diagram, Requirements, Test Cases, etc ) skills
Knowledge on Consumer Banking applications, if possible on main frame applications like HOGAN
Knowledge on Robotic Process Automation projects, web and data projects
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Able to manage multiple tasks, co-ordinate with various stake holders like Developers, Project Managers, Infrastructure teams, Security teams
Exposure to Agile projects is desirable
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Suggest design solutions (2.)
To participate and facilitate the walkthrough' to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements.
(3.)
To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage.
(4.)
To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.)
To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Duties:
Detailed documentation preparation for requirements, use cases, functional, non- functional requirements.
Creating UML Diagrams.
User Interface prototypes development.
Process flow development.
Conducting JAD sessions.
Designing UI mockups.
Qualifications:
Previous experience in business intelligence, analysis, or another related field.
Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills.
Strong attention to detail.
Master's degree in Business Administration, Management Information Systems, or any related business or IT management field of study that provided the required skills and knowledge, and 6 months of related experience in any position that provided the required skills and abilities.
No travel or telecommuting
Employee privileged benefits are offered.
Powered by JazzHR
hxzHXsczsJ
",[None],"['problem solving', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Strong business analysis skills
Exceptional analytical and organizational skills
Thorough understanding of project lifecycle; full SDLC knowledge
Ability to handle multiple projects
Experience leading stakeholder interviews, requirements workshops, UAT sessions and ability to conduct high level meetings.
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Detail oriented and highly effective documentation skills - Use Cases, workflows (diagrams)
Proficiency in MS Office, visualization tools, SQL
You will be responsible for:
Will work on multiple project initiatives (technology and business)
Eliciting and analyzing needs
Process analysis - understand, capture, validate, simulate, document, and change requirements
Communicating the requirements, and changes, to the project team in conjunction with, or on behalf of, the business
Collaborating with both business and technology groups
Facilitating, eliciting, analyzing, managing, defining, and communicating requirements needed by the business and project team
Ensure all project tracks have awareness and clear understanding of requirements and their impacts to track deliverables
Handle multiple concurrent work streams of business analysis and leverage best-suited methodologies and practices
Powered by JazzHR
Kbvq0rjGAM
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']"
BA,"To be responsible for providing technical guidance / solutions (2.)
To develop and guide the team members in enhancing their technical capabilities and increasing productivity (3.)
TO ensure process compliance in the assigned module| and participate in technical discussions/review.
(4.)
To prepare and submit status reports for minimizing exposure and risks on the project or closure of escalations.
",[None],['risk'],999.0,['risk']
BA,"Business Systems Analyst
Pay Rate: $DOE
Job Type: Contract to Perm
**No 3rd parties / No C2C pls**
The incumbent will work to help define business requirements, software specifications, applications & workflow processes in an Agile environment.
Experience required:
4+ years of Business Systems Analyst experience
2 years of recent Agile environment experience
Proven track record for solid technical documentation
Experience running multiple projects at one time
System Integration project (strongly preferred!)
Preferred experience:
Experience with POS or EMR systems of some type
Cloud experience
Jira/Confluence experience
Managed care or retail healthcare industry experience
Bachelor' s degree
Please send your Word.doc formatted resume to:
talent.manager@techquarry.com
","['jira', 'cloud']","['busi', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['jira', 'cloud', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Position : Business Analyst
Duration: 12+ Months
Minimum 8+ years' experience with Banking & Finance domain as BSA.
Experience working in Auto Finance domain
Excellent presentation skills in Power Point.
Experience working on Telephony technologies (Preferred)
Good knowledge of functions and processes of different business units
Ability to critically evaluate business needs, identify opportunities for improvement and decompose high-level information into detailed requirements
Proficient in major business processes for accounting system
Demonstrated ability to interact and collaborate with key functional business users and ability to guide users towards
Best Practices Perform detailed analysis of business requirements and document the business process flows Create and maintain the Functional Specs documentation and work collaboratively with the team to test and deploy the system changes
Ability to manage and own quality of deliverable to business users
Experience with SDLC process (Software Development Life Cycle) including application development, testing, deployment, operations, documentation
Ability and willingness to work with a global IT team, including other BSAs, Developers, QA and Project Management Detail-oriented, organized, self-motivated and a great team player with excellent interpersonal skills
Expert in handling crucial conversations with the customer coupled with good negotiation and conflict-resolution skills13.
Excellent communication and problem-solving skills, with a try until you succeed attitude
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",['excel'],"['financ', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Lackland AFB, TX (San Antonio)
Full-time
Job Summary
The Business Analyst will serve as a liaison among NAFI stakeholders in order to elicit, analyze, communicate, and validate requirements for changes to business processes and information systems.
Responsibilities
Maintain an understanding of business problems and opportunities in the context of contract requirements.
Conduct the elicitation and management of business and system level requirements in an Agile Scrum framework, utilizing industry standard tools to manage requirements.
Conduct scoping, requirements elicitation, business modeling, requirements management, and feasibility and cost benefit analysis.
Recommend solutions that enable NAFI to achieve its goals distinct from financial analysis,
project management, quality assurance, organizational development, testing, training &
documentation development.
Validate that solutions delivered meet the business needs of NAFI.
Produce business analyst technical and functional documents, including case tools based on PMI standards.
Perform other qualified duties as required.
Required Skills
Knowledge of DoD or other federal Government contracting, FAR, and related terms/regulations.
Knowledge of Government contracts, correspondence, reports, and records.
Knowledge of Project Management Institute (PMI) standards.
Ability to understand and proofread complex system requirements and specifications.
Possesses interpersonal skills to maintain communications and positive relationships with diverse stakeholders, including in a virtual setting.
Attention to detail and ability to handle multiple tasks independently.
Demonstrated proficiency with Microsoft Office (e.g., Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Project).
Qualifications and Education
U.S. citizenship required.
Five (5) years of Government project management experience or comparable work experience required.
BA or BS in an associated IT discipline preferred.
Ability to obtain and maintain a U.S. Government National Agency Check with Law and Credit (NACLC) clearance, as required.
Ability to successfully pass employment background and/or drug testing checks required.
Valid state Driver's License with acceptable driving record required.
Prior military service or experience working closely with a U.S. military customer, preferred.
PLEASE NOTE
Candidates interested in relocating to San Antonio, TX (Lackland AFB area - 78236) will be considered.
EEO/Drug Free Workplace Statement:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment and will not be discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, or protected veteran status.
All offers of employment will be contingent on applicant passing a pre-employment drug screen.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"So you can deliver what matters most.
The Business Analyst analyses an organization and designs its processes and systems, assessing the business model and its integration with technology.
Assesses current state, identifies customer requirements, and defines the future state and/or business solution.
Researches, gathers and synthesizes information.
",[None],"['research', 'busi']",999.0,"['research', 'busi']"
BA,"Works on projects of varying magnitude and helps to ensure the implementation from beginning to end is timely and satisfactory to stakeholders.
Minimum of five (5) years in a large financial institution environment or comparable experience.
Minimum of two (2) years of related experience and/or training as a Business Analyst performing the following activities: (a) Requirements gathering, (b) Use Case generation and documentation, (c) Design of complex solutions using multiple architectures, (d) Generation and documentation of both Functional and Technical Design Documents for use by self and other programming staff.
Minimum of one (1) year hands-on experience designing and implementing technical solutions.
Use of structured application development methodology and principals, understanding of structured environments using distinct development, test, and production.
Work in a team environment, meet deadlines, and take on a high level of responsibility and accountability environments.
Superb critical thinking, analytical, interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills.
Excellent organizational skills with the ability to pay close attention to details.Experience with Fidelity Information Systems' ""Systematics"" banking software product suite.
Proven experience in participating/coordinating multiple simultaneous projects and ability to work with general supervision.
",['excel'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'supervis', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"If this sounds like you, please read on.
About the Business Analyst Role
Review business requirements with project teams to propose and produce technical documentation such as data architecture, data modeling, data dictionary, source to target mapping with transformation rules, ETL data flow design, and test cases.
Experienced Business Analysts good at data analysis, use case documentation.
Participate in the Agile development process to develop automated data pipes.
Optimize queries, data aggregations, and data pipes and improve data models in order to optimize and improve data delivery performance.
Responsibilities
· Gather requirements from JAD sessions with business users.
· Design and develop Activity Diagrams, Sequence Diagrams, and OOD to represent the requirements to communicate the information effectively with users, developers and testers.
· Work closely with business users, subject matter experts to understand and document functional and non-functional requirements for various use cases.
· Identify/document data sources and transformation rules required to populate and maintain data warehouse content.
· Reverse engineer ETL jobs, Reports, SQL scripts to capture rules and build end-end mapping sheet.
· Review and analyze data and data models including reports to augment the requirement for use cases with technical information for facilitating development and data modeling activities.
· Partner with data modeler to facilitate design and build of conceptual, logical and physical data models for Data Marts and the Data Warehouse.
· Conduct meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings to stakeholders and team members.
· Effectively communicate insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
· Be involved in formatting data stores and generate UML diagrams of logical and physical data assets.
· Write data analysis SQL queries to profile and document metadata to analyze data and augment key inputs required for data modeling and ETL build activities.
· Perform extensive requirement analysis, develop use cases and workflows.
· Play key role in the planning, User Acceptance Testing, and Implementation of system enhancements and conversions.
· Develop strategic partnerships with the business units to develop a solid knowledge base of the business line including the business plan, products, process and revenue streams.
· Parsing high-level design specification to simple ETL coding and mapping standards.
· Develop business requirement specification documents as well as high-level project plan.
Requirements
· Bachelor's Degree or master’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics.
· 10+ years of experience working as Business Analysts.
· 6+ years of experience in T-SQL and multiple databases like SQL Server, Oracle.
· 3+ years of experience in Informatica and other ETL tools.
· 5+ years of experience in Reporting tool like MicroStrategy and Tableau.
· Experience Hadoop / Big Data Technologies and Cloud – Azure.
· Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
· Conducted benchmarking activities to identify best practices.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Salary: $65.00 - $70.00 per hour
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analysis: 8 years (Required)
data warehouse: 10 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
San Antonio, TX (Required)
www.gathi.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['etl', 'big data', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'hadoop', 'azur', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'etl', 'big data', 'sequenc', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Masterâs Degree related to Information Technology
Strong business analysis skills
Exceptional analytical and organizational skills
Thorough understanding of project lifecycle; full SDLC knowledge
Ability to handle multiple projects
Experience leading stakeholder interviews, requirements workshops, UAT sessions and ability to conduct high level meetings.
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Detail oriented and highly effective documentation skills - Use Cases, workflows (diagrams)
Proficiency in MS Office, visualization tools, SQL
You will be responsible for:
Will work on multiple project initiatives (technology and business)
Eliciting and analyzing needs
Process analysis - understand, capture, validate, simulate, document, and change requirements
Communicating the requirements, and changes, to the project team in conjunction with, or on behalf of, the business
Collaborating with both business and technology groups
Facilitating, eliciting, analyzing, managing, defining, and communicating requirements needed by the business and project team
Ensure all project tracks have awareness and clear understanding of requirements and their impacts to track deliverables
Handle multiple concurrent work streams of business analysis and leverage best-suited methodologies and practices
Powered by JazzHR
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']"
BA,"• Involved in Business Analysis, requirements gathering using the SDLC and Agile model.• Ability to convert business requirements into technical specifications.
• User Acceptance Testing - Collaborates with stakeholder in testing for acceptance of end user business solution.
• Business Relationship Management - Ability to engage business sponsors and contribute to their targeted business outcomes
Job Requirements:
• Should have worked on UI side of things
• Experience with identity management - SSO, federation, identity & access management
",[None],"['end user', 'busi']",999.0,"['end user', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirements:
Project management,
Task and organizational management
Basic risk and controls knowledge
Technology:
Microsoft Word
Microsoft Excel
Microsoft Visio
Responsibilities:
Organize and format reports for distribution
Create or modify procedural documents using good grammar, spelling, and adhering to template formatting
Assist with planning, implementation, monitoring and support of business information systems across multiple departments
Ensure the business data and reporting needs are met
Develop and monitor data quality metrics
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
OaJALBjMfr
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Business Analyst, Senior must have experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment while considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks and schedule concerns.
Requirements:
A Bachelor’s Degree (Operations Research, Mathematics, Computer Science, Cost Accounting or related scientific or technical discipline).
Five years of experience is required.
(8 years of additional relevant experience may be substituted for education).
Full Benefit Package to include:
• Paid PTO and sick leave (15 days initially)
• Paid Federal Government Holidays
• 100% Medical premium for employee
• 100% Dental and Vision
• 100% paid Life, short and long-term disability insurance for employee
• 401K
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi']"
BA,"Masterâs Degree related to Information Technology
Strong business analysis skills
Exceptional analytical and organizational skills
Thorough understanding of project lifecycle; full SDLC knowledge
Ability to handle multiple projects
Experience leading stakeholder interviews, requirements workshops, UAT sessions and ability to conduct high level meetings.
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Detail oriented and highly effective documentation skills - Use Cases, workflows (diagrams)
Proficiency in MS Office, visualization tools, SQL
You will be responsible for:
Will work on multiple project initiatives (technology and business)
Eliciting and analyzing needs
Process analysis - understand, capture, validate, simulate, document, and change requirements
Communicating the requirements, and changes, to the project team in conjunction with, or on behalf of, the business
Collaborating with both business and technology groups
Facilitating, eliciting, analyzing, managing, defining, and communicating requirements needed by the business and project team
Ensure all project tracks have awareness and clear understanding of requirements and their impacts to track deliverables
Handle multiple concurrent work streams of business analysis and leverage best-suited methodologies and practices
Powered by JazzHR
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']"
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Masterâs Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional organizational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Qualified candidates will have the following qualifications:**Credit Risk**+ **Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired.
**+ **Prior experience in a 1st or 2nd line Credit Analyst function**Responsibilities:Provide guidance and credible challenge to the Credit Card Credit Risk strategies through analytics.
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau .
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high pressure execution oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken.
**Preferred Skills:**+ 5+ years of experience developing Credit Card strategies in a large financial institution or bank+ strong technical programming experience in R. Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired.+ Experience communicating to senior leadership with the ability to influence+ Proven ability to be a self-starter, independent and critical thinker, and problem solver+ Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills+ Experience working as part of a team+ Prior experience in a 1st or 2nd line Credit Analyst functionlocation: SAN ANTONIO, Texasjob type: Contractwork hours: 8am to 5pmeducation: Bachelorsresponsibilities:Provide guidance and credible challenge to the Credit Card Credit Risk strategies through analytics.
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau .
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high pressure execution oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken.qualifications:+ Experience level: Experienced+ Minimum 3 years of experience+ Education: Bachelorsskills:+ Business Analysis+ SQL (2 years of experience is required)+ Python (2 years of experience is required)Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
","['tableau', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
awRzgNU8u7
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Resource with 8+ years of experience in Cards and Payment Processing experience.
Ability to work with the customer and define the Business requirement.
Document the Business requirement as Stories.
Work with the Development team through the course of Design, Development and System Testing.
Mandatory Skills:
Cards and Payment Processing experience.
Finance industry exposure.
",[None],"['financ', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'busi']"
BA,"Qualified candidates will have the following qualifications: **Automation of Credit Business** + **strong experience automating reporting from manual process using Tableau** + **strong technical programming experience in R. Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired.
** + **Prior experience in a 1st or 2nd line Credit Analyst function** Responsibilities: Provide guidance and credible challenge to the Credit Card Credit Risk strategies through analytics.
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau .
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high pressure execution oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken.
**Preferred Skills:** + 5+ years of experience developing Credit Card strategies in a large financial institution or bank + strong technical programming experience in R. Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired.
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau .
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high pressure execution oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken.
qualifications: + Experience level: Experienced + Minimum 3 years of experience + Education: Bachelors skills: + Business Analysis + SQL (2 years of experience is required) + Python (2 years of experience is required) + Tableau (2 years of experience is required) + credit risk Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.
","['tableau', 'sql', 'sa', 'python']","['risk', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'sa', 'python', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Job #: 1070627
Title: Pega Business Analyst - Lead
Starts remote then would move to onsite
Duration: 1 year contract with potential to extend/convert
Here, you will make an impact by:
Actively participates in AGILE process for Pega deployment to the Advantage Center's Order to Cash business area – they are going to be in stand up calls daily / dealing with onshore and offshore resources
Develops process maps, user stories, UI Mockups to gain agreement and prove understanding of business need and process requirements.
Works closely with onshore and offshore teams to ensure the solution is technically feasible and to identify areas to reduce implementation efforts.
Assists in product demos, UAT testing, and quality management reviews and helps ensure that all business and design requirements are met.
Plays an active role in configuring and testing the solution and supporting the technical team for any OOTB (out of the box) and custom development required for custom code they want to develop
Required Skills:
Bachelor's Degree or higher from an accredited institution
Need to be comfortable with Agile – this resource will be working w/ onshore and offshore sprint teams, so experience working in both of those environments.
2+ years of Pega project experience
2+ years of Business Analysis and Business Process Design experience
5+ years’ experience in contact centers, medical collections, medical claims processing, health administration, medical device, pharmaceuticals operations, health insurance, order to cash business processes, finance, or revenue cycle.
Nice to Have:
Certified Pega Business Architect (CPBA)
Pega Certified Architect or Senior Architect
Lean Six Sigma GB or BB
Background in medical, finance, or banking industry
If this position is something of interest to you, please send over your most up to date resume to Patrick Herbelin at pherbelin@apexsystems.com
EEO Employer
",[None],"['financ', 'busi']",1.0,"['financ', 'busi']"
BA,"Prior experience in Life Sciences domain is must
Acts as an consulting resource for business partners and broader analyst community for applying leading techniques, interpreting data
Understanding implications for business function strategy, tactics and ongoing operations
Creates and manages complex dashboards, using insights from data exploration to build comprehensive findings with advanced and effective visualizations (using Tableau) and insights
Demonstrate forward thinking by anticipating and remediating potential roadblocks, comprehending the bigger picture of the business strategy
Communicate and collaborate effectively with Offshore and Client
Develop actionable insight presentations for business partners and answers complex/unique questions
Develop a close collaboration with technology partners to strengthen alignment between business data applications, implications and technical architecture
Advanced analytical and quantitative skills with the ability to navigate large and complex data sets making insightful observations and identifying relevant patterns
Excellent communication skills with executives and other internal stakeholders, catering to various levels of analytical proficiency
Ability to work independently and collaboratively, as required, in a fast-paced, matrixed, team environment consisting of internal and external team members
Excellent planning, organization and time management skills including the ability to support and prioritize multiple projects
Prior experience with Data Lake, Tableau, SQL or other related programming languages is preferred
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Includes developing a thorough understanding of the client's requirements then applying industry best practices and detailed knowledge of ServiceNow to design an optimal solution which supports the business process meeting or exceeding the functional requirements.
Builds a trusting relationship with major project stakeholders and leads them to adoption of the best solution.
Supports organizational change management (OCM) efforts by providing information on the ""to be"" solution.
Leads quality management reviews and ensures all business and design requirements are met.
Conducts application and implemented business processes demonstrations to stakeholders; may support preparation of training material and provide user training.The ServiceNow Senior Business Analyst will work closely with the Solution/Technical Architect to ensure the solution is technically feasible and to identify areas to reduce implementation efforts.
Validates the configuration of business data and supports the technical team for any required custom development.
Assist or lead test plan development and execution including conducting user acceptance testing ensuring implementation meets client's requirements.
",[None],"['optim', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['optim', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
The Workforce Services team oversees the delivery of services that technologically enable core HR functions, including: workforce planning, recruitment and onboarding, training and development, compensation and payroll, benefits admin, employee relations, and performance management.
You will shepherd your features from backlog through dev, business verification and release.
Should consumers of live workforce services run in to trouble, you will be on point to provide exemplary support.
Job Responsibilities
Understanding and assessing as-is business process workflows and user experiences
Eliciting new business requirements and envisioning improved service offerings
Conducting value analysis and justification to inform strategic priorities
Developing detailed product requirements, data specs and acceptance criteria
Directing the implementation of Workday HCM configuration changes and integrations
Facilitating business stakeholder verification and end user acceptance testing
Managing release comms and the rollout of new service capabilities and features
Capturing and addressing end user service requests and support inquires
Documenting and publishing solutions to commonly reported issues
Monitoring the state of critical transactions, integrations and operational jobs
Informing stakeholders and end users of service disruptions and resolution status
Evaluating new business apps, data services and tools
Job Qualifications
Education and Certifications
Bachelor's degree in a relevant field (preferably business administration, information systems, or computer science) or comparable work experience
Work Experience
3+ years full-time employment in technology-related roles (i.e., technology consulting, corporate IT, tech startup)
2+ years consulting with customers/stakeholders, understanding business needs, and prescribing technology solutions
2+ years contributing to the delivery of enterprise-class business software, technology services and/or support
2+ years developing business requirements and technical specs at progressive levels of detail (i.e., epics, features, user stories)
2+ years utilizing agile delivery methods, practices, and frameworks (ie., Scrum, Kanban, FDD, Lean)
1+ years developing domain knowledge of core HR business functions, processes and enabling technologies
1+ years working with Workday HCM and/or other cloud-based ERP/HR software platforms and services
Skills
Strong organizational / time management skills, and be detailed oriented.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Self-starter with a diligent work ethic and demonstrated flexibility
Able to multi-task and stay calm under pressure
Competencies
Business Acumen: Knows how businesses work; knowledgeable in current and possible future policies, practices, trends, technology, and information affecting his/her business and organization; knows the competition; is aware of how strategies and tactics work in the marketplace.
Customer Focus: Is dedicated to meeting the expectations and requirements of internal and external customers; gets first-hand customer information and uses it for improvements in products and services; acts with customers in mind; establishes and maintains effective relationships with customers and gains their trust and respect.
Process Management: Good at figuring out the processes necessary to get things done; knows how to organize people and activities; understands how to separate and combine tasks into efficient work flow; knows what to measure and how to measure it; can see opportunities for synergy and integration where others can't; can simplify complex processes; gets more out of fewer resources.
Creativity: Comes up with a lot of new and unique ideas; easily makes connections among previously unrelated notions; tends to be seen as original and value-added in brainstorming settings.
Problem Solving: Uses rigorous logic and methods to solve difficult problems with effective solutions; probes all fruitful sources for answers; can see hidden problems; is excellent at honest analysis; looks beyond the obvious and doesn't stop at the first answers.
Functional/Technical Skills: Has the functional and technical knowledge and skills to do the job at a high level of accomplishment.
San Antonio, TX: 20880 Stone Oak Parkway, 78258
Position Type
Regular
Click here to learn about E-Verify.
","['erp', 'excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"organizations.
breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety,
civilian and military health organizations.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Master’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
KK4RuWEJrT
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyoneâs common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Job Function(s):
Provide guidance and credible challenge to the Credit Card Credit Risk strategies through analytics
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high-pressure execution-oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken
REQUIREMENTS:
Credit Risk:
Preferred Skills:
5+ years of experience developing Credit Card strategies in a large financial institution or bank
Strong technical programming experience in R; Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired
Experience communicating to senior leadership with the ability to influence
Proven ability to be a self-starter, independent and critical thinker, and problem solver
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills
Experience working as part of a team
Prior experience in Credit Analyst function
Automation:
Preferred Skills:
Strong experience automating reporting from manual process using Tableau
Strong technical programming experience
Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired
Proven ability to be a self-starter, independent and critical thinker, and problem solver
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills
Experience working as part of a team
Prior experience in a 1st or 2nd line Credit Analyst function
Knowledge:
Expertise in Credit Risk within large financial institutions; 5 to 10 years of experience
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['risk', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'risk', 'commun']"
BA,"Assesses current state, identifies customer requirements, and defines the future state and/or business solution.
Researches, gathers and synthesizes information.
",[None],"['research', 'busi']",999.0,"['research', 'busi']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyoneâs common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Proudly dedicated to serving the federal government.
Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry.
You are:
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for business process and system analysis, design/translating business requirements to technical requirements, testing, troubleshooting, and implementation of components in an enterprise SAP environment.
The SAP Business Analyst will work closely with architects, developers, technical services (i.e.
BASIS, Middleware, Portal) and business analysts to perform business analyst functions and responsibilities .
The SAP Business Analyst is involved in maintenance, enhancement and/or development work of SAP modules and those that interface with other applications.
The SAP Business Analyst has a range of skills and knowledge of the technologies used and applications supported.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide change management and training support.
The SAP Business Analyst is required to participate in pager/on-call support.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide estimates of software development cost and schedule.
The Work:
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members and executives on and across the project team.
Provide SAP application support in a timely manner.
Analyze, design, troubleshooting, and test break/fix requests and enhancements to SAP modules.
Provide change management and training support for SAP enhancements.
Identify, track and resolve issues and risks affecting the SAP application.
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members to gather and interpret functional user/system requirements into system specifications.
Design SAP components to functional and technical programming standards.
Provide support toward installation of application releases into production as directed.
Coordinate and participate in structured peer reviews / walkthroughs.
Create operational documentation.
Perform system, interface, and batch monitoring as required
Meet service commitments for assigned deliverables and proactively provide work status.
Continuously develop industry knowledge and associated skills.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Job Function(s):
Provide guidance and credible challenge to the Credit Card Credit Risk strategies through analytics
Once Credit Card team is able to backfill current positions, then shift work to automate reporting through Tableau
Must be able to handle fast-paced, often high-pressure execution-oriented environment with high degree of accuracy and attention to detail, and document actions taken
REQUIREMENTS:
Credit Risk:
Preferred Skills:
5+ years of experience developing Credit Card strategies in a large financial institution or bank
Strong technical programming experience in R; Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired
Experience communicating to senior leadership with the ability to influence
Proven ability to be a self-starter, independent and critical thinker, and problem solver
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills
Experience working as part of a team
Prior experience in Credit Analyst function
Automation:
Preferred Skills:
Strong experience automating reporting from manual process using Tableau
Strong technical programming experience
Experience in SQL, Python, SAS also highly desired
Proven ability to be a self-starter, independent and critical thinker, and problem solver
Demonstrated strong interpersonal skills
Experience working as part of a team
Prior experience in a 1st or 2nd line Credit Analyst function
Knowledge:
Expertise in Credit Risk within large financial institutions; 5 to 10 years of experience
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa']","['risk', 'commun']",1.0,"['sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'risk', 'commun']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Proudly dedicated to serving the federal government.
Solving big problems using the latest tech, serious brain power, and deep knowledge of just about every industry.
You are:
The SAP Business Analyst is responsible for business process and system analysis, design/translating business requirements to technical requirements, testing, troubleshooting, and implementation of components in an enterprise SAP environment.
The SAP Business Analyst will work closely with architects, developers, technical services (i.e.
BASIS, Middleware, Portal) and business analysts to perform business analyst functions and resposbilities .
The SAP Business Analyst is involved in maintenance, enhancement and/or development work of SAP modules and those that interface with other applications.
The SAP Business Analyst has a range of skills and knowledge of the technologies used and applications supported.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide change management and training support.
The SAP Business Analyst is required to participate in pager/on-call support.
The SAP Business Analyst will provide estimates of software development cost and schedule.
The Work:
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members and executives on and across the project team.
Provide SAP application support in a timely manner.
Analyze, design, troubleshooting, and test break/fix requests and enhancements to SAP modules.
Provide change management and training support for SAP enhancements.
Identify, track and resolve issues and risks affecting the SAP application.
Work with Client, Accenture, and Teaming Partner team members to gather and interpret functional user/system requirements into system specifications.
Design SAP components to functional and technical programming standards.
Provide support toward installation of application releases into production as directed.
Coordinate and participate in structured peer reviews / walkthroughs.
Create operational documentation.
Perform system, interface, and batch monitoring as required
Meet service commitments for assigned deliverables and proactively provide work status.
Continuously develop industry knowledge and associated skills.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Masterâs Degree related to Information Technology
Strong business analysis skills
Exceptional analytical and organizational skills
Thorough understanding of project lifecycle; full SDLC knowledge
Ability to handle multiple projects
Experience leading stakeholder interviews, requirements workshops, UAT sessions and ability to conduct high level meetings.
Excellent oral and written communication skills
Detail oriented and highly effective documentation skills - Use Cases, workflows (diagrams)
Proficiency in MS Office, visualization tools, SQL
You will be responsible for:
Will work on multiple project initiatives (technology and business)
Eliciting and analyzing needs
Process analysis - understand, capture, validate, simulate, document, and change requirements
Communicating the requirements, and changes, to the project team in conjunction with, or on behalf of, the business
Collaborating with both business and technology groups
Facilitating, eliciting, analyzing, managing, defining, and communicating requirements needed by the business and project team
Ensure all project tracks have awareness and clear understanding of requirements and their impacts to track deliverables
Handle multiple concurrent work streams of business analysis and leverage best-suited methodologies and practices
Powered by JazzHR
","['ms office', 'excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'visual']"
BA,"Includes developing a thorough understanding of the client's requirements then applying industry best practices and detailed knowledge of ServiceNow to design an optimal solution which supports the business process meeting or exceeding the functional requirements.
Builds a trusting relationship with major project stakeholders and leads them to adoption of the best solution.
Supports organizational change management (OCM) efforts by providing information on the ""to be"" solution.
Leads quality management reviews and ensures all business and design requirements are met.
Conducts application and implemented business processes demonstrations to stakeholders; may support preparation of training material and provide user training.The ServiceNow Senior Business Analyst will work closely with the Solution/Technical Architect to ensure the solution is technically feasible and to identify areas to reduce implementation efforts.
Validates the configuration of business data and supports the technical team for any required custom development.
Assist or lead test plan development and execution including conducting user acceptance testing ensuring implementation meets client's requirements.
",[None],"['optim', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['optim', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"PNC Claims Insurance experience is MUST.
Business System Analyst experience who is well versed in Agile methodology.
E2E BSA proficient in eliciting requirements from the Business stakeholders and converting them into technical requirements for the development Team
BSA should co-ordinate with multiple teams , build strategic relationships with them to get the work completed on time
BSA must have has solid work experience on AGILE and Waterfall methodologies and complete thorough documentation
BSA must be a self-starter and go-getter rather than wait for directions from Management for getting the tasks completed
This BSA must be well organized and have good communication skills.
Excellent understanding of the software development life cycles and the BSA role in them
Strong understanding of business requirements and translation of those to technical needs
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
You are:
Develop a clearly defined vision demonstrating your understanding of the client's desired business needs and end state.
Analyze business processes and how those business processes can impact the end user experience.
Conceptualize and visualize end-user experiences that delight the customer as a key priority.
Communicate the value gained through the improvements in functionality, design, and/or operations enhanced or developed in ServiceNow.
Develop client relationships easily as your people skills are on point.
The Work:
Experience developing strong relationships with clients and coworkers
Strong oral and written communications skills
Defining User Stories, conducting User Studies, designing and creating Wireframes and graphic assets
Ability to promote and champion your UI/UX design solutions based on reason, research, and data
Experienced in the System Development Life Cycle (SDLC) processes including client requirement analysis and system design
Experience in Agile development environments
Working closely with the development team to ensure design follow through and problem resolution
Assists in quality management reviews and ensures that all business and design requirements are met
Lead requirements development of customized components
Work with a team to develop and deliver ServiceNow-based solutions for clients
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary
The Salesforce Business Analyst works on the Product Management & Platform Development team.
They help define and implement software solutions to support requirements and increase efficiency in consumer incentive programs.
Deep knowledge of Salesforce is essential but the position is not limited to business analysis of only Salesforce CRM.
Other technology and tools involved in the day to
day analysis include Web Development, Box Integration, Tableau Reporting, Security tools, etc.
This role should be able to mentor other Business Analysts, as it relates to knowledge of Salesforce, best practices in general software development and in the development of documentation used by Developers to build best in class software solutions.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
BUSINESS ANALYSIS:
Own and support system development projects, including integration between project websites, rebate databases, and cloud-based document storage
· Gather and translate business needs into detailed software requirements and technical specifications.
Oversee system specification development, including creating and reviewing flowcharts and process diagrams.
Participate in and/or manage projects using traditional waterfall methodology or agile Kanban/sprints
· Develop waterfall SDLC documentation such as - Business Requirements Documents, Functional Requirements Documents, Acceptance/Regression Test plans, User Acceptance Test Plans and Deployment plans
· Develop Agile documentation such as – User stories, Detailed Requirements, Acceptance Criteria, Agile test documentation
· Work with UX Interaction Design to build best in class user experiences
· Guide the implementation and rollout of new system features.
· Provide guidance to stakeholders on devising effective and efficient approaches to achieve project objectives.
· Perform research to gather necessary information, compile statistics, and prepare analysis of data.
· Lead and manage other Business Analysts on the team, as needed
PROCESS IMPROVEMENT:
· Support process improvement activities.
· Perform other related duties as assigned
QUALIFICATIONS
Essential Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Required
Significant experience with custom Salesforce development
Knowledge and understanding of the SDLC process
· Experience working with cloud-based storage systems (e.g., Box.com, Dropbox, etc.).
· Experience in developing and implementing test plans.
· Ability to conceptually outline a high level-design of how a system would work based on business requirements.
Ability to work with technical resources to translate business requirements into technical requirements.
Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to non-technical staff and stakeholders.
Ability to understand and document processes at a conceptual level.
Exceptional communication skills
· Ability to solicit the voice of the customer.
· Ability to represent stakeholder concerns and requirements.
· Exceptional problem-solving and troubleshooting skills.
· Experience with best practices benchmarking.
· Professional oral and written communication skills (internal and external).
· Ability to manage multiple tasks and priorities.
Experience working with a diverse team.
Experience working with diverse business and community groups.
· Intermediate Microsoft Visio (or comparable) skills.
· Advanced Microsoft Office skills.
· Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to non-technical staff and stakeholders
Preferred
Experience with custom database/website development/implementation other than Salesforce/Drupal.
Understanding of barriers to adoption of clean transportation by underserved communities and low-to-moderate income households.
Basic knowledge of and/or interest in electric, plug-in hybrid electric, and other alternative fuel vehicles.
Basic knowledge of and/or interest in local, state, and federal transportation issues related to greenhouse gases (GHGs) and climate change.
Education:
· Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience required.
Experience:
4+ years of related experience preferred
Licenses, Certificates or Registrations:
· Salesforce certifications preferred but none required
","['tableau', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['tableau', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Primary Purpose
The Business Analyst will support HR systems and process related projects in the My Info Services organization.
The role will provide analytical support to develop, analyze, communicate, document and test business requirements to maintain and enhance the HR systems and services.
Additionally, the role is expected to assist with multiple projects simultaneously and work directly with clients and vendors.
Duties and Responsibilities
Performs other duties as assigned (no more than 5% of duties).
Work as part of a team to provide detailed business analyst support to understand, analyze, communicate, document and test existing and desired state HR systems/processes.
Develop detailed existing and desired state business requirements.
Develop system and process enhancement proposals including defining the magnitude of the change, the value of the change and the return on investment.
Update and maintain solution roadmaps for the major HR systems.
Update and maintain the departments processes.
Qualifications:
Qualifications
Education
Bachelor's Degree Business Administration or related field Required
Experience
2+ Relevant experience Required
Skills and Abilities
Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Intermediate
Must demonstrate the ability to follow department processes and policies.
Intermediate
Experience with business level, financial, etc.
data analysis Intermediate
Advanced in Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint) Intermediate
Demonstrated experience with change management Intermediate
Experience working on multiple projects simultaneously Intermediate
Area of Interest:
Human Resources
Full-Time/Part-Time:
Full-time
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst will coordinate a new product initiative to streamline internal business operations.
They will gather requirements by working directly with end users, create user stories, and coordinate the project details as directed through documentation, development, testing, and implementation.
Self-motivated and achieve goals
Outside the box thinkers
Career oriented with a desire for advancement
Enthusiastic about being part of an organization that recognizes your talent
Responsibilities:
Evaluate, prioritize and respond to requests for software updates and modifications
Consistently visualize solutions, document research and implement change
Maintain a detail oriented mindset while innovating new solutions to existing problems
Problem-solve existing challenges and anticipate potential future issues
Manage multiple tasks simultaneously
Produce quality work while maintaining a strong sense of urgency
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree is required, with Information Systems or related field being strongly preferred
5+ years of applicable experience in business systems analysis required
Familiarity with Agile Scrum methodology is required
Experience writing SQL queries
Free premium medical, dental, life and vision insurance
Generous 401K match
Celebrations!
Compensation: DOE
",['sql'],"['research', 'end user', 'busi']",1.0,"['sql', 'research', 'end user', 'busi']"
BA,"About this Job
Business Analyst Intern - BC Analytics
Employment Type Part-time / Full-time
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include:
Data gathering via secondary and primary source research methods
Creating in-depth client reports and polished deliverables
Effectively communicating research results to the Business Analyst team and making the appropriate strategic recommendations
To qualify for this excellent opportunity, candidates must:
Be currently enrolled or recently graduated from a in a four-year college/university undergraduate or graduate program
Strong research and analytical skills
Strong problem-solving skills
Excellent written communication skills
Ability to work independently and interdependently within a team environment
Adept at managing multiple projects and completing deliverables on schedule
Foreign language skills preferred but not required
Proficiency in Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Be able to work a minimum of 15 hrs/week
Compensation: Hourly/Contract/Academic Internship
Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, the individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Education/Experience: Currently enrolled in University with Business/Consulting background interests
Why Work Here?
""Forbes rated award winning professional consultancy with exceptional growth in new technology, meritocracy, expanding management team""
Powered by JazzHR
oJZ7Rg2DKy
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Develop and manage projects and initiatives to meet the clients’ business needs
Participate in the elicitation, documentation, analysis and validation of business processes, systems, and solution requirements.
Develop project scope, schedule, and requirements; and generate technical documents for developers to execute
Work with other teams to facilitate the support process and work toward issue resolution
Perform problem determination, analysis and resolution for clients’ functional, financial, and accounting issues
Qualifications:
Bachelors or Master’s Degree
Strong Communication & Technical skills
Responsible, dependable, quick learner
Demonstrated ability to adapt to new technology
Various Sponsorship Benefits for International Students:
OPT Sponsorship Jobs
OPT Extension
E-verified Employers
H1B Visa Processing for OPT Candidates
50 plus direct customers
Free Online training
Excellent Salary Package
Job Assistance and Support
Real-time Certified S/W Trainers
Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
Online & onsite support provided
Training Process:
2 to 3 week online training using WebEx
Training provided by instructors with extensive industry experience
Daily training (Evening 2 - 3 hours)
Teaching with 70% exercise and 30% lecture
Real time examples and case studies to practice with
Special one-on-one support before joining a project
Limited Students in every batch
Marketing & Placement:
Strong and motivated marketing team
Marketers are specifically trained
Great Marketing Support
Mock-Interviews and interview training
Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
Online & onsite support provided
Interested?
Feel free to call me or text me at ‪(609) 796-2021
Contact Details:
Amir
‪(609) 796-2021
",['excel'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst I
Why join SUNRx (340B Holdings LLC)?
The Scoop:
The Business Analyst serves as a technical member of the client team.
Ensures timely, accurate service delivery as liaison between the customer community (internal and external customers) and the software development team through which requirements flow.
What You Get To Do:
Program Configuration Analyst:Must be able to translate the 340B entity’s business specifications into the technical set up of Wholesaler EDI setup and terminations for new implementations and wholesaler changes
Configure the SUNRx Virtual Inventory system to support the Client Business Plan as outlined by the Implementation manager(s)
Liaison for wholesalers that are operational, inclusive of wholesaler research for drug availability, issues, return requests and development needs
Execute Pharmacy Quarterly Registration Submission, coordination, and tracking
Conduct pharmacy implementations for new covered entities and expansion pharmacies
Conduct pharmacy admin tool and price file configuration
Perform switch vendor activation / termination
Change Form creation and release for pharmacy expansions, changes, and terminations
Serve as Liaison for Macro Helix Gateway Platform, and other gateway accumulator vendors that are contracted with SUNRx contracted pharmacies
Serve as liaison for Macro Helix for the addition of new Walmart accounts, term accounts, request go live approvals, and accumulator gateway research
Elicits requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, business analysis, task and workflow analysis
Critically evaluates information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decomposes high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs
Performs various types of analysis related to business and system changes/enhancements (gap, impact, risk etc.)
Maintains commitment to operational goals in the face of obstacles
Collaborates and cultivates positive relationships with internal and external customers through delivery of sustainable, measurable, accurate, reliable, and timely results that meet or exceed customer expectations
Promptly responds to service failures, resolves issues, and escalates concerns as appropriate
Creates/updates user guides and training documentation for areas of responsibility
Trains internal users on functionality changes as necessary
What You Need:
Education and/or Experience
For consideration candidates will need a Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university and one (1) to two (2) years of related experience or four (4) years of related experience in 340B Administration, Pharmacy Benefit Management (PBM), Pharmacy, Managed Healthcare or similar role; or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Computer Skills
Strong proficiency with MS Office / Word, PowerPoint, Excel, Visio and Outlook.
Other Skills and Abilities
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts
Ability to negotiate effectively and work well with a team
Ability to work effectively in a fast-paced environment
Understands project plans and is able to clearly articulate roles, project goals, and timelines
Takes input from supervisor and appropriately and accurately applies comments/feedback
Establishes responsible deadlines and personal work plans and manages time effectively
Travel - This position may require domestic travel of up to 10% of the time.
The Perks:
Medical / Dental / Vision / Wellness Programs
Life and Disability Insurance
Tuition Reimbursement
Employee Referral Bonus
This position is eligible for Employee Referral Bonus at Level I
EOE, M/F/D/V
OSHA/ADA:
To perform this job successfully, the successful candidate must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Disclaimer:
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this classification.
They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'classif', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Government/Military City San Diego State/Province California Zip/Postal Code 92127
Business Analyst 12+ month contract
San Diego, Onsite, Full-time
This person will serve in a role that is critical to ensure optimal functioning of their Case Management and EHR software.
This includes communicating clear requirements; evaluating current functionality; and recommending optimizations, effective solutions, workflows, and reporting.
This person will work with the development and testing staff, support UAT, provide training, etc.
Previous experience with implementation/integration of enterprise-wide administrative, ERP, EHR, MRP, HRIS, or similar systems will provide the right background for success in this role.
Requirements
3+ years working with IT teams to implement or integrate enterprise-wide administrative, ERP, EHR, MRP, HRIS, or similar systems will provide the right background for success in this role.
(EHR system experience a plus)
Superior communication and documentation skills.
Proven ability to work cross-functionally.
Proven history of working with business AND IT teams.
Ability to translate technical requirements into business workflows and requirements.
Ability to stay organized, juggle multiple priorities, and influence stakeholders.
Proven customer service skills.
",['erp'],"['optim', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['erp', 'optim', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The successful candidate will exercise a data driven analytical approach to troubleshooting procurement operational tasks.""
* Proven experience in a business operations/analyst function with desire to drive business value through analytical, problem-solving approach.
* High proficiency in Microsoft Excel reporting systems.
* Passionate about collaborating with others cross-functionally to ensure business deliverables are successfully accomplished.
* Tableau Certification, ETL or data mining experience preferred.
* The opportunity to make a difference by leveraging your unique strengths.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Overview:
The Business Analyst is assigned to deliver Communication Strategy as a primary function and performs professional duties related to the review, assessment and development of business processes and call center effectiveness.
The Business Analyst will ensure that all activity, reconciliations, reporting, and analysis is carried out in an effective, timely and accurate manner and will look for continued process improvement and innovation.
Primary Responsibilities: The Business Analyst is expected to develop strategies and activities that result in optimized processes, insight and high client satisfaction.
Specifically, this person will:
· Defines and documents customer business functions and processes
· Develop and perform ongoing improvements to reporting packages effectiveness that include scope and objectives, identify and understand needs of clients and
· stakeholders, and assess the technical feasibility
· Ensure continuous improvement, meaningful trend analysis and action planning while minimizing waste and inefficiency
· Build strong working relationships with clients, stakeholders, vendors and team members through effective communication throughout client life-cycle.
· Consults with functional unit management and personnel to identify, define and document business needs and objectives, current operational procedures, problems, input and output requirements, and levels of systems access
· Plans, organizes and conducts business process re-engineering/improvement projects and/or management reviews thorough gap analysis and develop multiple solutions for identified gaps.
· Design new communication outreach programs and processes by analyzing data, constructing workflow charge and diagrams, studying system capabilities and
· writing business requirements
· Design new programs and processes by analyzing data, constructing workflow charge and diagrams, studying system capabilities and writing business requirements
· Utilize deductive reasoning skills to anticipate internal and external client needs
· Build and present trend data of multi-channel monitoring formats and quality standards to track performance at team, individual and client level.
· Maintain departmental quality standards through exceptional listening and analytical skills.
· Recommend call center employee schedules and work modes (dialer/manual) to ensure optimal account servicing and customer satisfaction
· Design multi-channel campaign development, conduct testing, implementation, and optimization during frequency intervals and ad-hoc as needed
· Monitor daily operations and enhance processes to maximize technology efficiency for self-serve and agent-assisted calls
· Troubleshoot technical issues and serve as technical liaison between front-line deficiencies and application support teams, internally and externally
· Optimize vendor performance, including reporting and pricing structures, to increase performance and reduce costs
Position Requirements:
· Bachelors degree in Business Management, Finance, Computer Science, or related field, 2-5 years of experience in finance or related field, or combination of relevant experience and education.
· Strong working knowledge of computer software including Microsoft Office.
Advance level in Excel is required.
· Ability to communicate effectively with various audiences including clients, team members, and vendors, through written and verbal means.
· Must possess proven leadership skills with the ability to influence key decision makers and collaborate across business lines.
· Must demonstrate strong analytical skills and ability to translate data into action.
· Dialer Management Software and Loan Servicing Software required (Genesys, or Nortridge preferred).
Physical Requirements:
The work is of an intellectual nature.
While performing the functions of this job, the employee is required to stand and sit for prolonged periods.
Specific vision abilities required include close and medium distance vision and the ability to adjust focus.
Must be able to hear normal sounds, distinguish sound as voice and communicate through human speech.
This position requires the ability to operate a keyboard, computer mouse, telephone, fax, copier, writing tools, scissors, and other standard office equipment.
On an occasion, an employee will be asked to lift items weighing up to 35 lbs.
Other Duties:
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']"
BA,"Define and document business needs and objectives; interact with users to gather business requirements and transform them into document requirements and business scenario/rules; work with business managers and assist them with analyzing the requirements and creating Business Case Documents (BCD); participate in user acceptance testing and testing of new system functionality; gather and document the impact assessment on the project due to change requests; ensure the system design fits the needs of the users; and prepare training materials.
Job duties require use of the following software and tools: MS Excel, MS PowerPoint, MS Word, SQL Server 2005/2008, Oracle 10g/11g, Oracle Applications, PL/SQL Developer, SQL Management Studio and Crystal Reports.
Requires MS in computer Science, information Systems or business administration plus one years experience as a business/management analyst or programmer analyst.
Telecommuting neither required nor permitted.
No travel required.
Drug Testing required
San Diego,
Email resumes to: panny@sysintelli.com
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'oracl', 'sql']",['busi'],2.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'busi']"
BA,"Candidates must have a background in reviewing, analyzing and evaluating business requirements, business systems and user needs in order to interface effectively with developers in consulting and producing task outlines.
To be considered for this position candidate must have an interest in technology and strong computer skills, superlative communication skills in both written and verbal form and the ability to partner with multiple business partners.
Responsibilities:
Organization of task needs and the clear communication of them to the broader IT group for implementation
Management of project goals and time frames with third-party clients or providers
Proactively manage changes in project scope, identify potential risks, and devise contingency plans and gap analyses as needed
Collaborate with cross-functional teams
Qualifications:
0-3 years of experience as a business analyst, project manager, or related field.
Masters in Computer science/IT.
Strong written and verbal skills.
Powered by JazzHR
0kjZDx8q20
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job: Senior Business Analyst, Sales Operations
Work matters.
And the workplace of the future is going to be a great place.
People matter.
Role
The preferred candidate will have experience supporting Sales, is comfortable managing large data sets, has strong attention to detail, has the ability to build financial models, has a creative problem-solving mindset, and has strong communication skills.
They will work cross-functionally across sales, operations, marketing and finance, with the primary objective of enabling sales leadership to make effective, analytically driven, and strategic operating decisions.
What You Get To Do In This Role
Assist in the development and reporting of key performance metrics to help drive increasing Sales productivity
Work directly with Sales Operations Senior leadership on business-critical reporting needs
Extract data sets, perform analyses, build financial models to support pipeline, coverage, renewal or other initiatives on a weekly/monthly/quarterly cadence
Manage operational process improvement projects
Support the implementation of Sales productivity, planning and reporting tools
Assist with annual planning and monthly forecasting processes for the AMS Sales organization
Analyze performance and productivity data and assist in preparing slides for QBR's, or other Sales leadership presentations
Other ad hoc responsibilities in support of Sales and Operations
Minimum of 3 years' experience in Sales Finance / Sales Operations or relevant advanced coursework portfolio
Excellent communication skills - verbal and written
Ability to communicate effectively and collaborate with others
Self-motivated with the ability to multitask and come up with creative solutions
Comfortable and flexible working in a fast-paced environment
Positive can do attitude and highly analytical; enjoys challenges & strives for success
Detail oriented and comfortable working with large data sets
Advanced Excel and PowerPoint capabilities.
Tableau or PowerBI experience preferred
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, gender identity, or veteran status.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"As appropriate, provides supervision and support to assigned team and provides training and ongoing support for staff on data and evaluation requirements.
Develops Quality Assurance plans for regional networks and special projects.
Job Roles
As appropriate, supervises assigned team, including recruiting, hiring, training, coaching and ongoing support, conducting corrective action, and providing performance assessments.
Builds positive relationships, inspires others to perform at a higher level, prepares career development plans and retains an accountable workforce.
Ensures adherence to all relevant policies, procedures, and contractual obligations related to research and evaluation.
Communicates any evaluation concerns to Program Management and External evaluators as appropriate.
Interfaces with FHCSD’s IT Dept.
and data systems to obtain data and reports to assess performance in meeting identified metrics and support ongoing quality improvement efforts.
Oversees data cleaning process.
Ensures work is completed according to established timelines and meets all department guidelines.
Participates in continuous improvement activities and ensures appropriate Lean tools (i.e., 5S, A3) are deployed and results are evaluated and/or measured.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Provides on-going training to staff related to relevant data systems and evaluation requirements.
Provides/ensures staff receive all new hire and annual training's on time.
Reviews, approves, and follows-up on data and reports submitted for analysis; serves as primary point-of-contact for follow-up on data discrepancies; directly submits all final reports.
Work with other departments, such as IT, Billing and Accounting departments to establish rules and methodologies for sustainable effective data management.
Education/Certifications/Licenses/Registrations
Supervisory experience preferred.
No more than 2 points in past 12 months; No suspensions in last 2 years for moving violations; No DUI, reckless or felony Driving within 5 years.
No license revocation in 7 years.
Experience/Specialized skills (including Language)
Bilingual English-Spanish preferred.
Effective training and coaching skills; ability to drive results and achieve objectives through others.
Excellent interpersonal and customer service skills.
Excellent organizational skills, attention to detail, time-management skills, and strong motivation to meet deadlines and achieve goals.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong skills in computer applications and software, including MS Office.
Grant and clinic based data experience to include Special Populations.
Ability to work well with IT department to obtain data and reports.
","['ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'commun']"
BA,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"You are an experienced digital marketing pro and have the ability to translate client goals into a multi-dimensional enrollment marketing strategy that achieves cost per lead, cost per enrollment and student goals.
You will set the direction for the entire unit and your expertise will be critical to the success of each partnership.
Responsibilities
Main Objectives: Within the Analytics team, the digital business analyst will provide analytics and marketing technology expertise.
The digital business analyst will work through various analytics technology tasks/projects at the requests of the Director of Analytics & Digital Strategy and the Analytics Lead.
This individual will also assist the partnership managers, subject matter experts (Paid Media, SEO, PR) and leadership in order to help achieve the overall KPIs for each partner university.
He/she will initially research and select an effective data warehouse/data mart and provide a long-term solution for BI reporting working closely with the Analytics Lead.
The digital business analyst will provide additional analytics/marketing technology support as explained below.
As the digital business analyst, you will:
Build a brand new data warehouse/data lake solution for digital analytics with focus on Paid Media, SEO, & Digital PR and incorporating CRM down-funnel enrollment data
Collaborate with key stakeholders and data analysts to provide innovative BI solutions/deliverables for customer-centric analytics
Research and consider a DMP solution to integrate 1st party and 3rd party data
Manage multi-channel attribution modeling process/reporting to build customer journey maps and understand the whole customer experience
Setup/manage Google Tag Manager, Google Analytics, Hotjar, etc.
and provide relevant reports to the team for actionable insights
Work with data analysts to setup AWS SFTP processes for lead files exports and enrollment files imports
Assist in marketing technology tasks -- Unbounce landing page forms CRM integrations, Facebook/LinkedIn Lead Form Ads CRM integrations using Zapier, tags/pixels (including event-tracking) setup and QA
Join monthly client and business unit strategy meetings and ad hoc strategy meetings as needed
Stay up-to-date on the current trends in digital marketing and higher ed.
Understanding and intermediate-level ability to conduct practical market research and industry analysis
Additional relevant projects or tasks for the Analytics team
Requirements
Bachelors Degree (Masters Degree preferred) in Business Analytics, Computer Science, Information Systems, Data Science, Economics, Math, Statistics, or a related field of study.
Projected project management and/or development of a data warehouse/data mart or similar technology integration.
Advanced experience with web analytics and reporting tools focused on telling stories through data (e.g.
Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, Hotjar).
1+ years focused on web analytics and/or business analytics.
Analyze marketing performance issues -- data mining to provide effective reporting showing wins and opportunities.
Business Modeling: spreadsheet modeling and data visualization.
Digital Enterprise: CRM system (Salesforce, Hubspot, Recruit, Slate, etc.)
integrations with digital platforms.
Advanced Excel/Google Sheets skills: VLOOKUP, Pivot Tables, Macros, etc.
Higher education industry experience preferred.
Remote Possibility; preferably, San Diego or Orlando.
Preferred Skills
Excel (advanced modeling), Google Sheets (advanced modeling), Supermetrics, AdStage, Zapier, Google Marketing Platform (Google Data Studio, Google Analytics, Google Tag Manager, Google Optimize), Digital Media Platform Analytics (Google Ads, Bing Ads, Facebook Ads, LinkedIn Ads), Hotjar, Unbounce, Instapages, AWS, Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, SQL, SAS, R, Python
Salary range: [$55-65k/year]
Learning stipend of $1,500 per year
Unlimited vacation days
Health, dental, vision and life insurance
401k + match
Career mapping and planning
Up to eight training and development opportunities per month
Continuous performance feedback and learning opportunities
Weekly and monthly team lunches and events
Visit circaedu.com to learn more.
Powered by JazzHR
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw']","['data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'sa', 'aw', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'optim', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
BA,"Business Analyst
San Diego, California
Job ID 3834
Date posted 06/24/2020
Schedule Full-Time
Shift Day
Department Transforming Mental Health
This is a casual position with an end date of June 30, 2023.
JOB SUMMARY:
Provides analytical, planning and coordination support on projects as assigned.
Responsible for reviewing, interpreting, analyzing and illustrating data in a manner that stimulates and supports innovative and enlightened thinking and decision making.
Provides analytical and database PC support.
Serves as information systems liaison with vendors, Information Services, end users, etc.
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's Degree; will consider experience in lieu of degree
2 years of experience
Exceptional critical thinking and analytical skills, including system, process and business analysis for problem solving, product evaluation, and effective organization of responsibilities
Strong verbal and written communication skills and ability to interact professionally with diverse groups
Expert computer skills, extensive database experience and Microsoft Office applications skills
Strong project management skills
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:
4 years of experience
Master's Degree
Specific experience with Utilization Management or health insurance organizations
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"DEA has 39 domestic offices in 23 Divisions.
Those Divisions are as follows: Atlanta, GA; Caribbean; Chicago, IL; Dallas, TX; Denver, CO; Detroit, MI; El Paso, TX; Houston, TX; Los Angeles, CA; Louisville, KY; Miami, FL; New England; New Jersey; New Orleans, LA; New York, NY; Omaha, NE; Philadelphia, PA; Phoenix, AZ; San Diego, CA; San Francisco, CA; Seattle, WA; St. Louis, MO; and Washington, DC.
Schedule: Full Time
Functional Responsibilities: Performs analysis and related support functions relevant to strategic planning and assists with performance measurement and tracking performance related metrics.
Develops reports and makes recommendations to improve business processes, procedures, and performance.
Assists in performing analyses and interpretation of cost and expense variances.
Compiles and analyzes financial information.
Develops integrated analyses, projections, reports, and presentations.
Creates and analyzes monthly, quarterly, and annual reports and ensures information has been recorded accurately.
Performs financial forecasting and reconciliation.
Coordinates performance metrics gathering, analysis and reporting activities.
Identifies and analyzes systems requirements and defines project scope, requirements, and deliverables.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Minimum Education: Bachelor degree or equivalent
General Experience: Requires 5 years of experience and strong analytical, interpersonal, oral and written communication skill and the ability to solve complex problems and work in a team environment.
Must be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong organizational skill and the ability to work in a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline environment.
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'forecast']",1.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'forecast']"
BA,"job summary:
The Analyst works within project teams and with business stakeholders to gather, clarify, and translate business requirements into documentation and conceptual design from which technical solutions are developed.
The Analyst is an active participant in all phases of a project lifecycle and will be required to work closely with a variety of stakeholders to ensure that all business requirements are understood, documented, and met.
The Analyst researches, analyzes, and recommends solutions which meet the business needs for new projects.
The Analyst interfaces with business users and technical staff to translate business user requirements into technical documentation such as use cases, process diagrams, functional design documents, and other system documentation required by project lifecycle methodologies.
education: Bachelors
",[None],"['research', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['research', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"This valued team member will drive automation as well as create, improve, and standardize processes, procedures, and documentation.Responsibilities Include:* Provide reporting support for the business unit and conduct data mining using SQL from internal and external data sources i.e.
Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position.
",['sql'],"['data mining', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Analyst Level 1:
Knowledge and skill in applying analytical and evaluative techniques to
identify, consider, and resolve issues or problems of a procedural or factual nature.
Knowledge and skill on the usage of various qualitative or quantitative techniques.
Minimum/General Experience: Associates degree in Business, Finance, Management,
Information Systems or other related discipline.
With at least four years of specialized
experience a degree is not required.
Analyst Level 2:
Provides strategic guidance and influences program direction.
Recommends large scale information system solutions, and assists with business integration
across organizational levels.
Provides program-level guidance within area of expertise and
recommends domain-specific solutions and policies.
Evaluates various business models
including cost-benefit analysis.
Minimum/General Experience: A Bachelor's degree in a related discipline.
With at least six
years of specialized experience, a degree is not required.
Specialist Level 1:
Expert in a specific domain with general knowledge of other
domains.
Provide support for all phases of defined program/project implementation and
transition subsequent knowledge/tasks to the ongoing delivery team/process.
Review data
and develop and document process flows ensuring continuous process/productivity
improvement.
Must follow quality-control standards and develop and document business
requirements.
Review business requirements and systems specifications to ensure plan
milestones and requirements are met.
Must be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong
organizational skills and the ability to work in a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline
environment.
Minimum/General Experience: A Bachelor's degree in a related discipline with 2 years of
experience.
With at least eight years of specialized experience, a degree is not required.
Specialist Level 2:
Works as a team member with expertise in a specific domain and
advanced, comprehensive knowledge of methodologies, principles and practices related to
business or financial management disciplines.
Provide support and completes research and
analysis, gathers analyzes and synthesizes information using evaluation and critical thinking
skills.
Ability to organize, analyze, interpret, and evaluate financial and management data in
the solution of financial management and accounting problems.
Develop and document
process flows ensuring continuous process/productivity improvement and compliance with
standards throughout a project.
Operates with considerable latitude for actions and decisions.
Must have demonstrated ability to work independently or under only minimal direction.
Must
be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong organizational skills and the ability to work in
a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline environment.
This position also requires
demonstrated proficiency using commercial automated word processing and other systems.
Good written and oral communication skills are required.
Minimum/General Experience: Bachelor's degree in business, finance or a related field with
four years of experience.
With at least 10 years of specialized experience, a degree is not
required.
Job Posted by ApplicantPro
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst will be responsible for providing support to a fast-paced analytics department.
This role will require deep problem-solving skills and possess a broad knowledge of quantitative modeling as it relates to the banking/financial services industry.
Consult with business partners to develop strategy to address and influence business problems
Analyze data, build BI tools and develop financial models
Communicate results and recommendation to senior management and business partners
Communicate technical subject matter clearly and concisely to individuals from various backgrounds
Develop quantitative modeling competencies of others within the same line of business.
Teach and mentor quantitative modelers
Expertise in one or more of the following: Statistical Modeling, Probabilistic programming, ML/AI, knowledge presentation, cognitive modeling, natural language processing
SQL knowledge and experience and exposure to Python and R
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Building, maintaining and developing on software infrastructure to or cloud infrastructure to handle enterprise projects along with data integration mechanisms for interfacing between machine learning and artificial intelligence applications
Experience in building machine learning applications, broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools and open source libraries
Supports customer acquisition strategies by vetting information from public sources and lead providers then aggregating content from data provider to stimulate development of telemarketing and email marketing campaigns.
Consolidation of publicly available information to develop an achievable picture of a perspective customer
Exploration that leverages more information pertaining to a specific area in a market or product that stimulates development for product offerings while also discovering strategic opportunities within a specific markets or demographics
Track record of fact-based communication to support senior decision-making
Minimum of 3 years of experience in data analytics
Minimum of 5 years of proven experience in a problem solving/analytical role in a fast-paced organization
Experience in regulated financial services (FDIC, OCC, FINRA, FRB) or experience in another highly regulated environment i.e.
pharma or med device (FDA) or utility, power, oil/gas (FERC, BSEE)
Management consulting experience preferred
Pre-Employment Drug Test:
All offers are contingent upon the candidate successfully passing a credit check, criminal background check, and pre-employment drug screening, which includes screening for marijuana.
Equal Employment Opportunity:
Job Functions and Work Environment:
While performing the duties of this position, the employee is required to sit for extended periods of time.
Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position.
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'r', 'python']","['machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'natural language processing', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'r', 'python', 'machine learning', 'data', 'analyz', 'nlp', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Ability take raw data in CSV/excel format to dissect data and visualize it - can make recommendations on visualization tools* Demonstrated ability and motivation to try new things and lead change, with a drive for continuous improvement and efficiency* Exceptional project management and organizational skills* Operates independently and efficiently to manage multiple projects and deadlines simultaneously and successfully, without sacrificing attention to detail* Work well within cross-functional organizations and has proven experience driving end-to-end customer programs and working collaboratively with internal and external teams* Proven ability to manage a sizable number of service delivery projects with keen prioritization and multitasking abilities* Ability to think creatively and be persistent* Exceptional interpersonal skills; you have the unique ability to talk technical details and business strategy, in the same conversation* Respect processes but be adaptable through change* Strong organizational and analytical skills with a keen attention to detail* Customer-first mentality; ability to empathize and build customer relationships* Coachable, open to feedback and dedicated to constant self-improvement* Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related technical disciplineWhy you'll love it here:* Competitive salary!
* Flexible PTO and paid holidays!
* Comprehensive medical, dental, and vision benefits.
* Opportunity to make a difference and implement your ideas.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex including sexual orientation and gender identity, national origin, disability, protected Veteran Status, or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state, or local law.
",[None],"['busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['busi', 'recommend', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"The purpose of this job is to assume responsibility for helping business and IT implement technology solutions in a cost-effective way, and to communicate requirements to stakeholders, facilitators, and partners.
.
This position exists to liaise with both Business and IT stakeholders to enable business to achieve its goals.
This person will serve a key role in the communication with other teams from Advanced Analytics to Business Intelligence and Actuary.
It's a dynamic role that calls for a driven and motivated Business Analyst to bring everything together.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Acts as an intermediary between the business community and the technical community.
Elicits, analyzes, and documents detailed business requirements.
Understands business processes and relevant technology for business initiatives.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
Coordinates and organizes input from various stakeholders, negotiates priorities, resolves conflicts, and builds consensus.
Possesses expertise in the business unit(s) they support as well as an understanding of the IT organization’s systems and capabilities.
Applies insurance and information system knowledge to assist business in improving workflow and improving the cost effective utilization of insurance systems.
Achieves the strategic vision and operating platforms that define the people, processes, tools, and technology.
Works with business Product Owners to create and maintain an operating plan.
Conducts user acceptance testing.
Facilitates communication between IT and business stakeholders and Product Owners.
Works to ensure that projects are delivered on time and within budget.
Formulates and defines systems scope and objectives through research and fact-finding combined with an understanding of applicable business systems and industry requirements.
Provides insurance and technical support to IT staff.
Implements new systems and solutions of installed systems.
Oversees enhancements and maintenance of installed systems.
Documents user manuals to describe application installation and operating procedures.
Participates and contributes in design sessions in prototyping new or existing systems.
Works to continually enhance business processes, operations, and information process flow.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This role does not have supervisory responsibilities.
Education and Experience
Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university; or equivalent work experience.
Minimum 2 years of relevant technical or business work experience.
Minimum 2 years of related experience in business analysis.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations
CBAP certification preferred.
Insurance Certifications NTH (CPCU, ARM, AIC, AINS), and domain expertise preferred; CSM or CSPO preferred.
Knowledge and Skills
Knowledge of insurance preferred.
Strong analytical skills, ability to create compelling business cases; ability to provide input for cost/effort estimates and financial analysis.
Team-oriented focus; ability to conduct effective meetings with business and project teams; ability to create and interpret user needs into specifications, user stories, flowcharts, UML diagrams, etc.
Highly competent in reading, analyzing and interpreting technical industry-related journals and DOI filings.
Strong understanding of basic system engineering, object-oriented design, information risk and security guidelines, and architecture standards.
Knowledge of Modeling Techniques: Object Orientation analysis, UML (e.g.
Use Cases, Activity Diagrams).
Good understanding of data management and database concepts.
In depth understanding of the various software development lifecycles (e.g.
Scrum, Waterfall, and/or Hybrid) and demonstrated experience in writing software requirements and test specifications.
Intermediate knowledge of SQL and intermediary working knowledge of Excel (e.g.
Data cleaning, manipulation and reporting).
Working knowledge of API standards for communicating and integration between applications.
Physical Requirements
This job operates in a professional office environment.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear.
The employee frequently will sit, stand, walk, and bend during working hours.
Requires manual and finger dexterity and eye-hand coordination.
May be required to lift light objects.
Requires normal or corrected vision and hearing corrected to a normal range.
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']"
BA,"About this Job
Business Analyst - BC Analytics
Job Type: Full-time / Salaried / Contract
Professional Summary:
Develops strategic recommendations and solutions for clients using primary and secondary data, gather research, transform data into reports by writing clear and concise business documents, and develops presentations by utilizing proprietary and non-proprietary software.
Essential Duties:
Gather data, analyze, and make recommendations to meet project objectives, prepare client presentations, and assist in pre-call planning
Maintain client relationships by consulting on customer and competitor strategies, business solutions, and management decisions.
Create reports and presentations utilizing qualitative analysis regarding companies, markets, and industry trends
Conduct weekly client updates on progress of research both in-person and over the phone
Stay informed of current business and industry trends relevant to your client's business
Job Specifications:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university relating to field required
2+ years of related experience management consulting preferred
Master’s degree a plus but not required
Outstanding verbal and written communication skills
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail
Excellent reporting, problem solving, and analytical skills
Ability to manage multiple projects and complete deliverables on schedule
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Products
The above declarations are not intended to be an ""all-inclusive"" list of duties and responsibilities of the job described, nor are they intended to be such a listing of the skills and abilities required to do the job.
Rather, they are intended only to describe the general nature of the job.
Candidates are subject to pre-employment drug screens and background checks.
Benefits Include:
Medical Coverage Selection: HMO - UnitedHealthcare (CA), Kaiser, (CA) & Blue Cross Blue Shield (CA), PPO – UnitedHealthcare, HDHP – UnitedHealthcare
Dental Coverage: personal coverage and additional child plus orthodontia
Vision Plan:Comprehensive Vision coverage including exams, lenses and frames allowance, contact lenses.
Healthcare savings account HSA.
This is different than a flexible spending account, it is a long-term savings account that provides an ongoing resource that you can tap into year after year for healthcare costs and can be built up incrementally.
Dependent care pre-tax spending account.
Covers the kids and elderly dependents with pretax spending dollars
Why Work Here?
""Forbes rated award winning professional consultancy with exceptional growth in new technology, meritocracy, expanding management team""
Powered by JazzHR
MtoBGSokmm
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Jr.
The position requires outstanding customer service and communication skills, proven analytical and solutions-driven mindset, ability to collaborate across multiple stakeholder groups, and strong detail-oriented problem-solving skills.
Responsibilities:
Help users solve their IT problems and provide targeted instructions to users to improve their skills and confidence in using computer systems and the Cobalt application to meet their business needs.
Promptly notify Service Desk management of issues that require management attention.
Validate documentation for accuracy and adherence to Service Desk standards.
Requirements
Master’s degree in Computer Science / Information Technology
0 to 2 years of experience as a business analyst
Written and Oral Communication
Collaboration and ability to influence others
Quality and accuracy
Attention to detail
Proactive and Persistent
Problem Solving and conflict negotiation
Planning, prioritization and monitoring
Powered by JazzHR
ut3nG2Bmty
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Imagine a place where talented and driven people, band together into high performing teams.
Where love for customer experience and success is at the core.
Where everyone tells it as it is and no-one tolerates mediocrity or B.S.
Welcome to API Nation.
Summary:
In simple terms, you will translate customer speak into geek and geek to customer speak :)
In practice, this means you learn the needs of a customer, analyze the software applications they use, and design a solution that connects their applications and automates their work.
You work with Product Manager, Software Engineers, and Quality Control to develop and deliver the solution.
If this sounds like a role for you, get in touch.
Responsibilities:
Gather information through research and interviews with stakeholders.
Provide research, analysis, and support to software engineers and implementation specialists as needed
Provide technical consultations to customers, potential customers, and the team as needed.
Prioritize tasks & objectives to meet deadlines.
About You:
Experience with analyzing technical documentation, API Documentation, working with datasets, etc.
Enjoy working with customers.
Excellent English language communication and presentation skills (both written and verbal).
Strong organizational, administrative, and analytical skills.
JIRA, Confluence).
BS/BA Degree or equivalent combination of education and experience.
You are an intellectually curious person who likes to learn and figure things out.
Mega Bonus Points:
Knowledge of Real Estate industry and experience with software used in the Real Estate industry for functions such as Lead Generation, Lead Nurturing, Marketing, Transaction Management, Accounting, CRM, etc.
Make it stand out!
Take a look at the “What makes you awesome?” section above.
Include a link to your public work, your LinkedIn profile, blog, public presentations, or talks.
Share and show off your communication skills.
","['excel', 'jira']","['research', 'commun', 'account']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'research', 'commun', 'account']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsibilities:
As a Business Analyst, this individual will be working with client, County and third-party vendors to assist with related projects
Prepare Scope of Work and assists in conducting business requirements analysis for system enhancements or replacement
Identify approaches to satisfy business requirements by conducting detailed analysis and technical design of one or more program areas, in support of project
Evaluate the existing information processing systems or manual workflow to identify effectiveness, and recommends changes to improve production or workflow as required
Provide recommendations for the most efficient and cost-effective solutions
Work with end-users through the elaboration process by collecting and analyzing feedback
Work with end users, subject matter experts, business analysts, technical experts and existing documentation to develop, create and present clear, concise and detailed requirement and design documentation
Work closely with staff, developers, testers and a variety of end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Maintain and communicate accurate status of work performed
Meet frequently with Information Technology Services, client staff and external vendors to coordinate resources and timetables as well as provide status updates regarding projects
Work directly with development and testing staff to develop and implement unit, systems integration and performance testing scripts
Support required system go-live activities including, completing required documentation, supporting User Acceptance Testing, supporting training delivery, etc.
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field
Minimum 4 years prior Information Technology experience required
Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
Excellent Analytical skills
Must be customer service oriented and demonstrate a passion to assist and add value
Working knowledge of software development lifecycle (AGILE and Waterfall)
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office Tools
Strong experience in application testing
Ability to translate technical requirements into business language and business requirements
Solid understanding of business practices with fundamental understanding of project management methodology
Ability to work on multiple projects, solve problems, deliver on commitments, and work with multidisciplinary teams
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with customers
Ability to organize, prioritize and follow complex and detailed technical procedures
SharePoint knowledge is a plus
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Provide reporting and analysis of monthly market segment profit results
Provide capital planning and reporting to leadership and ensure policy compliance
Allocate resources and maintain cost efficiency.
Ensure recommendations meet business needs and requirements.
Prioritize initiatives based on business needs and requirements
Meet business requirements through querying of large datasets, transforming them into meaningful reporting of deliverables
Minimum Requirements:-
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any
related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Job duties are project-based and performed on long-term assignments at
Powered by JazzHR
FUzXbNdCwk
",[None],"['busi', 'segment']",2.0,"['busi', 'segment']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
PY4EePRxJa
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
PiPDZRBq6N
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst / Consultant
As a Salesforce Consultant you will leverage your business and technical skills to uncover pain points within the client's current technology and processes.
This is the ideal position for someone with experience as a Salesforce Admin, Business Analyst, or Salesforce Consultant looking for a role working on a full-scale Salesforce implementation from start to finish.
*This project could be delayed due to market uncertainty.
If interested in other roles, please join the Talent Network for consideration: https://www.pinkuspartners.com/salesforce-talent-network/
Facilitate requirements development sessions in order to gain an understanding of the customer’s current state.
Present implementation needs and options confidently to technical teams as well as a C-Level audience.
Strong attention to detail is required.
Elevate the client experience as a knowledgeable liaison between technical teams, testing teams, and business stakeholders during the implementation phase.
Lead discovery workshops which may include large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations
Execute rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Perform business process modeling, user experience modeling, and basic technical architecture diagramming.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities)
Requirements:
Strong attention to detail
5+ years of experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Salesforce Admin Certification Required, additional certifications preferred
You have a strong understanding of Salesforce functionality and can clearly communicate its capabilities and limitations to customers.
Ability to build and demonstrate prototypes in Salesforce.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
You have experience with Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Community Cloud functionality.
You are a highly motivated individual with a desire to learn and contribute.
You have strong presentation and communication skills.
Hands on experience working with companies implementing Salesforce.com functionality in some of the following areas is preferred:
System Implementation & Adoption
Salesforce.com Service Cloud
Salesforce.com Community Cloud
Salesforce.com Sales Cloud
Experience with data migration tools is a plus.
Quickly scale your business with experienced and pre-vetted Salesforce Talent.
Job Type: Contract
License:
Salesforce (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The purpose of this job is to assume responsibility for helping business and IT implement technology solutions in a cost-effective way, and to facilitate communication with stakeholders, facilitators, and partners.
the core of this Business Analyst III is to analyze business partner’s operations to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Partners with business leaders to align IT initiatives with business strategy.
Educates the IT organization on the direction of the business.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
Works with business Product Owners to create and maintain an operating plan.
Works to achieve the strategic vision and operating platforms that define the people, processes, tools, and technology.
Brings solutions to business units supported to enhance the enterprise’s competitive edge.
Partners with business and technology partners to elicit, analyze, translate, and document business requirements into technical requirements.
Analyzes, documents, and tests program development, logic, process flows, and specifications.
Finds ways to improve workflow and the cost effective utilization of insurance systems.
Partners with business stakeholders to conduct user acceptance testing
Documents user manuals to describe application installation and operating procedures.
Facilitates communication between IT and business stakeholders and Product Owners to ensure that projects are delivered on time and within budget.
Provides business process and technical expertise to IT staff for the implementation of enhancements, solutions, and maintenance for installed systems.
Improves the cost effective utilization of insurance systems.
Contributes in design sessions in prototyping new or existing systems.
Works to continually enhance business processes, operations, and information process flow.
Performs cost-benefit and ROI analyses for propose systems to aid teams in making implementation decisions.
Identifies inefficient processes and procedures.
Supervisory Responsibilities
This role does not have supervisory responsibilities.
Education and Experience
Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university; Information Technology, Engineering, or related degree preferred.
Advanced Degree with Industry/Technical designations (i.e., CPCU, ARM, and CBAP) preferred.
Minimum 5 years of relevant technical or business work experience.
Minimum 4 years of related experience in business analysis.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations
BPM, Lean, or Six Sigma preferred.
Knowledge and Skills
Knowledge of insurance preferred.
Strong analytical skills; ability to create compelling business cases; very strong understanding of business complexity and project interdependencies.
Intellectual curiosity and the ability to question status quo; ability to partner with software engineers quality analysts to identify course of resolutions.
Ability to create and interpret user needs into specifications, user stories, flowcharts, UML diagrams, etc.
Highly competent in reading, analyzing and interpreting technical industry-related journals and DOI filings.
Ability to coordinate and organize input from various stakeholders, negotiate priorities, resolve conflicts, and consensus building.
Strong understanding of basic system engineering, object-oriented design, information risk and security guidelines, and architecture standards.
Strong knowledge of Modeling Techniques: Object Orientation analysis, UML (e.g.
Use Cases, Activity Diagrams); in depth understanding of the various software development lifecycles (e.g.
Scrum and Waterfall) and demonstrated experience in writing software requirements and test specifications.
Strong understanding of data management and database concepts.
Advanced knowledge of SQL, and ability to work on advanced Excel functions including VBA if required.
Strong working knowledge of API standards for communicating and integration between applications.
Physical Requirements
This job operates in a professional office environment.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to talk or hear.
The employee frequently will sit, stand, walk, and bend during working hours.
Requires manual and finger dexterity and eye-hand coordination.
May be required to lift light objects.
Requires normal or corrected vision and hearing corrected to a normal range.
If you have a passion for the Insurance Industry this is a great opportunity to continue pursuing your career in this domain!
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"ERP Analyst
San Diego, CA
6-12+ month contract
As the IT Business Analyst, you will be responsible for supporting General & Administrative (G&A) departments and leading initiatives that improve the effectiveness and efficiency of G&A business processes
Key Responsibilities
Partner with the business users within G&A departments and become a go-to person for improving existing business processes and evaluate business needs for implementing new processes.
Lead initiatives to improve G&A area's business process effectiveness and efficiency, contributing to IT's roadmap.
Strong working knowledge of change management, delivering projects in a SOX regulated environment.
Support existing and design new integrations as required between various G&A applications to streamline business processes.
Author knowledge articles, SOPs and training materials to equip G&A business partners with the information they need to fully leverage the solutions IT provides.
Remain current on industry trends and vendor roadmaps and use that information to influence the future of IT organization's services.
Work with cross functional teams, coordinating system and business requirements involving system integrators for key design decisions and enhancements.
Evaluate alternative systems solutions and recommend solutions that best address business needs.
Recognizes, identifies and documents potential areas where existing business processes require change, or where new processes need to be developed, and makes recommendations in these areas.
Experience & Education
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field or equivalent experience.
Minimum of 5 to 7 years' experience as an IT Business Analyst, in a SOX regulated work environment.
Strong functional knowledge of the business processes within Finance, Procurement and Human Resources.
Ability to prioritize assignments ensuring on-time completion of tasks & projects while continually improve operational effectiveness through the use of KPIs, SLAs, and other metrics.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills.
Functional knowledge of Coupa, Netsuite, Paylocity (or similar Procurement, ERP and HRIS applications) is strongly preferred.
Proven ability to work independently, with minimal supervision.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Well-developed business partnering & collaboration skills, adept at establishing & sustaining effective working relationships, both within & between departments.
Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills, with the ability to interact with business users, technical experts.
","['erp', 'excel']","['kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
jqYjPAcjB6
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Job Summary
Perform requirements gathering, design, build, test, and documentation activities for packaged software applications.
Work under the direction of a project manager as part of a team to deliver large-scale business solutions or enhancement projects.
Responsible for leading a team to complete the configuration of a solution for an entire business function or process.
Major Tasks, Responsibilities and Key Accountabilities
Leads the design and development for whole business processes and/or functions on approved projects and on enhancements to existing projects.
Approves designs by junior members of a project team.
Identifies impact to business resulting from newly configured or improved business functionalities and identifies methods for addressing business change impacts.
Coordinates user acceptance testing (UAT) with the business client.
Prepares System Requirement Documents, functional specifications, and test and user documentation.
Prepares status reports to update the Project Manager on day-to-day activities and statuses.
Executes quarterly security audits and participates in internal and external audits.
Responsible for maintaining SOX controls in application security design and administration, including building roles, module and data permissions, and assigning roles to privileged users.
Nature and Scope
Displays the highest level of critical thinking and analysis in bringing successful resolution to high-impact, complex, and/or cross-departmental problems.
Makes prompt, sound decisions when faced with complex and often contradictory alternatives that result in successful outcomes.
Operates with considerable latitude.
Situations may have little or no precedent requiring original or new concepts or approaches without guidance from others.
Reaches decisions under conditions of uncertainty.
Develops or engages/directs others in developing innovative solutions to important, highly complex strategic and operating problems; cross-departmental considerations are often present.
Work Environment
Located in a comfortable indoor area.
Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.
Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about.
On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.
Typically requires overnight travel 5% to 20% of the time.
Education and Experience
Typically requires BS/BA in a related discipline.
Generally 8+ years of experience in a related field OR MS/MA and generally 5+ years of experience in a related field.
Certification is required in some areas.
Preferred Qualifications & Job Specific Details
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous SAP EWM implementations required.
Preferred candidate has experience with SAP ECC and SAP EWM configuration.
7+ years of experience in project business analysis and coordination.
7+ years of experience in software development.
4+ years of experience working on projects or programs requiring the integration of cross-functional technology and/or business solutions.
Bachelors degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, Management Information Systems, or a related field.
Open to non-local candidates.
PRID
PRID159
Job Locations US-GA-Atlanta | US-TX-Dallas | US-CA-San Diego | US-FL-Orlando
Posted Date 7 days ago (7/7/2020 10:28 AM)
Job ID 2020-38233
Business Unit Facilities Maintenance
Functional Area Information Technology
Remote Position?
No
Position Type Full-Time
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'information technology', 'data']",1.0,"['busi', 'account', 'information technology', 'data']"
BA,"Position: System/Business Analyst
Duration: 12+ Months
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:
• Prepare Scope of Work and assists in conducting business requirements analysis for system enhancements or replacement
• Identify approaches to satisfy business requirements by conducting detailed analysis and technical design of one or more program areas, in support of ConnectWellSD.
• Work with end-users through the elaboration process by collecting and analyzing feedback.
• Work with end users, subject matter experts, business analysts, technical experts and existing documentation to develop, create and present clear, concise and detailed requirement and design documentation.
• Work closely with HHSA staff, developers, testers and a variety of end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
• Maintain and communicate accurate status of work performed
• Work directly with development testing staff to develop and implement unit, systems integration performance testing scripts.
• Support required system go-live activities including, completing required documentation, supporting User Acceptance Testing, supporting training delivery, etc.
PREFERRED EDUCATION & EXPERIENCE:
• Minimum Education& Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field .
• Minimum 4 years prior Information Technology experience required.
• Strong communication skills, both written and verbal
• Excellent Analytical Skills
• Must be customer service oriented and demonstrate a passion to assist and add value
• Working knowledge of software development lifecycle (AGILE and Waterfall)
• Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office Tools
• Strong experience in application testing
SOFT SKILLS:
• Ability to translate technical requirements into business language and business requirements
• Solid understanding of business practices with fundamental understanding of project management methodology
• Ability to work on multiple projects, solve problems, deliver on commitments, and work with multidisciplinary teams
• Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with customers
• Ability to organize, prioritize and follow complex and detailed technical procedures.
• SharePoint knowledge is a plus
• Security clearance is not required for this position
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Performs analyses of the business goals, objectives and needs of the general business environment for appropriate FIS segment, division, group or line of business.
Performs research and analysis to support business operations and presents findings to manager or project leader.
Plans and designs business processes and make recommendations and changes in order to improve and support business systems and activities and/or to deliver greater effectiveness and efficiency.
Utilizes systems and data to resolve business issues in the most effective and productive manner.
Identifies and implements best practices and suggests how to improve current practices.
Calculates/estimates costs and benefits of alternative actions or solutions to establish their viability/return on investment.
Develops recommendations to solve problems and issues related to business operations.
Analyzes and documents business processes and metrics and identifies improvement opportunities.
May perform special projects upon request and on occasion.
May provide coaching and/or guidance to less experienced Business Analysts.
Other related duties assigned as needed.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
u5WqqCYJm6
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Let's build your career together.
Responsibilities Transportation Electrification.
Creating documentation on charging stations for electric vehicles.
Provides support in the areas of documenting IT system requirements, administrating department workflow management systems, managing the user acceptance testing of new IT system releases, creating system release notes.
Effectively collaborates with internal departments, stakeholders, cross-functional teams, and vendors to define requirements, assess alternatives, and present solutions to business and regulatory challenges.
Qualifications Experience with Electric Vehicle charging stations.
Utility operation experience is a huge plus Requires a bachelor's degree or equivalent, preferably in business administration, computer science, mathematics or engineering.
Requires at least two years of experience transportation electrification Analytical abilities, ingenuity and excellent oral and written communication skills are required to identify, understand and translate user requirements into system applications.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Minimum 4 years prior Information Technology experience required.
Minimum Education& Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or a related field
Working knowledge of software development lifecycle (AGILE and Waterfall)
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office Tools
Strong experience in application testing
As a Business Analyst, this individual will be working with Perspecta, County and third-party vendors to assist with related projects.
Prepare Scope of Work and assists in conducting business requirements analysis for system enhancements or replacement
Identify approaches to satisfy business requirements by conducting detailed analysis and technical design of one or more program areas, in support of ConnectWellSD.
Evaluate the existing information processing systems or manual workflow to identify effectiveness, and recommends changes to improve production or workflow as required
Provide recommendations for the most efficient and cost-effective solutions
Work with end-users through the elaboration process by collecting and analyzing feedback.
Work with end users, subject matter experts, business analysts, technical experts and existing documentation to develop, create and present clear, concise and detailed requirement and design documentation.
Work closely with HHSA staff, developers, testers and a variety of end users to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Work directly with development testing staff to develop and implement unit, systems integration performance testing scripts.
Support required system go-live activities including, completing required documentation, supporting User Acceptance Testing, supporting training delivery, etc.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
tC5INVK7bu
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst with Servicenow
Job Type: Contract
Roles and responsibilities:
Business analysis skills
ServiceNow experience is plus
Excellent communications skills Customer orientation Well versed with agile/scrum
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
xcmiMi4RWc
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"VDC Business Analyst – AEC industry
This role will actively provide information technology solutions support for ongoing design and construction projects to ensure the success and adoption of all aspects of the clients' platform: capital planning, funding, cost management and controls, process automation, reports and dashboards, scheduling, document management, bid management, and field related activities.
VDC solutions also may be implemented by clients to manage facilities projects of all types, including planning projects, maintenance projects and capital projects on campus, including new construction, facility renovations and infrastructure upgrades.
The position will be responsible for assisting in the solution and process design of VDC solutions, including an array of ERP systems, GIS, and BIM.
The position requires a strong understanding of computer applications as well as knowledge of architecture, engineering, and construction processes.
Additionally, the position requires a demonstrated ability to both maximize the utility of computer systems and assist, explain and coach others in such solutions.
Minimum Qualifications (Required):
Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Informatics, Design, Architecture, Engineering, Construction Management, or other relevant discipline and a minimum two (2) years of responsible and practical experience in enterprise architecture, engineering and/or construction – or any relevant Associate’s degree or technical certification and 5 years of experience – or any other equivalent combination of experience and education
Experience with Building Information Management (BIM) or comparable enterprise information system
Demonstrated customer communication and presentation experience serving a diverse base of users with varying levels of technical expertise to Senior Level Executives
Knowledge of various Business Process and Analysis Tools
Excellent organizational skills and the ability to work within deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Experience in working in an environment using Agile methodologies
Demonstrated excellence in oral, written, and graphic communication
Must be familiar with process development to support various customer solutions
Must possess the capability to understand various Business structures and be able to produce project deliverables to clients
Additional Considerations:
Experience with Revit, BIM 360, eBuilder, Unifier, Kahua, PMWeb or comparable enterprise-class AEC Solutions
Experience implementing new enterprise information systems
Knowledge of design and construction practices
Direct experience with the budgeting, planning, design, and construction of buildings and/or facilities
Construction industry, project management, and or Information Technology related certifications or registrations
Must be team focused and active contributor to the delivery of the overall solution
Must be willing to travel up to 25%
","['erp system', 'erp', 'excel']","['dashboard', 'gi', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['erp system', 'erp', 'excel', 'dashboard', 'gi', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
8uTPGxeVvr
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"The role is in BRM organization as Supply Chain Planning Business Analyst.
This position requires strong hands-on SAP SCM System knowledge in modules such as SCM SNP, CTM, , SCM BI and GATP.
Integration knowledge with other SAP and non SAP transactional systems is must.
In this role it is also required to work as subject matter experts with business and regions users and help in defining requirements as well as generally identify and recommend solutions supporting Supply Chain applications.
Primary Responsibility:
The incumbent will be responsible to help identify supply chain planning requirements and features in the context of existing technology landscape and prioritize the deployment of feature sets and partner with the users both in regions and central businesses
Execute against the product roadmap closely aligned with the requirements of the customers.
Advances Supply Chain Planning demand and project implementation work plan to include, working with delivery team and participate in change management/communications plan for key stakeholders.
As a SCM planning business analyst has responsibility for translating business requirements to SCM functionality as well as interfaces to transactional system such as ECC, LOTS ASCP and other bespoke solutions.
7-10 years of strong hands on experience in SAP DP, SNP, CTM, Configuration, Master Data and transaction processing in SCM.
Should have strong understanding of GATP functionality using SCM and its interfaces to Sales processing, delivery and production including underlying configuration in other transactional systems
Strong hands on experiece in SAP BI technology such as Data source creation, transformation rules, Info source and data transfer between multiple BI systems.
Must have hands on configuration experience coupled w/ technical knowledge in the process areas of Supply Chain Planning in manufacturing environment especially in validated environment.
Medical device manufacturing knowledge is a plus.
Must have undergone/implemented at-least 3 full-life cycles of SAP APO/SCM or later versions such as IBP
Should have thorough knowledge of CIF integration, handling issues and batch job management.
Participate in a cross-functional, team environment applying knowledge of MM, PP and SD and its integration with Inventory Management, Warehouse Management and Sales & Distribution functionality, supporting the established global design.
Provide production, project, and program support in Enterprise Master Data Management, Data Conversion, Data Governance any knowledge of SAP MDG or other complementary technology is plus.
Experience with optimizer and exposure to S4 HANA and IBP is desirable in this role
Working knowledge of HP ALM and Service Now familiarity is desirable and/or other ITIL tools.
Ability to work in both waterfall as well as Agile IT delivery methods are highly desirable.
Required IT and other business Competencies:
SDLC methodology; Business Acumen; Conflict Management; Listening; Perseverance; Process Management; Project Management; Time Management; Written Communications; Verbal Communication & Presentation Skills; Remote Training Skills; Incident & Change Management Skills; Ability to perform remote training using tools as Microsoft Teams and Power BI and working virtually in global environment.
Strong Med tech system validation requirements is a plus.
Also ability to work in virtual global teams is required to be successful in this role with matrix operating environment with a proclivity towards operating with ambiguity.
Required Eduction:
Bachelors Degree
USA NJ - Franklin Lakes
Additional Locations
USA CA - San Diego (BDB)
Work Shift
","['microsoft', 'power bi', 'hana', 'bi']","['optim', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'hana', 'optim', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
DGQd6P3R2W
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Sr.
IT Business Analyst
Ref#:
Responsible for coordinating development resources and business customers to identify and enhance business applications in alignment with overall corporate strategic goals.
Proactively communicates and works in partnership with external and internal customers to analyze information and functional requirements and delivers project support content as needed.
Leads projects of limited scope; provides training and constructive input to team members.
Job site: San Diego, CA.NuVasive is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
The EEO is the Law poster options are available here.
About NuVasiveNuVasive, Inc. (NASDAQ: NUVA) is the leader in spine technology innovation, focused on transforming spine surgery and beyond with minimally disruptive, procedurally integrated solutions designed to deliver reproducible and clinically-proven surgical outcomes.
For more information, please visit .
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
MSferKSjcR
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Role Name:Â
Duration: 1 year (C2C) contract
Â
Functional Test Resource will be expected to attend workshops and working sessions to identify requirements as specified by the project and business team.Â
Requirements will need to be documented and reviewed with team members of various levels within the organization.
â Experienced gathering requirements â functional and non-functional.Â
â Experienced creating documentation detailing requirements and assess for testability.Â
â Able to present in front of the client.Â
â Position requires excellent verbal and written skills.Â
SAP experienceÂ
â Core knowledge around utility (electric) billing, usage, C3Â
â My Account self-serviceÂ
â AclaraÂ
â Rate Enrollment, Rate ComparisonÂ
â How business requirements are fulfilled in the systemÂ
â Knows how the data works and is setupÂ
â Need someone that knows the business driversÂ
â Can provide options or alternatives during design sessionsÂ
âÂRequires knowledge of utility billing in California (TOU rates, AMI etc).Â
",['excel'],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['excel', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will be the liaison between the business and technical groups, gathering and documenting business requirements, designing business processes, developing wireframes, developing high level application designs with the technical teams, and financial analysis or modeling.
Communicate with the business users and / or functional teams to develop business requirements and analyze information needs, delivering the follow artifacts as needed: Functional Requirements, Business Requirements Documents, Use Cases, Wireframes, Test Cases, and Training Manuals.
Serve as the strategic interface between the users and the vendor and / or internal IT groups to resolve problems and fulfill requests for package applications supported by the team.
Lead and perform functional testing, includes coordination of QA and UAT tasks.
Work with business users, PM and Senior Business Analysts to re-platform the existing legacy system and expand functionality, reporting and streamline performance in the new system.
Trend analysis helps in forecasting production costs and needs.
Participate in team strategic planning, supporting the initial analysis and assessment of proposed projects leading to the development of business cases.
Be proactive in identifying enhancements for existing applications, design user manuals and conduct training.
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Information Technology or related discipline.
4-6 years working experience in a similar role.
Working knowledge of continuous process improvement methodologies and customer satisfaction measurement practices.
Proficient in Microsoft Office products.
Attention to Detail is required.
Has a good verbal and written communication skill.
Ability to establish and build healthy relationships with clients, vendors and peers in an environment where all are committed to providing excellent and continually improving service.
Ability to effectively transmit, receive and accurately interpret ideas, information and needs through the application of appropriate communication behaviors, tools and techniques.
Knowledge of approaches, tools and techniques for promoting innovative, original thinking and applying it to existing and emerging situations.
Ability to understand customer needs and expectations, provide excellent service in direct and indirect manner, and fulfill customer expectations.
Creatively applying knowledge of approaches, tools, techniques for recognizing, anticipating, and resolving organization, operations or process problems.
Ability to build, manage and work as an effective team.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Title: Business Analyst (Information Technology Specialist, Mid)
Under general direction, applies specialized knowledge in a single discipline such as assembly/integration, cross-discipline functions, data engineering, industry expertise, knowledge engineering or legacy evolution.
• Applies specialization to conceptualize, design, construct, test and implement portions of business and technical information technology solutions through application of appropriate software development life cycle methodology.
• Interacts with the customer to gain an understanding of the business environment, technical context, and organizational strategic direction.
• Defines scope, plans and deliverables for assigned projects.
• Collects, identifies, defines, and organizes detailed user and information technology requirements.
• Coordinates and collaborates with others in analyzing collected requirements to ensure plans and identified solutions meet customer needs and expectations.
• Confirms and prioritizes project plans and deliverables with the customer, participates in business and technical information technology solution implementations, upgrades, enhancement, and conversions.
• Understands and uses appropriate tools to analyze, identify and resolve business and or technical problems.
• Applies metrics to monitor performance and measure key project criteria.
Prepares system documentation, establishes, and maintains security, integrity and business continuity controls and documents.
• Participates in special studies.
• Stays current on emerging tools, techniques, and technologies.
• Assists information engineers on application of specialized knowledge to coding, testing, implementation, and documentation projects.
Required
• High school Diploma or General Equivalency Diploma (GED).
• Active DoD Secret Clearance
• Certified in accordance with DoD 8570.01-M Information Assurance Technician (IAT) Level II.
(IAT II).
Desired
MCSA/MCSE/CCNA/MTA/MCTA
* Salary commensurate with experience.
",[None],"['data', 'information technology', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"JOB ANNOUNCEMENT
Position Title: Business Analyst
Department: Administration
Supervised By: Chief Operations Officer (COO)
Status: Non Exempt, Hourly
Posted: March 6, 2020
Closing Date: Until Filled
Compensation: $20-$31.27/ HR
Grant: Grant Funded
Clinic Hours: Monday-Friday, 8:00AM-4:30PM
GENERAL STATEMENT OF RESPONSIBILITIES:
In collaboration with SIHC Leadership, develops, maintains, and provides alternate options to expand current PSFAs with evaluation/data supported reports to show future sustainability.
This includes the design, improvement, and correction of management systems that address potential weaknesses identified through quality control measures, internal control reviews and updating/creating new policies.
Management structures include, but not limited to financial management systems, including systems for accounting, personnel, third-party billing, medical records, management information systems, etc.
SPECIFIC DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Demonstrates understanding with current SIHC infrastructure processes to effectively fulfill the statement of responsibilities.
Under the supervision of the COO, initiates, identifies and coordinates the analysis of complex needs in project areas such as: new/existing business operating models, innovative approaches to solutions support, and operational requirements.
Identifies opportunities for increasing business efficiency through improved manual and automated process systems.
Coordinates the development of comprehensive proposed projects that are used at management and executive levels for funding and scope decisions.
Plans, coordinates, and conducts the analysis of functional infrastructure requirements and prepares appropriate documentation to communicate and validate the information.
Develops cross-initiative integration plans.
Identifies other initiatives that exist and ensures that efforts are not duplicated.
Consults on the integration of application systems into the work environment, regarding their operational and training implications.
Lead liaison between Department Heads and/or with development staff throughout the development life cycle of new/changing PSFAs.
May develop project plans.
Identifies and coordinates with departments to implement schedule deadlines as appropriate.
Asses and validate projects to determine if a successful solution has been reached.
Understanding of the Award Terms and Conditions.
Ability to work a flexible schedule may be required based on need.
Other duties as assigned
QUALIFICATIONS:
Education/Experience: Education, training, and/or experience which clearly demonstrates possession of the knowledge and skill stated above.
Bachelor's degree in business/health care administration or related discipline OR coursework in business/healthcare administration with two (2) years of experience in a directly related field.
Facilitate, negotiate and resolve issues professionally; work collaboratively in a team approach; effectively communicate with confidence and knowledge to staff and clients.
Applicant must be able to adapt to changing situations and circumstances and handle pressure with dignity, in all circumstances maintaining confidentiality.
Possess an ability to act professionally at all times in the workplace and the community.
Possess excellent written, verbal and interpersonal communication skills.
Demonstrate sound judgement, critical thinking, evaluation and problem solving skills.
Licenses/Certifications: A valid California drivers license required with application submission and must be maintained throughout employment.
Current certifications and/or licenses appropriate to the positions required education and profession.
Character: Applicants must have a reputation for honesty and trustworthiness.
Must be responsible and able to exercise good judgment, accept administrative supervision, pay attention to detail, follow instructions, including the ability to interact effectively and communicate with people in a professional and courteous manner.
Must be highly confidential and respect confidentiality to all limits of the governing laws and ethics.
Applicant must be able to work as a team with other staff.
Other: Applicant must adhere to professional standards, federal, state, and local requirements; maintain required insurance and certifications, comply with legal requirements; and, code of ethics.
Applicants must successfully pass a pre-employment tuberculin skin test or x-ray, and blood/urine drug-screening test.
Applicants must complete an SIHC application questionnaire and submit it to Human Resources prior to the close dates indicated.
The position is primarily responsible to the Alpine clinic though local travel may be required.
Public Law (P.L.)
",['excel'],"['data', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"null
If you are interested, Then please reach to me at my direct number 734-335-8252 or Email me at Sachin.S@infotreeglobal.com
Job Title: Business Systems Analyst IV
Contract: Long Term
The Senior Business Analyst (SBA) works with multiple client groups and departments of the County of San Diego.
The SBA develops an in-depth knowledge and understanding of the client's business and proactively researches, investigates, and elicits requirements to meet the client's needs and enhance overall business value.
The SBA is required to exercise significant independent judgement within broadly - defined policies and practices to determine the best method for accomplishing work and achieving objectives.
Typical activities include:
Performing current and future state analyses, business risk assessments, and business process mapping and modeling
Authoring detailed requirements documentation
Preparing and delivering recommendations to executive management and technical staff
Qualifications:
Proven success leading projects involving business transformation activities such as:
Eliciting, documenting, Analyzing, and validating business and functional requirements
Business Process Improvement and Re-engineering
Preparing business cases, calculating Return on Investment (ROI), payback periods, and Total Cost of Ownership (TCO)
Experience applying Organizational Design and Development methodologies such as:
Lean Six Sigma
Total Quality Management
Business Process engineering
Use cases
Extensive knowledge and application across the principles of Business Analysis (e.g., Business Analysis Body of Knowledge)
Knowledge of and experience applying the principles of Project Management
Experience with Enterprise Services Management projects that involve concepts such as:
IT Governance: defining, designing, and implementing
Outstanding interpersonal skills: ability to work effectively with a diverse set of public sector customers through exemplary professionalism and high emotional intelligence
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Intermediate to advanced experience with the following:
Microsoft tools: Outlook, Skype, SharePoint, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio
Business process modeling tools such as IBM Blueworks Live
Requirements management systems
Program and project management systems.
Education and Experience:
Bachelor's degree in a technical or business discipline or equivalent experience and a minimum of 8 years of related experience or a Master's degree and a minimum of 6 years of related experience are required
Certification and/or education in Lean Six Sigma or ITIL is highly desirable.
Comments for Suppliers:
Thanks & Regards,
Sachin Sondhiya
Associate Technical Recruiter
Email:Sachin.S@infotreeglobal.com
LinkedIn: https://www.linkedin.com/in/sachin-sondhiya-819499164/
Phone: 734-335-8252
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Manual dexterity and coordination are required while operating standard office equipment such as computer keyboard and mouse, calculator, telephone, copiers, etc.The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee may encounter while performing the essential functions of this position.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"As the IT Business Analyst, you will be responsible for supporting General & Administrative (G&A) departments and leading initiatives that improve the effectiveness and efficiency of G&A business processes.
Key Responsibilities
Partner with the business users within G&A departments and become a go-to person for improving existing business processes and evaluate business needs for implementing new processes.
Lead initiatives to improve G&A area's business process effectiveness and efficiency, contributing to IT's roadmap.
Strong working knowledge of change management, delivering projects in a SOX regulated environment.
Support existing and design new integrations as required between various G&A applications to streamline business processes.
Author knowledge articles, SOPs and training materials to equip G&A business partners with the information they need to fully leverage the solutions IT provides.
Remain current on industry trends and vendor roadmaps and use that information to influence the future of IT organization's services.
Work with cross functional teams, coordinating system and business requirements involving system integrators for key design decisions and enhancements.
Evaluate alternative systems solutions and recommend solutions that best address business needs.
Recognizes, identifies and documents potential areas where existing business processes require change, or where new processes need to be developed, and makes recommendations in these areas.
Experience & Education
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or related field or equivalent experience.
Minimum of 5 to 7 years' experience as an IT Business Analyst, in a SOX regulated work environment.
Strong functional knowledge of the business processes within Finance, Procurement and Human Resources.
Ability to prioritize assignments ensuring on-time completion of tasks & projects while continually improve operational effectiveness through the use of KPIs, SLAs, and other metrics.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills.
Functional knowledge of Coupa, Netsuite, Paylocity (or similar Procurement, ERP and HRIS applications) is strongly preferred.
Proven ability to work independently, with minimal supervision.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Well-developed business partnering & collaboration skills, adept at establishing & sustaining effective working relationships, both within & between departments.
Strong interpersonal and teamwork skills, with the ability to interact with business users, technical experts.
","['erp', 'excel']","['kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'kpi', 'financ', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Essential Duties and Responsibilities Partners with business leaders to align IT initiatives with business strategy.
Negotiates agreements and commitments by facilitating communication between business unit(s) and IT from initial requirements to final implementation.
Works with business Product Owners to create and maintain an operating plan.
Partners with business and technology partners to elicit, analyze, translate, and document business requirements into technical requirements.
Analyzes, documents, and tests program development, logic, process flows, and specifications.
Partners with business stakeholders to conduct user acceptance testing Documents user manuals to describe application installation and operating procedures.
Facilitates communication between IT and business stakeholders and Product Owners to ensure that projects are delivered on time and within budget.
Contributes in design sessions in prototyping new or existing systems.
Works to continually enhance business processes, operations, and information process flow.
Performs cost-benefit and ROI analyses for propose systems to aid teams in making implementation decisions.
Identifies inefficient processes and procedures.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst- (R&D – Pharma industry required)
Position Type: Full Time
Position Summary:
This role will partner with leaders in the R&D and QA, to ensure delivery of information technology solutions that generate business value.
This role will also interface with other IT team members and partnering business functions to ensure successful alignment across groups.
The IT Business Analyst -R&D role engages with business users to understand and document detailed business requirement, workflows, reporting specifications and help define operational system processes.
This position requires having a good understanding of Pharmaceutical R&D business processes specifically in the areas of Clinical Operations, Clinical Development, Regulatory Affairs & Quality Systems.
This person will have the ability to analyze and understand the usage of existing system landscape both on-premise as well as COTS/SaaS solution capabilities and create detailed business requirements for implementation using the right fit model.
The position also requires strong project management, written and verbal communication skills and an ability to collaborate with management, users and other teams within the organization.
The ideal candidate will be well versed in technologies used in R&D and Quality such as CTMS/EDC, SAS, Veeva, Master Control, EDMS and other analytical software packages.
Role works with department leads to identify opportunities, develops business cases, defines requirements and works closely with counterparts and the project team to ensure successful system implementations and their support.
Essential Functions & Responsibilities:
-The individual will work closely with clients to understand their business, the challenges they face, and how best to introduce technology as an enabler to support them in achieving their goals and operational effectiveness.
-The candidate should be able to provide valuable thought leadership that helps drive business success.
They should be comfortable listening and understanding business needs, asking insightful questions, and working with a team to solution and execute on the solution.
-Portfolio Management in this position outlines your responsibility for managing the business / client requests and working with the Director of R&D IT in demand planning, portfolio and financial management for all IT engagements.
-Project Ownership as a responsibility requires you to drive execution of key projects as well as understand how they work and integrate into the business ecosystem.
-Perform business and functional analysis activities for projects as required.
Analyze business requests to determine the best approach to creating successful resolution delivery solutions/projects effectively and efficiently.
-Process understanding and documentation.
Ensure that project documentation is complete, and all Quality requirements are executed upon.
-Ensure that all customer expectations have been met through delivery of services or projects
-Analyze and understand existing system landscape utilized by R&D, identify opportunities for improvement and make proposals for solution implementation
-Create, manage and maintain process diagrams and process definition documents
-Gathering and analyzing requirements to improve existing processes
-Evaluate processes and existing technology and platform and their ability to provide efficient and effective control in relationship to industry 'best practices'
-Be the ""Go To"" resource for business users in troubleshooting 2nd level system issues
-Performing the role of project manager in leading and managing implementations of on-premise as well as 3rd party applications.
-Assess business needs, scout for technology solutions in the market and onboard optimum solution to enhance business productivity.
-Other duties as assigned
Qualifications:
-Bachelors in a field related to Information Technology, Science or Business
-5+ years of experience working as a System Analyst within R&D IT environment
-5+ years of experience in project management and business analysis
-PMP certification is a plus
-Understanding the Business - Will know the business and the mission-critical technical and functional skills needed to do the job; understands various types of business propositions and how businesses operate in general; learns new methods and technologies easily.
-Communicating Effectively - Writes and presents effectively; adjusts to fit the audience and the message; strongly gets a message across.
-Ability to work well within a team to learn and share knowledge
-Ability to speak the user’s language when talking to the business and the ability to speak technology when devising the solution with other colleagues in IT
-Have keen sense of quality awareness to support regulated system processes
-Willing to travel to the other offices if needed
Skills & Knowledge:
-Hands on working knowledge of SAS as an implementer - installed, configured and supported SAS applications
-Good understanding of Veeva R&D suites specifically Submission & Registration Vaults
-Familiar with CTMS/EDC applications and related technology/processes
-Familiar with Quality Management Systems and related technologies such as Master Control, Electronic Document Management System
-System validation experience is a must
-Good understanding of SDLC and CFR Part 11 is a big plus
-MS SharePoint Online, Office 365 experience
-Agile Project Management
-Business Analysis/Requirements Analysis
-Life Sciences Analytics Experience and familiarity with various tools such as Spotfire/EAST
-Knowledge/Experience with the IT Infrastructure Library (ITIL) framework - a plus
-Experience working on a Life Sciences organization
-Location - San Diego based or can be NYC based with 50% travel to San Diego
","['r', 'sa']","['information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['r', 'sa', 'information technology', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
FkfwbrAFVm
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Position Summary
The role is primarily responsible, under limited supervision, for eliciting, analyzing, validating, specifying, verifying, and managing the needs of stakeholders.
These include customers and end users from cross-functional departments.
The Senior Default Business Analyst serves as the conduit between the business and the Information Systems software development team through which requirements flow for medium to complex projects.
Essential Functions
Work with the project sponsor to document project objectives, identify project stakeholders and analyze scope
Elicit project requirements through the use of interviews, document analysis, viewpoints, etc.
Write project requirements specifications and business rules according to standard templates.
Set up, maintain and document I5/Foreclosure tracking system codes and stops, and manages change control process/signoff.
Accurately define quality attributes, constraints, external interfaces, and other nonfunctional requirements.
Establish and implement effective testing strategies to appropriately assess final programming changes; work with other Business Analysts to identify cross impacts of final programming changes to other areas.
Document system changes in short narrative or diagram overviews including all business rules, use cases, and test scripts.
Develop training programs and tools to increase systems knowledge; develop servicing processes, scripts, and templates for correspondence.
Decompose high-level business and user requirements into functional requirements and quality, specified in an appropriate level of detail.
Represent requirements using alternative views via flowcharts, diagrams, or scenarios where appropriate; participate in business justification and the prioritization of proposed requirements.
Identify and stay current on changes in industry regulations, and recommend updates to internal policies, procedures, policies, and systems based on new/changed requirements.
Participate in peer reviews and inspection of requirements documents and corresponding work products; ensure that the requirements were interpreted correctly.
Establish and implement effective requirements practices, including use and continuous improvement of requirements process.
Assist with the development of the organization’s requirements engineering policies, procedures, and tools.
Provide audit/monitoring support as directed.
Use expertise to resolve issues escalated by junior-level teammates.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications
Knowledge of Standard Operating Procedures, CFPB, FCRA and FDCPA requirement preferred.
Excellent verbal and written communication required; able to effectively manage communication with multiple stakeholders.
Demonstrated ability to interview subjects, facilitate group discussions, gather information, and report on results.
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Office, Excel Google docs, collaborative cloud-based programs, and third-party software applications required.
Ability to handle aggressive deadlines, set appropriate expectations and juggle multiple responsibilities
Self-motivated, with the ability to work independently and lead projects with a strong attention to detail.
Supervision
High-level of independent judgment and discretion used in decision-making; uses sound judgment in executing core responsibilities
Requirements
Travel: 0%
Physical: Work is primarily sedentary; mobility in an office setting.
Manual Dexterity: Frequent use of computer keyboard and mouse.
Audio/Visual: Ability to accurately interpret sounds and associated meanings at a volume consistent with interpersonal conversation.
Regularly required to accurately perceive, distinguish and interpret information received visually and through audio; e.g., words, numbers and other data broadcasted aloud/viewed on a screen, as well as print and other media.
Environmental: Office environment– no substantial exposure to adverse environmental conditions.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
lakxMOYZun
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
fnssmrboBe
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Performs analyses of the business goals, objectives and needs of the general business environment for appropriate FIS segment, division, group or line of business.
Performs research and analysis to support business operations and presents findings to manager or project leader.
Plans and designs business processes and make recommendations and changes in order to improve and support business systems and activities and/or to deliver greater effectiveness and efficiency.
Utilizes systems and data to resolve business issues in the most effective and productive manner.
Identifies and implements best practices and suggests how to improve current practices.
Calculates/estimates costs and benefits of alternative actions or solutions to establish their viability/return on investment.
Develops recommendations to solve problems and issues related to business operations.
Analyzes and documents business processes and metrics and identifies improvement opportunities.
May perform special projects upon request and on occasion.
May provide coaching and/or guidance to less experienced Business Analysts.
Other related duties assigned as needed.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
OmZNuQr6hD
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Duties:
Detailed documentation preparation for requirements, use cases, functional, non- functional requirements.
Creating UML Diagrams.
User Interface prototypes development.
Process flow development.
Conducting JAD sessions.
Designing UI mockups.
Qualifications:
Previous experience in business intelligence, analysis, or another related field.
Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills.
Strong attention to detail.
Master's degree in Business Administration, Management Information Systems, or any related business or IT management field of study that provided the required skills and knowledge, and 6 months of related experience in any position that provided the required skills and abilities.
No travel or telecommuting
Employee privileged benefits are offered.
Powered by JazzHR
N9d9ummkhc
",[None],"['problem solving', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsibilities/Accountabilities:
Responsible for supporting users, creating and maintaining training documentation and desktop procedures
Acts as liaison between the business user community and the Application Support organization
Provide day to day operational troubleshooting for system issues, bugs, and fixes
Perform unit testing for Back Office applications, and manage and document user testing
Runs various queries on settlement and billing application data to validate interfaces are operating properly and data content is accurate
Develop business requirements documents based upon knowledge of the business processes and meetings with the business owners
Responsible for supporting users and deliver training for upgrades and enhancements to Lodestar and related applications
REQUIREMENTS:
Requires a Bachelor's degree, preferably in Computer Science, Mathematics, Business, Economics or at least 3 years of equivalent work experience
Desire at least 2 to 3 years of retail energy related experience
Must possess initiative, advanced decision-making skills and problem-solving abilities
Must possess a working knowledge of the retail energy billing process (specific knowledge of Solutions?
systems and processes is desired)
Experience with Customer Care Operations, and Billing software (Lodestar/Oracle Utilities and Excelergy Revenue Manager is desired)
Experience with SQL query tools to extract information from databases (SQL Server) and source applications is required
Strong Microsoft Excel skills required, including experience with macros and VBA
Requires excellent verbal and communication skills
Ability to identify issues, analyze data, develop, recommend, and implement solutions
Must be self-motivated, goal oriented, and able to learn independently
Advanced Proficiency in Excel
Requires problem solving ability and sufficient knowledge of system analysis skills
Must possess initiative and advanced decision-making skills abilities
Must be able to handle multiple requests at the same time and be able to prioritize one's workload
Experience with every phase of the System Development Life Cycle
Ability to develop and test data in accordance with system requirements to achieve expected results
Ability to work in a team environment
Ability to effectively communicate and gather conceptual ideas and turn into functional requirements
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'oracl']","['data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'oracl', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom', 'recommend']"
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Master’s Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional organizational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
LY2MR3lcNH
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
lb5W6hAdFI
",[None],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['optim', 'busi']"
BA,"With guidance and supervision from more senior members of the team, this role will undertake requirement gathering, analysis and definition and testing of business applications and functionality.
Qualification:
Experience equivalent to BS Engineering/Computer Science
BS/BA degree in relevant IT discipline; Commercial BA/Testing or equivalent experience required
Basic Requirement:
Ability to maintain automated test scripts.
0-2 years of experience as business analyst.
Understanding of As-Is and To-Be processes.
Basic understanding of software development methodologies, platforms, tools, and languages.
Understanding of gathering business requirements and translating them into user stories/functional specifications.
Basic understanding of software development life cycle (SDLC).
Proficient in Microsoft Office products.
Moderate facilitation skills a plus.
Basic oral and written communication skills.
Powered by JazzHR
s4QZdbiIpa
",['microsoft'],"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
3zX7biz72q
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The ERP Business Analyst will work closely with both internal and external departmental representatives to optimize the use of the ERP to improve business operations.
The ERP Business Analyst will examine business processes, architect solutions, perform testing and training, identify and resolve issues and guide system use.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES (other duties as assigned):
• Maintain overall design integrity of ERP processes and systems, by corporate and global success factors to create sustainable and scalable solutions.
• Prioritizes, resolves and closes ServiceNow production tickets at all levels including resetting security, providing system navigation support; resolving configuration, process, and data issues for E1 and other systems.
Communicates and educate changes and issue resolutions.
• Lead and manage strategic, transformational projects that are directly aligned with the annual operating plan and impact operational success of certain business units.
• Lead business requirements gathering and document business requirements.
Work with business stakeholders to analyze current business processes and document AS-IS business process flows.
Translate business requirements into technical specifications.
• Assist in developing business cases, testing and training plans, project plans, and estimates.
Manages risks and issues that arise pertaining to ERP platforms.
• Facilitate decision documents to assess options, benefits and risks for steering team and business leaders.
Works to balance the requirements of the enterprise business resources and minimize the need for system customization to utilize the systems standard processes.
• Serve as the subject matter expert for the business community and understands detailed system functionality (including security requirements and coordination of implementation).
• Influences and contributes to process and organizational continuous improvements.
• Other duties as assigned.
SCOPE & IMPACT:
La-Z-Boy generates approximately $1.5B in revenues; has 6 upholstery plants, 6 supply centers, 3 parts distribution centers and 6 regional distribution centers.
This position will support how processes and data work together through the business to efficiently and effectively operate the business.
Communicates statuses and priorities to senior leadership regularly.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
• Bachelors Degree in Finance or Accounting with 4 6 years experience.
• One to Three years Supervisor/Leadership Experience
• Demonstrated leadership abilities and ability to work in a team atmosphere
• Excellent oral and written communication skills
• Strong attention to detail required
PREFERRED REQUIREMENTS:
• 6 -8 finance and accounting experience
• E1 certifications and PMP certification a plus
PHYSICAL DEMANDS/WORK ENVIRONMENT:
Office environment / no specific or unusual physical or environmental demands.
CORE ATTRIBUTES:
Communicate Transparently
Lead the Team
Impact and Influence
Deliver Results
Coach and Develop
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Job Requirements:
","['erp', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"17768 Business Analyst II (Open)
Position Type:
Full time
US.TX.Allen.Office
Position Details:
Job Responsibilities:
Gain in-depth knowledge of current products, processes, and business practices and lead remediation of any issues or gaps identified
Work closely with the product manager to understand Product Vision and assist in defining/refining Product Road map by applying value management principles
Lead requirements elicitation sessions with business owner and stakeholder groups across the organization and document as-is and to-be functional requirements
Manage ad hoc requests for investigative work and unique reporting needs
Perform impact analysis across products and responsible for identifying and/or designing business processes to deliver greater effectiveness and efficiency
With minimal supervision analyze requirements to create Epics, features and user stories and maintain a backlog in line with the product road map
Work closely with UX/UI team to define mock-ups/wireframes
Collaborate with the business owner, technical teams and stakeholders to ensure requirements acceptance in an agile environment
Negotiate and communicate priority for new features and enhancements of payment products
Conduct Product backlog grooming sessions and sprint planning
Facilitate a team to consensus on the scope, design decisions, and implementation decisions
Closely track project progress and manage nuances of scope creep effectively
Coordinate and ensure product documentation is up to date
Support development and QA teams during the development cycle and assist with UAT
Report on common sources of technical issues or questions and make recommendations to the product team
Additional tasks as assigned by manager and team organization/planning
Desired Qualifications:
Bachelors degree with 3+ years of relevant professional experience as an IT Business Analyst working closely with Technical teams in an agile environment
Proven experience in gathering, organizing and documenting technical and non-technical functional requirements interacting with cross-functional teams
Demonstrated experience working on various requirement gathering techniques
Ability to multi-task, organize and prioritize multiple deliverables while working independently
Proven examples of leadership and ability to drive results
Strong analytical, verbal and written skills
Self-motivated; adaptable and flexible; responsive and resourceful in a fast-paced business model
Excellent interpersonal skills
Experience working on Agile methodology is required
Experience in payment industry is preferred
",['excel'],"['analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Current Need:
Position Title: SAP Business Analyst
Job Duties:
Create and maintain systems to load and transform large data sets from various internal sources.
Responsible for delivery of new SAP service functionality.
Makes and tests configuration changes to SAP modules to reflect the functional design decisions.
Create data-driven insights and reports for senior management.
Perform daily monitoring, administration, repair and maintenance related to databases and related technologies in all environments.
Interpret and clarify functional details and process change requirements involving SAP modules: Design and develop custom ABAP code where required.
Create technical/functional work specification and solve complex technical problems.
Perform functional configuration tasks for SAP modules to satisfy business requirements.
Qualifications:
A Bachelor’s degree in Management or a related field of study AND Seven (7) years of experience in the job offered or related occupation.
Applicants must have demonstrated experience with: Business Analysis, requirements definition and building SAP systems solutions; SAP Configuration in all SD modules and GATP modules; Order to Cash business process; SAP Vistex Chargebacks and Rebates; Agile, SAFe and SCRUM methodologies; Creation of Design and Development specification; and Middleware/ API interfaces Mapping exercise and documents.
Education:
A Bachelor’s degree in Management or a related field of study AND Seven (7) years of experience in the job offered or related occupation.
Contact:
Must reference job title: SAP Business Analyst
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.Qualified applicants will not be disqualified from consideration for employment based upon criminal history.
Resumes or CVs submitted to this email box will not be accepted.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Summary:
The IT Business Analyst will collaborate with owners and stakeholders across all departments to initiate IT projects that drive customer success.
Scope of projects include but are not limited to process efficiency, data strategy and digital transformation, business system enhancements, and system integration.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Study and evaluate existing processes, workflows and inputs/outputs
Collect requirements for meeting/exceeding business objectives
Identify gaps between current state and future state
Prepare and analyze directional reports to quantify scope of gaps and to support solution design
Prepare detailed documentation that effectively describes current state and supports critical success factors for future solutions, including known and anticipated business cases
Develop presentations and conduct meetings to share findings and to confirm understanding and directional approach
Translate business requirements into technical requirements to drive scalable solution designs
Facilitate proof of concept design meetings between business owners and IT developers/administrators
Collaborate with IT developers/administrators throughout build process and drive milestone dates
Collaborate with Quality Assurance to define applicable test cases
Facilitate User Acceptance Testing
Assist in the successful implementation of all solutions
Monitor and measure post-implementation performance, adoption and compliance
Maintain a comprehensive understanding of digital information sources leveraged or required by each organization to gain a competitive advantage.
Maintain a comprehensive understanding of required audit controls to drive processes and solutions that are SOX compliant
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required.
Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s degree from a four-year college or university and 3-5 years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Finance or Accounting or Information Technology preferred.
Required Skills and Experience:
3+ Years’ experience operating in a dedicated, cross-functional Business Analyst capacity in an IT organization
Experience writing detailed business requirements
Preferred Skills and Experience:
Ability to gather information from multiple sources and critically evaluate it, reconcile conflicts, disseminate high-level information into details and distinguish user requests from their true needs
Ability to write detailed specification documents and develop activity diagrams, workflow charts and process maps
Ability to translate business requirements into technical requirements that drive measurable and expected results
Ability to guide scalable solutions that are in alignment with roadmap objectives
Advanced presentation, written and verbal communication skills
Excellent project management and change control skills
Strong background in core business applications; CRM, ERP, LMS
Communicate and work well in a team environment
Ability to prioritize work and adjust to rapidly changing requirements and demands
Excellent organizational, document management, and team leadership skills
Computer skills including Microsoft Office at a highly proficient level
Knowledge of core business systems; Salesforce, NetSuite
Project Management experience
BA Certifications or specialized education
","['erp', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'excel']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['erp', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Current Need:
Position Title: SAP Business Analyst 3
Job Duties:
Assist with breaking down business features into user stories and tasks to deliver solutions.
Pivot into multiple areas like P2P as well as outside of core P2P, including new technologies in and outside of SAP.
Configure, develop, and test solutions that support Material Management, Forecasting & Replenishment, Trade and non-Trade procurement (SAP-SRM and/or Ariba), returns and reconciliation processes.
Design of solutions supporting business processes within the SAP application space.
Enable configurations to implement new businesses or functionality into SAP and to provide ongoing support of existing systems and processes.
Prepare functional specifications.
Create or modify programs and development objects.
Identify technology and application development opportunities to improve existing processes.
Review and analyze business functional and technical needs.
Qualifications:
A Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or a closely related field of study and seven (7) years of experience in the job offered or related occupation.
Experience must include seven (7) years with: SAP cross-module integration in MM, SD, and FI, including requirements gathering, configure/prototype solution alternatives, providing high-level and low-level estimations and specifications, implementing solutions, Data migration, Go-Live and post Go-Live support); SAP cross-module integration with SRM and full-life cycle SAP projects (including requirements gathering, configure/prototype solution alternatives, providing high-level and low-level estimations and specifications, implementing solutions, Data migration, Go-Live and post Go-Live support); Leverage SAP and other configuration best practices to enable configurations that will enable Business teams to quickly and efficiently implement new businesses or functionality into SAP and to provide ongoing support of existing systems and processes; Development and enhancement of SAP-ABAP for Reports (Interactive, ALV using classical and Object Oriented Programming), Dialog Programming, BTEs, Conversion Routines, SAP Script, Smart Forms, BDC, LSMW, FTPs, ABAP WebDynpro objects for SAP PORTAL including ESS travel and expense, interfaces like ALE, IDOCs, BAPIs and RFC interfaces, User-Exits, BAdIs, Implicit/Explicit Enhancements, Workflows, multiple SAP Job Scheduling, applying SAP OSS notes, BW extractors – Custom and standard extractors etc; Work on various projects including SAP implementations, SAP Upgrades, SAP Roll-outs, Data migrations etc.
in the capacities of technical and functional analyst; Databases SAP-HANA, and Oracle 10g & 11g; and Agile methodology of Development.
Applicants must have 3 years of experience with: SAP cross-module integration in Vistex application, including requirements gathering, configure/prototype solution alternatives, providing high-level and low-level estimations and specifications, implementing solutions, Data migration, Go-Live and post Go-Live support).
Education:
A Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, or a closely related field of study and seven (7) years of experience in the job offered or related occupation.
Contact:
Must reference job title: SAP Business Analyst 3
","['oracl', 'hana']","['forecast', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['oracl', 'hana', 'forecast', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"What will you contribute?
Reporting to the Product Manager, the Senior Business Analyst will collaborate with the Development and Product Management teams on product requirements, design, documentation, and risk mitigation strategies.
Participate in business case development, market research, and competitive intelligence analysis.
Develop business requirements and collaborate in the translation of business requirements into technical requirements.
Define system and functional requirements.
Responsibilities & Deliverables:
Creates recommendations and feature definition to address market opportunities.
Gathers information from stakeholders to document functional, system, and/or data requirements.
Perform product system impact analysis to determine affected functional areas of the application.
Collaborates with team members to create detailed functional and/or technical specifications for complex development of new or modifications to existing applications or systems.
May review requirements developed by other staff and provide guidance to improve requirement quality as necessary.
Collaborates with team members in the development of specifications to create unit and integrated test cases.
Assists in the analysis of results of unit and integration testing.
Provides overall direction for product enhancements and general product development requirements.
Serves as a liaison between internal and external stakeholders
Collaborates with technical communications writer to develop proper and thorough documentation (internal and external) describing product changes as appropriate.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, and distinguish defects from enhancement requests.
May design and implement training plans.
Identifies continuous improvement opportunities for Product Management processes.
May act as a team lead for project work and facilitate meetings, webinars, and focus groups.
Assist in release preparation duties including release notes, bulletins, and/or supporting documentation.
Required Experience:
5+ years of business analysis or relevant experience.
5+ years SME Lending experience required.
ACBS or AFS experience preferred.
Proficient with Microsoft Office applications.
Strong technical, analytical, and development skills including the ability to provide solutions to a variety of business problems of complex scope and complexity.
Strong verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills required.
Ability to mentor less experienced analysts.
Advanced facilitation skills to conduct and facilitate focused requirements analysis discussions.
Ability to work independently or within a team environment and handle multiple projects simultaneously.
Demonstrated ability to collaborate effectively with cross-functional teams.
Ability to organize and lead others in accomplishing project goals and objectives.
Knowledge of the Software Development Lifecycle.
Advanced knowledge of defining system and functional requirements.
#LI-JH1
*************************************************************************************************************
The above statements describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job.
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required.
If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability please contact your recruitment partner.
*************************************************************************************************************
",['microsoft'],"['risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"You will participate in planning, design sessions, and provide clarification on product requirements.
Manage the request process by collaborating with the Product Owner/Manager to define and justify new product developments/projects.
You must be able to work at a detailed level while maintaining the big picture of overall product goals and the supporting system design.Responsibilities:* Work with end-users, product management, and development resources to gather and document user requirements, translating them into user stories.
* Develop and maintain product backlog(s) with oversight from the business relations manager or other mentor.
* Observe or participate in interviews with business owners and stakeholders.
* Collaborates with development team to ensure design meets customer requirements.
* Participate in Agile ceremonies, helps to drive the discussion during sprint planning and user story grooming.
* Support project team during design, development, and QA testing by clarifying requirements questions.
* Assist stakeholders/end users with UAT.Qualifications:* Relevant degree preferred.
* Knowledge of Agile and Scrum methodologies.
* No prior work experience required.
",[None],"['end user', 'busi']",1.0,"['end user', 'busi']"
BA,"Deliver high quality documentation that is relatively error free so that updates as a result of document reviews are minimal\.
Timely and effectively manage requirements for the projects\.
**System Integration Testing**Develop, document, update, revise, maintain and publish test plans, procedures and reports for IT Systems and computers\.
The Contractor shall conduct functional, unit, system/integration, regression, smoke, load/performance and/or stability tests as applicable for each application release\.
Each applicable test shall be identified as a milestone in the WBS where appropriate\.
Use of industry\-standard automated testing software \(provided by the Government\) is strongly encouraged\.
The amount and type of testing shall be commensurate with the size, scope, and risk of the requirement and the specific release\.
The Contractor shall:+Complete all applicable system tests: Unit Testing \(UT\); integration Testing including Team Level Integration Test \(TLIT\), System Integration Test \(SIT\), Final Integration Test \(FIT\), and Accessibility Test; Regression Testing includes Comparison Test, Installation Test, Security Test, Smoke Test, and System Test\.+Provide support to the project to assess and fine\-tune system performance to optimize results\.+Provide support to the project to get system ready for Independent System Acceptance \(ISAT\) and Deployment Site Readiness Testing \(DSRT\) \(e\.g\., supply interim builds, complete application registration, update technical brochure, supply ReadMe, submit Standard Image Above Baseline Application Test Plans, provide final build for deployment per the Integrated Master Schedule \(IMS\)\.+Thoroughly test code through the phases of applicable system tests outlined above\.
Ensure that work is documented, reviewed, and submitted according to the deliverable schedule\.
**Requirements:**+ U\.S\.
citizen or U\.S\.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, protected veteran status or status as an individual with a disability\.
EOE/Minority/Female/Disabled/Veteran\.
",[None],"['risk', 'regress']",2.0,"['risk', 'regress']"
BA,"Department Overview
Supply Chain Business Analysts
Reporting to the Team Lead Supply Chain Business Analysts, Avigilon is seeking an experienced, highly qualified and capable Business Analyst.
This role will provide expertise in the areas of business problem/opportunity identification, requirements definition, business process and cost of production analysis.
Responsibilities:
Responsible for participating in the analysis, design, development, implementation and supporting activities associated with the supply chain, warehousing, and manufacturing of products
Bridge the gap between the business and IT teams, ensuring common understanding and alignment of both functional and non-functional requirements
Prepare cost-benefit and return-on-investment analyses to aid in decisions on system implementation
Conduct detailed statistical analysis on data provided and make recommendations to key stakeholders
Measure performance against process requirements
Develop metrics that provide data for process measurement
Evaluate current business processes, identify opportunities, and provide recommendations for changes to business processes using established methodology
Independently plan, prioritize, and coordinate complex and concurrent activities to meet deadlines in a constantly changing environment
Plan, perform and implement process improvement initiatives
Define and complete UAT testing within SAP and other enterprise applications
Manage projects from inception to conclusion
Present analysis results to various groups and individuals, including senior management
Develops tools that support decision making and business cases by summarizing needed information
Qualifications:
Experience in Manufacturing areas and business analytics
Certified in SAP would be an asset
Certified in Salesforce or Salesforce knowledge and experience would be an asset
Experience with PLM is an asset
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of changing situations
Excellent organization, time management, and follow-up skills
Ability to take initiative and exercise excellent judgment
In-depth SAP knowledge in manufacturing
Prior experience in API’s and EDI’s is a plus
Self-motivated and action oriented, with demonstrated track record of pursuing work with energy, drive, and a strong accomplishment orientation
Excellent verbal and written communication skills (reading, writing, listening, oral, presentation) Exceptional interpersonal skills; Able to build strong and successful long-term working relationships, Strong ability to achieve objectives by working with others in an organizational context
Ability to handle changing priorities and manage workload
Basic Requirements
Bachelor's Degree
Minimum 3 years prior experience in a similar role
Prior experience with a Supply Chain System such as SAP (preferred), Oracle, JD Edwards, etc.
Travel Requirements
Under 10%
None
Position Type
Experienced
Referral Payment Plan
No
EEO Statement
","['excel', 'oracl', 'salesforc']","['data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'salesforc', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Type: Contract
Duration: 6-12+ months
Process: x2 Video
As a BA you will report to Project Owners and will be driving customer service and digitalization products.
You will also sit in on all different types of meetings and gather requirements, build out requirements/documentation, analyze data and support a certain group.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Purpose
Characteristics
Analytical Thinking and Problem solving: Analyze problems and opportunities effectively.
Business Communication: Good communication tools to perform business analysis activities, manage teams, and collaborate with stakeholders.
Business & Industry knowledge: Perform effectively within their business, industry, organization, solution, and methodology.
Resourceful: Involve the right people at the right time.
Relationship-Building Skills: Able to gain the trust on Stakeholders based on ethics, Accountability, Organization and Adaptability.
Tools & Technology: Able to provide a variety of tools and technology to model, document, and manage outputs of business analysis activities and deliverables to stakeholders.
Experience
3 years as a Business Analyst in the IT industry or related
Education
Business Information
Computer Science
Industrial & System Engineering
Knowledge
Business Analysis Body of Knowledge (BABOK) (Study or Certification)
Business Analysis Planning and Monitoring
Elicitation and Collaboration
Requirements Life Cycle Management
Strategy Analysis
Requirements Analysis and Design Definition
Solution Evaluation
Career Path
Sr. Business Analyst
Project Manager
",[None],"['analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"(1.)
Documentation work (2.)
To develop the codes for the project as per work assignation.
(3.)
To maintain the existing project and resolving the issues occurring in the existing project.
(4.)
To work upon the new requests raised by the client and develop those features.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Job Category: Professional Services
Position Summary:
Ideal candidate is responsible for customer engagement, analysis of client
requirements and work with engineering teams in implementation of the requirements.
Duties/Responsibilities:
Work effectively with Talent Leaders and executive staff to define and translate
high level business requirements into functional specifications
Keep up with deep technical conversations, and high-level conceptual product conversations
Work with customers to solve day-to-day business problems, and have an eye for spotting
new ones
Interact with technology, HR functional areas, and HR Service Centers to formulate
and implement solutions to enhance existing systems, services, create new deliverables
and improve processes
Evaluate the quality and effectiveness of new processes, systems and/or modifications
to existing solutions
Provide ongoing support and trouble-shooting for various HR systems and others as
assigned
Equally responsible in explaining complex technical issues to customers and communicating
detailed requirements to engineering teams
Maintain confidentiality of customer data
Skills/Requirements:
Bachelors or Masters in Computer Science, Information Technology or Business preferred
3+ years experience in Business analyst role
Knowledge of MS Office/MS Visio/MS Project is required
Candidates should have demonstrated knowledge and understanding of application programming,
database and system design
Ability to function independently and as a team player in a fast-paced environment
required
Must have strong written and verbal communication skills
Excellent Customer service and organizational skills
Experience with Human Resource and workforce administration concepts
Experience with Talent Management Systems/Human Capital management Systems like
On-Boarding, Hiring, Learning, Performance, Payroll, and Succession is a plus
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Your Team
The Information Mosaic Team architects and delivers intelligent post-trade software applications to the capital markets globally.
This role would sit specifically within the business analysis function, reporting into the Business Analysis Director.
Your Role
You are a creative thinker, who is self- driven, takes initiative and ownership in your daily responsibilities.
You enjoy developing innovative solutions to a variety of complex problems.
Responsibilities
Actively contribute in client engagements and requirement workshops
Understand the underlying business, implementation & product usage of assigned client/s
Elaborate and deliver clearly defined requirement documents without subsequent change requests
Work closely with product design & development team to analyze and design functional enhancements
Provide onsite product consultancy and assist the client with acceptance criteria gathering and support throughout the project life-cycle
Provide assistance and business expertise to the Support Team and the QA Team in verifying client reported issues and internally raised issues
Work with the client to define the most optimal future state operational process and related product configuration.
Ability to take ownership of a client from initiation to go live, through business process mapping, requirements analysis, UAT, go live support.
Manage scope by providing innovative solutions and challenging all new client requirements and change requests but simultaneously ensuring that client gets the required business value.
Your expertise
You have:
4+ years of experience as a Business Analyst/Implementation Consultant in the financial services sector (Asset Servicing experience ideal)
Detailed knowledge of Capital Markets
University degree in relevant business/finance discipline or equivalent years of experience
Excellent communicator with client presentation experience
Delivery focused with good time management and personal organisational skills.
Ability to build and maintain strong relationships both internally & externally with clients
Travel is required
It's a bonus if you also have:
Understanding and experience of the agile software development process and overall project life cycle.
A proven ability to elicit requirements, identify solutions & complete requirement documentation.
Experience of industry standard interfaces is an advantage (e.g.
SWIFT, XML)
User acceptance testing experience.
Open to extended period(s) onsite with client
Determination on requests for reasonable accommodation are considered on a case-by-case basis.
This contact information (email and phone) is intended for application assistance and accommodation requests only.
Resumes are only accepted through the online application process, and only qualified candidates will receive consideration and follow-up.
For information please click on the following links:
Right to Work
EEO is the Law
EEO is the Law Supplement
Pay Transparency Statement Current Colleagues
",['excel'],"['optim', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'optim', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Senior Business Analyst
Job Type: Contract (On-Site)
Length: 6-Months
Est.
Start Date: 7/20/2020
Hours: 40 hours/week, 8 hours/day
Pay Rate: $32 - $36 per hour
This position is responsible for but not limited to the drafting, preparation, and maintenance of SBC’s (summary of benefit coverage).
Working in a team environment this position will interpret health benefits and prepare documentation that will be distributed to health plan members.
This position will work with teams that file documentation with Federal and State Insurance Regulators, and will be required to maintain the highest level of quality.
This position will be required to regularly speak with legal counsel, product teams, and other internal stakeholders to ensure that all language on SBC’s are interpreted truthfully and accurately.
The ideal candidate will possess a curiosity about insurance regulations/standards, process improvement, and the overall operation of contract administration.
The ideal candidate will have a desire to complete all of their work timely and of the highest quality standards.
The ideal candidate needs to be a results-oriented person that is able to work autonomously towards achieving goals.
The ideal candidate will possess the highest level of integrity and the desire to always do what is right.
The ideal candidate has initiative and is willing to step in and step up wherever the demand of the job calls.
FUNDAMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Basic MS Office understanding
Solid communication skills, written and verbal
Ability to meet strict deadlines
Works well in a team environment
Has a self-starter mindset
A willingness to learn new things
A Bachelor’s degree from accredited university
PREFERRED JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Experience in the health insurance industry
Experience in healthcare
Experience working with benefits
Advanced MS Office understanding and utilization
Strong Project Management skills and/or experience
Experience in the customer service industry
Ability to work with executive level personnel.
JIRA experience and usage
Lotus Notes experience and usage
Strong data analysis background
Excellent Excel Skills, Attention Detail, Health Care Basic Knowledge
If you have questions about the position, you may contact the recruiter recruiting for this position Robv492@kellyservices.com however, your resume should be uploaded via the “SUBMIT RESUME” button included within**
Why Kelly®?
As a worker today, its up to you to take charge of your career and look for opportunities to learn, grow, and achieve your potential.
Helping you find whats next is what were all about.
About Kelly®
Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
#KellyGTS
]]
","['ms office', 'excel', 'jira']","['busi', 'commun', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'jira', 'busi', 'commun', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"This position is responsible for but not limited to the drafting, preparation, and maintenance of SBCs (summary of benefit coverage).
Working in a team environment this position will interpret health benefits and prepare documentation that will be distributed to health plan members.
This position will work with teams that file documentation with Federal and State Insurance Regulators, and will be required to maintain the highest level of quality.
This position will be required to regularly speak with legal counsel, product teams, and other internal stakeholders to ensure that all language on SBCs are interpreted truthfully and accurately.The ideal candidate will possess a curiosity about insurance regulations/standards, process improvement, and the overall operation of contract administration.
The ideal candidate will have a desire to complete all of their work timely and of the highest quality standards.
The ideal candidate needs to be a results oriented person that is able to work autonomously towards achieving goals.
The ideal candidate will possess the highest level of integrity and the desire to always do what is right.
The ideal candidate has initiative and is willing to step in and step up wherever the demand of the job calls.
FUNDAMENTAL JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Basic MS Office understanding
Solid communication skills, written and verbal
Ability to meet strict deadlines
Works well in a team environment
Has a self-starter mindset
A willingness to learn new things
A Bachelors degree from accredited university
PREFERRED JOB REQUIREMENTS:
*Experience in the health insurance industry
*Experience in healthcare
*Experience working with benefits
*Advanced MS Office understanding and utilization
*Strong Project Management skills and/or experience
*Experience in the customer service industry
*Ability to work with executive level personnel.
*JIRA experience and usage
*Lotus Notes experience and usage
*Strong data analysis background
Job Requirements:
","['ms office', 'jira']","['commun', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'jira', 'commun', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Overview:
The generation analyst will be responsible for application development, maintenance and support for all applications in the Business Applications Management (BAM) portfolio.
Supported by the Business Applications Supervisor, this team member will be a conduit to the off-shore application maintenance support team to manage and prioritize work while maintaining good working relationships with all Vistra technology teams and stakeholders.
They will also be expected to execute application maintenance where deemed appropriate.
Responsibilities:
Provide support and development/configuration for power plant applications, partnering with the business, vendors and 3rd parties as applicable, utilizing Agile practices.
Implement projects to improve the productivity of assigned business areas.
Collaborate with and prioritize daily work for the offshore application maintenance team.
Execute support remediation applications that cannot be handled offshore.
Lead efforts to gather work projections for projects and continuous improvement activities from the offshore team, providing training as needed.
Contribute to continuous improvement activities through independent and group work.
Provide project management oversight application upgrades.
Translate business requirements into technical/executable delivery units, serving as a liaison between business & technology teams to ensure that requirements are fully understood.
Develop relationships with other Vistra work teams to aide in problem solving, work execution, and licensing/procurement.
Update system of record with application details (architecture, licensing, users, etc.)
as needed.
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in MIS, Computer Science, Accounting, or a related field from an accredited college/university (or equivalent experience).
1- 3 plus years of technology related experience, required
2 - 3 plus years of experience with Tier 1 corporate applications or ERP business process improvement & implementation initiatives
Responsible for building application and OS patching schedules and implementing in both cloud and data center environments
Proven ability to collaborate on cross-functional teams
Ability and willingness to travel
Knowledge of and/or experience supporting and troubleshooting software products
Ability to communicate technical information to nontechnical personnel, learn new applications and IT processes
Successful management of ServiceNow backlog
CMDB at 90% > accuracy for BAM apps
Job Family
Information Technology
Locations
Irving, TexasTexas
If this describes you, then you will have a good career here!
","['erp', 'cloud']","['data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['erp', 'cloud', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Employment type: Fulltime
Roles & Responsibilities:
The candidate should have at least 10 years of experience in Business analysis, implementation and successful delivery of complex systems.
Work with the Product, Dev and QA team to understand and analyze estimation/budget.
Should be able to assist the development teams by clarifying requirements, resolving functional and test data queries.
Experience working with testing teams for test plans, test cases and execution of automation test cases in SIT, Integration and UAT environments.
Should be able to lead testing team to test UI and biz functionalities.
Develop and maintain testing standards and procedures for broader testing team to ensure cross dependency issues are analyzed.
Partner with Scrum team and Scrum Masters to build and own product roadmap for project.
Extensive experience in designing software products and creating Product Backlog, Sprint Backlog and managing User stories.
Very good experience of agile and SCRUM methodology.
Certification preferred.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent written/verbal communication skills
Bachelors or Masters in Information technology or computer science in related field.
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"As a Business Analyst in IT Gathering Business Requirements from the client/Customer Interact with clients to understand and capture their functional and technical requirements.
Middle level project based business knowledge.
Ability to diagnose issues and resolve simple to moderately Preparation of presentations with the inclusion of feasibility study as well as proof of concept delivery.
Preparing (Functional Specification Documents)/Business Documents.
Good Organizational, analytical, Problem-solving,
verbal and written communication skills.
Interprets business needs and translates them into system requirements.
Writes business specifications and forwards to technical staff for system development.
Interprets systems specifications to develop, maintain and support automated business processes.
Qualifications
null
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst (BA)
The Business Analyst will work with internal and external stakeholders to gain an understanding of data requirements and operational processes.
This position will collect and measure key metrics in order to evaluate client success and business impact.
Over time the expectation is that the Business Analyst will become a source of knowledge within the business on the relationship between customer data and operations performance.
The work of the Business Analyst will directly support the goals an initiative of the Client Success Managers and leadership team.
Essential Job Functions
Conduct research and analysis as directed by the client-facing team members
Take the lead on ad-hoc analysis requests from the business
Track and measures ongoing client activities to optimize performance
Measure and analyze historical data and report on trends
Analyze and document complex business processes
Dig into large data sets and existing reports to find, document and communicate anomalies
Engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously
Prepare weekly reports in Excel, Word and PowerPoint
Required Skills and Experience
3-5+ years of business analysis experience required
Bachelor’s degree required; Business analysis certification a plus
Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Word, PowerPoint and Outlook required
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills required
Strong written and verbal communication skills required
The ability to cooperate and collaborate with cross-functional teams required
Health Care and HIPAA experience preferred
Familiarity with the basics of database structure and logic is preferred
1-3+ years of software experience preferred
1-3+ years of Salesforce experience preferred
Benefits
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"DEA has 39 domestic offices in 23 Divisions.
Those Divisions are as follows: Atlanta, GA; Caribbean; Chicago, IL; Dallas, TX; Denver, CO; Detroit, MI; El Paso, TX; Houston, TX; Los Angeles, CA; Louisville, KY; Miami, FL; New England; New Jersey; New Orleans, LA; New York, NY; Omaha, NE; Philadelphia, PA; Phoenix, AZ; San Diego, CA; San Francisco, CA; Seattle, WA; St. Louis, MO; and Washington, DC.
Schedule: Full Time
Functional Responsibilities: Performs analysis and related support functions relevant to strategic planning and assists with performance measurement and tracking performance related metrics.
Develops reports and makes recommendations to improve business processes, procedures, and performance.
Assists in performing analyses and interpretation of cost and expense variances.
Compiles and analyzes financial information.
Develops integrated analyses, projections, reports, and presentations.
Creates and analyzes monthly, quarterly, and annual reports and ensures information has been recorded accurately.
Performs financial forecasting and reconciliation.
Coordinates performance metrics gathering, analysis and reporting activities.
Identifies and analyzes systems requirements and defines project scope, requirements, and deliverables.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Minimum Education: Bachelor degree or equivalent
General Experience: Requires 5 years of experience and strong analytical, interpersonal, oral and written communication skill and the ability to solve complex problems and work in a team environment.
Must be detailed oriented, flexible, and have strong organizational skill and the ability to work in a fast-paced, high volume, tight deadline environment.
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'forecast']",1.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'forecast']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst
Duration : - Long term
Responsibilities and Duties
o Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
o Strong problem solving and analytical skills.
o Excellent written and oral communication skills a MUST.
o PC literate in Windows environment including MS Office.
o Demonstrated ability to build and maintain strong networks.
o Self-confidence combined with openness to learning and applying new skills and concepts.
o Good sense of humor.
o Knowledge of or ability to understand technical terminology and concepts.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $68,000.00 - $73,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['ms office', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst Dallas, TX
Type: Contract Duration: long-term Rate: DOE
Business Analyst
JD:
The Search and Gallery Product Analyst is responsible for delivering capabilities that support search, search relevancy and SEO -facing products.
This role will support the Product Manager in the development and prioritization of the product roadmap, maintenance of Agile Epics and Stories leveraged by technical delivery teams, and helping manage cross-scrum dependencies.
The Product Analyst will help conduct in-depth business reviews, present to OmniChannel leadership, and supporting initiatives with the site merchandising, marketing, and peer technology teams.
The Product Analyst must be able to analyze data, write agile epics and stories, review test cases and work with technical teams to solve problems.
The Product Analyst works with the Product Manager to monitor and drive the business on all aspects of demand, customer experience, and conversion.
Responsibilities and Key Accountabilities include:
• 1Document functional capability roadmap within team landscape that includes Search, Search Relevancy, SEO
• Complete opportunity assessments in a quick-to-market agile environment.
Including, but not limited to: synthesizing business requirements, identifying required capabilities and calling out areas of uncertainty and recommending solutions
• Support prioritization and sequencing of product and backlog grooming based on input from Product Owner.
• Partner with Site Operations and support teams to triage and prioritize product issues.
•
• Work across teams and projects to synchronize and manage deliverables •
• Document and review test scripts and ensure requirement traceability •
• Supports operational readiness tasks by performs product demos & presenting training to stakeholders •
Competencies & Accomplishments:
• Passion for working in a fast pace agile digital environment is a must!
• Retail ecommerce experience
• Hands on experience on any Search component, Search relevancy, SEO with in retail (like Solr, Endeca)
• Relevant agile software development and Product Analyst experience
• Ability to understand technology and Web Services
• Excellent analytical skills with an understanding of Web Analytics, engagement KPI s and the a basic understanding of how to build and measure benefits.
• Superior relationship building with cross-functional teams to deliver results through excellent partnership, communication and negotiating skills
• High level of attention to detail with the ability to work independently, manage multiple projects, adjust priorities, and work in a continuously changing environment to meet critical deadlines
• Highly motivated to be self-sufficient and able to operate without close supervision
","['solr', 'excel']","['sequenc', 'data', 'kpi', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['solr', 'excel', 'sequenc', 'data', 'kpi', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Product Innovation
Position: Business Analyst, Product Innovation
Reports To: VP, Payment Innovation
Position Summary:
Qualifications Required:
Bachelor’s degree
5+ years’ experience as a Business Analyst
Design thinking knowledge
Creative problem solver, confident in proposing alternative approaches and unique perspectives
Strong critical thinking and decision-making skills
Ability to interpret abstract and complex business requests and analyze based on aggressive timelines
High aptitude for learning new systems and concepts and act with agility in a fast-paced environment
Experience developing all types of documentation including business and functional specifications, and end-user guides
Results-oriented, is proactive and flexible, strategic thinking, and self-motivated
Excellent writing and storytelling skills, ability to present abstract and complex concepts in a logical fashion
Proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and Word
Qualifications Desired:
Experience with payment products, operations and technology delivery
Experience leading a team through new product design
Proficiency in UML and Use Case development
Knowledge of software development SDLCs and PLCs; both agile and waterfall
Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
Research new concepts to outline impact to marketplace, benefits, risks and costs
Business Case development
Develop/update reports for decision support and management reporting
Assist with external and internal facing system documentation (interface specifications, user guides, support manuals etc.)
Adherence to management instruction and performance expectations including key disciplines:
Critical validation of analysis results
Obtaining confirmation/clarity around reporting and analysis request
Responsive and focused on customer satisfaction
Supportive of team initiatives and decision-making process, including contributing to concept development and solution design
Performance Standards:
Maintain effective communications with internal personnel at all levels and with vendors and external clients
Complete tasks and projects in a timely manner
Demonstrate high levels of professionalism and decorum
Demonstrate effective team work
Physical Demands and Work Environment:
Work is generally sedentary in nature, but may require standing and walking.
Lighting and temperature are adequate, and there are no hazardous or unpleasant conditions caused by noise, dust, etc.
Work is generally performed within an office environment, with standard office equipment available.
Your resume
Names and contact information of three references, or three letters of reference
* Please submit a single application per position.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Title: Technical Business Analyst
Type: 6-12 Month + Contract (no sponsorship or third parties)
Rate: MARKET
Start Date: ASAP!
Please Note: Salary/Rate and Client will not be disclosed via email!
Technical BA (1-2 Openings)
Technical BA's - do not want to see functional BA's
Will be documenting technical requirements, experience working with developers, working on business process flow
Must be self sufficient
Must Have:
Visio
Lucidchart
Agile background
Experience documenting code technology
If qualified and interested, please send your most current resume as a word document to Jason Weinstein at jason.weinstein@mondo.com
JD:
Job Title: Technical Business Analyst
I.
Job Summary
Independently and consistently performs analysis to map business requirements and solutions to system/technical design by acting as the primary liaison between the Technology and the Business team.
Conducts technically advanced and in-depth level business process analysis, needs assessments and preliminary cost/benefit analysis, in addition to project timelines and program road mapping in an effort to align Technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each duty satisfactorily.
Other ancillary duties may be assigned.
""
Work with stakeholders and technical team members to map, analyze and document business processes and projects.
""
Perform research and analysis to determine business requirements and then translate such into technical specifications (for custom development, system integration, etc.).
""
Primary liaison between technical team and business owners; demonstrating advanced communication skills between all levels of the organization.
""
Contributes expertise in particular business processes and is responsible for formulating systems/process scope and objectives relative to the organization's business plan and user requirements, process flow definitions, business process mapping and functional specifications.
""
Partner with all levels of Digital team including architects and developers on architecture, design and developing logical and physical data models.
""
Document technical and functional requirements and formulate test plans with QA and other partner groups prior to requesting business user testing.
""
Work with QA to validate releases match the requirements set for it.
Attend monthly releases and perform SIT testing.
""
Lead project team for gaining business user acceptance.
""
Facilitate design sessions with the development teams across the organization to define the and document the technical solution.
""
Deliver elements of systems design, including data migration rules, business rules, wireframes, or other detailed deliverables.
III.
Supervisory Responsibilities
Will coach and mentor less-experienced analysts and act as team leader on more complicated system projects.
IV.
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the qualifications necessary to perform the job.
A.
Education and Experience
Required: Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Business Administration or similar area of study.
Four years of related experience may substitute for the Bachelor's degree.
Five to Eight years' experience as a Technical Business Analyst.
Four or more years working as a Manager/Project Manager may substitute for the minimum years of experience.
Preferred: Bachelor's Degree and Computer Science, MIS, or Business Administration and minimum eight years' experience as a Technical Business Analyst and at least 2 years project management experience.
B.
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations or Other Requirements
PMP or CBAP preferred
C. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities Required
Technically advanced knowledge or in-depth skills in one or more of the following is required:
"" Business analysis methodologies, data model, system design, detailed functional/technical design and related data analytics
"" Analysis and consultation on enterprise architecture
"" Excellent documentational skill
"" Advanced Tactical and Strategic Planning including roadmap development
"" Good working knowledge of Business Intelligence concepts (e.g.
reporting, querying software, spreadsheets, dashboards, and data mining)
"" Experience with Cloud Solutions (preferred AWS), Web-based/Microservices/API/Serverless architectures, databases (RDBMS and/or No-SQL)
"" Experience in SLA driven service offerings and estimation
"" Excel, PowerPoint, BI/Reporting tools, Jira, MS Visio
"" Basic competence in some programming language like Python, VB, C#, Java, etc.
""
Good project management, project planning, basic modeling, analytical and problem-solving skills.
""
Familiar with waterfall and agile concepts
D. Other Knowledge, Skills or Abilities that Contribute to Success
"" Excellent communication skills, both written and oral including prioritizing, problem solving and interpersonal relationship building
"" Proven time management cum organization skills (must be able to prioritize workload and meet deadlines).
""
Ability to learn quickly and think creatively
"" Team player with strong interpersonal skills and ability to take a leadership role when necessary
","['aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'powerpoint', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'jira', 'java']","['data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'powerpoint', 'c', 'cloud', 'python', 'jira', 'java', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"7 years Expertise in Written and oral communications
7 years Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7 years Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 years Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5 years Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4 years Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4 years Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
Preferred:
5 years Experience reporting to executive management.
1 years Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1 years Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"JOB SUMMARY:
Mortgage originations experience preferred.
The Business Analyst serves as the liaison between the business unit and the information systems team they represent.
Provides leadership in defining business systems requirements, and coordinates/leads large or complicated business systems projects and/or tasks, as required.
Performs advanced planning of automation needs necessary to define business system project objectives and prepares project plan.
Manages projects to assure objectives are met within the time frame specified.
ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Conducts user interviews to collect business and functional requirements.
Analyzes business and user needs, and translates them into proper system requirement specifications.
Documents business, functional and system requirements in a clear and concise manner that will provide clear definition of application functionality.
Formulates and defines system scope and objectives based on: user needs, how the request impacts other systems and business processes, industry requirements, business goals, objectives and risk factors the organization is facing (current and projected).
Works with other system business analysts to understand and manage project dependencies.
Writes and executes thorough test plans.
Keeps teammates informed of changes by issuing Change Management Notifications.
Actively participates in providing end user training.
Documents test user scripts to ensure requirements effectively developed and signed off prior to deployment.
EDUCATION / EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS:
•Graduation from a 4-year college or university with major course work in a discipline related to the requirements of the position is preferred.
Will consider the equivalent combination of job experience & education that demonstrates the ability to perform the essential functions of this job.
•Understanding of Mortgage Servicing systems and terminology a must - experience with LSAMS, Fortracs, IVR, LPS Desktop, Equator, Lewtan preferred Working knowledge of MS SQL and SQL Reporting Services.
Experience with gathering requirements for reports associated with Investor and Loan Portfolio reporting Excellent verbal and written communication skills Excellent planning and task-tracking skills Excellent analysis and assessment of business needs and cross-system impacts Proficient in using Microsoft Office Suite, including MS Project and Visio Proficient in MS/SQL data analysis and programming interpretation Excellent team-play skills, able to work in fast-paced environment on multiple projects/jobs concurrently.
•Minimum of 3 years Business Analysis experience Minimum of 2 years experience with, and comprehensive understanding of, Mortgage Servicing processes and associated Mortgage Lines of Business
PHYSICAL CONDITIONS/WORKING ENVIRONMENT:
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
Individuals may need to sit or stand as needed; may require walking, primarily on a level surface, throughout the day; reaching above shoulder heights, below the waist or lifting as required to file documents or store materials; proper lifting techniques required; may include lifting up to 25 pounds for files or paper.
Note any additional physical requirements for the job (e.g.
heavy lifting requirements).
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"One Team.
One Commitment.
One Goal.What's In It For YouReimagining scrap is where it all starts.
Ready to join an innovative IT Team?
The Business Analyst will provide business, analytical and technical expertise to the Mill line of business for the design, development, modification, and support of the business processes, data, analytics, and software applications supporting the SAP APO environment.
The Business Analyst will also drive process change and standardization through change initiatives and process improvement projects including relevant change management activities to enhance business acceptance.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
k7e37i7nZG
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Do you find it easy to listen to customer needs and interpret what action must be taken to address them?
The ideal candidate should be an ambitious, excellent communicator that possesses terrific technical and social skills.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.
",['excel'],['commun'],999.0,"['excel', 'commun']"
BA,"Analyze complex problems, derive options and solutions and present in an understandable manner to stakeholders, developers, testers and users at multiple levels.
Act as a liaison with technology and business unit subject matter experts in support of Transactions Monitoring project.
Solicit information from business and IT SMEs about application functions, data and process flows.
Document application functions, data and process flows using prescribed template, or appropriate fit-for-purpose format
Participate in integration design process and provide detailed documentation and requirements as appropriate.
Document reports required by system stakeholders.
Oversees the acquisition, analysis, strategy and dissemination of subject matter knowledge.
Conducts high level business analysis involving complex business requirements and processes.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Established, Entrepreneurial, Empowered…Explore the Opportunities!
IT Business Analyst
The EAS team is responsible for developing and delivering sales and mobility applications for a global direct sales force.
This position also provides on-going support for continuous improvement of existing business applications.
Applying for a new job is a little like entering uncharted territory.
Culture and benefits
And that’s speaking for 100 years in the business!
Employee-centric environment (regular corporate activities, personal relationships, small teams)
Family-first attitude (work-life balance support, flexible hours)
Approachable leadership (collaboration with top leaders, open-door policy)
Growth-oriented mindset (autonomy, creative freedom to explore new ideas)
Paid vacation and holiday leave
Wellness initiatives (on-site fitness facility and cafeteria, walking trail)
Community involvement (volunteering, fundraisers, charity events, school sponsorships and donations)
Employee recognition programs (appreciation week, awards and ceremonies)
Personal and professional development and growth
Tuition reimbursement
Financial wellness (retirement options, 401(k) match, employee credit union)
Benefits package (medical, dental, vision, life, long and short-term disability)
If this sounds like a fit for you so far, keep reading.
A little about you
You have a Bachelor’s degree and 3+ years of experience working with Customer Relationship Management (CRM) or ERP Business Applications, system in a functional capacity.
A big plus would be experience with Salesforce Force.com, Sales Cloud, or Service Cloud, or Oracle eBusiness Suite.
Additionally, you have superior knowledge of Microsoft Office suite, including Word, PowerPoint, and Excel.
You are a confident communicator.
You work well with others and can confidently communicate, whether in-person, on the phone or via email, with a variety of people, including those you have never met and in large groups.
You have great attention to detail.
You would consider yourself an exceptional multi-tasker and never let a to-do item slip past you.
Even when you have multiple projects to manage at any given time, you can execute accurately with little to no error.
You have a consultative personality.
You have no problem quickly building rapport and credibility with your business partners.
People see you as an analytical, problem-solver and an influential personality, capable of handling complex issues and delivering appropriate solutions.
You are an innovative problem solver.
You look at the way things are done and always ask yourself if there is a better way to do it.
You bring innovative ideas to the table to improve process efficiency.
When tasked with a problem, finding the solution excites you.
You give great customer service.
You respect individual’s questions and inquiries and treat all customers the same.
You manage expectations well and are always happy to help.
There is no dumb question to you.
You also work in a timely fashion so customers can get back to it.
Day-to-Day Work Examples
For starters, though, here are some day-to-day examples of what you will be doing:
Work as a part of an implementation team to rollout out software to business groups, using both agile and waterfall methodologies
Identify business needs, requirements, constraints and business problems of current and future systems along with the stakeholders
Hands on participation in system design, system configurations and testing of various software systems
Perform extensive system, integration, and user acceptance testing
Responsible for project documentation including requirements, design specifications, user stories, test cases & scenarios, etc.
Coordinate project events such as status meetings, training sessions, testing sessions, and IT communication sessions, including documentation and communication pertaining to above events
Provide post-production support to various business groups
May perform report development using various non-technical reporting tools
May participate in development of training material and conducting end user training sessions
Perform various other project tasks as assigned
Sound like a fit for you?
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Job Role: Business Analyst
Long Term Contract :W2 Only
Minimum 8+ years experience with Banking & Finance domain as BSA.
Experience working in Auto Finance domain
Excellent presentation skills in Power Point.
Experience working on Telephony technologies (Preferred)
Good knowledge of functions and processes of different business units
Ability to critically evaluate business needs, identify opportunities for improvement and decompose high-level information into detailed requirements
Proficient in major business processes for accounting system
Demonstrated ability to interact and collaborate with key functional business users and ability to guide users towards Best Practices
Perform detailed analysis of business requirements and document the business process flows
Create and maintain the Functional Specs documentation and work collaboratively with the team to test and deploy the system changes
Ability to manage and own quality of deliverable to business users
Experience with SDLC process (Software Development Life Cycle) including application development, testing, deployment, operations, documentation
Ability and willingness to work with a global IT team, including other BSAs, Developers, QA and Project Management
Detail-oriented, organized, self-motivated and a great team player with excellent interpersonal skills
Expert in handling crucial conversations with the customer coupled with good negotiation and conflict-resolution skills13.Excellent communication and problem-solving skills, with a try until you succeed attitude
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",['excel'],"['financ', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The candidate will work to bridge the gap between the client needs and solution development to ensure a strong product is deployed.
The candidate should be able to independently learn and become an expert in the Momentum Performance Budgeting software in order to advise the federal client on best practices and procedures.
The candidate may also support the client in analyzing Performance Budgeting issues entered through a Help desk portal and on-site assistance.
Federal financial management/accounting and/or budgeting experience with some exposure to Oracle SQL will help the candidate be successful in this role.
It is an extraordinary time to be in business.
Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.
No unsolicited agency referrals please.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.
You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested.
Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.
Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.
Your future duties and responsibilities
• Help drive successful operation of Momentum Performance Budgeting by delivering high quality advisory and support services to government clients.
• Document workflows and processes based on requirements.
• Document requirements and provide final technical review and validation of requirements.
• Work with stakeholders and the project team to prioritize collected requirements.
• Provide additional support and guidance to clients during the implementation phase to include development of training resources.
• Perform testing to confirm user issues and support system enhancements.
• Development of SQL queries and scripts for data analysis and manipulation
Required qualifications to be successful in this role
• 2+ years of workplace experience with SDLC Testing and data analysis experience.
• Strong SDLC experience and documentation experience (Requirements, design documents, and user training documents)
• Strong customer service skills.
(E.g., Ability and desire to develop and maintain productive client relationships.)
• Proficient in the Microsoft Product Suite
Desired Qualifications:
• Experience in government functions such as federal acquisition, grants, and/or financial management is preferable.
• Active Secret Security Clearance
• Bachelors degree in information systems, computer science, business administration or related field
• Working knowledge of Oracle SQL.
#LI-HS1
#CGIFederalERPJob
","['microsoft', 'oracl', 'sql']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'oracl', 'sql', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Department: Business Analyst
Reports to: Project Team Lead
SUMMARY
RESPONSIBILITIES
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Conduct business process analysis and requirements gathering sessions
Develop user stories and functional requirement specifications for consolidated Contact Center web applications via JIRA
Assist in method definition for API integration to third party applications
Clearly communicate with clients and project teams via email and conference calls
Coordinate product deployments and write release communications
Ensure collaborative outcomes by establishing and promoting strong client partnerships
Work collaboratively with PMO, Design, IT, Development, QA, and Business Analysis teams
Responsible for the successful definition, testing, management, and launch of product
Responsible for maintenance and product enhancements post launch
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Business, or Marketing.
Other disciplines or experience substitutions maybe considered.
2-3 years of experience in a BA role with increasing responsibility
Requirements gathering, data modeling, API integration, and specifications for new web applications
Relational databases and SQL query tools
QA use cases, QA testing, and Bug Tracking tools
Software Project Management
Excellent written and interpersonal communication skills
Proficiency in Microsoft Outlook, Excel, and Word is a must
Experience with JSON and XML data structures
Experience writing T-SQL queries
Experience in the Financial or Electronic Payment Processing industry, with Contact Center software, and/or JIRA is a plus
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
Principals only.
Recruiters please don't contact this job poster.
Powered by JazzHR
34Q08yFcBq
","['excel', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"You will analyze Current Work Flow to understand business and market trends and propose the automation options in order to increase efficiency.
Responsibilities:
Use data to understand business patterns and trends
Analyze internal and external data through quantitative research
Promote best practices in data analysis and reporting
Collaborate with cross-functional teams
Qualifications:
Previous experience in Robotic Process Automation Analysis.
Knowledge of RPA tools and automation
Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills
Strong attention to detail and ability to present the findings to VP and C level teams in concise presentations in a visually appealing fashion.
Ability to prioritize and multitask
Imagine a better way of doing business, of implementing the perfect software, of refining a practice or business integration, and it can be realized.
",['c'],"['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities
• Work with business users to understand their business functions and processes in order to help them define project requirement documents.
• Conduct internal walk throughs with the project team and insure comprehension.
Insure requirements are being met as the project team progresses through the software development process.
• Follows documentation and development standards.
• Provide/confirm detailed estimates for assigned work units and provide communications for deviations from estimates.
Pro actively works with project managers to ensure appropriate time is allocated to assigned tasks.
Qualifications
• Education: Associates/Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, MIS, Communications, Business or related area
• Proven ability to be flexible and work hard, both independently and in a team environment with changing priorities
• 0-3 years working as a Business Analyst in a technical environment gathering and documenting requirements for technology projects.
• Application familiarity and/or insurance industry / business knowledge preferred
• Willingness to work outside of normal business hours
• Some experience working with project team following a software development lifecycle preferred; Exposure to Agile a plus.
• Excellent English oral / written communication skills
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'normal']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'normal']"
BA,"Position Title: Pricing Support Analyst (PSA)
Position Summary: The Pricing Support Analyst functions as a key position of Green Mountain’s Commercial Sales Division.
Broadly, the Pricing Support Analyst is responsible for assisting the Commercial Pricing Desk in support of the 3rd party broker channel and the Direct sales channel; by executing on deal specific requests, analyzing and loading deal information, and finalizing customer fulfillment.
The Pricing Support Analyst will aid in assisting the Commercial Pricing Desk Analysts in relation to pricing desk performance and functions as well as execute on weekly and monthly goals.
Position Responsibilities:
• The Pricing Support Analyst is primarily responsible for entering customer information and usage history into the system accurately and in a timely fashion in order to support the pricing team effectively.
• The Pricing Support Analyst will work closely with the Pricing Desk to make sure all customers accepted satisfy internal credit requirements.
• The Pricing Support Analyst is responsible for working directly with the Pricing Desk Managers and Pricing Analysts to assist in preparing daily commercial prospects, deal pipeline management, and 3rd party interactions.
• The Pricing Support Analyst will assist the pricing team in working with 3rd party broker channels to promote beneficial relationships in order to maximize closing ratios and profits.
• The Pricing Support Analyst role requires flexibility and adaptability in support of a real-time, growing sales department.
Assisting with reports, helping solve customer issues, and generally willing to grow with and support an evolving department will be necessary.
• Maintain knowledge and understanding of contract language in order to aid in 3rd party broker channels understanding of the language.
Required Skills and Experience:
• Ability to efficiently and effectively handle data intensive and time sensitive daily responsibilities
• Strong understanding of Excel
• Experience in using Microsoft Office product programs important in overall process
• Good verbal and writing skills required
• Some college a plus
Physical Requirements:
• Majority of work performed in front of a computer
Working Conditions:
• Professional, fast paced, high intensity sales office environment
• Support the use of sustainable office practices
• Work schedule will start as early as 8:30 AM
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Â
Serves as the liaison between the customer community and the software development team via clearly documented functional, system and process requirements.
Works with clients to obtain requirements through interviews, document analysis, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, workflow analysis and use cases.
Evaluates the information from those multiple sources to develop an understanding of the clients business requests and needs and translates them into application and operational requirements.
Requires excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to lead a project or group.
Years of Experience: 5 - 10.
Experience: Relies on extensive experience to plan and accomplish tasks .
Leadership/Contributions: Leads and directs the work of others.
Reports to: Director.
Advanced Degree or Certifications?
: Yes.Â
Business AnalystÂ
High-level Responsibilities:Â
Analyze current business processes and make recommendations for improvementÂ
Work with stakeholders to solicit and document business requirementsÂ
Ensure business needs are captured in a clear, concise and unambiguous wayÂ
Define product epics and user stories for delivery and test case traceabilityÂ
Product functionality prioritization and backlog groomingÂ
Work closely with developers and end users to ensure technical compatibility and business process uniformity of future state solutions
Support implementation of projects from inception to completionÂ
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to uncover insights and make recommendationsÂ
Skills and Qualifications:Â
Sharp problem-solving, analytical and innovation skillsÂ
Excellent communication skills and ability to translate complex ideas into simple language for non-technical stakeholdersÂ
Solid technical background and experience with agile development methodologyÂ
Keen leadership and project management skills, ability to drive projects from inception to completionÂ
Relevant product management and/or business analyst experience with loyalty and/or enterprise promotions
Â
Â
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Who you are
Well-spoken and customer facing, you have the ability to present ideas in user-friendly language
A self-starter, able to keep up in a fast paced environment, a team player, capable of juggling multiple projects, and a curious learner
A self-directed, trusted liaison among stakeholders that understands structure, policies and operations of a client accounts
A synthesizer adept at recommending SAP Hybris solutions that enable clients to meet their business goals.
What you’ll do Sales Support
Provide proposal preparation support to Delivery Managers
Provide cross-reference of customers’ requirements against CS/CL/SP/Services component features
Provide SAP Hybris business solution domain expertise to Delivery Managers
Solution Delivery
Provide SAP Hybris business solution domain expertise when engaging clients, guiding them to the best practices for their needs
Gather business, functional and user requirements into a solution requirements specification
Define the vision statement and business objectives for the customer, ensuring that it fulfills the customer needs
Participate in systems analysis and high-level design; identify, troubleshoot, and escalate risks throughout the lifecycle
Lead dynamic & interactive requirements gathering sessions with stakeholders throughout the enterprise, leveraging findings and recommendations from Analytics, User Experience, and Development teams
Communicate clients' processes and requirements to the project team
Develop functional requirements documentation in the form of user stories, process flows, and user acceptance criteria.
Support QA and UAT efforts.
5+ years of full-lifecycle SAP Hybris project experience
Served as a business analyst on ecommerce engagements/projects; consulting experience preferred.
Strong facilitation, negotiation, and conflict-resolution skills
Adaptability and capacity to work effectively in an environment where priorities change frequently
Superior communication and interpersonal skills with the ability to develop and foster long-term relationships
PMP certification
The next big thing isn’t what you’ll buy, it’s how you’ll buy it.
Offices in Gatineau, Seattle, Dayton, and Spokane service clients including Air Canada Vacations, AT&T, PCNA, Honeywell, Microsoft, and more.
Learn more at SMITH.co
",['microsoft'],"['risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'risk', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
Perform requirements gathering, design, build, test, and documentation activities for packaged software applications.
Work under the direction of a project manager as part of a team to deliver large-scale business solutions or enhancement projects.
Responsible for leading a team to complete the configuration of a solution for an entire business function or process.
Major Tasks, Responsibilities and Key Accountabilities
Leads the design and development for whole business processes and/or functions on approved projects and on enhancements to existing projects.
Approves designs by junior members of a project team.
Identifies impact to business resulting from newly configured or improved business functionalities and identifies methods for addressing business change impacts.
Coordinates user acceptance testing (UAT) with the business client.
Prepares System Requirement Documents, functional specifications, and test and user documentation.
Prepares status reports to update the Project Manager on day-to-day activities and statuses.
Executes quarterly security audits and participates in internal and external audits.
Responsible for maintaining SOX controls in application security design and administration, including building roles, module and data permissions, and assigning roles to privileged users.
Nature and Scope
Displays the highest level of critical thinking and analysis in bringing successful resolution to high-impact, complex, and/or cross-departmental problems.
Makes prompt, sound decisions when faced with complex and often contradictory alternatives that result in successful outcomes.
Operates with considerable latitude.
Situations may have little or no precedent requiring original or new concepts or approaches without guidance from others.
Reaches decisions under conditions of uncertainty.
Develops or engages/directs others in developing innovative solutions to important, highly complex strategic and operating problems; cross-departmental considerations are often present.
Work Environment
Located in a comfortable indoor area.
Any unpleasant conditions would be infrequent and not objectionable.
Most of the time is spent sitting in a comfortable position and there is frequent opportunity to move about.
On rare occasions there may be a need to move or lift light articles.
Typically requires overnight travel 5% to 20% of the time.
Education and Experience
Typically requires BS/BA in a related discipline.
Generally 8+ years of experience in a related field OR MS/MA and generally 5+ years of experience in a related field.
Certification is required in some areas.
Preferred Qualifications & Job Specific Details
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous SAP EWM implementations required.
Preferred candidate has experience with SAP ECC and SAP EWM configuration.
7+ years of experience in project business analysis and coordination.
7+ years of experience in software development.
4+ years of experience working on projects or programs requiring the integration of cross-functional technology and/or business solutions.
Bachelors degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, Management Information Systems, or a related field.
Open to non-local candidates.
PRID
PRID159
Job Locations US-GA-Atlanta | US-TX-Dallas | US-CA-San Diego | US-FL-Orlando
Posted Date 7 days ago (7/7/2020 10:28 AM)
Job ID 2020-38233
Business Unit Facilities Maintenance
Functional Area Information Technology
Remote Position?
No
Position Type Full-Time
",[None],"['busi', 'account', 'information technology', 'data']",1.0,"['busi', 'account', 'information technology', 'data']"
BA,"Hi ,
There is a job opening for a Business Analyst in Irving, TX.
Â
Title: Sr. Business Analyst
Duration: 6 to 12 months contract
What you'll be doing...
As a Business Analyst/ Project Manager you will assess the requirements for the Sales and Services Applications portfolio to understand system impacts, use Agile approach to manage projects of various sizes through the full software development life cycle, inception through implementation.
Using your top-notch facilitation skills, you'll work with a variety of stakeholders (clients, legal, security, and IT), designing solutions, managing expectations, mitigating risks, and delivering results.
<u>
Collecting client requirements and performing analysis for medium - large size projects.
Responsible for analyzing problems, developing solutions and making decisions that impact projects.
Performing some technical evaluation of products.
Developing and maintaining project plans.
Managing execution, highlighting risks and dependencies, and resolving conflicts.
Keeping project scope in check.
Ensuring that the solutions as implemented meet expectations.
</ul>
<b>
You'll need to have:
Bachelor's degree or four or more years of work experience.
Four or more years of relevant work experience.
Even better if you have:
A degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or relevant discipline.
Experience running mid- to large-scale projects.
Salesforce or PEGA certification.
Experience as a Business / Systems Analyst in a large applications team.
Experience with applications written in Java / J2EE, SDLC, Web Service, and XML technologies with most of the emphasis on front end development.
Experience to Agile Software Methodologies.
PC literacy, including desktop applications competency (e.g., Microsoft Office, e-mail).
Strong business knowledge and interpersonal skills.
Knowledge of information systems concepts.
Knowledge of applicable methodologies, tools, standards, and procedures.
Strong decision-making and leadership abilities.
Strong organizational and problem solving abilities.
Â
Thanks & Regards
Sarah
TekLeaders Inc
4975 Preston Park Blvd, Suite 500 Plano, TX 75093
Phone: 469.860.0777 (153)
Email: Sarah@tekleaders.com Â
www.tekleaders.com
Â
","['microsoft', 'salesforc', 'java']","['risk', 'problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'salesforc', 'java', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title:
Business Analyst
Other Work Locations: Various unanticipated locations throughout the U.S.
Job Duties:
Responsible for the full systems lifecycle from requirements gathering through implementation of functional solutions.
Gather and document Business Requirements
Document and Maintain Policies & Procedures
Must have experience gathering business requirements for advanced analytics teams (Data Engineers, Data Scientists) and building the necessary use cases.
Must have experience with Data analysis to provide business value (SQL, Excel, BI)
Very good communication skills as well as high level technical knowledge to correspond with the developers team and client side.
Responsible for making BRD (Business Requirement Document) and FRD (Functional Requirement Documents).
Validate requirements specifications and solution design with stakeholders, project team members, and senior management sponsors via an iterative and collaborative review and verification process to obtain consensus and approval.
Identify and manage scope concerns, risks and issues and escalate to appropriate team members and management as needed.
Create and process project change requests when required.
Schedule and facilitate required systems analysis customer and technical interviews, status meetings and topic meetings.
Develop and maintain project plan, issues log, action item log, meeting agendas, meeting minutes and other artifacts as required by governing methodology and departmental processes..
Responsible for creating personas, use case scenarios, usability testing, user cases, Storyboarding, brainstorming.
Responsible for making style guide, including typography, color theory, target audience, moodboard.
SEO, card sorts, trend analysis, competitive analysis google analytics and contribute for increasing web traffic for programs, web APIs, mobile applications.
Design content templates and layout for various programs, initiatives.
Create Web UI and graphics for user friendly desktop.
Manage and own the effective design and communication of team deliverables including newsletters, marketing Campaigns, Graphic publishing to various audiences including IT partners, Business Partners, End Users through multiple channels
Create UI designs through consideration of business requirements and technical limitations
Translate high-level feature concepts into use cases and customer experience requirements
Present design work to the product development team, executives, and external partners for review and feedback
Produce high-fidelity and low-fidelity wireframes, high-fidelity mockups and production art assests.
Develop and maintain detailed UI specifications and templates.
Ensure designs can work across many languages using different character sets
Check the cross-browser compatibility for websites as well as multiple platform testing
Redesign existing websites to Responsive web design
Create UI designs for mobile apps.
Ability to internalize and understand complex technical systems and how your implemented designs will fit into the big picture
Work on several different projects at once, and meet demanding deadlines.
Design and Create innovative desktop friendly sites for mobility information and support
Utilize and recommend efficient web technologies targeted to both Intranet and Internet
Work with Adobe Photoshop, Illustrator, Axure, Balsamiq Microsoft Visio, prototype tool, text Editor, Notepad++, Macromedia Flash, Indesign.
Knowledge of HTML5, CSS3, JavaScript , CMS platform (wordpress)and web APIs.
Develops domain expertise in specific technical skills Java/J2EE, web services, messaging services, Drools rules, XML and web technologies.
Make technical recommendations on designs as well as technical improvements.
Education Required:
Bachelor's or Master's in Computer Science, Business Administration.
Employer will accept combination of degrees or diplomas.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'javascript', 'java']","['risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'javascript', 'java', 'risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"About ConduentConduent delivers mission-critical ?services and solutions on behalf of businesses and governments - creating exceptional outcomes for its clients and the millions of people who count on them.
Learn more at www.conduent.com.Job DescriptionJob ResponsibilitiesConduent is currently seeking a Clinical Business Analyst within the Government Healthcare business group.
For those using Google Chrome or Mozilla Firefox please download the form first: click here to access or download the form.
",[None],"['busi', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The candidate must have professional experience in databases, bui...What Is Expected Of • Bachelor's Degree in related software or technical field or comparable education and/or experience • Understanding the data lifecycle and ETL processes as it relates to data management • Proven ability to organize and structure business and technical requirements • Proven experience in building reports with database languages • Ability to work with limited supervision showing creativity, innovation, motivation initiative, and professionalism • Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with diverse groups, executives, managers, and subject matter experts
",['excel'],"['data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'supervis', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun']"
BA,"Job ID: 91649
Required Travel :Minimal
Managerial - No
In one sentence
The Business Analyst has a broad and deep knowledge of the environments, relevant regulatory, compliance and governance frameworks as well as industry standard processes
and leverages the expertise with Veracode, Qualys and other vulnerability reports analysis to execute risk assessment / mitigation.
What will your job look like?
Investigate and document application vulnerabilities, End of Life and End of Support
Work with Product Owner and Scrum teams to fix detected vulnerabilities
Execute risk assessment / mitigation
Facilitate the warm handoff between ""Just do it"" work and EOL/complex work
Stay current on IT security trends and news.
Research security enhancements and make recommendations to management.
Stay up-to-date on information technology trends and security standards.
All you need is...
Bachelor's degree in computer science
Experience in IT of Financial industry and banking domain
At least 5 years of practical experience in system analysis, working with the client on the requirements and processes definition, in a variety of complex situations
Experience with SAST and DAST tools
(SAST - Static Application Security Testing, DAST – Dynamic Application Security Testing)
Deep understanding of application security vulnerabilities and threat and mitigations.
Familiar with OWASP top ten security risks, like injection, cross-site scripting, weak encryption, broken authentication, etc.
Experience writing technical stories in JIRA/confluence using industry standard notations
Details oriented.
Problem solving capabilities
Excellent verbal and written skills are critical since this job primarily entails communicating technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences
Why you will love this job:
You will be able to use your specific insights and deep knowledge of customers’ business environments to influence decisions impacting customer to optimal solution design.
You will be a key member of a global, dynamic and highly collaborative team with various possibilities for personal and professional development
You will have the opportunity to work in multinational environment for the global market leader in its field
Nearest Major Market: Dallas
Nearest Secondary Market: Fort Worth
","['excel', 'jira']","['risk', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'risk', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"JR Business Analyst - Dallas, TX
Full Time
Looking for Entry Level Candidates Only.
Responsibilities :
Develops, manages and collaborates on standard practices and processes
Build and maintain lasting relationships with all business stakeholders
Actively promote the value of Business Analysis throughout the organization
Responsible for solicitation, analysis, estimation and review of analysis efforts
Perform business and systems analysis and document requirements
Proficiency in the use of Excel and PowerPoint.
Ability to isolate key issues and draw sound conclusions.
Desirable Requirements Strong analytical skills and problem solving ability
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $52,016.00 - $75,000.00 per year
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"Technology Business Analyst - Dallas, TX
About the team:
About the Job:
The successful candidate must be able to bridge the gap between user-functionality and system developers and assist in documenting, evaluating, and translating business architectures and needs into IT applications.
An understanding of consulting methodologies within the financial services /Energy industry (Strategy work, business case development, process mapping, the lifecycle of project implementation, requirements gathering, competitive assessment) is an essential factor for success in this role.
What You'll Get to Do:
Preparing, facilitating, documenting and participating in client meetings/workshops conducting a structured gathering, research, and analysis o Developing and evaluating procedures, controls, user requirements, and functional specifications to identify gaps between the current state and future state
Creating business requirement documents (BRD's) into use cases/functional specifications for customization
Requirements gathering, functional requirements, user stories, and documentation business/data/application/technology architectures, requirements and business rules
Business process models/design, logical data models, standards and guidance
Documenting and explaining problems and works to resolve software defects while ensuring technical compatibility and end-user satisfaction
Analyzing, developing and proposing enhancements to current business processes, reports and applications in order to optimize system effectiveness
Conducting customer interviews and producing meeting summaries
Conducting market/client research and industry analysis of requirements
Producing high-quality verbal and written consulting deliverables (including proposals, customer presentations, consulting reports) to effectively communicate project findings
Generating re-usable intellectual capital in the form of consulting methodology and templates, blueprints and business cases
Basic scripting and project plans
What You'll Bring with You:
2+ years of experience relevant experience required
Bachelor's degree required; major in MIS, Computer Science, Finance, Economics, Business or Financial Engineering preferred
An advanced degree is desirable
Background in financial services or energy a plus
Solid Business Analyst skills, including experience interviewing client executives to gather and document business requirements and process mapping
Strong presentation skills, extensive experience writing successful project proposals, experience planning and executing related projects
Ability to demonstrate project management skills and experience
Ready to get started?
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'econom']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'econom']"
BA,"Working at the intersection of business and technology, you'll sharpen your understanding of business processes and data analysis, while continuing to develop your leadership, management, and communication skills.
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job details
Job Type:
Job Summary:
Responsibilities will include document findings of study and prepare recommendations for implementations of new systems, procedures, or organizational changes, analyze data gathered and develop solutions or alternative methods of proceeding, and plan study of work problems and procedures, such as organizational change, communications, information flow, integrated production methods, inventory control, or cost analysis.
Applicants must have expertise in creating Use Cases, User Stories, Requirement Documentations (BRDs), Mapping/Crosswalk, and Functional Specific Documents (FSDs) for claims processing.
Previous experience following PEGA recommended best practices and capturing requirements within PEGA using the Direct Capture of Object (DCO) approach is expected.
Strong knowledge of Microsoft Project, Microsoft SharePoint, and VendorScape to create end-to-end process flows is a must.
Job Type: Full-time
",['microsoft'],"['recommend', 'commun', 'data']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'recommend', 'commun', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Contract Length: 2 Months
This position will work closely with the quality control team, the finance group and the broader analytics team, to integrate new data sets, build dashboards, support internal and external users, and perform ongoing enhancements:
Develop advanced excel models to assist in reporting and analysis
Track financial performance for operational programs and initiatives
Utilize complex financial models that incorporate all relevant metrics and drivers of the business
Implement business tools and processes and coordinate training efforts as assigned
Identify and develop reports to assist management with status of workflow within the department and interrelated departments
Collect, analyze and report on key drivers and metrics
Recommend and participate in process improvement initiatives related to business unit objectives
Assist in strategic planning process throughout organization, including monitoring and executing strategic initiatives, as requested.
Prepare competitive analysis, market research, and client analysis
Develop, write, publish and maintain documentation in support of manual or automated systems and processes, including screen layouts, reports, interfaces, analytics, etc.
Knowledge and Skills:
"" Ability to building and maintaining dashboards in a Business Intelligence tool.
""
Demonstrates ability of analytics, data manipulation, and working with and evaluate data.
""
Strong written and oral communication skills; must be able to explain data and dashboards to an audience with a variety of technical skills.
""
Ability to identify, analyze, and resolve problems in a timely manner; is detail oriented.
""
""
Ability to adapt to changes in the work environment, manage competing priorities, and able to deal with frequent changes, delays and/or unexpected events.
""
Ability to work independently in a multi-tasked environment.
""
Demonstrates excellent organizational skills.
""
Self-motivated and proactive attitude to work.
""
Ability to learn and understand new products quickly.
REQUIRED SKILLS:
High level of proficiency in developing financial models
Strong analytical and problem solving capability.
Proficiency in Visio, Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Access and PowerPoint) and SharePoint.
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to present ideas and information in a clear, concise, organized and diplomatic manner; ask appropriate questions in order to obtain information; listen to others to respond effectively to ideas and questions.
Excellent organizational and planning skills with ability to set goals and objectives, and timelines to efficiently meet tasks.
Excellent interpersonal skills and professional image.
Proficiency with project planning software tools, preferably Microsoft Project, a plus.
REQUIRED EDUCATION:
Bachelor's degree in Finance, Accounting, Math, Statistics, Engineering or other related quantitative discipline.
Minimum of two (2) years' work experience, preferably as a Business Analyst or Financial Analyst, or the equivalent experience
Experience:
"" 2+ years' experience in analytics and/or Business Intelligence tool support, building dashboards and evaluating data.
""
Experience in the insurance claims industry, finance or weather analytics strongly preferred.
""
Experience in analytics or related quantitative field; understand the basics of data analysis, data manipulation, and seeing the relationships between different data sources.
""
Experience with Tableau, Micro strategy and Business Objects preferred.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint']","['data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'powerpoint', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Skills:
Experience in defining requirements, creating functional design specifications, and creating test scripts.
Must have Mortgage Default and Loss Mitigation experience.
Design and develop metrics, reports, and analyses to drive key business decisions.
They provide a link between raw data extract and the business, so data extraction, analysis, and transformation are key job responsibilities.
Reporting analysts receive requests from all members of the business unit so they must have strong task prioritization skills in addition to good statistical and critical thinking skills.
Principal Duties and Essential Functions:
Provide technical configuration knowledge to support the implementation of system components/subsystems.
Understand business processes, system functionality, industry requirements and best practices applicable for the mortgage servicing departments being supported.
Develop and modify the configuration in the software to implement changes/enhancements to the system, providing input to design when applicable.
Plans, designs, and recommends business processes to improve and support business activities.
Support functional/regression testing activities in support of system functionality releases, patches, and upgrades.
Develop and execute scripts and automate processes where possible to improve efficiencies and accuracy of the software build, integration, release, and deployment processes.
Analyzes and documents client's business requirements and processes.
Facilitates meetings with clients to gather and document requirements and explore potential configuration solutions.
Assists in coordinating business analyst tasks on information technology projects and provide support to other team members.
Participates in technical reviews and inspections to verify 'intent of change' is carried out through the entire project.
Assists in providing time estimates for project-related tasks.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Five or more years of business analysis and system configuration experience.
Experience working with the interface of information technology with functional groups within an organization.
Experience working with business processes and re-engineering.
Experience working with computer programming concepts and basic language.
Other Qualifications:
Interpersonal skills to interact with customers and team members.
Good communication skills.
Good analytical and problem-solving skills.
Presentation skills to present to management and customers.
Personal computer and business solutions software skills.
Good ability to work in a team environment with multiple team members.
Willingness to travel.
",[None],"['regress', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['regress', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Details:
Deliver high quality of customer service by troubleshooting and resolving frontline issues with responsiveness, professionalism and customized support
Develop expertise at the level of Subject Matter Expert (SME) for assigned applications
Deliver accurate and complete documentation of resources, job aids, learnings, one pagers and training materials
Prepare and execute User Acceptance Testing (UAT) for application enhancements and releases
Helps gather requirements (UCD) for enhancements by engaging with end users frequently, both in formal and informal settings
Support leadership to identify opportunities for application enhancements and help define the short-term and long-term application roadmap, including the customer/end user experience map and features
Required:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent work experience
2+ years’ experience business processes and technology solutions
Strong communication skills (verbal and written), including the ability to create presentations and present to small groups
Ability to take initiative, problem-solve with limited direction, and navigate ambiguity to resolve issues
Ability to manage multiple tasks, organize & prioritize
Demonstrate flexibility and the ability to adapt to change
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
",[None],"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Business Analyst
The BA will join agile software development teams to drive the feature requests for insurance claim and pharmaceutical software services.
The candidate should be comfortable working in a data-driven environment.
Perform analysis efforts to implement automated systems and processes.
Collaborate and gather information with Product Management and Software Engineering to implement improvements and product enhancements which are cost effective, efficient, and meet regulatory requirements.
• Act as liaison between business and technical team members
• Troubleshoot business or system related issues
• Develop requirements and documentation for system changes
• Clearly communicate concepts, ideas and directions
• Collaborate with software developers and IT to implement robust solutions
• Ability to negotiate and resolve requirement conflicts
• Ability to prioritize and identify prerequisites to organize a feature/issue backlog
• Lead requirement grooming sessions
• Meet critical timelines
• Follow operational processes and identify improvement opportunities
• Analyze customer product performance and monitor financial results
• Working SQL knowledge to investigate data issues in SQL Server environment
• Detail oriented approach to work
Education & Experience
• Bachelors degree in Computer Science or Information Systems related field
• Minimum 5 years IT experience
• Software Business Analyst or Systems Analyst experience
• Pharmacy or healthcare industry experience a big plus
• Experience working with a software development team
Required Skills
• Highly motivated and committed individual to meet department and corporate objectives.
• Ability to present ideas and information in a clear, concise, organized and diplomatic manner.
• Excellent communication and process management skills
• Strong analytical/problem solving experience
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Primary areas include Inventory Management, Distribution Centers, and Cross Docks.
Additional areas include Transportation, Retail operations, Merchandising, Logistics, & Finance.
Develop and support reports needed to analyze supply chain business operations and processes.
Gather data to be used in the development of high-level analytics and quantitative techniques with the support of a mentor.
Modify existing SQL reporting processes to maximize automation and create consistent run-times.
Troubleshoot failures and handle questions to existing reports that are being supported.
Manipulate Network and Transportation optimization models run using Llamasoft.
Support other team members and Managers in framing operational problems, analyzing information, and assisting in test validations.
Be reliable source in providing data to be used in analytical endorsements of Supply Chain initiatives that make an immediate impact on bottom line.
Conduct necessary adhoc data analysis and quantitative investigations for supporting business groups.
Participate in Supply Chain analytics and reporting discussions with to capture the necessary data requirements used to model current business processes.
Develop an understanding and knowledge of complex system requirements.
Capable of offering innovative ideas and solutions.
Support the testing of developed models and interpret results.
Reading and comprehending the design of existing reports and mathematical/statistical models.
Being capable of making changes or enhancements to these reports and models if necessary.
Creation of new Supply Chain reports.
Participate in report evolution.
Prepare and maintain detailed specification of current and future reports.
Coding application components based on design specifications, while adhering to defined programming standards, structured coding techniques and development methodologies.
Analyze and revise existing reporting system logic and assist in development, testing and debugging.
Own some of the reporting services to Supply Chain (Inventory Management, Warehouses, Cross Docks, and Transportation).
Participate in the development and implementation of user manuals, initial and ongoing report training efforts.
Expected to write SQL code to extract the number of picks to be used in answering this question.
Another instance may involve owning an existing customer fill-rate report that is distributed to planners, facility leaders, and executive management.
Some troubleshooting and data analysis may be expected by the business with the distribution of these reports as well.
A familiarity with the data, an understanding where it resides, and any additional insights regarding its use are necessary to complete these tasks.
Bachelor's Degree (B.A./B.S.)
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $60.00 - $65.00 per hour
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 2 years (Preferred)
Cognos: 2 years (Preferred)
SQL: 2 years (Preferred)
Tableau: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
","['tableau', 'cogno', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist']",1.0,"['tableau', 'cogno', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'logist', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist']"
BA,"ÂJob Title: IT - Technology Lead | Telecom | Customer Service & CRM
Job title: Business Analyst
Minimum years of experience: 5+
Would you require the candidates to meet you for in person interview?No Is Skype/WebEx interview OK?Yes
Please provide the TOP skills, and the years of experience that you'll consider: Telecom, Java, Agie
",['java'],['busi'],999.0,"['java', 'busi']"
BA,"Experience in requirements gathering methods and techniques
Has performed in a role creating Business, Functional and/or Systems Requirements documents
Has defined and understands the use for the key elements of a use case and how was use cases used
Experienced in requirements validation
Knowledge of SDLC, IT Literacy – understand software systems usage, systems
Interpersonal skills, cooperation/collaboration/teamwork
Banking experience or working knowledge preferred.
A four-year college or university with major coursework in a related field.
WHAT YOU WILL DO:
Collaborate with the Development and Product Management teams on product requirements design, documentation, and risk mitigation strategies
Develop business requirements and collaborate in the translation of business requirements into technical requirements
Define system and functional requirements.
Gathers information from stakeholders to document functional, system, and/or data requirements
Collaborates with team members to create detailed functional and/or technical specifications for complex development of new or modifications to existing applications or systems
Serve as a liaison between internal and external stakeholders
May design and implement training plans.
Conduct and facilitate focused requirements analysis discussions
Other duties as assigned
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms; talk or hear.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
",[None],"['risk', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Reporting to the Sr Consumer Engagement Manager, the Business Analyst will be responsible for using data to help guide key business decisions.
S/he will own the analytical roadmap and reporting tools for the Consumer Engagement department through in-depth analysis.Major Responsibilities:* Responsible for working with all customer contact and parts order data to perform analyses, identify trends, create reports, and communicate insights.
* Prepares graphs, spreadsheets, reports, scorecards and PowerPoint presentations as required for key business stakeholders* Manages reports on call center KPIs such as call volume/patterns, service levels, abandon rates, customer satisfaction, and opportunities for agent training and development.
* Proactively identifies and implements data improvements, enhancements, and system customizations* Ensures accuracy of all reported data by continually reviewing and analyzing current sources, processes, and systems functions.
* Researches and reports out company-wide process failures that affect the consumer experience* Conducts workflow process mapping analysis and makes recommendations to improve workflow and efficiency.
* Is the in-house SME on key customer-impacting systems including Zendesk, Netsuite, and Smartsheets* Manages agent access and IT requests for all programs.
* Provides a centralized point of contact for all data storage, requests and analysis* Participates in Consumer Engagement Quality Audits and helps to identify opportunities for improvement.
* Assists in implementing technology that will drive the best possible customer engagement experience* Supports the development and maintenance of departmental procedures, tools, and metrics.
* Responsible for managing Zendesk knowledge base program* Back up for Dallas agents and CE Supervisor* Other tasks and duties as definedQualifications:* Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience* This role needs a strong self-starter who is data-driven, strategic, curious and great at problem solving while synthesizing quantitative data into actionable insights* Strong Microsoft office skills with a particular emphasis on Excel, Teams, and PowerPoint* Knowledge of Zendesk, Smartsheet and Netsuite preferred* Operates independently and efficiently to manage multiple projects and deadlines simultaneously and successfully, without sacrificing attention to detail* Exceptional project management and organizational skills* Strong presentation creator that is able to move beyond data to insights for executive audiences.
* Able to think independently and anticipate department needs* Strong collaborative skills with cross-functional teams to enable the success of both teams regarding customer experienceAbout KidKraftKidKraft, Inc. is a global leader in the toy industry committed to inspiring children to develop their creativity and imagination through its portfolio of indoor toys, play sets and furniture, in addition to its Big Backyard and Cedar Summit outdoor play sets and play houses.
For nearly fifty years since 1968, the brand has had an unwavering focus on the design and delivery of high quality products, serving all channels of distribution as a result of the companys world-class supply chain.
For additional information, visit
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'kpi', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'kpi', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst
This job posting is no longer active.
Job ID: 1084991
Corporate Positions
Buying & Planning
Job Type: Full-Time
Date Updated: Aug 12, 2019
Merchandise Allocator - Planning & Allocation
Plano, Texas
The merchandise allocator is responsible for the allocation of merchandise at the sku level across all stores, ensuring presentation standards by store are met based on Buyer's intent and allocation objectives.
Partner with merchandising organization to drive size strategy and execution.
Collaborate with (sr.) planning manager and merchandising organization to review / challenge assortment flow plan.
Primary Responsibilities:
Allocate merchandise at sku level based on the Buyer intent and allocation objectives.
Accountable for ensuring stores and eCommerce platform are at optimal inventory levels and presentation standards are met to drive sales, in-stocks, and service customers
Develop product knowledge to be store level expert in regards to product needs and opportunities.
Responsible for presenting needs to Merchandise Action Team (MAT) in determining the best strategy to maximize opportunity
Collaborate with (sr.) planning manager and merchandising organization to review / challenge assortment flow plan and ensure sufficient quantities are purchased to support the assortment plan
Perform pre-season, in-season, and post-season analysis to uncover opportunities and risks.
Develop recommendations for in-season changes and pre-season assortment plans to ensure maximization of objectives
Monitors JCPenney warehouse inventory and flow and recommends appropriate actions to the MAT in order to maximize business objectives
Partner with merchant organization on size strategy execution providing analysis, depth needs, range recommendations, and pack configuration
Develop / implement strategies to create vendor pre-packs based on pack configuration analysis; identify opportunities to add new sizes and / or liabilities to omit sizes from assortment • Prepare weekly / monthly review of item sales and inventory results; coordinate subsequent re-forecasting estimates with the (sr.) Planning Manager to review with the MAT
Core Competencies & Accomplishments:
College degree or equivalent work experience preferred • Ability to drive retail profitability and inventory productivity
Readily grasps numerical concepts and interprets financial information accurately
Ability to utilize retail math skills to analyze and drive business
Exhibit high standards and accountability; takes pride in accuracy • Results-oriented and self-motivated with a strong sense of urgency
Able to independently organize and prioritize broad workload to meet deadlines
Effective verbal and written communication skills
Able to successfully collaborate with internal and external partners
Proficiency in MS Word and Excel
What you get:
On-site campus amenities include health clinic, pharmacy, daycare and preschool, full cafeteria service, a 24-hour fitness center and free garage parking.
About JCPenney:
At every touchpoint, customers discover stylish merchandise at incredible value from an extensive portfolio of private, exclusive and national brands.
Working at JCPenney means joining a dedicated team of associates who are encouraged to be uniquely themselves in a safe, caring and welcoming environment.
It is a place where careers prosper, accomplishments are celebrated and diversity flourishes.
It's a place that's meant for you.
#LI-PZ1
Job Title: Business Analyst
Job ID: 1084991
Plano, Texas
",['excel'],"['risk', 'account', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'account', 'optim', 'math', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"CATE / Contractor Applications Business Analyst/ SMS automation consultant: Works with the business to capture requirements and with IT applications team to implement additional communication touch-points with contractors or notifications during the customer life-cycle.
Works with business stakeholders to identify opportunities for customers communication via SMS/Email Channel
Creates Business requirements documents, defines use cases and UAT plan
Completes regression testing and participates in UAT
Must have strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Preferred experience with Twilio/SMS communication platforms.
",[None],"['regress', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['regress', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The position requires a quick learner who is holds themselves accountable to understanding from concept to the lowest level of detail around current and to-be processes.
The IT BA can anticipate gaps, drive solutions, and rally teams to continuously move forward.The Business Analyst will need a blend of agile experience, business skills and experience that enables them to facilitate sessions with multiple stakeholders to drive measurable results.
This role will require impeccable organizational, time management, and communication skills, both oral and written.Candidate ProfileThe ideal candidate is an innovative partner and collaborative solution builder who is driven by the opportunity to win in this highly competitive market by building a customer/agent experience that delivers on corporate objectives.
The candidate will have significant experience in the Tele/Data Communication Industry and in optimizing a customer relationship manager funnel leveraging strong analytic curiosity to challenge the traditional processes and drive creative solutions.
* Ability to present ideas in user-friendly language.
* Excellent technical architecture and technical support documentation skills* Open to criticism, openly invites opinions and perspectives of others* Adapts their own approach to the audience, preparing for and working through possible resistance* Inspires people by engaging them in dialogue to gain commitment and bring them on board, linking their perspective to the intent* Proactively resolves conflict by discussing individual issues with each person.
* Excellent organizational and time management skills* Sharp analytical and problem-solving skills* Creative thinker with a vision* Attention to details* High level of professionalism, integrity and commitment to quality* Ability to effectively prioritize and execute tasks in a high-pressure environment* Experience in defining solutions and leading large programsBeneficial Attributes* Experience with Jira/Confluence* Previous Experience as a Business Analyst working on projects focused on software development* PMI-ACP (Agile Certified Professional)
","['excel', 'jira']","['busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'busi', 'commun', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Title: Customer Communications Business Analyst
Type: 6+ month contract
FULLY REMOTE
I.
Job Summary
Conducts business process analysis, detailed requirement gathering, document user stories, prioritize backlog and preliminary cost/benefit analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
II.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform the assigned essential duties satisfactorily.
Other minor duties may be assigned and duties may vary by department.
• Possess a fundamental understanding of end-to-end customer experience integration and dependencies.
• Works in an Agile environment and continuously reviews the business needs, refines priorities, outlines milestones and deliverables, and identifies opportunities and risks.
• Develops, owns, and executes product roadmap.
• Translates product roadmap features into well-defined product requirements including features, epics, user stories, and acceptance test criteria.
• Prioritizes and maintains the sprint backlog for assigned products, balancing the requirements of stakeholders.
• Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet business requirements and fulfill user stories
• Acts as a liaison between technical staff and business owners.
• Collaborate with developers to test and verify that solutions will meet the business requirements
• Participate in key meetings including discovery sessions, sprint demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Deep understanding of SFMC (Salesforce Marketing Cloud) , develop and implement marketing and communications campaigns and strategies and monitor their success, experience in end to end customer journeys, systems development implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
Ops - Experience in end to end implementation, systems development, implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
Pricing Data Integration - Experience in end to end implementation, systems development, implementation, integration experience, including between different business systems as well as working with integration tools, QA testing, system design and analysis, project management, conducting training, strong analytical skills and communication skills.
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'risk', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for understanding the client business environment, eliciting requirements, and providing consulting and solution advice to clients on implementation strategy based on industry knowledge and best practices.
The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.
Essential Duties and responsibilities:
Project Delivery Responsibilities:
Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
business rules, data mapping, and product integrations)
Architect solutions based on client’s needs by utilizing established ELM Solutions methodologies and tools, industry experience and best practices
Analyze client’s existing systems of record to create data conversion mappings into ELM Solutions core products
Document functional requirements and partner with the development team to translate into technical requirements
Gather and document reporting requirements
Complete the configuration spreadsheet based on client requirements
Coordinate and organize client product training
Support user acceptance testing and production support tickets
Act as the primary client advocate and problem solver throughout the implementation process
Review and validate deliverables from development team and quality assurance resources against requirements and provide feedback
Coordinate activities and communication of requirements with internal and external teams
Project Operations Responsibilities:
Assist the program manager in tracking project delivery
Assist program manager in identifying and challenging scope and work estimates that seem extraordinary, providing acceptable alternatives as needed
Communicate functional or scope risks against statement of work to program manager in a timely manner
Provide a successful and seamless hand-off of client to customer support
Other Duties:
Perform quality assurance tasks when needed
Understand project management and quality assurance best practices
Foster team spirit within the team and across teams within the department
Attend seminars and web events to maintain professional and industry knowledge
Job Qualifications
Education:
Bachelor’s degree required preferably in business, finance, accounting, MIS, computer science or a related field
Experience:
Minimum 2-4 years of experience in implementing and supporting technology solutions, gathering requirements, participating in client interviews and meetings, and providing value-add services preferably in corporate legal departments
Professional consulting experience is highly preferred
Experience implementing and integrating with ERP systems
Experience working with relational databases
Experience in gathering requirements related to data loads
Experience managing external clients
Experience with e-Billing or matter management systems a plus
Travel requirements:
Ability to travel up to 25%
All Locations:
USA-IL-Riverwoods-Lake Cook Rd, USA-NY-New York-Liberty St, USA-TX-Houston-Post Oak Blvd
","['erp', 'erp system']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job ID: 415192
AddThisShare
|
Facebook
Email
Favorites
Print
Senior Business Analyst
Dallas, TX
Since 2010,
and staffing industry.
Qualifications
and find a satisfying and challenging work environment.
For the Senior Business
Analyst position, you should meet the following criteria:
Experience in a project server environment
Previous experience creating user profiles/security,
project schedule templates, project SharePoint sites
Troubleshoot application issues
Experience creating and updating reports for executive
leadership teams
Experience training end-users on the use of the
application
Experience with budge reports, status report consolidation,
program/portfolio management reporting
Must be familiar with Capital Project Budget
tracking & reporting
Strong communication, organizational and
leadership skills
Bachelor’s degree or related field experience
Joining the Team
success.
Competitive compensation
Life and long-term disability
Weekly pay
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for defining the as-is current and target state process and product documentation.
This includes breaking down and managing business-driven priority and creating well-defined content, requirements, and stories for delivery teams.
This is an excellent opportunity for a talented Business Analyst to broaden his/her business analysis skill set by working on high-visibility projects that are both tactical and strategic in nature.
This position
",['excel'],['busi'],999.0,"['excel', 'busi']"
BA,"This will include recommendations around assortment planning, pricing & promotions, customer research and market development.
In addition, this role will own the development, execution, and maintenance of Customer Intelligence related platforms utilizing market leading Business Intelligence solutions.
Modeling & Analysis
Analyzes trends and purchasing behavior to identify opportunities to enhance consumer spend and profitability.
Utilizes advanced analytics and A/B testing to implement recommendation engines.
Develops case scenarios for enhancement of private label product line extensions
Creates and validates customer segmentation utilizing internal and external data sources utilizing modeling and validation.
Reporting Development & Analysis
Develops and reports out on KPI metrics to leadership
Develops Customer Intelligence Dashboards
Identifies & integrates outside market data to enrich the Customer Intelligence strategies,
Ad Hoc Analysis (10%)
Support Business Intelligence team with ad hoc reporting and analysis as needed.
Mentors less experienced Team members
Requirements - Knowledge / Skills / Abilities
Experience with a BI Platform (Qlik, Tableau, Power BI or equivalent)
Experience with coding in SQL, Python, R/Rstudio/SAS, Alteryx or equivalent preferred
Microsoft Office (Excel, Powerpoint, and Access)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veterans.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'rstudio', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'qlik', 'python', 'sa']","['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'r', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'qlik', 'python', 'sa', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Serves as the business requirements expert, engaging and managing the work of subject matter specialists from the business.
Serves as the day to day decision maker and provides continual business guidance for the execution/agile team.
Prioritizes the execution team's work so that it aligns with business leader's strategies.
Leads, manages or orchestrates activities for completion and proper documentation of business requirements/stories and validating metrics as appropriate for agile methodology.
Works with the business and IT delivery teams to identify and mitigate risks to include business operational risks.
Escalates issues and develops and recommends appropriate solutions.
6 or more years of hands on experience in business, agile team and/or project delivery.
Advanced knowledge of multiple technical software delivery methodologies (i.e., Leading SAFe, Agile framework, PMI)
Provides prioritization of work for the Delivery Team.
Sets the scope for Deliverables and approves completed work.
Front door for Customers to provide unplanned work.
Collaborates with the leaders and SMEs to understand strategic direction and trade-offs.
May need to make tactical trade-off decisions
Member of the Agile Team.
Works with the Engineers daily to drive work (User Stories) to completion
Decompose Features into User Stories with Acceptance Criteria (daily-weekly work).
Create and maintain user stories in Jira or Rally.
Deliverables include user Stories, Iteration Goals per Iteration, Team PI Objectives per PI, Delivery Metrics
Maintains and prioritizes the Team Backlog (User Stories per Team).
Negotiates trade-offs and reviews unplanned work prior to start
Understand Enabler work and identify Team impacts
Escalate risks within the Team Backlog to leaders and sponsors
Preferred: working knowledge of Asset Management
",['jira'],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['jira', 'risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
Site
Dallas, TX
Employment duration
Full-Time
Job Category
Business Analytics
Job Brief
Work will be conducted remotely due to the COVID-19 pandemic until further notice.
This position will be based in Louisville, KY however future work may be conducted in the Dallas, TX area or remotely.
Responsibilities:
The candidate’s areas of focus include, but are not limited to:
Ability to conceptualize frameworks and use quantitative modeling to evaluate opportunities and size the value-add
Risk Assurance Strategy Development:
Using data and metrics to get a strong understanding of the state of regulatory compliance across multiple health care and insurance domain processes
Understanding key factors contributing to compliance failures and translating into actionable remediation measures
Designing and building solutions for monitoring regulatory compliance failures
Evaluating and implementing quantitative models for predicting compliance failures
Data Visualization & Automation:
Using database and software tools for execution of rule-based control reports
Ability to translate learnings into data pulls and visualization which can be run in a self-service / automation or as-needed basis
Working with technology partners to scale solutions to production
Reporting Dashboard Development:
Ability to understand and grasp processes and identify metrics that matter / key metrics to be monitored on an on-going basis
Build reporting on regulatory compliance initiatives and audit performance to identify opportunities for improvement and root causes analysis of compliance findings
Interpret historical trends and provide insights to process owners
Requirements:
To be successful in this position, a candidate’s specific skills include, but are not limited to:
Partnership: Work closely with client stakeholders to understand their domain, processes and develop solutions for their problems with tools to make their day-to-day operations efficient and effective
Conceptual thinking for framework creation combined with strong quantitative orientation to solve complex problems with rigorous analytics and monitoring
Strong Communication Skills: Strong written and oral communication skills coupled with the ability to influence and drive agreement through intellectual insights and interpersonal skills
Execution Focus: Build and manage execution plans of business intent, requirements, execute against the strategy and monitor results
Results Focus: Focused on achieving short- and long-term goals.
Able to drive and execute an agenda in uncertain, fluid environment with minimal supervision
Strong business judgment, leadership, and integrity: Strong decision maker able to bring healthy, assertive, yet responsible approach to projects
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field such as Math, Computer Science, Statistics, Data Science, Industrial Engineering
Minimum 3+ years of experience in an analysis role
1+ years of experience with data mining and statistical modeling for solving real-world business problems
Experience with algorithms like Decision Tree (CART), Random Forest, Boosting methods
Hands-on SQL skills for pulling analysis data from diverse sources
Advanced skills in MS Office:
Excel-based data manipulation, pivot tables lookups, charting, macros
Proficient in building slides to communicate with all levels in the organization
2+ years of experience working with programming languages, any one of Python, R, or SAS
Experience with data visualization software such as Power BI, Tableau, QlikView, etc.
Preferred Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Statistics, Data Science or Machine Learning
Experience working with Microsoft Azure tools/environment
1+ years of experience working as an analyst in Health Care and/or Insurance domain
Experience working in Risk Function of large Heath Care/Insurance corporate a plus
4+ years of business analysis in a business consulting setting
Experience in an ML engineer or data scientist role building ML models
2+ years of data visualization experience
","['ms office', 'power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'sa']","['risk', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'boost', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'azur', 'sa', 'risk', 'data mining', 'decision tree', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'boost', 'random forest', 'supervis', 'math', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Senior Business Analyst
REQUIREMENTS- Masters degree in Computer science,
Engg, Biz Admin, Math or Equiv with 1 yr experience or other
suitable qualifications
JOB DUTIES:
Senior Business Analyst (Master's deg w/ 1 yr experience
Job entails
working with and requires experience to include XML, HTTP/SOAP,
IIS Server, n-Tier Development, Weblogic, SOA, OOD, RUP, Rational
RequisitePro, Rational Clearcase, UML Diagrammer, HP Quality
Center, Share point, Primavera, VB, TOAD, RDBMS, MS Office-Visio-Project,
Oracle, MS SQL Server, C++, Webservices, Business Analysis,
OO Analysis, Data Analysis, Requirement Analysis, Oracle R12,
Peoplesoft, Micro controller/processor/Real-time applications
design and development.
locations within USA possible.
1200 Walnut Lane #1100,
","['ms office', 'oracl', 'sql']","['math', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['microsoft', 'oracl', 'sql', 'math', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"What you'll do:
Bridge the Gap | Gather, interpret, and translate customer needs into functional and nonfunctional requirements translate business problems into requirements that facilitate application development through client interviews, internal interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, business analysis, task and workflow analysis.
Collaborate | Work with architects to translate the detailed requirements into design deliverables.
Review design deliverables with architects upon completion.
Proactively communicate with external and internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements and deliver the project artifacts
You'll be the point person for all day-to-day client communications across multiple teams.
Team | Manage, inspire and motivate project, product and development teams for the new .com experience.
Review team deliverables.
Provide strategic oversight and ensure the work gets noticed, used and appreciated.
Find innovative ways to build new best practices.
Who you are:
A builder | Entrepreneurial attitude couple with a strong business acumen.
Ability and appetite to bring people together.
Innate ability to marshal people and create gravity around ideas.
Optimistic and resilient | Dig in and figure out how to work around problems.
Yes and why not posture.
Takes care of self and team.
Balance needed to maintain stamina and positivity.
What you'll need:
Strong understanding of marketing concepts, including multi-channel and digital marketing.
Ability to manage multiple activities in a deadline-oriented environment; highly organized and flexible.
Strong listening, verbal and written communication skills.
Strong Microsoft Office skills Excel, Word and Power Point.
Ability to work independently and jointly in unstructured environments in a self-directed way.
Ability to take a leadership role on projects and with customers.
Experienced in research and analysis of data and customer issues.
Experienced developing functional and non-functional requirements.
Understanding database concepts including tables, data types, instances, fields, connection strings, keys, and records.
Experience with back-end database feeds a plus.
Experience with Unica, Adobe, and other CRM solutions a plus.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"They will also be expected to execute application maintenance where deemed appropriate.Responsibilities:* Provide support and development/configuration for power plant applications, partnering with the business, vendors and 3rd parties as applicable, utilizing Agile practices.
* Implement projects to improve the productivity of assigned business areas.
* Collaborate with and prioritize daily work for the offshore application maintenance team.
* Execute support remediation applications that cannot be handled offshore.
* Lead efforts to gather work projections for projects and continuous improvement activities from the offshore team, providing training as needed.
* Contribute to continuous improvement activities through independent and group work.
* Provide project management oversight application upgrades.
* Translate business requirements into technical/executable delivery units, serving as a liaison between business & technology teams to ensure that requirements are fully understood.
* Update system of record with application details (architecture, licensing, users, etc.)
as needed.Requirements:* Bachelor's degree in MIS, Computer Science, Accounting, or a related field from an accredited college/university (or equivalent experience).
",[None],"['account', 'busi']",1.0,"['account', 'busi']"
BA,"The address is 1701 River Run, Fort Worth, TX 76107.
Salary range is Min.
$32.31/hr.
to Max.
$51.59/hr.
- based on relevant experience
Work Schedule:
• Full Time: 1 st Shift
BI Business Analyst II will coordinate and actively contribute to the business intelligence projects throughout the development life cycle from initial requirement analysis/documentation, prototyping, design, and development all the way through to implementation, Quality Assurance and user acceptance.
BI Business Analyst II will serve as a liaison between your team and other technical and functional teams to document requirements develop and deliver analytical outputs.
You would need to have strong quantitative analytical skills, with a balanced interest in data manipulation and business.
Essential Functions:
• Develop, maintain and standardize reports and processes through the use of scripts, stored procedures and packages.
• Use systems and templates to document technical specs detailing the methodology, procedures, outcomes, and observations as part of the data processing and analytical steps in the projects.
• Meet with functional teams to help them frame their business requirements.
• Assess complexity of tasks and projects and develop timeline and scope documents.
• Provide stakeholders with regular written status updates on the progress of analytical requests using the available tools.
• Evaluate healthcare clinical and financial data for trends, utilization, outliers and organizational standards.
• Define and implement performance metrics as part of outcome measurement to address clinical and financial concerns.
• Direct in-depth analysis of clinical and financial outcomes in order to evaluate and develop process improvement initiatives • Perform the appropriate data analysis to validate the technical requirements • Plan and implement steps required for data quality assurance.
• Manage user acceptance testing
The ideal candidate will possess the following qualifications:
a plus
Skills:
• Experience in documenting business and technical requirements for healthcare quality and financial reporting.
• You must also have strong analytic and problem-solving skills as well as strong time-management skills.
• You must also have excellent verbal and written communication, and interpersonal skills.
• Strong skills in data warehousing process design and development using the SSIS data warehousing tool suite • Knowledge of data warehousing methodologies and best practices • Effective interpersonal relations skills, ability to effectively collaborate with others and work as part of a team • Ability to initiate and follow through on assignments • Excellent organizational and time management skills • Ability to work independently, research and resolve questions and problems
","['excel', 'bi']","['data warehousing', 'data', 'outlier', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'powerbi', 'data warehousing', 'data', 'outlier', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The business is comprised of three leading brands-Capterra, Software Advice, and GetApp.
What you'll do
You will be responsible for the setup, administration, and configuration of web analytics tools and will provide support and training as need to ensure decentralized access to web analytics data.
You will leverage your deep knowledge of analytics tools to assist with reporting and analysis deliverables.
You will partner with Google and other vendors as needed to deliver industry-leading analytics solutions.
You will cover a broad and evolving set of responsibilities to accomplish your objectives-versatility, adaptability, and self-sufficiency will be critical to success.
What you'll need
BA/BS from a top-tier university
Minimum of 2 years of professional work experience
Minimum of 2 years of experience with the Google Analytics 360 suite of applications
Deep experience using Google Analytics for reporting and analysis
Experience with Google analytics reporting filters, segments, custom metrics and custom dimensions
Understanding of best practices and standards for analytics tagging and tracking
Experience using browser tools to identify web analytics tagging issues
Understanding of how to implement analytics tracking across device and browser versions
Comfortable using BigQuery or relational database technology to access web analytics data
Experience with importing and exporting data from web analytics and campaign management tools
Experience with Google Tag Manager setup, configuration and integration of 3rd party tracking tags
Comfortable using Google Tag Manager for page data layer integration and event tracking
Knowledge of SQL or similar database scripting languages
Exposure to agile development environments a plus
Experience with cloud-based data storage systems a plus (Snowflake, Redshift)
Digital business or digital advertising experience a plus
Who you are
Excellent organizational and time management skills and capable of juggling multiple priorities
Strong project management skills with the ability to manage across teams to complete projects
Self-sufficient and driven to acquire the skills necessary to accomplish complex tasks
Strong interpersonal skills with ability to build relationships and effectively collaborate with partners
Comfortable working independently to achieve successful results with minimal guidance
Strong verbal and written communication skills with ability to clearly present complicated analysis
Resourceful and resilient with the ability to take a creative approach to problem solving
A collaborative, positive culture.
You'll work with people who are as enthusiastic, smart and driven as you are.
You'll be managed by the best too
Limitless growth and learning opportunities.
Outstanding compensation.
A truly collaborative and positive culture - Your team will be as smart and driven as you.
Outstanding compensation.
Watch what it's like to work for GDM!
:https://vimeo.com/user87402552/review/368342244/d55d011d7b
#Digital Markets
Job Requisition ID:39248
By submitting your information and application, you confirm that you have read and agree to the country or regional recruitment notice linked below applicable to your place of residence.
For efficient navigation through the application, please only use the back button within the application, not the back arrow within your browser.
","['snowflak', 'redshift', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",1.0,"['snowflak', 'redshift', 'bigqueri', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Hello Associates,
Position:ÂBusiness Analyst
Duration:Â12+ months contract
Â
Job Descripiton:
Â
At least 2-3 years of good experience in Mortgage domain
At least 2-3 years of Agile experience
Communication and coordination
Ability to be upfront and ask the right questions with business
Ability to take care of sprint grooming session and demos
Ability to organize and co-ordinate meeting team and notes
Â
Â
Â
Â
Thank you,
Â
PHANITEJA
6750 Poplar Ave # 711, Memphis, TN.Â
Ph: 901-466-4709 ext 409
Email:Âphaniteja@conchtech.com
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
byhwSubyMl
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"KellyMitchell matches the best IT and business talent with premier organizations nationwide.
Business Analyst
Overall Purpose:
Responsible for working across multiple IT organizations/functions on business strategies and functional/business architectures.
Roles & Responsibilities:
3) Prepare detail plans, detail schedules, resource allocation and assignment, critical path analysis, methodology, coordination within all IT functions, and conducting budget analyses.
4) May be involved in user requirement definition, recommending business solutions/alternatives, assisting in RFP development and evaluations, and assisting clients in defining new services that ride on new technologies.
5) May also be responsible for analysis of existing business processes, design and implementation of streamlined processes and leading client organizations in the identification, planning and implementation of business process solutions.
6) Works as a liaison to clients and other IT organizations as a subject matter expert on the business processes they represent.
7) May coordinate, evaluate and partner with technology vendors and outside consultants as needed.
Top 5 Skills
Analytical Skills
Excellent proficiency in PowerPoint, Excel, Word
Excellent Communication Skills
Ability to work with Cross-Functional Skills
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"In this role the candidate will determine which techniques and artifacts should be used for each project based upon size, complexity and stakeholders.
This position has no supervisory responsibilities.
The senior Business Analyst will lead and mentor other business analysts and will be expected to successfully lead project teams in a Scrum Master Project Manager capacity with little management oversight.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed are representative of the knowledge, skill, andor ability required.
Qualifications Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university.
Equivalent work experience in a similar position may be substituted for educational requirements Ideal candidates will have a minimum of five to seven years of increasingly responsible experience in information technology with an emphasis on business architecture business analysis Experience in gathering andor developing requirements for multi-channelomni-channel digital marketplaces, B2B portals B2C portals Propertycasualty insurance, financial services andor jewelry industry experience is desired, but not required.
Proficiency in common Microsoft applications, including MS Office Suite, Visio, SharePoint and Outlook.
Working knowledge of project management applications, Mind Mapping Software, and prototyping applications (e.g.
Photoshop, Dreamweaver, Axure, iRise, Microsoft Expression Studio).
Responsibilities Identifies all stakeholders Helps communicate and mitigate risks to ensure project success Responds to changing organizational priorities Works closely with project managers and assists with the project planning Provides input from a business and IT perspective Conducts data gathering and analysis to understand business strategy requirements Contributes to the business short-and long-term planning sessions and provides direction to ensure understanding of business goals and direction May generate appropriate communication, process and educational plans for mitigating the disruption of change May identify and remove obstacles to change Requirements Gathering Ensures stakeholders are involved in requirements gathering activities Obtains needed information from stakeholders to form requirements Captures information provided in formal and informal meeting environments Prepares requirements documentation in format understandable to the recipient audience Ensures requirement traceability through all phases of a projectprogram Strives to eliminate ambiguity in, or varying interpretations of requirements Assesses stakeholder needs utilizing a structured requirements process to assist in identifying business priorities and advises on options Develops, writes, and communicates business requirements and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions Analysis, Management Communication Obtains, organizes and categorizes large amounts of information provided by stakeholders Critically evaluates information gathered from multiple sources, reconciles conflicts, decomposes high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguishes user requests from the underlying true needs.
Documents the business requirements and functional specifications which express what actions the business must take in order to solve a business need and delivers work artifacts through the project lifecycle Ensures that all requirements and designs support the delivery of value, fulfill goals and business outcomes Offers input on priority of requirements based on time, cost, scope, strategic fit and return on investment Obtains approvals for each artifact generated Analyzes and articulates impacts of changes to requirements Appropriately responds to changing requirements Identifies opportunities for improvement and proposes solutions to impacted areas Takes ownership of conflict and issue resolution Coaches and transfers knowledge to less experienced team members.
Keeps stakeholders informed of problems, issues, and resolutions Varies communication method style based on stakeholder or group Understands organizational culture, structure and impact on work efforts Understands enterprise architecture concepts and can assess business capability needs Effectively identify, understand and communicate business impactsoutcomes across the organization functioning as a business architectenterprise analyst Establishes and maintains liaison relationship with business units and IT in order to provide effective technical solutions Seeks opportunities to improve and deepen relationship between IT and business units Analyzes performance metrics to ensure stakeholder satisfaction.
","['ms office', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"**This position requires you to work in the office; however, during the COVID-19 pandemic, you may work from home.
""Home Lending Operations Business Analyst position is responsible for development and implementation of reporting, automation and data solutions for System Maintenance, research, assisting with projects, remediation, testing of new enhancements.
Position responsibilities are performed within established development deadlines and pursuant to control requirements and process protocol.The Senior Operations Analyst role includes assisting in project management, analysis and resolution of issues, creating and running reports and transactions.
Individual will work directly with data and information, creating meaningful analyses, reports and management presentations in support of client, business unit, or function activities and performance.
Types of analysis and reporting may include: quality review, workflow analysis, process improvement, regular business or client reporting, project management, and/or a variety of other function specific purposes.
**Principal Duties and Responsibilities (in order of importance)**+ Creating reports per business users requirements+ Running reports on agreed upon frequency+ Running mass transactions to update servicing system+ Completing research as assigned and coming up with solutions for identified issues+ Testing System Maintenance and MSP/VLS enhancements+ Testing Agent Desktop, Default Workflow, Fortracs enhancements related to plan breaks/opt outs+ Participation in remediation projects as assigned+ Completion of business processes to support a controlled environment
",[None],"['research', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for defining the as-is current and target state process and product documentation.
This includes breaking down and managing business-driven priority and creating well-defined content, requirements, and stories for delivery teams.
This is an excellent opportunity for a talented Business Analyst to broaden his/her business analysis skill set by working on high-visibility projects that are both tactical and strategic in nature.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES
Determine operational objectives by studying business functions, gathering information, and evaluating output requirements and formats
Define, groom, and prioritize business requirements using interviews, document analysis, and requirement workshops
Break down requirements into DEV ready and testable user stories by establishing business acceptance criteria
Uncover business functionality, technical details, and risks, and help formulate options to drive decisions towards the best solution
Take ownership of the functionality being delivered
Partner with development and testing teams to ensure the product meets the specifications and quality
Recommend controls by identifying problems and writing improved procedures
Maintain system protocols by writing and updating procedures
Prepare detailed documentation and maintain product, project, and process standard artifacts
REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree or higher
3 years of demonstrated business analysis and consulting methodology experience
Experience with industry-standard iterative and incremental SDLC methodologies
Experience with work management tools – TFS/DevOps, Rally or Jira
Experience with database querying
Strong project management, analytical, problem-solving capabilities in a team environment
Highly analytical mindset and strong information capturing and writing sills
Outgoing personality that adapts well to a variety of types of individuals at different levels within the organization
Strong organizational/communication skills
Must be currently authorized to work in the United States without sponsorship and not require sponsorship in the future
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Ability to write Transact-SQL (T-SQL) queries to fulfill data mapping and light analytics
Experience working with a large Automated Testing Suite using SmartBear TestComplete
Experience with projects that are based on Scaled Agile Framework (Safe)
Certifications in SAFe PM/PO, SAFe SA, CSPO or PSPO, CBAP, or PMI-PBA
Experience in a financial environment
COMPENSATION
Annual salary of $86,500
BENEFITS
Medical, dental, and vision
Voluntary life/ AD&D
Short-term & long-term disability
Paid vacation, holidays, and sick time
Paid maternity, paternity, extended medical leave, and jury duty
Corporate discount program on personal cell phone accounts with select providers
Business casual work environment
ABOUT COTTONWOOD
Founded in 1996, Cottonwood Financial is one of the largest privately held retail consumer finance companies in the United States.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tf', 'jira', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tf', 'jira', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Tuesday, March 3, 2020
The Business Analyst will typically analyze many areas of the business with guidance from a more senior analyst.
Wellness Programs
Tuition Reimbursement
Draw insight from the monitoring to identify opportunities for business improvement.
Performs additional duties as needed within the department
Position Requirements:
0-3 years related experience performing analytical work is desired.
Track record of delivering improved business results.
Demonstrated experience building long-term relationships with strategic business partners.
Ability to work independently with minimal supervision as well as function within a team environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled
Other details
Pay Type
Salary
",[None],"['supervis', 'busi']",999.0,"['supervis', 'busi']"
BA,"You will directly partner with the Finance Business Product Owner and Leads to successfully implement the Workday ERP platform.Responsibilities:* Partner and support the Finance Product Owners/Leads for the setup of the Workday ERP application platform while meeting the established project schedule.
* Develop user stories and product backlogs for primary products.
* Lead the Agile ceremonies, driving the discussion for sprint planning and user story refinement.
* Process data conversions from Lawson to the new ERP and collect technical requests based on business requirements.
* Complete any necessary training requirements and follow established procedures.
* Oversee the design, development, testing of interfaces for ERP connectors to other applications.
* Collaborate with the business development team to ensure designs meet customer requirements.
* Partner with the Enterprise Architecture team and Technical Architects setting the strategic product direction.
* Perform gap analysis and eliminate process inefficiencies as well as identify any areas of redundancy.
* Identify technical customization requests and develop the Key Decision Document for layout options and pricing for the customer, IT and the steering committee for approvals.
* Closely partner with the ERP Security Officer to establish the appropriate security roles that align to the Security Architecture of the ERP tool.Qualifications:* Relevant degree preferred.
* Minimum of 5 years' experience in an operational or technical consulting role supporting the integration and implementation of Workday systems or other ERP platform required.
* Hands-on experience with financial integrations for ERP systems (i.e.
revenue reporting, budget and forecasting, purchasing, accounts payable, general ledger, investments, fixed assets, capital software, treasury and tax etc.)
required.
* Knowledge of ERP implementations for HR business functions (such as payroll, talent acquisition, employee training, etc.)
within Workday is strongly preferred.
","['erp', 'erp system']","['busi', 'financ', 'account', 'data']",2.0,"['erp', 'erp system', 'busi', 'financ', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Department: Business Analyst
Reports to: Client Operations Manager
*Temporary remote position due to Covid19*
SUMMARY
RESPONSIBILITIES
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
Ensure collaborative outcomes by establishing and promoting strong client partnerships
Develop functional requirement specifications for new modules within the Electronic Payment Processing product line
Coordinate product deployments and write release communications
Work collaboratively with PMO, Design, IT, Development, QA, and Business Analysis teams
Monitor client backend processes and work with appropriate teams to resolve issues in an extensive ETL environment
Responsible for the successful definition, testing, management, and launch of product modules
QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Business, or Marketing.
Other disciplines or experience substitutions maybe considered.
3+ years of experience in a BA role with increasing responsibility
Requirements gathering, data modeling, and specifications for new web applications
Relational databases and SQL query tools
QA use cases, QA testing, and Bug Tracking tools
Software Project Management
Excellent written and interpersonal communication skills
Proficient in Microsoft Outlook, Excel, and Word is a must
Previous programming experience and writing T-SQL queries is a plus
Experience in the Financial or Electronic Payment Processing industry is a plus
ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS
Principals only.
Recruiters please don't contact this job poster.
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"This position will work closely with Product Management, Technology and Operations, and other key stakeholders through the ideation process to develop, analyze, and document concepts and requirements around strategic innovation initiatives.
Responsibilities Meet with decision makers, systems owners, and users to define business, financial, and operations requirements and systems goals.
Interacts with the business stakeholders and subject matter experts in order to understand their problems and needs.
Lead design sessions for the purpose of enhancing business processes.
Review and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing systems and develop strategies for improving or further leveraging these systems.
Identify and establish scope and parameters of systems analysis in order to define outcome criteria and measure-taking actions.
Build a relationship between business partners and the ITIS Departmentrsquos relative to requirements, solutions, and priorities.
Develop requirement documentation that will translate business needs into requirements that can be understood by the development team.
Required Bachelorrsquos degree 5+ yearsrsquo experience as a Business Analyst Design thinking knowledge Creative problem solver, confident in proposing alternative approaches and unique perspectives Strong critical thinking and decision-making skills Ability to interpret abstract and complex business requests and analyze based on aggressive timelines High aptitude for learning new systems and concepts and act with agility in a fast-paced environment Experience developing all types of documentation including business and functional specifications, and end-user guides Results-oriented, is proactive and flexible, strategic thinking, and self-motivated Exceptional organizational skills and the ability to handle multiple work assignments simultaneously with little direction Excellent writing and storytelling skills, ability to present abstract and complex concepts in a logical fashion Proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and Word
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Looking for your next opportunity?
And here, you'll have the opportunity to put all your skills to work, and the support to grow and advance in your job and your field.
Generates reports regarding financial, utilization, and clinical quality measures and maintains all associated documentation.
Collaborates with stakeholders in various business units to identify and document report requirements.Minimum Specifications:Education* High School diploma or equivalent is required.
* Bachelor Degree in Management Information Systems, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Finance, or related discipline is preferred.Experience:* Two years of healthcare reporting/analytics work experience.
* Two years of experience in writing SQL queries to extract data from multiple sources.
* Two years of experience creating detailed reports for internal and external stakeholders.
* Experience with regulatory reporting and deliverables management is preferred.
* In-depth knowledge of claims processes is preferred.
* Experience at a managed care organization is preferred.Skills or Special Abilities:* Skilled in interpreting, analyzing, and providing recommendations regarding data accuracy and data collection needs and processes.
* Strong verbal and written communication skills.
* Proficiency with writing queries in Structured Query Language (SQL).
* Ability to transfer files using SFTP tools.
* Proficiency with Microsoft Office Excel, Word, Outlook, and PowerPoint is preferred.
Microsoft Access is a plus.
* Excellent planning, organization, and documentation skills.
* Demonstrated ability to plan and manage multiple processes and projects simultaneously.
* Demonstrated ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team.
* Demonstrated ability to work with internal and external stakeholders to gather requirements and to continuously improve data collection and reporting processes.Responsibilities:* Manages the regulatory deliverables process to ensure timely and accurate delivery of data and reports.
* Writes and runs SQL queries and uses other data tools to extract data from multiple source systems for regulatory and internal reporting.
* Collaborates with stakeholders across business units to develop requirements and documentation.
* Creates and maintains report documentation, templates, and code.
* Collects, assembles, and distributes data and information from multiple sources using multiple tools.
* Provides quality assurance of data files and reports prior to distribution.
* Coordinates resolution of claim encounter data issues.Job Accountabilities:* Identifies ways to improve work processes and improve customer satisfaction.
* Stays abreast of the latest developments, advancements, and trends in the field by attending seminars/workshops, reading professional journals, actively participating in professional organizations, and/or maintaining certification or licensure.
Integrates knowledge gained into current work practices.
* Maintains knowledge of applicable rules, regulations, policies, laws and guidelines that impact the area.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"About the Role:
You will also work with developers to create the functional specifications that meet requirements, serve as an expert, and work with the Quality Assurance team to test the developed functionality.
You Will:
Interpret goals and present and advocate for solution options and scope
Provide precise functional specifications to include functional hierarchy, workflow, and business rules to clients and development staff
Gather requirements and help build and document specifications for Solution development
Present proposed solutions to customer in non-technical/business terminology
Work with Development, Quality Assurance, and Production Support teams to verify and test the desired functionality
Work towards improving business analysis best practices
You Have:
A Bachelor’s or Master’s degree is a plus
Experience developing use cases, user stories, functional specifications, and technical requirements
Experience providing leadership to team members and peers by working with others; explain ideas and viewpoints to senior management, peers and others
Experience providing and helping implementing solutions by building partnerships with key stakeholders; identify business needs; execute necessary processes and practices; monitor progress; recognizing and capitalizing on improvement opportunities; and adapt to competing demands
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and can present complex technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences
Experience adapting to changing requirements and responsibilities
Comprehensive healthcare options (Medical, Dental, and Vision)
401K match, and a fully funded pension plan
Paid vacation, holidays, and volunteer hours; flexible work environment
Generously subsidized public transportation and free parking
Annual tuition reimbursement
Professional development programs, training and conferences
And more…
Notes:
This position may be filled at various levels based on candidate's qualifications as determined by the department.
If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please notify your Talent Acquisition Consultant.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Posting Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 3 Months
Type of Experience: Supply Chain, Analytics, Operations Strategy, Decision Support, Data Management.
Business analyst with SQL, tableau, cognos, excel - all required and snowflake (preferred).
This role is designed to provide analytics support to Supply Chain functions.
Nature of work crosses many functional areas.
Primary areas include Inventory Management, Distribution Centers, and Cross Docks.
Additional areas include Transportation, Retail operations, Merchandising, Logistics, & Finance.
Modify existing SQL reporting processes to maximize automation and create consistent
Certifications or Technical Skills:
Data Retrieval, Data Analysis, Optimization, & Troubleshooting.
Information Systems: SQL, Cognos is desired, Mathematical Modeling language is a plus.
Technical Competencies: SQL, Mathematics, Statistics, Visual Basic.
Scripting language is a plus.
Job Type: Full-time
Experience:
Business Analyst: 6 years (Required)
Supply Chain Analysis: 5 years (Required)
SQL: 6 years (Required)
Snowflake: 5 years (Preferred)
Cognos/Tableau: 4 years (Required)
","['tableau', 'cogno', 'sql', 'snowflak']","['data', 'logist', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']",999.0,"['tableau', 'cogno', 'sql', 'snowflak', 'data', 'logist', 'financ', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist']"
BA,"WHAT YOU WILL BE DOING:
You will be working with the scrum team to develop Global solution for Omnichannel eCommerce platform reaching millions around the world.
You will work closely with the business team and international partners to analyze and identify gaps, document, communicate, validate requirements as well as execute roll-out activities.
Job Requirements:
SKILL SET REQUIREMENTS:
• 6 8 years of experience as a Business Analyst.
• 3+ years of Salesforce including Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Marketing Cloud, Commerce Cloud.
• Passionate about eCommerce challenges and good understanding of Salesforce ecosystem.
• Go-getter.
Team player who is willing to roll up their sleeves and take on additional responsibilities as business needs evolve.
• Ability to organize, specify and model requirements to ensure they are complete and support global needs.
• Strong analytical & problem-solving skills.
Detailed Oriented.
• Think strategically and creatively in finding business solution that meet the requirements in the best possible way.
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills to convey ideas or concepts to a variety of stakeholders.
• Familiar with JIRA, Confluence or similar tracking and management tools.
• Experience in eCommerce enterprise deployment.
• Experience in post deployment support is highly desired.
• Previous BA experience in Agile scrum teams in multi-cultural environment highly desired.
• Experience in SQL, CMS, Google analytics is preferred but not necessary.
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'jira', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'jira', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Roles and Responsibilities
Key roles and responsibilities include:
Work with clients and end users to gather, understand, and define business requirements
Work collaboratively with team members to design a solution that will meet a client’s business requirements and fulfill user stories
Complete the configuration for user stories within Salesforce, AppExchange products, or other cloud-based technologies
Participate in key meetings with clients including requirement sessions, system demos, user acceptance testing, and end user training
Requirements
Hands on experience configuring Salesforce or similar CRM Product, including workflows, validation rules, and security controls
Proven ability leveraging analytical and problem-solving skills in a fast paced environment
Detail-oriented individual with the ability to quickly ramp up on new clients, their business needs, and technologies
Strong presentation, communication (written and verbal) skills, and interpersonal skills
Ability to juggle and prioritize multiple tasks within a collaborative team environment
Demonstrates flexibility and willingness to do what it takes to get the job done
Drive and desire to learn and grow both technical and functional skill sets
Proficient in Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Project, and Visio
Bachelor's degree required
Must be authorized to work for any U.S. employer
Willingness to travel up to 50%
Preferred Experience and Skills
Experience leveraging and configuring AppExchange products to develop a solution
Experience soliciting, gathering, and analyzing user input and requirements
Experience documenting user stories and creating to-be process flow diagrams
Experience collaborating with business stakeholders
Experience on a Salesforce implementation through the full Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Salesforce Admin Certification and one Consulting Cloud Certification (Sales, Service or Community)
Benefits
EOE M/F/V/D
VEVRAA Federal Contractor
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"The Business Analyst I is an analyst role which supports the line of business and works with the management team.
Partners with the line of business on operational requirements and oversees complex operational and analytic tasks and projects including reviewing report performance data and performance against established metrics.
Helps the business to define reporting requirements and analysis of data to assist the business in meeting operational objectives.
Interprets results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to more complex data mining independently.
Focus is on process improvement and compliance with internal or external audit.
Responsible for supporting the coordination and execution of a variety of critical activities including strategic and tactical initiatives.
Provides guidance to more junior analysts.
Creates and recommends reporting solutions to meet the need of the business.
As a Business Analyst I, you will be responsible for: • Developing and maintaining analytical reports and metrics using SQL (Toad, Passport, etc) or equivalent reporting tools to assist the business in meeting operational objectives.
• Partnering with process owners to determine and refine reporting and analysis requirements.
• Developing, testing, and implementing daily, weekly, monthly, and ad hoc reports that enable data driven business decisions.
• Writing, maintaining, and troubleshooting data requests and/or queries to support the business.
• Help design, develop, and document reporting requirements as defined by the business.
• All other projects or tasks as assigned.
Qualifications • Bachelor's degree or equivalent preferred • Three to five year's mortgage servicing experience with focus on Loan Modifications or Document Operations highly desired • Fidelity/MSP experience is highly desired • Background using SQL • MS Access/VBA knowledge building and maintaining databases • Strong working knowledge of all Microsoft applications (Excel, Word, Visio, Outlook)
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql']","['statist', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'statist', 'data mining', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Plano, TX
Contract position
Billing & Revenue Assurance, Telecom Billing
Telecom Expense management using MDSL tool.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Ecommerce Business Analyst
Duration: Fulltime
This person will be a key member of the Product Development team.
The ideal candidate has experience with business analysis and workflow analysis, and is capable of communicating technical processes throughout different departments in an organization.
Responsibilities:
Create detailed business requirements and communicate them effectively to all departments.
Interact with members of the Software Development team and Data team to communicate business requirements, analytics, and documentation.
Document the functional and technical design of processes or enhancements.
Track and analyze user behavior, then be able to gather insights from those analytics and develop any necessary execution plans.
Conduct manual testing processes and work with the Software Development team to communicate testing results.
Act as a liaison between business stakeholders and technical departments of client.
Conduct effective market research on consumer electronics to help client develop its growing list of products and categories.
Oversee client original content that is being created and troubleshoot original content to ensure it production-ready.
Qualifications:
Proven IT/Tech knowledge of business analysis processes and functions
Proven technical experience and understanding of technical terminology and processes
Experience using Agile methodology to achieve project success
Excellent written and verbal communications skills
Excellent analytical skills
Proficiency with Microsoft Excel or Google Sheets
Education and Experience:
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science/MIS/Business Administration or a related discipline
1-5 years of Business Analysis experience
Direct experience in an Agile environment preferred
Regardless of race, color, gender, age, sexual orientation, citizenship, or disability
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"* Be proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets and communicating results* Write clear and concise documentation.
* Functional knowledge of Apex, Lightning, SOQL, SQL, Javascript, REST, SOAP, HTML/CSS, APIs to assist with the design, development, testing and documenting scalable, high-quality business solutions on the Salesforce & Marketing Cloud platforms
","['javascript', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'cloud']",['busi'],999.0,"['javascript', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: Long Term
Requirements:
· Looking for a Business Analyst with LOS Loan origination system, (In LOS needs experience in origination not servicing.)
Must have skills:
· Business analyst with Mortgage
· 8 to 10 years of experience
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $60.00 per hour
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
www.Ixoop.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst/Data Analyst
Locations: USA (Irving, TX and Tampa, FL)
Leading Regulatory Risk, Finance and Compliance technology development partner for Globally Systemic Important Bank (GSIB) with strong techno-functional delivery teams across the Globe.
Candidate will also be responsible for preparation of business requirement documents (BRD), business functional requirements (FRD), use cases, process flows and maintaining requirements traceability matrix..
The role will have exposure to state-of-the-art technology ecosystem with very complex Risk and Finance regulatory domain.
Job requirements:
Worked in Multinational Banks on Banking rules and regulations such has CCAR, 14A reporting and Part 30
Must have good knowledge with all the Banking products such as CorpLoans, Personal Loans, Mortgages,Deposits, Trading Securities, Debt, SFT, Derivatives, Margin, Collateral Management and Cards
Experience in preparation of business requirement documents (BRD), business functional requirements (FRD), use cases, process flows and maintaining requirements traceability matrix
Able to document and understand information from multiple data sources
Drive discussions with business users/owners
Should be able to engage with stakeholders, business owners & decision makers to drive project goals
Ability to work fluidly with both business and technical teams
Must have strong SQL skills
working knowledge of data warehousing concepts and ETL
Curious, relentless with excellent written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills
Experience in test strategy, preparation of test scenarios, defects triaging and co-ordination with QA team.
Understanding of SDLC and all phases of project management lifecycle.
Should be well versed with Agile Methodologies
Excellent analytical & problem-solving skills
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Business Analyst ( Functional) Aviation Practice
Experience: 1-4 Years
Ø Engineering in Aeronautical OR Aerospace OR Industrial OR Mechanical with good academic credentials
Ø Exposure to IT solutions including research in advanced technologies is preferred
Your Role and Responsibilities:
Ø Requirements Elicitation Fit Gap Analysis and Requirement specification documentation
Ø Perform basic solution analysis using proven solution evaluation methods and use process mapping tools to identify gaps in the processes for simple client scenarios
Ø Prepare various business documents like process flows training guides etc as per set standards Preparing best in class presentations and demonstrations to prospects or partners
Ø Understand and analyze various industry best Practices or Markets or Competitors
Ø Facilitate User Champion Training User Acceptance testing End user Training and ensure smooth transition in moving over to the new system
Ø Work closely with customer to analyze a situation scenario problem and provide appropriate solutions
Ø Assist end users during the go live phase and track sustained usage of the system
Job Type: Full-time
Salary: $70,000.00 - $75,000.00 per year
COVID-19 considerations:
WFH are allowed wherever required,
Experience:
IT solutions : 1 year (Preferred)
Aviation or Aerospace: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",[None],"['research', 'end user', 'busi']",1.0,"['research', 'end user', 'busi']"
BA,"The Team is comprised of both Sustainment and Project based roles in support of tools and technology that enable Frontline Sales Perform & Transform.
Within T&S, the Sales Technologies Service (STS) team supports current and future Frontline Sales applications:
"" Activity Planner
"" Box
"" Calero (device ordering)
"" Contracting (Nintex)
"" Customer Wiring
"" KAM Destination
"" My Store Accelerator
"" OneWithOne
"" POS2GO
"" Sales Hub
"" Salesforce
"" Scorecard
"" SDW
"" SellMax
"" SPM
"" Store Facts on Demand
"" TPM
"" uSell
"" VCOP
"" Week To Date, v2 DSLD, v3 - BPT, PDSD
"" WorkWith
"" XPC
"" ZFM
This Associate Analyst role supports and influences critical FLUS and Chilled DSD roles in sales and finance including Route Sales Representative, Sales District Leader, Zone and Region Leadership Team, Key Account Manager, National Account Manager, Net Sales Manager, Pricing Coordinator, Finance Admin, and Sales Admin.
This can include live support, formal and in-formal training, email, instant messaging, and other forms of communication.
Job responsibilities will include:
"" Deliver high quality of customer service by troubleshooting and resolving frontline issues with responsiveness, professionalism and customized support
"" Develop expertise at the level of Subject Matter Expert (SME) for assigned applications
"" Deliver accurate and complete documentation of resources, job aids, learnings, one pagers and training materials
"" Prepare and execute User Acceptance Testing (UAT) for application enhancements and releases
"" Helps gather requirements (UCD) for enhancements by engaging with end users frequently, both in formal and informal settings
"" Support leadership to identify opportunities for application enhancements and help define the short-term and long-term application roadmap, including the customer/end user experience map and features
Qualifications/Requirements:
Required:
"" Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience
"" 2+ years' experience business processes and technology solutions
"" Strong communication skills (verbal and written), including the ability to create presentations and present to small groups
"" Ability to take initiative, problem-solve with limited direction, and navigate ambiguity to resolve issues
"" Ability to manage multiple tasks, organize & prioritize
"" Demonstrate flexibility and the ability to adapt to change
"" MS Office proficiency (Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Teams, Sharepoint)
"" Ability to work independently and as part of a virtual team
Preferred:
"" Managing product development deliverables such as requirements gathering, user story writing, acceptance testing, and product launches
"" Experience with Lean-Agile principles, metrics, and technology and/or experience with Lean Thinking, Lean Six Sigma, Kaizen Leader, Agile
","['ms office', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'net']","['financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'net', 'financ', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Elicits and documents business requirements using workshops, andor existing systems documentation or procedures.
Uses industry-standard analysis techniques to document business requirements such as data flow modeling, use case analysis, workflow analysis, functional decomposition analysis, and object modeling.
Develops functional designs (FDDrsquos) to include wireframes, logical data model, system interfaces, and security requirements, and reviews with and obtains stakeholder approvals.
Performs System Testing and reports and tracks issues identified through resolution.
Develops user acceptance test plans and test scenarios and manages the execution of UAT.
Documents test results and monitors and reports testing results and status.
Perform first and second level production support to Retail systems, including analysis and resolution (Good to have) Manages requirements and functional design through the entire lifecycle - tracks and fully documents changes for functional and business specifications writes detailed universally understood procedures for permanent records and for use in training.
Leads and conducts definition, documentation, testing, training, implementation, and support of system requirements on assigned projects.
Manages issues and reports status to assigned Project Manager.
Liaison between departmental end-users and I.T.
in the analysis, design, configuration, testing, and maintenance of information systems Preferable skills and domain experience Ability work in offshore- onsite model SAFe methodology project execution ( Agile ) Hands-on work experience in Retail, Point of Sale, e-commerce
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"* A four-year college or university with major coursework in a related field.WHAT YOU WILL DO:* Collaborate with the Development and Product Management teams on product requirements design, documentation, and risk mitigation strategies* Develop business requirements and collaborate in the translation of business requirements into technical requirements* Define system and functional requirements.
* May design and implement training plans.
Verification of employment eligibility will be required at the time of hire.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.Department: Product ManagementThis is a non-management positionThis is a full time position
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Everyone communicates.
It’s the essence of the human experience.
The epicenter of this transformation is the network—our passion.
JOB SUMMARY:
Translate knowledge of business process into IT solutions that align with overall IT strategies as well as meet the needs of the business.
Ability to lead end-to-end implementation of SAP PLM (Product Lifecycle Management) including change management, BOM management, document and file management.
Define configuration and customization requirements based on engineering business requirements.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITES:
SAP implementation role in PLM/PPM/QM, S4/HANA.
SAP PLM Document Management
SAP PLM Engineering Change Management
SAP PLM BOM Management
Configure SAP PLM solutions for identified gaps in functionality and business process.
Support SAP production business processes within expert field to meet business process requirements.
Participate in design reviews and business model matching sessions.
Leverage SAP PLM/PPM/QM knowledge to identify SAP landing zones for existing
PLM applications on legacy platforms.
Maintain complex integration points between SAP PM and third-party systems (Bolt-ons).
Leverage business knowledge and expertise to deliver business process improvements.
Provide subject matter expertise on SAP best practices for implementing SAP PLM/PPM business processes.
Creates test scenarios and development of test cases and preparation of test data.
Manage user acceptance testing and approval of configuration and development with the business partners for signoff.
Coordinating the custom development, conduct testing, training and data migration, cutover activities and Post go live Support.
Provide innovative solutions by staying abreast of current technology.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field of study / equivalent experience.
Seven (7) plus years' experience with PLM tools / applications.
Configuring and implementing functionality in Engineering Change Management/Engineering Record and workflow design.
Business process analysis and redesign experience.
(Business analysis skills; process mapping; business process redesign and implementation)
Document Management System (DMS).
Experience in Engineering Change Management (ECM).
Workflow Setup for the PLM objects
Knowledge on Data Migration and data cleansing
Must have excellent communication skills both oral and written.
Must be able to work independently and willing to learn new technologies
Must be able to mentor junior team members
PREFERRED SKILLS:
Experience in S/4 HANA PLM /PPM/QM (Cloud Platform).
SAP DMS, PLM, complex Engineering workflow and QM modules with business users.
Knowledge on Intelligent Product Development (IPD).
Experience with Master Data Governance (SAP MDG).
Material Master, Bill of Materials (BOM), Classification.
Knowledge of Environmental Compliance.
Experience with third party systems (Bolt-ons) that interact with SAP systems preferred.
Setting up background jobs, SAP Query, IDOC handling.
Furthermore, this contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a) and 41 CFR 60-741.5(a).
;;
","['excel', 'hana', 'cloud']","['classif', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'hana', 'cloud', 'classif', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for gathering product & workflow requirements and effectively capturing the business processes to drive the design and roadmap for Core Development Products.
The successful candidate is acute at identifying suitable process changes, working through internal and external customers.
This individual will implement, document and monitor business processes, while serving as a functional and technical liaison.
Job Duties:
Author business and technical documents
Gather, analyze and define workflow requirements to document, implement and monitor workflow processes.
Establish product requirements and specifications to support new and existing business initiatives
Conduct interviews and brainstorming sessions with internal and external stakeholders to gather requirements
Document and manage all product requirements and changes
Conduct analyses to discover new functionality requirements
Provide leadership and product direction to ensure ongoing delivery of new releases
Work closely with the development team, business users, and service providers
Assist in reverse engineering existing application functionality
Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree preferred.
4 6 years of experience in a Business Analyst role.
Skills & Knowledge Required:
Excellent troubleshooting abilities, able to solve complex technical issues.
Must demonstrate superb professional verbal and written communication skills, through clearly written, concise and comprehensive documentation.
Demonstrated ability to communicate technical concepts to non-technical audiences.
Fast learner of new technologies and tools.
Knowledge of the software development lifecycle, preferred.
Strong technical writing skills.
Knowledge of Title Industry, helpful.
Excellent interpersonal and customer service skills.
Ability to prioritize and handle multiple projects.
Strong attention to detail and organizational skills.
Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite and Outlook.
Additional Information:
Short-term/Long-term Disability coverage, and Retirement options
Conveniently located in Plano, TX off of the Dallas North Tollway and Plano Parkway
Business hours are 8am - 5pm with some flexibility
Casual dress code
Job Posted by ApplicantPro
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"job summary:
Summary:
Process all Resource Management emails/requests
Liaise with Vendors
Maintain team roster of roughly 300 resources and how resources align to managers and teams across the DPS organization
Monitor headcount changes in real time, facilitate hiring process, and create resource forecast on quarterly basis.
Process all Funding changes and track funds received
Agile experience
Work with Managers to capture Future Projects (Project Tracker)
Responsibilities:
Capture resource allocations and forecasts in PMMT
Provide weekly updates to DPS Manager on financial health including resource allocations, project funding expectations and burn.
Partner with financial practitioner oversee staffing changes in alignment with quarterly corporate forecasts.
Leverage allocation reporting tools to track and manage project level resource allocations as input to project forecasting.
Support the yearly planning process including project/initiative, Base, OCNI and TCOA.
Support the resource onboarding and seating process as needed.
Monitor contractor visa dependency status and dates.
Monitor contractor tenure end dates and remediate ahead of time.
Qualifications:
Ability to manage, structure, and consolidate multiple sources of data into intelligent reports and stories, and take appropriate actions to remedy outlier situations; can operate assertively and independently in a fast paced environment
Relationship, verbal and written communication, team building, and influencing skills.
Highly organized and motivated self-starter and quick learner.
Skills:
Advanced Excel skills, general financial acumen, analytical skills, detail oriented
Analytical experience ability to make sense of data from multiple sources, and put into views for Executive consumption.
Prior Financial experience a plus.
Staffing planning; sourcing/procurement experience a plus
education: Bachelors
",['excel'],"['outlier', 'commun', 'data', 'forecast']",1.0,"['excel', 'outlier', 'commun', 'data', 'forecast']"
BA,"BUSINESS ANALYST
Opportunity will be five months with a strong chance for a long-term extension.
Primary Responsibilities/Accountabilities
Responsible for ensuring on-going lien position of loan collateral for more complex loans.
Monitors system of record ticklers for upcoming expirations of UCCs and insurance policies and other time sensitive expiring collateral related items and acts to extend or obtain renewals of the items prior to their expiration.
Maintains ticklers on systems of record for these items.
Acts to resolve exceptions related to items that have expired or lapsed.
Processes releases of collateral and loan documents for loans that have been repaid.
Provides direction and guidance to more junior associates
Let's talk!
",[None],"['account', 'busi']",999.0,"['account', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Looking for a Sr. Business Analyst with 10+ years of experience for a Contract Consultant opportunity.
The Sr. Business Analyst collaborates with the Finance, business and IT teams to analyze root causes, improve processes, define problems, develop business requirements, as-is and to-be process documentation and success metrics.
Additionally, the BA coordinates end to end UAT business cycles from planning/strategy through to execution and retrospectives.
Responsibilities:
Perform root cause and business process analysis, document business requirements, including business value and stakeholder alignment, as-is and to-be process documentation
Applies analytical thinking skills to diagnose and make recommendations on systems.
Incorporates knowledge of business and technology to make recommendations.
Translates data gathered from user discussions into business requirements.
Identifies business/system needs and recommends solutions.
Assists with the testing strategies and develops preliminary findings.
Participate in prioritization process for systems implementation planning cycles
Liaise regularly with IT Product Owners, BSAs, global business process owners and other organizations to drive process and system solutions
Plan and lead UAT business cycles, including creation of coverage matrices, test script documentation, test execution logistics, tracking and reporting
Manage the delivery of multiple projects concurrently that have moderate to high levels of business or technical complexity and risk
Respond to problems, prioritize correctly, systematically gather information, seek input from others, develop accurate conclusions from findings, and make timely decisions to prioritize and adapt to change
Support Project Lead to drive the overall program plans, resolve ad hoc action items and ensure the smooth delivery of the business solution and all deliverables
Determines approach and solution to problem when issue is within scope of own ability.
Conducts training.
Work is performed and technical decisions are made with a high degree of independence and performance is judged by results obtained.
Works effectively with a team/group to accomplish organizational goals.
Actively participates in client or team meetings by offering suggestions.
Provides leadership to project planning.
Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree (BA or BS) in Computer Science, Engineering, Business Management or Information Management
10-12 years experience with increasing scope of responsibility - in IT and business/industry work
Enterprise Applications: 8 years
Experience in a Business System Analyst role
Excellent interpersonal skills and well-developed verbal and written communication skills.
Must exhibit exceptional teamwork skills.
Excellent judgment and ability to prioritize resource allocation where they will be most useful
Proven experience implementing and project managing enterprise-level business applications
Proven change management experience and effectively prepared users for technical roll-out and implementation
Responsive and comfortable working in a fast-paced, high accountability environment
Outcome focused; able to understand current and changing organizational requirements and provide effective solutions
Ability to communicate technical concepts and break down complex business problems into easily understood communications
General accounting, finance and budgetary experience
Great judgement and decisiveness when dealing with timely, deadline-driven, content-related issues and concerns
",['excel'],"['risk', 'logist', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'logist', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"8 years Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 years Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 years Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 years Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 years Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 years Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 years Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 years Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 years Experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 years Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 years Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 years Experience working in a team environment.
Preferred:
3 years Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 years Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 years Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Job Details
Job Role: Business Analyst
Duration: Contract
Must have skills:
Business analyst with Mortgage and LOS
8 to 10 years of experience
At least 2-3 years good experience in Mortgage domain
At least 2-3 years Agile experience
Communication and co-ordination
Ability to be upfront and ask right questions with business
Ability to take care of sprint grooming session and demos
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Imagine working in a place where continuous improvement and innovation is celebrated and rewarded; where fast-paced, high-impact teams come together to positively drive results for one of the largest & most iconic brands in the world.
Be Customer Obsessed
Be Courageous with Your Point of View
Challenge the Status Quo
Act Like an Entrepreneur
Have an “It Can Be Done” Attitude
Do the Right Thing
Be Accountable
Each principle has a defined set of behaviors which help guide the 7-Eleven team to Serve Customers and Support Stores.
▶About This Opportunity
The Sr. Supply Chain Analyst will support advanced financial analysis, be a liaison to merchandising and operations support, and focus on driving improvements to supply chain performance.
The analyst will provide sales forecasts for new and promotional items in order to optimize inventory levels.
Manage performance, reporting & analytics initiatives.
Monitor weekly & monthly performance management initiatives.
Serve as team lead & supervisor for other analysts that track metrics.
Review weekly & monthly reports on financials performance of logistics partners - provide insights and corrective actions.
Communicate performance objectives & progress to managers & leaders within SEI.
Provide detailed insights on key analytics & reports in order to drive improvements through the supply chain.
Understand trends of key business indicators and determine actions required to improve the underlying business drivers.
Responsible for supporting and acting on Supply chain, demand chain & logistics related reporting & analytics.
Help define targets and benchmarks for departmental metrics.
Keep up with Industry best practices & benchmarks in order to help improve metrics, analytics & insights.
Manage and Control Supply Chain financial Reporting.
Have the ability to pull data, review financial performance, and recommend improvements.
Identify and Implement Controls to better control costs and identify performance issues.
Ensure all documentation for reporting & analytics processes are current.
Serve as a SME for SEI analytics systems.
Offer leadership to other analysts on training & creating other internal experts.
Manage Analytics, Metrics, & Forecasting.
Support special cross-functional projects for performance improvements.
Manage third parties vendors, consultants to help accomplish objectives related to improvements.
Provide forecasts for new and promotional items in parternship with merchandising.
Monitor sales and inventory levels of new and promotional items to ensure fill rate objectives are met.
Lead effective problem solving and continuous improvement projects.
Provide thought leadership on Forecasting functions and improvements.
Manage distribution fee analytics and assign fees for items.
Work with merchandising to understand cost impact.
Assign items to the appropriate supply chain channel to store.
Identify and communicate the appropriate cost structure.
Manage small to meduim sized analytics projects within the Logistics and Demand Chain department.
Support efforts to roll out new technologies & analytics tools to help improve Logistics processes.
Education: Bachelors/4 Year Degree.
Experience: 5 to 10 Yrs, Supply Chain, Forecasting, Financial Management.
Experience with performance management, benchmarking, Supply Chain management & logistics.
Experience with contract management is preferred.
Strong knowledge of Microsoft Excel, working knowledge of Powerpoint/Access, effective communication skills; VBA experience preferred.
Strong analytical skills, interpersonal skills, project management skills, leadership & advanced communication.
#LI-KM1
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba']","['logist', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'logist', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Long Term Contract
This project is an Advisory Project.
Candidate with Cyber-Security background will be favorable.
The candidate needs to have more 5+ years of core BA experience with at least 3+ years in the recent project.
Core BA experience is a must.
The candidate must have Agile experience.
He/She must have worked on project.
First question asked to candidate is to explain his/her daily activity with Agile.
Must be able to handle at least 3-4 projects/products at one time.
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst
W2 Only
Skills and Experience Required:
2-4 years Business analyst role with Finance
Experience in Financial industry is a MUST.
Experience gathering business requirements, gap analysis, process flows, solution design
Graduate or undergraduate degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent
Excellent analytical and process-based skills, i.e.
process flow diagrams, business modelling, and functional design
Excellent communication skills (there is a requirement to be trader and sales facing)
Significant Business Analysis experience across the full project lifecycle (requirements, design, development, testing and deployment).
Strong understanding of the Software Development Life Cycle
Experience with modern software development practices (test-driven development, Agile continuous integration)
Excellent organizational skills, including the ability to effectively manage multiple priorities simultaneously
Strong analytical and problem solving skills
Strong work ethic and ability to work in a team environment
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $80,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analysis: 3 years (Required)
sql: 2 years (Required)
RDBMS: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
https://consultinus.us/
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
No
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'financ', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst 1 - Omni Channel Foundation
This job posting is no longer active.
Job ID: 1084914
Corporate Positions
Technology
Job Type: Full-Time
Date Updated: Sep 9, 2019
Business Analyst 1 - Omni Channel Foundation
Plano, Texas
The Business Analyst 1 will report to Senior Manager - Omnichannel Foundation Marketing, and will be part of the team that is responsible for building and configuring software solutions supporting strategic CRM and Customer Data platforms
Primary Responsibilities:
Analyst role in one or many small to medium sized projects for use case creation, scope management, stakeholder analysis, requirement gathering, process improvement, service management and/or test case creation.
Understanding core business/domain/process capabilities, functions, services and applications for the assigned portfolio/domain.
Ensuring technical solutions match functional and non-functional requirements throughout the project lifecycle.
Serving as a liaison between the various stakeholders and the IT teams for which requirements flow.
Effectively work with vendor(s) when necessary to integrate vendor and JCPenney requirements.
Leading medium projects/efforts with moderate scope and complexity and involves collaboration with cross-functional teams
The team provides IT solutions to multiple business clients, primarily from CRM and Customer Data Integration(CDI) teams.
Understand and own the business requirements and functionality of the CRM and CDI applications along with understanding the general functionality of the integrating applications
Gather, analyze, evaluate, and challenge information obtained from multiple sources.
Reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low level information to a more general understanding for both IT and business audience.
Serve as a liaison between the business customer, IT, vendors, integration, and testing teams to ensure deliverables are technically sound and meet customers' expectations.
Conduct reviews of teams' deliverables for understanding, completeness, and accuracy.
Work closely with Project management and Leader to ensure priorities are aligned.
Maintain awareness of business and technology changes that could impact the requirements and their final delivery in an application.
Participate in impact analysis sessions to determine impacts when application changes are made.
Provide domain and subject matter expertise on data and metrics.
Core Competencies & Accomplishments:
At least 2 years of sql experience
Self-motivated, creative and strong sense of accountability
Minimum of bachelor degree (preferably in MIS, Computer Science, or Business Administration)
Excellent communication skills (both written and spoken)
Extensive experience in Visio and Excel
Experience to translate high-level business requirements into functional specifications in addition to managing changes to the specifications.
Own multiple project related work efforts (business requirements, functional requirements, best practice, process definition etc.)
along with other Marketing, CRM and Loyalty departmental tasks.
Must be able to switch from one project to another seamlessly.
Experience owning BA responsibilities (as described above) for the full software development lifecycle (waterfall and iterative) for large multi-year projects and/or multiple overlapping shorter-term projects.
Ability to manage multiple concurrent BA tasks along with other departmental tasks with minimal supervision.
Experience with vendor software implementation and integration projects.
Facilitation of business requirements gathering and definition in various formats including joint collaboration sessions with business and IT, targeted Q&A sessions with multiple Subject Mater Experts, and one-on-one user interviews.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Able to connect with business SMEs, end users, IT partners, and 3rd party software vendors.
Able to effectively convey critical information to various levels within the organization.
Effectiveness in sharing knowledge across the organization, driving best practices, and coaching junior team members.
Experience with database modelling is a plus
Experience in CRM, IBM MDM and Customer data projects is a plus
What you get:
On-site campus amenities include health clinic, pharmacy, daycare and preschool, full cafeteria service, a 24-hour fitness center and free garage parking.
About JCPenney:
At every touchpoint, customers discover stylish merchandise at incredible value from an extensive portfolio of private, exclusive and national brands.
Working at JCPenney means joining a dedicated team of associates who are encouraged to be uniquely themselves in a safe, caring and welcoming environment.
It is a place where careers prosper, accomplishments are celebrated and diversity flourishes.
It's a place that's meant for you.
#LI-VR1
Job Title: Business Analyst 1 - Omni Channel Foundation
Job ID: 1084914
Plano, Texas
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Summary
Acts as liaison between technical personnel and non-technical personnel.
Essential Job Functions
Plans, designs and recommends business processes to improve and support business activities.
Analyzes and documents client's business requirements and processes and communicates these requirements by constructing conceptual data and process models, including data dictionaries and volume estimates from organization.
Creates test scenarios and develops test plans to be used in testing the business applications in order to verify that client requirements are incorporated in to the system design.
Assists in analyzing testing results throughout the project.
Provides input into developing and modifying systems to meet client needs and develops business specifications to support these modifications.
Facilitates meetings with clients to gather and document requirements and explore potential solutions.
Assists in analyzing testing results in all phases.
Participates in technical reviews and inspections to verify 'intent of change' is carried out through the entire project.
Assists in providing time estimates for project related tasks.
Assists with developing the methods and procedures required to identify whether current business goals and objectives meet organizational needs.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of education and experience
Bachelor's degree in business administration, information systems, or related field preferred
Six or more years of business analysis experience
Experience working with business processes and re-engineering
Experience working with computer programming concepts and basic language
Other Qualifications
Interpersonal skills to interact with customers and team members
Good communication skills
Good analytical and problem solving skills
Presentation skills to present to management and customers
Personal computer and business solutions software skills
Good ability to work in a team environment with multiple team members
Willingness to travel
Work Environment
Office environment
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"State:
Texas
City:
Irving
Interest:
Post Closing-12309
POSITION SUMMARY
The Senior Business Analyst fulfills analyst activities specific to their department that are found in a traditional software development and process engineering organization.
This role is responsible for leading discrete projects that are focused on creating efficiency within the organization through process improvement or enhancing technology systems.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Work with the departmental managers to understand the current processes and systems.
Conduct time-in-motion studies and facilitate focus group sessions to identify areas within the process or system that require improvement.
Recommend process changes/system modifications to streamline and automate a business process.
Define high-level goals and road map associated with their project.
Identify and analyze the risks associated with achieving the milestones for a project.
Develop risk mitigation strategies.
Work with Deployment Manager to organize and execute pre-deployment user acceptance testing that is specific to the project.
Assist the corporate training group in the creation of training documentation and programs that are focused on building consistency and proficiency within a process.
Facilitate/present the initial training sessions for a particular process.
Ensure the management and training for a particular process is effectively transitioned back to the business after the completion of a project.
Communicate status of the project to senior management.
Serve as the single point of contact for project related issues that need to be escalated to senior management for resolution.
Data validation and report development
REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor's degree or equivalent.
Over 5 years of experience in Mortgage industry.
Proficiency in defining business problems and proposing solutions.
Product, Process and Industry Knowledge.
Expert skills in Microsoft Excel, including the ability to utilize the following functions: V-Lookup, H-Lookup, Concatenating formulas, Conditional formatting, and Pivot Tables
Bachelor's degree in Business, Economics or related field a plus
Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.
Must be proactive and solutions oriented business professional with the ability to interface with all levels of management across business units and functions.
Collaborating Contagiously
Caring Fiercely
Doing the Right Thing
Leading Thoughtfully
Alternate Locations:
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Contract to hIre
Client is a seeking a Business Analyst to work closely with the Product Owner or Senior Product Owner to define and deliver product and feature enhancements.
The Business Analyst will report directly to the VP, Product and will have exposure with managing complex projects.
The Business Analyst will deliver features and functionality that meet customer needs and that can be commercialized in a competitive and changing environment.
The Business Analyst will proactively seek an understanding of market trends, customer needs and the competitive landscape of the industry, with direction from the Product Owner or Senior Product Owner.
The Business Analyst is a valuable role that continuously improves ROI through participation in reviewing and evolving the product processes, content, and functionality.
Responsibilities
Participate in building and executing a go-to-market plan including commercialization, positioning, channel and customer support strategies in collaboration with Sales and Marketing departments
Manage the build cycle of the product in partnership with the Product Owner or Senior Product Owner to present and approve product decisions
Develop features into user stories that can be consumed and executed by the Engineering teams
Review tickets to ensure requirements are clearly defined and prioritize for development
Work closely with other product teammates to identify cross-product dependencies
Communicate priorities and answer questions about the details of the projects through interaction with internal resources, customers and stakeholders to understand business processes and requirements
Give product demonstrations and presentations to clients as needed and/or at conference and trade shows
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree (or higher) in a related field of study (including but not limited to: Computer Science, Business Administration, Project Management)
2+ years of relevant experience within a SaaS organization
Excellent written and verbal communication and ability to deliver effective presentations
Excellent at developing detailed documentation and reporting
Analytical, problem solving, and research skills
Ability to influence as well as collaborate and negotiate with key stakeholders and executives
Experience with reporting and analyzing key metrics and incorporating them into decision-making processes
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree
Minimum of 5 years of Salesforce.com (SFDC) systems implementation experience
Salesforce Administrator Certification
Salesforce Sales or Service Cloud
Preferred Skills Requirements:
Facilitates requirements and solution design workshops.
Authors functional design and configuration specification deliverables based on clients business requirements.
Works independently to test Salesforce configuration and setup, test case development, performance and load testing, End to End testing, and functional/regression testing (coding and development skills not necessary)
Supports User Acceptance Testing
Migrates meta data between salesforce environments using change sets and other tools.
Advises and guides client towards best practices in application configuration, workflow, customizations and data validation.
Advises and guides client towards best practices for salesforce.com user setup including roles, profiles, security model, permissions and groups.
Collaborate with end-users to create project-specific training material.
Conducts training sessions and stakeholder interviews.
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['regress', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Additional duties will include documenting business requirements and processes, resolving production issues, application configuration, and other duties as assigned for administration and management of the Branch/Service Ops systems.
Business Analyst is primarily responsible for executing the Branch/Service Operations projects and supporting the systems related to these departments.
Following are the essential tasks, including but not limited to* The individual will be responsible for requirements gathering, development, testing and accountable for production deployment and support efforts.
* Translate high-level business requirements into functional specifications for the IT organization and/or vendors.
Mange changes to such specifications.
* Lead design sessions in prototyping new systems for the purpose of enhancing business processes, operations, and information process flow.
* Review and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of existing systems and develop strategies for improving or further leveraging these systems.
* Create system design proposals including systems models, specifications, diagrams and charts to providedirection to system programmers.
* Suggest design options and provide feedback on feasibility of solution designs proposed by technical teammembers.
* Ensure the proposed design meets all of the requirements and identify where gaps may exist andproactively work to close these.
* Identify and document relevant functional test cases and related testing scripts as a part of the qualityassurance process.
If necessary, participate in the execution testing and quality assurance relatedactivities.
* Coordinate and perform in-depth tests, including end-user reviews, for modified and new systems, andother post-implementation support.
* Drive, support, and if necessary formally lead a User Acceptance Testing (UAT) effort that culminates in anexplicit business approval to use the application in a production environment.
As necessary, employingcommunication skills such as persuasion and negotiation with key business stakeholders and SMEs toobtain this approval.
* Facilitate the development and delivery of relevant training for delivery to end users of the system, or in atrain the trainer format.
* Manage multiple project work efforts and coordinate effectively with Project Manager.
When necessary, perform the role of PM on technology enabled business projects.
* Monitor deliverables and ensure timely completion of projects.
* Prepare status reports and deliverables/presentations.
* Develop test plans and coordinate software testing.
* Communicates effectively with IT management and senior leadership, including providing overall project status & health.
* Lead efforts to elicit, review, and secure sign-off of business requirements.
Gather, document, review andsecure sign-off for functional requirements including functional use cases, integration requirements, datamigration requirements, and reporting requirements through engagement with the business stakeholdersand subject matter experts (SMEs).
* Provide orientation and training to end users for all modified and new systems.
* Coordinate and perform other post-implementation support.
* 8+ years of experience as a Business Analyst in a Retail and distribution industry* Significant experience in supporting the store/Branch/Service operations* Deep knowledge of Project Management Methodology, End-to-End understanding of project life cycle - defining scope and requirements clearly through testing and system implementation* Excellent analytical and problem solving skills and ability to translate business functionality and opportunities into clear, precise and easy-to-read functional specifications* Strong business acumen to quickly learn new business processes and understand how IT needs to support the business in achieving revenue and profit goals* SQL language proficiency with at least one of the common database platforms such as SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, and/or DB2 database management systems is a plus.
* Lead the solution user acceptance testing cycles - including test scenario documentation and sign off by the business.
* Analyze business partner operations to understand strengths / weaknesses and identify opportunities to improve processes and functions* Works closely with the IT organization on the project close phase, and transition to the normal support organization once agreed metrics have been achieved* Supports the day to day work of the integrated planning function by offering help, advice, and troubleshooting on the systems that have been implemented.
* Proactively drive root cause analysis and resolution* Work with geographically dispersed engineering teams ensuring remote teams can understand and follow the requirementsAttributes* Oral Expression : The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
* Written Expression: The ability to communicate job information so technician will understand the requirements.
* Oral Comprehension: The ability to understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
* Problem Sensitivity: The ability to tell when something is wrong or is likely to go wrong.
It does not only involve recognizing there is a problem but also solving it.
He or she will be required to follow any other instructions and to perform any other duties requested by his or her supervisor.FleetPride is the leader in the industry comprised of retail, service, distribution and wholesale divisions.
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'mysql']","['analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"clients.
This role is for Kronos
Business Analyst and candidate should have below technical skills.
Ability to work as a
liaison with both the customer and developers
Excellent verbal and
written communication skills.
Excellent analysis
and design abilities using object methods in support of authoring System
Requirements documentation.
Excellent abilities
in the design and creation of test plans and test cases which support the test
plans.
Excellent SQL
development skills used in support of testing and trouble shooting custom
solutions
Must be able to work
independently and work well as a team member
Must have the ability
to facilitate/lead their own meetings, communicate status of project work
Excellent knowledge
of base configuration and timecard knowledge
People Record
knowledge
Profile knowledge
on-line for immediate consideration, please send your updated resume and
contact info via email indu.bhyrappa@prolim.com or Contact.
(214)-945-2557
Ext 200.
They
understand business as much as technology, and help their customers improve
their profitability and efficiency by providing high-value technology
consulting, staffing, and project management outsourcing services.
Their IT and PLM consulting offerings include; Advisory, PLM
Software/Services, Program Management, Solution Architecture Training/Staffing,
Cloud Solutions, Servers/Networking, Infrastructure, ERP Practices and QA
Services.
Engineering services include Data Translation, CAD/CAM/CAE, Process
& Product Engineering, Prototyping, and Testing/Validation within a wide
range of markets and industries.
","['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Looking for your next opportunity?
Primary Purpose
Minimum Specifications
Education:
Bachelor Degree in Management Information Systems, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Finance, or related discipline is preferred.
Experience:
Five years of healthcare reporting/analytics work experience.
Five years of experience in writing SQL queries to extract data from multiple sources.
SAP, Tableau, Qlik) is preferred.
Experience with SAP Reporting Tools (HANA, Digital Boardroom, WebI) is preferred.
Experience at a managed care organization is preferred.
Equivalent Education and/or Experience:
Skills or Special Abilities:
Advanced proficiency with writing queries in Structured Query Language (SQL).
Microsoft Access is a plus.
Inclination for problem solving.
Responsibilities:
Develops automated self-service reporting for stakeholders.
Manages data interfaces with third party vendors.
Job Accountabilities:
Integrates knowledge gained into current work practices.
","['microsoft', 'sql', 'hana', 'tableau', 'qlik']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'hana', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'problem solving', 'statist', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Technical Background MS and MBA or equivalent from Good reputed college.
Good experience in handling (model) risk management requirements & analysis.
Good knowledge of regulatory requirements regarding model risk management and (risk) modelling.
Excellent presentation skills ( Creation of presentations, wireframes etc) and presenting to business
Strong experience in creating requirements docs like BRD , FRD etc.
Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
Able to work independently.
Good communication skills to a wide range of stakeholders.
Proactive attitude.
Able to manage deadlines while delivering high quality workfull business proficiency in English
Certifications like FRM, CBAP, CSPO, PSPO, PMP are added advantage
",['excel'],"['risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",2.5,"['excel', 'risk', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job #: 1071315
Develops and leads programs, initiatives for data quality, governance, and metadata activities.
Develops tools and processes used to maintain a common, firm-wide data standard.
May define strategic requirements, roadmap, or direction for metadata capabilities.
Drive analysis and assessment approach during issue remediation life cycle.
Supports and interacts with various functions and groups on multi-domain remediation efforts.
Leverages domain expertise and data / business / process analysis to inform and support solution design.
May provide inputs into communication routines with stakeholders, business partners, and senior leaders.
5+ years of experience in one or a combination of the following: data management, data governance, data quality or data analysis
**Must have Auto Loan Servicing Experience**
EEO Employer
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The North Tarrant Express was the first design-build-finance-operate-maintain managed lanes project in Texas and consisted of the complete reconstruction of 13.3 miles of the existing I-820/SH-183 corridor between Dallas and Fort Worth.
Since opening in October 2014, nine months ahead of the contracted completion date, the general highway lanes are experiencing a 70% decrease in congestion time and a 15% increase in average speed.
The LBJ Express is currently the largest P3 operation in Texas and one of the largest ever undertaken in the U.S. With an Average Annual Daily Traffic (AADT) of 270,000, it is a regionally-significant transportation improvement project in North Texas that is relieving severe congestion in the dense urban area of north Dallas.
In 2009, the Cintra-led consortium was selected to complete the design, construction, finance, operation, and maintenance of the project along I-635 and I-35E.
Since opening in September 2015, approximately three months ahead of schedule, the general highway lanes are realizing a 60% decrease in congestion time and a 10% increase in average speed.
Your next calling:
As the Field Systems Analyst, you will have the opportunity to assist in monitoring and supporting day to day operations of the Toll Collection System (TCS) and Advanced Traffic Management System (ATMS) by ensuring timely and accurate processing of toll transactions and gathering of accurate traffic data.
Participate in the implementation and testing of systems, tracking results, recording and escalating system performance issues.
Functions key to success:
Monitor and report on the accurate and timely collection of traffic data including: transaction generation at the roadside, timely data transmission, and data validation
Track and analyze TCS and ATMS performance
Assist Field Systems Technical team in troubleshooting system issues
Responsible for evaluating, analyzing, and reconciling information from multiple systems and stakeholders
Coordinate and collaborate with the Field Systems Manager on the integration of the Central Toll System with the deployment of the roadside components, while ensuring its logic, functional and technical alignment, and schedule alignment
Coordinate and collaborate with the Field Systems Architect Manager on Network Communications Systems (NCS) components performance, network analysis, and systems checks.
Act as a conduit between the system maintenance technical team and central systems operational teams; including third party service providers as required
Actively participate in integration test execution and user acceptance test execution when applicable
Investigate exceptions and prepare briefings to management on issues, impacts, and proposed resolutions
Ensure clear communication of system issues, workarounds, and resolution
Identification of potential exceptions, especially those which may result in customer facing issues.
These exceptions may be identified via:
Analysis of system data and trends
Discussions with external service providers
Responsible for ITS Field Systems data visualization development and data maintenance
Responsible for daily, weekly, monthly, and annual field systems reporting and analysis.
What you bring to the table:
You have worked hard to achieve success in your educational career, now put it to use.
If you have an Bachelor’s degree in business, information technology, computer science or relevant you are half way there with the needed abilities for this position.
Do you have at least 0 to 3 yearsof experience in the field of field of data analysis, toll industry background or another transaction processing environment?
If the answer is yes, you can check off another box.
With success comes a high level of professionalism.
Excellent attention to detail
Excellent communication skills
Reporting and documentation skills
Effectively manage tasks
Ability to interact with colleagues in a self-managed team structure
Must be able to multitask, problem solve, and implement innovative processes within a fast-paced environment while ensuring accuracy in work product; strong focus on being detail oriented is a must.
Finally, in a technology-drivenworld, it is important to know your way around a computer.
For this role, it will be important to know the basics of the following:
Must be able to demonstrate computer proficiency, especially as to Microsoft Excel, Word and Power Point and other PC based programs
Working knowledge of Microsoft Project and Visio
Working knowledge of data visualization and accompanying toolset i.e.
Microsoft Power BI, Tableau, or Qlik
Working knowledge of Oracle SQL developer
Effective communication will be key for this role and will require you to talk and hear others.
You will probably spend a majority of your time sitting and/or walking around the office, whether to visit a co-worker or make it to a meeting on time and there may be occasional long hours to put in if you are diligently working to complete a project and finish a report.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include ability to adjust focus, as necessary to use a computer.
There could be a time when you may need to lift and/or move up to 10 pounds, but not very often.
Finally, minimal travelwill be required.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'oracl']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'qlik', 'oracl', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Â
Job Title: Sr. Business Analyst with Telecom<b>
Job Type: Contract<b>
Duration: 6 months+
Requirements:
Qualifications:
BA/BS degree in related field or equivalent experience
A minimum of 4 years of experience in contact center telephony technology domain (e.g., ACD, Skills Based Routing, IVR, QA, reporting and analytics, etc.
), operations experience
Bilingual a plus
Experience leading small to large projects
Ability to work effectively within matrixed organizations and develop strong partnerships with both IT and business partners
Ability to navigate through large and complex organizations
Strong customer service skills
Extensive understanding of SDLC, Agile, change management, application development, infrastructure and industry best practices
Critical, strategic thinking, meeting facilitation, outstanding verbal and written communications, and interpersonal interaction skills are required
Â
Best Regards,
Steve,
Sr.
Talent Acquisition Consultant,
TekLeaders Inc
4975 Preston Park Blvd, Suite 500 Plano, TX 75093
Phone: +1(214)(935)3378
Â
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst/ System Analysis (Security)
Term: W2 Role
Responsibilities:
and leverages the expertise with Veracode, Qualys and other vulnerability reports analysis to execute risk assessment / mitigation.
All you need is...
• Bachelor's degree in computer science
• Experience in IT of Financial industry and banking domain
• At least 5 years of practical experience in system analysis, working with the client on the requirements and processes definition, in a variety of complex situations
• Experience with SAST and DAST tools
• (SAST - Static Application Security Testing, DAST - Dynamic Application Security Testing)
• Deep understanding of application security vulnerabilities and threat and mitigations.
• Familiar with OWASP top ten security risks, like injection, cross-site scripting, weak encryption, broken authentication, etc.
• Experience writing technical stories in JIRA/confluence using industry standard notations
• Details oriented.
• Problem solving capabilities
• Excellent verbal and written skills are critical since this job primarily entails communicating technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences
What will your job look like?
• Investigate and document application vulnerabilities, End of Life and End of Support
• Work with Product Owner and Scrum teams to fix detected vulnerabilities
• Execute risk assessment / mitigation
• Facilitate the warm handoff between ""Just do it"" work and EOL/complex work
• Stay current on IT security trends and news.
• Research security enhancements and make recommendations to management.
• Stay up-to-date on information technology trends and security standards.
Why You Will Love This Job
• You will be able to use your specific insights and deep knowledge of customers’ business environments to influence decisions impacting customer to optimal solution design.
• You will be a key member of a global, dynamic and highly collaborative team with various possibilities for personal and professional development
• You will have the opportunity to work in multinational environment for the global market leader in its field.
","['excel', 'jira']","['risk', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'risk', 'optim', 'research', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Summary:
As a Sr. Business Analyst, you will work closely with product owners, developers, and analysts in cross-functional agile teams to create and deliver innovative payment products and services in a dynamic IT environment with a focus on debit payment processing.
Job Details:
Key Responsibilities
Develop, maintain, and grow strategic partnerships with the card brands, debit networks, and other service providers
Translate strategic vision and objectives into project needs as technical requirements, scope definition, process maps, gap analyses, and business test cases
Ensure technical designs meet product objectives during initial implementation and ongoing production support
Collaborate with product management to translate payment processing requirements into prioritized features for the program backlog
Decompose capabilities/features into prioritized user stories and manage the team backlog
Participate in scrum ceremonies
Provide advisory services to all business units regarding existing regulations, regulatory requirements, new regulatory changes, and compliance risks for debit processing
Support new and existing merchant implementations/conversions as required
Interface with third-party vendors such as Card Brands, Debit networks, and Debit service providers to ensure business needs are met
Assist various operational teams with production issues related to application compliance, network rules, and third-party vendors (e.g.
debit networks or other service providers)
Train internal resources and external customers on new functionality and processes as required
Those applicants requiring reasonable accommodation to the application and/or interview process should notify a representative of the Human Resources Department.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"In addition this position involves testing applications against the business requirements and in many cases managing the project through its life cycle and bringing it to a successful conclusion.
Position Responsibilities Responsible to capture and document business requirements and review them with the stakeholders Defines Use Cases to articulate user requirements Helps document test scenarios and test scripts Responsible for testing applications against the business requirements Comfortable working in an Agile environment Maintains a close working relationship with business users to ensure their needs are translated into meaningful system changes Developing basic project plans, scope of work, timelines and ensuring projects are delivered to specifications and on-time Managing projects through its life cycle, providing periodic status and obtaining sign-offs Works with business to document business processes Works with IT to document project management processes Supports Scrum Master and fill in when necessary Create end user documentation Builds reports using reporting tools Addresses Customer Information System and reporting related helpdesk requests Train staff on applications and create documentation as needed Abides by clients code of conduct and all policies and procedures.
Education Essential Skills Bachelorrsquos degree in similar field preferred Minimum of five year with Business Analysis experience Insurance Industry and Agile Certification preferred.
Strong verbal and written communication skills Strong analytical and problem solving skills with detail-oriented accuracy Strong initiative and ability to work in a dynamic and global workplace environment Good understanding of both the technical and business facing sides of Business Analysis Ability to effectively communicate and interact with senior-level management and clients at a senior level Ability to work tight deadlines, manage priorities and take responsibility for delivering to time and quality requirements Ability to contribute in ArchitectureDesign reviews and gauge impact on Product Features Excellent presentation skills and competence in business process and case management tools, e.g.
MS Visio Fluent with Microsoft Office Tools especially Word and Excel.
Experience Experience with project management Experience with report designing Experience in business process modelling, business analysis and preferably software development Experience using JIRA Experience with leading UAT and interacting with global clients Experience in Functional and Product artifacts (User Stories, BRD, FRS, Wireframes, Release Notes, User Manual) Product BA experience is a plus.
If you are interested or know someone who will be a fit for this requirement, please contact me asap.
Thanks Regards, Ahmed Sayyed ahmed.sayyedxoriant.com Phone- 732 200 1918
","['excel', 'jira', 'microsoft']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Title: Technical Business Analyst with Credit Risk Wholesale Banking
Fulltime
Business Analyst with 10-12 yrs exp.
who is an independent contributor.
Should have data analysis skills and comfortable with writing SQL's.
Should have credit risk experience.
Should have wholesale banking ex
",['sql'],"['risk', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['sql', 'risk', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: BUSINESS ANALYST – S4 HANA
Duration: 12+ Months
Learn the interim-state and long term reporting strategies, processes and solutions
Translates all Value/Synergy teams captured reporting requirements into fully groomed technical reporting requirements ready for development.
The candidate will liaise between the Product, Architectural, Data Teams and the Functional Product Owners to refine Business requirements.
Identify end-to-end business scenarios for testing, identifying performance requirements, and helping to conduct any testing.
Ensure development is delivered meeting all requirements and standards
Participate in solution design activities (e.g.
requirements gathering, system analysis and design)
Identify requirement “gaps” and provide design alternatives to maintain a high degree of quality
Strong working technical knowledge of SAP S4HANA reporting and analytics tools
Experience with Cloud-based implementations of SAP HANA a strong plus
Problem-solving, troubleshooting and analytical skills
Strong technical skills including understanding of software development and configuration principle
","['hana', 'cloud']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['hana', 'cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business analysis work – Conducting Due diligence and Discovery sessions
· Independently Work with client’s cross-functional team for business requirements gathering, analysis, and solution design
· Review user business process and use cases, create workflows and functional design during SDLC
· Provide direction and inputs to the solution development team during presales as well as SDLC processes.
· Provide guidance and direction to the delivery team during the software development.
This could be in terms of functionality, system integrations, user interface, user experience, best-in-class practices, KPIs, review demos etc.
· Work with the customer (business users) in preparing User acceptance test cases and assist in the UAT.
Presales and consulting for the Warranty Solutions group
· Techno-functional Subject Matter Expert (SME) with a mix of expertise in IT Systems/Tools/Technologies as well as Business Analysis/Consulting in manufacturing after-market domain with a specific focus on warranty management and related processes
· Support the sales process and closely engage with prospective clients before and after the sale.
· Participate with clients in defining business requirements, mapping processes, reengineering processes, identify gaps for solution design and architecture development
· Understand clients ‘As-is’ process, legacy systems architecture and functionality to come with the solution design and mapping of future system and processes
· Perform demos, participation in building POCs and look out for cross-sell opportunities with existing customers
Experience/ Education
· 5+ years’ of overall work experience, out of which
· 3+ years in IT Solutions/Services industry in Business Analysis area
· At least 2 years in software development
· Industry consulting experience a plus
· Experience in enterprise custom applications for Manufacturing industries (Auto, HVAC, Construction equipment, High-Tech, Consumer Industries, Industrial/ Heavy/ Mining Equipment, etc.)
and good knowledge of following domain areas –
· Warranty Management
· Reverse Logistics
· Supply Chain
· Experience in handling projects with Onsite Discovery / Requirements Gathering, Analysis, and Functional Design
· Good understanding of Agile and iterative approaches for software development
· Willingness to learn and quickly ramp-up for new business models in post-sales for different industry segments
· An MBA with specialization in operations/ logistics/ supply chain preferred.
· Desirable Certifications
· IIBA certifications for business analysts (CCBA, CBAP)
· Agile certifications (PSM-1, PSM-2, CSM)
Thanks & Regards
Raj Singh | Resource Manager | IT Recruitment.
Email : raj@pddninc.net | Direct : 510-709-0391 | Gtalk : rajkumar.rgtalent |Skype : rkbuntyg
Linked In : www.linkedin.com/in/happyraj
PDDN INC. | 42840 Christy St #239, Fremont, CA 94538
",[None],"['busi', 'segment', 'logist', 'kpi']",2.0,"['busi', 'segment', 'logist', 'kpi']"
BA,"About BCS:
To provide preferred clients with IT and engineering professionals.
To be a staffing partner of choice and employer of choice by attracting, developing and retaining best-in-class associates.
To continuously provide and improve quality workforce solutions that help clients exceed their goals.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"About the Role:
Reporting to the Director of Technology Solutions, the Senior IT Business Systems Analyst works with functional and technical teams to capture and write the technical and requirements and design processes for medium to large-scale technical projects.
As a Senior Business Analyst, you will solicit and document the customer requirements, processes and workflows developing both written and visual depictions of requirements and process flows.
You will also work with developers to create the functional specifications that meet requirements, serve as an expert, and work with the Quality Assurance team to test the developed functionality.
You Will:
Interpret goals and present and advocate for solution options and scope
Develop understanding of customer workflows and needs
Provide precise functional specifications to include functional hierarchy, workflow, and business rules to clients and development staff
Gather requirements and help build and document specifications for Solution development
Present proposed solutions to customer in non-technical/business terminology
Work with Development, Quality Assurance, and Production Support teams to verify and test the desired functionality
Demonstrate an understanding of Cloud concepts and technologies
Work towards improving business analysis best practices
You Have:
An Associate's degree in related field of study.
A Bachelor's or Master's degree is a plus
7 years of technical business analysis
Understanding of business analysis principles, processes, and techniques
Experience developing use cases, user stories, functional specifications, and technical requirements
Experience providing leadership to team members and peers by working with others; explain ideas and viewpoints to senior management, peers and others
Experience providing and helping implementing solutions by building partnerships with key stakeholders; identify business needs; execute necessary processes and practices; monitor progress; recognizing and capitalizing on improvement opportunities; and adapt to competing demands
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and can present complex technical information to both technical and non-technical audiences
Experience adapting to changing requirements and responsibilities
Equivalent education and/or experience may be substituted for any of the above requirements
Why the Dallas Fed?
These efforts take a team of dedicated individuals doing many different jobs.
Comprehensive healthcare options (Medical, Dental, and Vision)
401K match, and a fully funded pension plan
Paid vacation, holidays, and volunteer hours; flexible work environment
Generously subsidized public transportation and free parking
Annual tuition reimbursement
Professional development programs, training and conferences
And more
Notes:
This position may be filled at various levels based on candidate's qualifications as determined by the department.
If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, please notify your Talent Acquisition Consultant.
","['excel', 'cloud']","['visual', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'visual', 'commun', 'busi', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
FC6zehotv3
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"PURPOSE AND SCOPE:
The Sr. Business Analyst develops, interprets and implements complex financial and/or accounting concepts for financial planning and control.
The Sr. Business Analyst performs economic research and studies in areas of business analysis within the assigned function(s).
PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Provide in-depth analysis and technical support to determine present and future financial performance.
Lead review(s) of submitted data for accuracy and integrity; addressing discrepancies and adverse trends as necessary.
Prepare presentations for review by management, board of directors, and diverse governing bodies by providing diverse financial data.
Provide an essential contribution to the development and implementation of policies and processes within assigned function(s).
May support management review of operations by performing cost-benefit analyses comparing diverse operating programs; reviewing financial requests and/or exploring alternative finance methods as necessary.
Mentor other staff as applicable.
Assist with various projects as assigned by a direct supervisor.
Other duties as assigned.
Additional responsibilities may include focus on one or more departments or locations.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORKING CONDITIONS:
The physical demands and work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
EDUCATION:
Bachelor’s Degree required; Advanced Degree desirable
EXPERIENCE AND REQUIRED SKILLS:
5 – 8 years’ related experience; or a Master’s degree with 3 years’ experience; or a PhD without experience.
Excellent computer skills with advanced proficiency in word processing, spreadsheet, database, presentation and email applications.
Experience in business warehouse (BW) and financial systems preferred (e.g., SAP, etc.).
Detail oriented with strong analytical and organizational skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills to effectively communicate with all levels of management.
EO/AA Employer: Minorities/Females/Veterans/Disability/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity
",['excel'],"['data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'econom']"
BA,"The Cyber Security Technology (CST) function within Global Information Security is responsible for innovation and architecture, engineering, solutions and capabilities development, deployment maintenance and support of information technology security controls.
The CST team is also responsible for the management of the program/project management teams.
The Production Support Analyst will be a member of the Production Support team responsible for administration and support of various solutions.
In this role, you may be working with multiple technologies across the Global Information Security technology stack, so flexibility is key.
You may have to work different shifts and on the weekend to provide 24x7 operations support.
Key responsibilities:
"" Provide day-to-day Production support
"" Provide administration and level 2 operations support to enterprise-wide implementations of the RSA Archer suite.
""
Manage data center migration of current environments.
""
Working knowledge of Microsoft Windows Server Administration, Microsoft IIS and Microsoft SQL Server
"" Previous experience with RSA Archer GRC platform highly desirable.
Desired Skills:
"" General knowledge and understanding of UNIX / Linux operating systems
"" Familiarity with common UNIX and Windows utilities, diagnostic and monitoring tools
"" Good verbal and written communication skills
Qualifications:
Must HaveTechnicalLinux
and 0 yearsRSA Archer
and 0 yearsUNIX
and 0 years
","['sql', 'unix', 'microsoft', 'linux']","['commun', 'data', 'information technology']",999.0,"['sql', 'unix', 'microsoft', 'linux', 'commun', 'data', 'information technology']"
BA,"Duties & Responsibilities:
Basic Qualifications:
BS in Computer Science, Information Systems, or related discipline
Minimum 5 years of experience as Business analyst
Experience supporting healthcare payer business processes and testing activities for enrollment, quote to card, claim processing and payment, etc.
Experience presenting and communicating to Senior Level Leadership
Experience with Azure cloud and/or similar cloud environments.
Experience in DevOps (Software development and information technology operations)
Experience with SharePoint, Microsoft applications including Word, Excel, Visio and Outlook
Exposure to business requirements gathering tool (HP-ALM or Rally or Jira, etc.)
Experience writing SQL or PL/SQL queries for various database
Experience creating subset plan and building subset queries for large databases
Nice to have
Experience working on a Protegrity implementation project
Graduate Degree in Computer Science or related discipline
Experience with qTest, Azure ADO, or Blueprint
Travel:
On-site position in Plano, TX OR Louisville, KY.
INDAPPS
Nearest Major Market: Louisville
Job Segment:
Database, Consulting, Developer, Mainframe, Oracle, Technology
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'azur', 'jira', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['healthcar', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'azur', 'jira', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'healthcar', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'segment']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
31VxZToee5
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: Sr. Salesforce Administrator / Business Analyst
Job Id: 184.20
# of Openings: 1
Responsibilities Include:
Serve as system administrator for the Salesforce environment with 500+ users
Complete regular internal system audits and prepare for upgrades
Coordinate the evaluation, scope, and completion of new application requests
Work with the organization to support administrative, development, and change management activities
Develop and implement a platform governance strategy and related tactics
Assist in training of new users, and grow the Salesforce skill set across the organization
Qualifications Include:
BS or BA degree
4+ years of experience as a Salesforce Administrator
Salesforce Administrator certification required; Salesforce Advanced Administrator certification desired; Other Salesforce certifications, a plus
Understanding of B:B and B:C sales and service operating models
Knowledge of the educational industry, a plus
Proven ability to implement new processes and facilitate user adoption
Strong understanding of the platform, with the ability to build custom apps and objects, formula fields, workflows, custom views, and other content of intermediate complexity
Demonstrated ability to meet deadlines, handle and prioritize simultaneous requests, and manage laterally and upwards
Strong data management abilities
A highly organized, energetic, and creative change professional who can establish and maintain strong relationships
A demonstrated ability to understand and articulate complex Salesforce concepts
Creative and analytical thinker with strong problem-solving skills, and a bias for action
A strong communicator, who has presence, can simplify messaging, and incorporate storytelling
Ability to assess the impact of new requirements on Salesforce, including all upstream / downstream applications, systems, and processes
Flexible and adaptable; able to work in ambiguous situations
Must be a team player and able to work collaboratively with and through others
***Must have U.S. work visa.
No H1-B visa sponsorship available or will be considered***
","['c', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"8+ years of experience as an Oracle DBA/Application ADBA,
Oracle Certification preferred (OCA or higher),
5+ years of SQL and PL/SQL Development experience,
Eclipse 3.3+, Linux scripting,
DB Schema Design, DB Performance tuning, Oracle 10g+, TOAD 9.6+
Working knowledge of Telecom domain and Fiber Planning
Will be responsible for high level database administration and related tasks on multiple DMBS platforms with emphasis on Oracle.
Should have the ability to create a logical model and transform logical design into efficient physical database elements, performing data table design, applying normalization and de-normalization principles as needed.
Ability to write Database procedures, functions, triggers and objects to assist developers with the implementation of new projects or for changes in existing projects for an enterprise application.
Should be able to assist developers in troubleshooting and resolving database related issues that are outside the domain of application programming.
Should have the ability to create and maintain application database related jobs and UNIX shell scripts to go with them to run a certain business function periodically.
","['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'db', 'oracl']","['data', 'normal', 'busi']",1.0,"['unix', 'linux', 'sql', 'db', 'oracl', 'data', 'normal', 'busi']"
BA,"A Fortune 500 client is looking for a Junior Business Analyst who could get started at the earliest and this could be just you fitting the role.
Responsibilities:
Engages with stakeholders to respond to requests for new applications and/or enhancements.
Participates in reviews of plans associated with project execution.
Exceptional analytical, problem-solving, and conceptual skills.
Desired Qualifications:
Master’s Degree related to Information Technology
Academic projects experience
Strong experience in Microsoft Excel, MS Visio, Tableau, SQL
Exceptional interpersonal, communication and presentation skills
Strong analytical skills
Strong problem solving and decision-making skills
Basic knowledge in generating process documentation
Strong attention to details
Ability to work both independently and as a member of the team
Powered by JazzHR
0tbyUzLtA7
","['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",2.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Position: Senior Business Analyst (SFDC) – Full Time – 7-10 years
Key Responsibilities:
Provide answers to (technical) questions in a Request for Information(RFI) or a Request for Proposal(RFP)
Identify gaps in business requirements, analyze functional specifications, map with technical deliverables, develop a questionnaire to elicit clarity & quality in requirements
Produce techno-functional proposals – conceptual and detailed and have a strong sense of business acumen
Assist customer, prospect and Sales Representative to build a compelling and competitive business case and ROI
Develop and authorize technical business solutions, product presentations, and demonstrations
Support sales opportunities with technical analysis and requirement scoping
Prepare estimations – effort and cost estimations to augment sales proposals
Support at external and internal customer facing events – as a technical representative to support business calls
Build custom demonstrations and deliver Proof of Concepts(POC)
Provide first-line technical support for software evaluations – third-party solutions or tools, systems integration solutions, and/or pilot projects
Actively participate in internal business/sales team meetings and provide consultative support
Build a technical relationship with delivery teams, prospects or existing customers to support overall prospect/customer engagement
Assist with the qualification of the opportunities and/or identification of target accounts
Assist with the creation of a sales cycle plan
Manage hand-over to the Services Functions (Post-Sales Support and Professional Services) for live project implementation
Education and Required Experience:
Graduate in Science or Engineering with overall 5 to 10 Yrs.
experience in Pre-Sales of Software Solutions or Products.
At least 3+ years of strong experience in providing pre-sales support in Salesforce CRM platform
In-depth knowledge of Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Marketing Cloud, Communities, Chatter, Salesforce1, and other Salesforce ecosystem
Minimum 3+ years of development experience in any technology – understand and reproduce technical designs, architecture diagrams, solution landscapes, requirement mapping
Affinity to both technology and business with fluency in English communication (written/verbal) is essential
Strong ability to discuss and demonstrate business benefits and value to a customer of a technical solution.
Must be able to translate technical and business requirements into cost-efficient solutions
Excellent presentation and demonstration skills
Strong understanding and knowledge about Cloud Computing, Cloud-based solutions, and tools
Good working knowledge of databases technologies – MS SQL Server, Oracle, My SQL, etc.
Good working knowledge of web & mobile technologies – HTML, XML, Salesforce1
Good understanding and knowledge of enterprise applications & technologies – ERP, CRM, ECM, EAI, Social Media, Document Management Systems, Cloud Storage Systems, Web Commerce Systems, Portals, Knowledge Systems, Collaboration systems
Exposure and understanding of any of the systems – SAP, Siebel, PeopleSoft, Magento, Oracle ERP
Other Desirable Skills
Strong skills in data management including data capture, warehousing, segmentation, mining, storing, cleaning and security
Having a Sales Cloud/Service Cloud Consultant certification is an added advantage
Deep understanding and knowledge in web-based systems architecture, SOA, enterprise application architecture
Deep understanding of B2B Integration, EDI integrations, third-party integration of Salesforce with AppExchange Apps, API based integration, Service Oriented Architecture, Single Sign-On, SOAP, REST Protocols, Web Services, Security implementation, etc.
Project Management Knowledge – Agile (Scrum) project methodologies apart from the Waterfall model
Deep understanding of B2B Integration, EDI integrations, third-party integration of Salesforce with AppExchange Apps, API based integration, Service Oriented Architecture, Single Sign-On, SOAP, REST Protocols, Web Services, Security implementation, etc.
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud']","['data', 'account', 'clean', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']",2.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'erp', 'oracl', 'cloud', 'data', 'account', 'clean', 'busi', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"POSITION: Oracle Lead Business Analyst/Developer
226 Days
Pay Grade 209
Salary Range: Min.
$91,251 Mid.
$107,355 Max.
$123,458
Job Req#: 18941
DATE AVAILABLE: Immediately
QUALIFICATIONS:
Required
· Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Business Administration, Information Systems, or other directly related field
· Minimum 5 years’ experience with Oracle ERP
· Minimum 2 years’ experience as an Oracle Analyst or equivalent Business or Systems Analyst
Preferred
· Experience with a Public Sector school system
· 5+ years’ experience with Oracle HCM Suite focusing on Payroll and Advanced Benefits
· SQL, PL/SQL, Fast Formula, and Oracle Workflow knowledge
· Knowledge of Teacher Retirement System (TRS) reporting requirements
· Oracle E-Business Suite (EBS) R12 Human Capital Management (HCM) Certification or similar certifications
Special Knowledge & Skills
· Experience with and strong knowledge of Oracle EBS Release 12
· SQL, PL/SQL knowledge
· Hands-on experience with Oracle tools such as Oracle Forms/Reports, BI Publisher, and
· Excellent written and verbal communication skills
· Excellent interpersonal and customer care focus
· Excellent time management skills, able to plan/organize/complete work across multiple concurrent projects with various timeline constraints
· Demonstrated ability to facilitate systems reviews, conduct business process analysis, conduct functional gap analysis, and perform data analysis
· Demonstrated self-direction skills and strong business relationship skills
· Excellent analytical and problem solving abilities with attention to detail
· Ability to make clear decisions in times of crisis
· Ability to work in a team environment
Major Duties and Responsibilities
· Assume role of functional analyst in the implementation, configuration, and support of Oracle eBusiness Suite R12 HCM modules with a focus on Payroll and Advanced Benefits
· Defining functional requirements, conducting detailed analysis, and acting as a liaison between the business project stakeholders and the development team
· Act as a liaison to the HR, Payroll and Benefits organizations to define solutions, elicit requirements and craft functional designs
· Develops business needs analysis to provide justification for changes
· Writes business requirements, use cases and functional requirements for new applications or modifications to existing applications
· Analyze program changes and participate in testing and troubleshooting
· Implement functional/configuration changes associated with all change/enhancement requests
· Works with Oracle support to resolve technical and application related issues
· Provide post-production support for all deployed modules in responsible area
· Assist with the development of reporting requirements
· Supports with the development of training materials and assists when necessary
· Other duties as assigned
FOR INFORMATION: Jason Genovese – Director, Oracle Technology Group
APPLICATION: GISD Administrative Application – must be online at
Attach the following to the online application:
ü Cover Letter
ü Detailed resume with references that include current supervisor
ü Complete transcripts of undergraduate and graduate as applicable
ü Copy of applicable certifications
Dr. Gradyne Brown – Assistant Superintendent – Human Resources
DEADLINE: Until Filled
INTERVIEWS: Conducted as needed
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Oracle: 5 years (Preferred)
www.garlandisd.net
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'erp', 'oracl']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'erp', 'oracl', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Sr. PS Business Analyst will be responsible for tracking, analyzing and auditing operational critical metrics for the global PS organization.
This individual will partner with senior PS leadership and various operational functions to drive near real-time availability of repeatable business metrics within dashboards and/or reports, establish operational targets and ranges, and drive implement engagement/analysis with delivery teams via a recurring cadence.
This pivotal role will ultimately be responsible for enabling data that drives timely, effective and predictive management of day-to-day PS business processes and strategic improvement initiatives.
Responsibilities:
Establish, drive and document clearly defined, global PS performance metrics and targets for Key Performance Indicators
Provide PS delivery and leadership teams with a “single pane of glass” view into to business performance/health
Work cross-functionally with others to identify and drive remediation of data and metric issues and anomalies relating to PS performance metrics
Partner with Data Analytics teams and BizApps teams to identify PS metrics within the greater customer journey that aid and correlate to long-term customer success
Build and run review cadence with PS leadership teams to identify trends and opportunities
Assist CS Operational Teams with compiling/interpreting data to be leveraged for periodic business reviews with Executive Leadership Teams
Participate in CS/PS special projects, on request
Desired Skills and Experience:
Good interpersonal and influencing skills as well as verbal and written communication skills
Self-starter, comfortable working on multiple initiatives in parallel, in a prioritized fashion
Comfortable confidently presenting and answering questions about PS metrics for an executive audience
Ability to maintain productive and effective working relationships with business partners, while working through complicated topics and issues
Working knowledge of data types and reporting within business systems: SFDC, Financial Force PSA, Apttus contract management, NetSuite or SAP
Skilled in taking sophisticated, multi-variable scenarios and providing appropriately simplified explanations
Critical and creative thinking skills, and strong organizational and time management skills
Bachelors or Master’s degree preferred
",[None],"['correl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['correl', 'dashboard', 'data', 'predict', 'anomali', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
9wbr63aIiB
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst, Advisory Services -
Performance Improvement (Finance Transformation) (Manager) (Multiple Positions),
Ernst & Young U.S. LLP, Dallas, TX.
Provide business advisory services to help clients improve business performance and operate efficiently.
Advise clients on improving and transforming financial processes and reporting systems.
Analyze data, document findings and prepare recommendations for the implementation of new financial systems, procedures, and organizational changes.
Design outsourcing, off-shoring, and shared-service arrangements.
Design and implement financial systems, and work with enterprise cost management systems.
Assist clients with planning, budgeting, forecasting, performance measuring, and reporting services.
Help clients reduce costs through consolidating finance functions across business units.
Consistently deliver quality client services by monitoring progress.
Demonstrate in-depth technical capabilities and professional knowledge.
Full time employment, Monday – Friday, 40 hours per week, 8:30 am – 5:30 pm.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Operations, Finance, Accounting, Statistics, Economics, Management Information Systems (MIS) or a related field and 5 years of progressive, post-baccalaureate work experience in professional services/industry.
Alternatively, will accept a Master's degree in Business, Operations, Finance, Accounting, Statistics, Economics, Management Information Systems (MIS) or related field and 4 years of work experience in professional services/industry.
Must have 3 years of experience in providing advisory/consulting/industry services related to finance function processes and other operational areas that impact the finance function, including a combination of at least five (5) of the following: Enterprise Resource Planning (ERP) or Finance Systems Transformation, Business Performance Management, Shared Services/Outsourcing, Financial Planning & Analysis (FP&A), Budgeting and Planning, Scheduling, Forecasting, Order to Cash, Procure to Pay, Ad Hoc Reporting, Consolidation, or the Close to Report process.
Must have 2 years of experience in two (2) of the following:
• Program management for large scale business transformation projects and programs;
• Developing new business with existing clients at the C' level of Fortune 500 companies;
• Leading a team of consulting professionals on multiple projects.
Requires travel up to 80%, of which 20% may be international to serve client needs.
Employer will accept any suitable combination of education, training or experience.
This particular position at Ernst & Young in the United States requires the qualified candidate to be a ""United States worker"" as defined by the U.S. Department of Labor regulations at 20 CFR 656.3.
You can review this definition at https://www.gpo.gov/fdsys/pkg/CFR-2011-title20-vol3/pdf/CFR-2011-title20-vol3-sec656-3.pdf at the bottom of page 750.
","['erp', 'c']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']",1.0,"['erp', 'c', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend']"
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Masterâs Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams
Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional organizational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst V
Position Type: Contract
Job Summary:
The Technical Business Analyst will analyze and translate the business needs and assess the feasibility for enhancements to existing applications or building new applications.
In this role, you are responsible for elicit and documenting the business and functional requirements, generating process/data flow diagrams, and creating user guides.
You will also be analyzing the impact of the proposed solutions across the business, develop use cases to explain/demonstrate the business requirements/specifications to the IT team, and contribute a business or process perspective during design reviews.
You are also responsible for partnering with the test team to develop system integration test scripts and ensure the testing results correspond to the expectations of the business.
Required Skills:
-Previous experience in Application Development or hands-on testing is desired, but not required
-Experience working in Agile or Waterfall methodology and a deep understanding of various phases of the Software Development Life Cycle
-Ability to communicate clearly and effectively with both technology/development and business partners - ability to translate between these two constituencies
-Information Security, Auditing, or Control Function background is nice to have, but is not required
-Solid grasp of how technology interacts with other technology
-Heavy data analytics background is often very helpful (e.g.
SQL queries, manipulation of data within Excel)
-Working experience in various technology environments/languages/platforms, such as Java, .NET, Python, R, or Hadoop, to name a few
-Possesses strong hands-on technical skills
-Highly organized self-starter who can deliver results with minimal direction
-Creative and proactive problem solver - ability to quickly grasp what the team needs and offer suggestions above and beyond what they are asking for
-Naturally curious individual with the ability to adapt and become an authority in the various data and systems used by the team
-Strong relationship, team building, and facilitation skills
-Proficient with Microsoft Office (Word, PowerPoint, Excel) and Visio
Specific Skillsets:
-Prior Customer Experience resolving product questions
-Proven experience learning a new application with great presentation skills
Top 3 Job Qualifications:
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Great analytical and problem-solving abilities with a strong attention to detail
-Experience with Excel, SQL, and SharePoint
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerpoint', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'java', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Overview
Provide support to a manager or group of managers by conducting sales evaluations, designing sales systems and procedures, conducting work simplification and measurement studies and preparing sales procedure manuals to assist management in operating more efficiently and effectively.
Responsibilities
Maintains databases and prepares weekly/monthly reports.
• Provides analysis of market execution and program ROI.
• Forecast and track marketing and sales trends, analyzing collected data.
• Prepare reports of findings, illustrating data graphically and translating complex findings into written text.
• Devise and evaluate methods and procedures for collecting data or arrange to obtain existing data.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university preferred; one to two years related experience, preferably previous marketing and analyzing data with an alcoholic beverage wholesaler or supplier and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
",[None],"['data', 'forecast']",1.0,"['data', 'forecast']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
Helps implement customer-centric solutions (web, mobile and call center applications) in a cost-effective way by learning and comprehending business process, eliciting and documenting requirements, and communicating clearly to business and technology.
This role requires a level of energy and assertiveness to drive work with multiple groups in a complex, busy environment.
The successful candidate will possess experience with full life-cycle application development along with exposure to evaluating, coordinating and creating deliverables; meeting with customers and resolving issues.
Responsibilities:
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Skills Required:
Ability to work independently as well as collaborate with others.
Strong project and time management skills.
Ability to analyze current systems/requirements and develop strategies for systems development.
Can assist in defining projects, effort and staff requirements.
Experience using Axure Pro/ MS Visio/ Pencil to prepare Wireframes.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Basic Requirement:
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
bJElUJ9cb0
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Overview
A healing focus
A selfless heart
A tireless resolve
Responsibilities
The Business Analyst II responsible for delivering quality customer service and performing daily task management and support.
The areas of responsibilities include completion of assigned tasks to integrate acquisitions, implement application software, and maintain existing applications.
In addition, they maintain existing documentation for system processes and procedures.
This position must coordinate and communicate with other IS resources who are assigned to support application issues and project tasks.
They also work with vendors on application issues and act a liaison between users and vendors to develop requests for additional reports and/or features.
This position primarily works independently and routinely interacts with more senior business contacts.
Often, the Business Analyst II will be assigned to larger and more complex projects and are subject matter experts for their assigned systems.
The Business Analyst II reports to the Lead/Manager.
THE DETAILS
Ensure customer satisfaction by responding in a timely manner to all issues reported to the Help Desk.
This support includes, but is not limited to, computer or peripheral hardware and software, network connectivity issues, as well as any systems in use.
Ensure that all issues are logged promptly and accurately with detailed up-to-date information.
Ensure timely escalation of customer problems by documenting the impact to the customer by assigning an appropriate priority and resolution target.
Initiate escalation, as appropriate, to ensure management awareness of problems that are severe in nature or that are exceeding documented targets.
Review outstanding issues on a daily basis to assure that troubleshooting and resolutions are current
Recognize potential areas where policies and procedures require change, or where new ones need to be developed, especially regarding future business expansion.
Submit recommendations as appropriate.
Participate in relevant information-sharing activities
Monitor and report on any security violations related to the unwarranted access to corporate data
Ensure that all problems are resolved in a timely and efficient manner
Help build team spirit by assisting other staff members and promoting a positive workplace
Maintain awareness of the rapidly changing environment and recommend cost efficient techniques
Recognize potential areas where policies and procedures require change, or where new ones need to be developed, especially regarding future business expansion.
Submit recommendations as appropriate
Create, maintain and update disaster recovery procedures when changes in hardware or applications occur
Ensure all changes comply with change management policies and procedures
Complete any activities, tasks, and projects assigned
Responsible for reporting to and completing work at assigned times
Testing of upgrades and fixes within defined deadlines
Available to provide on call support, as required
Document business processes
Develop status reports
Follow project methodology
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
Qualifications
EDUCATION/CREDENTIALS
BS or BA degree in Computer Science or in a related field from an accredited college or university or equivalent experience or education
In lieu of an undergraduate degree, the ratio is 1:1 meaning one year of college is equal to one year of directly related experience and vice versa
JOB-RELATED EXPERIENCE
Customarily has at least two or more years of project experience
Customarily has at least two or more years of healthcare experience
Customarily has at least five or more years of IS experience
JOB-RELATED SKILLS/COMPETENCIES
Ability to make decisions or solve problems by using logic to identify key facts, explore alternatives, and propose quality solutions
Outstanding customer service skills as well as the ability to deal with people in a manner which shows tact and professionalism
Strong ability to work in a team environment, as well as independently when required
Experienced with working in fast-paced and dynamic environment
Must be able to think independently to prioritize work activities
Demonstrate strategic thinking abilities
Requires superior teamwork skills
Strong interpersonal and communication skills a must; ability to read, write, and speak in a professional manner
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills are essential
Must possess a personal sense of urgency
Ability to effectively multi-task and adapt to changing business priorities
Superior customer service skills.
Excellent time management and organizational skills are required.
Excellent attention to detail
Large scale multi-site IS operations experience
PC Hardware and peripheral experience
Knowledge of Microsoft productivity applications
Knowledge of browser-based technology
Understanding of operating systems such as Windows and OS X/iOS
Prevents recurrence of issues by identifying trends and implementing fix
Document business processes
Develop status reports
Follow project methodology
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Immediate need for a talented Business Analyst (Mortgage) with experience in the Mortgage Industry.
This is a 03+ Months contract opportunity with long-term potential and is located in Irving-TX.
Key Responsibilities and Technology Experience:
Graduation from a 4-year college or university with major course work in a discipline related to the requirements of the position is preferred.
Will consider the equivalent combination of job experience & education that demonstrates the ability to perform the essential functions of this job.
Minimum of 3 years of Business Analysis experience.
Minimum of 2 years of experience with, and comprehensive understanding of, Mortgage Servicing processes and associated Mortgage Lines of Business.
Understanding of Mortgage Servicing systems and terminology a must - experience with LSAMS, Fortracs, IVR, LPS Desktop, Equator, Lewtan preferred.
Working knowledge of MS SQL and SQL Reporting Services.
Proficient in MS/SQL data analysis and programming interpretation.
Experience with gathering requirements for reports associated with Investor and Loan Portfolio reporting.
Excellent planning and task-tracking skills.
Proficient in using Microsoft Office Suite, including MS Project and Visio.
#Dal3
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"SUMMARY
The Pharmacy Technician – Business Analyst supports activities in the areas of drug safety, patient care and decision support toward creation and maintenance of the Indian Health Service (IHS), Health Information Technology Systems and Support (HITSS) Systems.
This position works with Healthcare Professionals to review prescribed drugs.
This position also works with RPMS staff to cleanup drug files to ensure compliance.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Essential duties and responsibilities include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Works and communicates with software engineers, clinical specialists and product analysts in the cleanup of drug files that are processed into RPMS.
Collaborates with other health care, business and information technology professionals to analyze, design, implement and evaluate information and communication systems that enhance individual and population health outcomes and improve patient care.
Uses their knowledge of drugs and patient care combined with their understanding of informatics concepts, methods and tools to assess information and knowledge needs of healthcare professionals and patients and develop, implement and refine clinical decision support systems and quality improvement systems.
Verifies patient paperwork related to patient prescriptions for compliance.
Works closely with decision support experts and engineers to develop clinical decision support methods.
Reviews updates to standardized terminologies and updates terminology content where needed.
Maintains customer satisfaction through a combination of meeting performance objectives, frequent communications and developing the relationship so that collaboration and consultative solutions-oriented approaches are possible.
Proactively manages changes in project scope, identifies potential crises and assists with devising contingency plans.
Develops and delivers progress reports such as project metrics and project status.
Responsible for keeping own immediate work area in a neat and orderly condition to ensure safety of self and coworkers.
Will report any unsafe conditions and/or practices to the appropriate supervisor and human resources.
Will immediately correct any unsafe conditions to the best of own ability.
EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIRED
Bachelor's degree in a related field and a minimum of five (5) years’ relevant experience, or equivalent combination of education / experience.
Experience working at a Pharmacy is required.
Experience working in a Federal Government environment is preferred.
Previous experience working with the Department of Health and Human Services especially with Food and Drug Administration is preferred.
CERTIFICATES / LICENSES / REGISTRATION
Possesses or has the ability to obtain a Public Trust Clearance
JOB SPECIFIC KNOWLEDGE / SKILLS / ABILITIES
Strong knowledge in reviewing and interacting with an electronic medical record
Knowledge of pharmacy rules and regulations, practices are desired
Pharmacy Technician Certification is preferred
Excellent communication skills
Attention to detail and precision, with a high value on quality
Excellent customer service skills
Excellent communication skills (verbal, written and presentation)
Skilled proficiency in the use of Microsoft Windows and Office programs (i.e., Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint, etc.)
Detail-oriented with ability to manage multiple projects and priorities
Solid organizational skills relevant to carrying out day-to-day responsibilities
Ability to work effectively, both independently and in a team environment
LANGUAGE SKILLS
Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations.
Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals.
Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.
MATHEMATICAL SKILLS
Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference and volume.
REASONING ABILITY
Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists.
Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Work is primarily performed in an office environment.
Regularly required to sit.
Regularly required use hands to finger, handle, or feel, reach with hands and arms to handle objects and operate tools, computer, and/or controls.
Required to speak and hear.
Occasionally required to stand, walk and stoop, kneel, crouch, or crawl.
Must frequently lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.
Exposed to general office noise with computers printers and light traffic.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst with Model Risk Management
Fulltime
Total Experience: 10-15 years of Good experience in handling (model) risk management requirements & analysis.
Good knowledge of regulatory requirements regarding model risk management and (risk) modeling.
Excellent presentation skills ( Creation of presentations, wireframes, etc) and presenting to business Strong experience in creating requirements docs like BRD, FRD, etc.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Able to work independently.
Good communication skills to a wide range of stakeholders.
Proactive attitude.
Able to manage deadlines while delivering high-quality work full business proficiency in English Certifications like FRM, CBAP, CSPO, PSPO, PMP are added advantage
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"* Schedule and lead requirements gathering sessions with stakeholders.
This will involve facilitation of timely meetings with various individuals at all levels of the organization.
* Prepare detailed business requirements which enable IT staff to expedite technical requirements resulting in faster development and deployment of solutions.
* Conduct requirements walk-through with stakeholders to ensure complete understanding/agreement and obtain sign-off.
* Document/Flowchart existing processes and new/enhanced processes to help stakeholders fully understand a project and its impact on business.
* Participate in user acceptance testing, test case planning and walk through to assist stakeholders as needed.
* Partner with IT in working through issues/defects/changes & ultimate resolution.
* Function as liaison between business stakeholders and the IT technical team.
* Collaborate with technical team to share business knowledge to assist in solution generation.
* Track project timelines and report deviations to management in a timely manner.
* Meet all defined target goals and milestone dates for assigned project(s) in order to ensure overall success.
* Work through any issues that arise during requirements gathering or testing phases with the business stakeholders in a proactive manner.
* Maintain a business centric results - oriented mindset at all times.Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:* 2 years' experience and prior knowledge in creating business requirement documentation preferred; and seek to gain higher level knowledge and skills* Builds knowledge of the organization, systems, processes and clients* Solves a range of straightforward problems* Analyzes possible solutions using standard procedures* Familiarity with project management discplines* Receives a moderate level of guidance and directionEducation/Experience:* College degree required.
* Ability to manage and complete multiple, concurrent tasks with multiple user interfaces.
* Strong problem-solving and analytical skills.
* Assertive, flexible, pro-active, team player with a strong sense of ownership.
* Ability to manage ambiguity in business needs and requirements.
* Excellent interpersonal and communications skills, both written and verbal.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Expertise/ Skills :
Working exp.
in development of Communities & LEX (aura and/or lwc) is MUST.
Strong on fundamentals of Salesforce including security/ privacy.
Ability to work with client – in direct communication.
Articulation/ comprehension skill is MUST.
Ability to understand requirements & be able to translate them into solution design/ poc/ pov.
Development expected 25% and remaining 75% of the time should be sol.
design, reviews, client interactions etc.
Be able to perform code review/ quality checks.
Ability to work/ partner with Offshore (IND) team/ counterparts.
Decent oral/ written comm.
skills.
Flexible attitude.
",['salesforc'],['commun'],999.0,"['salesforc', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst must understand business problems and opportunities in the context of the requirements and plays the lead role in providing direction, oversight, and coordination to high-level requirements management.
Works towards measuring effectiveness and impact of change to the business.The Business Analyst works on project documentation of requirements to ensure the development and quality assurance teams can execute effectively and without blockages surrounding the requirements.
Maintain relationship with Business Stakeholders and keep them up-to-date on current state of implementation* Responsible for ensuring change control and change management procedures are followed within the project team as they relate to requirements* Perform critical analysis of client business situations to develop recommendations and conclusions* Ability to change direction seamlessly and influence others to work through ambiguity with minimal impact on project results* Work with the project team to determine appropriate test plans, deployment plans and supports the product launch* Communicate with testing team and work close to make sure requirements are met and verified internally before functionality released to customers* Participate in the Quality Inspection process for all requirementsQualifications* Bachelor's Degree or 8+ years experience driving business objectives* 8+ years of Business Analyst experience delivering software implementations and/or software development projects working in all phases of the Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC)* 2+ years of client management experience with the ability to build relationships as a trusted advisor with good judgment and a willingness to be honest and candid in tough situations* Critical analysis and problem-solving skills with a focus on detail and quality* Action-oriented and a team player with the ability to work efficiently in a fast-paced, dynamic, matrix management organization* Experience delivering business analysis and functional and technical project artifacts including Use Cases, User Stories, Requirements Definitions, Process Definitions, etc.
In addition, all colleagues are eligible for a number of rewards and recognition programs including billable bonus opportunities.
Management retains the discretion to add or change the duties of the position at any time.IMPORTANT INFORMATION: Applicants should ensure that their e-mail settings will receive e-mail from the iCIMS system otherwise, you could miss critical communications related to your application.#LI-RW01
",[None],"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Hi,
Or you can reach me atÂ732-609-8354 or mukesh@itamerica.com
Job: SAP MM WM Business Analyst
Duration: 12+ Months
Â Works with the user community to identify their requirements, design enhancements and functionality to help meet user requirements
Â Serves as functional integration owner for area of expertise and performs configuration work as needed to support new and existing functionality
Â Prepares functionality specifications and delivers to developers
Â Collaborates with developers and the quality assurance team to develop and test significant new functionality
Â Performs integration testing work as necessary, to ensure that new functionality does not adversely affect existing functionality
Â Follows all design work and integration testing protocols, change control procedure, use standards, procedures and practices in performing required work, including documenting business process / procedures and updating as necessary per project
Â Analyst will work in a matrixed environment including with other technical service areas (EDI, EAI, XI, BI/BW, NW, etc.)
and with external contractors and vendors
Â Needs very strong functional experience in SAP materials management module and good understanding of integration of MM with other SAP modules.
Â Strong analytical skills and ability to understand existing business processes.
Â Proven problem-solving skills â ability to assess a specific business scenario and develop an appropriate technical approach to support the desired business outcomes
Â Ability to solve complex technical problems
Â Ability to design technical solution that operates efficiently in high data volume scenarios.
Â Ability to work in a team environment
Â Superior collaboration and communication skills â ability to develop productive relationships with cross-functional stakeholders; lead without formal authority; guide developers to appropriate outcomes
Â 4+ yearsâ experience working with MM in an SAP environment
Â 4+ yearsâ experience in SAP MM configuration
Â 2 yearsâ experience in WM or EWM
Â 2+ yearsâ experience in a distribution environment
Â Configuration experience in multiple SAP modules is desirable.
Â Team lead / project management experience is a plus.
Â Experience in requirements gathering, which requires strong communication skills.
Â Experience in multiple full cycles of SAP enhancement and/or implementation from design thru go-live.
Â Comfortable with complex interface environment
Â
Â
Â
mukesh@itamerica.com
351
www.itamerica.com
This email has been sent by or on behalf of an attorney.
All information provided is without any guarantees to its accuracy.
The information contained in this message is confidential and is intended only for the use of the individual or entity named above and is considered attorney-client privileged.
If the reader of this message is not the intended recipient, you are hereby notified that any dissemination, distribution or copying of this communication is strictly prohibited.
",['bi'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration Work Experience 1-3 years City Richardson State/Province Texas Zip/Postal Code 75082
Kelly Services is seeking a Senior Business Analyst for a well-known health insurer in Richardson, TX.
https://innovasourcing.com/4rxr
View similar jobs
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"State:
Texas
City:
Coppell
Interest:
Operations Support-13009
POSITION SUMMARY
The Senior Business Analyst fulfills analyst activities specific to their department that are found in a traditional software development and process engineering organization.
This role is responsible for leading discrete projects that are focused on creating efficiency within the organization through process improvement or enhancing technology systems.
RESPONSIBILITIES
Work with the departmental managers to understand the current processes and systems.
Conduct time-in-motion studies and facilitate focus group sessions to identify areas within the process or system that require improvement.
Recommend process changes/system modifications to streamline and automate a business process.
Define high-level goals and road map associated with their project.
Identify and analyze the risks associated with achieving the milestones for a project.
Develop risk mitigation strategies.
Work with Deployment Manager to organize and execute pre-deployment user acceptance testing that is specific to the project.
Assist the corporate training group in the creation of training documentation and programs that are focused on building consistency and proficiency within a process.
Facilitate/present the initial training sessions for a particular process.
Ensure the management and training for a particular process is effectively transitioned back to the business after the completion of a project.
Communicate status of the project to senior management.
Serve as the single point of contact for project related issues that need to be escalated to senior management for resolution.
Data validation and report development
REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor's degree or equivalent.
Over 5 years of experience in Mortgage industry.
Proficiency in defining business problems and proposing solutions.
Product, Process and Industry Knowledge.
Expert skills in Microsoft Excel, including the ability to utilize the following functions: V-Lookup, H-Lookup, Concatenating formulas, Conditional formatting, and Pivot Tables
Bachelor's degree in Business, Economics or related field a plus
Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.
Must be proactive and solutions oriented business professional with the ability to interface with all levels of management across business units and functions.
Collaborating Contagiously
Caring Fiercely
Doing the Right Thing
Leading Thoughtfully
Alternate Locations:
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'econom', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"CORE VALUES:
POSITION SUMMARY:
The Business Analyst - Acquisitions is responsible for assessing prior servicer data to ensure that loans in the mortgage servicing portfolios are boarded according to the prior servicer data.
This position includes a strong emphasis on special loans, ARMs and Mods.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Define and document preliminary data logic checks and prepare report of findings to support data mapping and review plan.
Participate in data conversion sessions with prior servicers
Perform data mapping for special products including: ARM plans, HELOC plans, Interest Calculation Options etc.
Perform root cause analysis for boarding exceptions
Maintain a log of boarding issues encountered with each servicer to be utilized for future reference.
All other duties as assigned
ESSENTIAL KNOWLEDGE & SKILLS:
In-depth knowledge of Black Knight’s Mortgage Servicing Package (MSP)
Comprehensive understanding of various special products, including ARMs, Bi-Weekly, Balloons, Daily Simple Interest, Interest Only, Dual Amortization, Negative Amortization and Payment Option loans.
EDUCATION AND/OR EXPERIENCE:
High School Diploma required
Bachelor degree preferred
Minimum 5 years’ experience working in a residential servicing environment
Minimum 3 years’ experience data mapping/boarding experience
MACHINES, OFFICE EQUIPMENT & SOFTWARE:
Proficient with Microsoft Office applications
Working knowledge of MERS, LPS desktop, and MSP
","['microsoft', 'bi']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'powerbi', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The ideal candidate will be someone with a get-it-done attitude and see problems as opportunities to innovate.
You will have successfully performed full life cycle business analysis on medium to large projects.
You will work closely with the business team and international partners to analyze and identify gaps, document, communicate, validate requirements as well as execute roll-out activities.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
• Lead the analysis and thorough documentation of current and future state business processes that require improvement.
Identify opportunities to innovate.
• Recommend solutions to improve Commerce functionalities, business practices & procedures.
• Distinguish requests from underlying needs.
Evaluate information received, deconstruct high-level information into functional details and translate low-level information into business requirements.
• Capture use cases, user stories and acceptance criteria for the new requests.
Develop UI/UX or other artifacts to facilitate requirement elaborations as needed.
• Participate in sprint planning & grooming session.
Elaborate on requirements and expectations for project team.
• Produce business flowcharts or other visual aids to communicate changes to the business teams.
• Check feasibility by comparing functional needs with the Salesforce Commerce Cloud solution and make recommendations to the Product Owner.
• Configure all aspects of storefronts for the global markets based on their localized requirements.
• Manage multiple initiatives, priorities, tasks and deadlines in a rapidly changing environment.
• Partner with SI partners on implementing the solutions and work with cross-cloud teams throughout the organization in supporting Project One initiatives.
• Assist business team and QA team in designing test cases, validate the features and end-to-end testing.
• Participate in cross-cloud meetings, eCommerce UAT and roll-out activities.
• Assist in developing training materials on the Business Manager tool and eCommerce features for the business users and regional support teams.
SKILL SET REQUIREMENTS:
• 6 8 years of experience as a Business Analyst.
• 3+ years of Salesforce Commerce Cloud experience with strong knowledge in Business Manager.
• Passionate about eCommerce challenges and good understanding of Salesforce ecosystem.
• Go-getter.
Team player who is willing to roll up their sleeves and take on additional responsibilities as business needs evolve.
• Ability to organize, specify and model requirements to ensure they are complete and support global needs.
• Strong analytical & problem-solving skills.
Detailed Oriented.
• Think strategically and creatively in finding business solution that meet the requirements in the best possible way.
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills to convey ideas or concepts to a variety of stakeholders.
Comfortable presenting business and technical terminology to groups of 5 20 individuals.
• Familiar with JIRA, Confluence or similar tracking and management tools.
• Experience in eCommerce enterprise deployment.
• Experience in post deployment support is highly desired.
• Previous BA experience in Agile scrum teams in multi-cultural environment highly desired.
• Experience in SQL, CMS, Google analytics is preferred but not necessary.
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'jira', 'cloud']","['recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'jira', 'cloud', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi', 'visual']"
BA,"Designation
Specialist Business Analyst
04-Jun-2020
SR Number
CFT/CFT/2020/1254596
Country
USA
No.
of Positions
1
Auto req ID
678988BR
Experience
7-12 Years
Skill (Primary)
Technical Skills-SKU-ARCH-Business Analyst
Qualification
Bachelor of Arts
Texas
Job Family
Domain (Domain)
Employee Group
Business Line FT
To ensure the business solution designed is based on the holistic view across all the processes of assigned domain while leveraging the pre-delivered best Practices.
(1.)
Suggest design solutions (2.)
To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements.
(3.)
To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage.
(4.)
To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.)
To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
Entity
CSW
City
Dallas County
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"A healing focus
A selfless heart
A tireless resolve
The Business Analyst II responsible for delivering quality customer service and performing daily task management and support.
The areas of responsibilities include completion of assigned tasks to integrate acquisitions, implement application software, and maintain existing applications.
In addition, they maintain existing documentation for system processes and procedures.
This position must coordinate and communicate with other IS resources who are assigned to support application issues and project tasks.
They also work with vendors on application issues and act a liaison between users and vendors to develop requests for additional reports and/or features.
This position primarily works independently and routinely interacts with more senior business contacts.
Often, the Business Analyst II will be assigned to larger and more complex projects and are subject matter experts for their assigned systems.
The Business Analyst II reports to the Lead/Manager.
THE DETAILS
Ensure customer satisfaction by responding in a timely manner to all issues reported to the Help Desk.
This support includes, but is not limited to, computer or peripheral hardware and software, network connectivity issues, as well as any systems in use.
Ensure that all issues are logged promptly and accurately with detailed up-to-date information.
Ensure timely escalation of customer problems by documenting the impact to the customer by assigning an appropriate priority and resolution target.
Initiate escalation, as appropriate, to ensure management awareness of problems that are severe in nature or that are exceeding documented targets.
Review outstanding issues on a daily basis to assure that troubleshooting and resolutions are current
Recognize potential areas where policies and procedures require change, or where new ones need to be developed, especially regarding future business expansion.
Submit recommendations as appropriate.
Participate in relevant information-sharing activities
Monitor and report on any security violations related to the unwarranted access to corporate data
Ensure that all problems are resolved in a timely and efficient manner
Help build team spirit by assisting other staff members and promoting a positive workplace
Maintain awareness of the rapidly changing environment and recommend cost efficient techniques
Recognize potential areas where policies and procedures require change, or where new ones need to be developed, especially regarding future business expansion.
Submit recommendations as appropriate
Create, maintain and update disaster recovery procedures when changes in hardware or applications occur
Ensure all changes comply with change management policies and procedures
Complete any activities, tasks, and projects assigned
Responsible for reporting to and completing work at assigned times
Testing of upgrades and fixes within defined deadlines
Available to provide on call support, as required
Document business processes
Develop status reports
Follow project methodology
Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.
EDUCATION/CREDENTIALS
BS or BA degree in Computer Science or in a related field from an accredited college or university or equivalent experience or education
In lieu of an undergraduate degree, the ratio is 1:1 meaning one year of college is equal to one year of directly related experience and vice versa
JOB-RELATED EXPERIENCE
Customarily has at least two or more years of project experience
Customarily has at least two or more years of healthcare experience
Customarily has at least five or more years of IS experience
JOB-RELATED SKILLS/COMPETENCIES
Concentra Core Competencies of Service Mentality, Attention to Detail, Sense of Urgency, Initiative and Flexibility
Ability to make decisions or solve problems by using logic to identify key facts, explore alternatives, and propose quality solutions
Outstanding customer service skills as well as the ability to deal with people in a manner which shows tact and professionalism
Strong ability to work in a team environment, as well as independently when required
Experienced with working in fast-paced and dynamic environment
Must be able to think independently to prioritize work activities
Demonstrate strategic thinking abilities
Requires superior teamwork skills
Strong interpersonal and communication skills a must; ability to read, write, and speak in a professional manner
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills are essential
Must possess a personal sense of urgency
Ability to effectively multi-task and adapt to changing business priorities
Superior customer service skills.
Excellent time management and organizational skills are required.
Excellent attention to detail
Large scale multi-site IS operations experience
PC Hardware and peripheral experience
Knowledge of Microsoft productivity applications
Knowledge of browser-based technology
Understanding of operating systems such as Windows and OS X/iOS
Prevents recurrence of issues by identifying trends and implementing fix
Document business processes
Develop status reports
Follow project methodology
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'healthcar', 'data', 'busi', 'recurr', 'commun', 'recommend', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Skills and Experience Required:
Understanding of and expertise with analyzing, assessing and documenting, for both technical and non-technical users, Salesforce internal configurations
Experience testing various Salesforce modules and configurations
Experience configuring and documenting Salesforce processes and workflows
Excellent communication and client interfacing skills, with the ability to discuss and present Salesforce technical concepts in non-technical terms, in writing and verbally, to business users
Salesforce Einsten Analytics experience.
Cisco experience is a plus.
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The team in Silicon Valley focuses on customer facing digital products and venture investments.As a Business Analyst, you are an advocate for data-driven decision making and have the deep technical skills and analytical abilities to turn data into insights.
You thrive in ambiguity and are naturally curious, employing a number of techniques to quantify and deal with uncertainty in order to identify the deep connections between seemingly disparate events.
Join a team of designers, engineers, venture capitalists, and product managers that work together to bring new products into the hands of users.Key Responsibilities* Use analytical techniques to solve complex problems and drive business decisions* Engage in exploratory analyses in breaking down large datasets to provide data-informed insights and opportunities for the team* Design and manage dashboards to analyze and monitor key customer and product metrics* Partner in the creation and tracking of KPI's that monitor project performance* Work cross-functionally with different engineering, product, and leadership teamsQualificationsRequired Qualifications* 3+ years experience in data analytics* Holistic understanding about business-cases & key value drivers for digital products* Passion for data analysis with proven analytical and quantitative ability to use data to back up assumptions and develop business cases* Highly skilled at writing SQL to query relational databases* Strong data visualization skills and the ability to communicate findings to both technical and non-technical stakeholders* Possess a healthy balance between curiosity, intellectual rigor, and the desire to execute* Organized, with excellent planning skills and attention to detail* Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or BusinessPreferred Qualifications* MBA, or Master's degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering* Experience or familiarity with analytics platforms like Google Analytics, Firebase, Mixpanel, etc.
* Experience with A/B and multivariate testing* Experience working for a luxury or premium lifestyle brand* Experience working with an automotive OEM* Strong interpersonal and communication skills to translate complex analyses into actionPorsche Digital is an equal opportunity employer.
All applicants will be considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran or disability status.
","['excel', 'sql', 'firebas']","['data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'multivariate testing', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'firebas', 'data', 'dashboard', 'kpi', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'multivariate testing', 'commun']"
BA,"Mountain View, CA
Job Terms:
Temporary
Salary:
DOE
Start date:
07/01/2020
Posted By:
Scott Toohill
Date:
06/29/2020
Overall Responsibilities:
Work with key stakeholders across marketing, research, and product management teams to conduct research and define product roadmaps as well as consumer facing positioning and messaging across devices and services
Top 3 Daily Responsibilities:
Synthesizing research to inform and develop key positioning, messaging, feature descriptions of key products
Coordinate and communicate with key cross-functional stakeholders, engaging in meeting and creating presentations for stakeholder management and feedback
Mandatory Skill/Experience/Education:
4+ years in marketing (consumer, product marketing, research)
Demonstrated communication skills to conduct stakeholder interaction and presentation
Experience in or related to synthesizing research to inform product positioning and messaging
Desired Skill/Experience/Education:
Data visualization
As different as those cities are, you can expect that the personality of each office is the same.
Commonalities include bringing people together in the physical work space, outlets for creativity (outside work-related exercises), and a setup for brainstorming on the fly, whenever the opportunity strikes.
No egos here!
Here, everyone is considered a project owner, and expected to give 100%, even when the path forward isn’t necessarily clear.
Work here, and find the challenge of your career!
Fitness center access
Discounts on things like dry cleaning and oil changes
Free lunches
Convenient commuter shuttles
",[None],"['data', 'clean', 'research', 'visual', 'commun']",999.0,"['data', 'clean', 'research', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"The Analyst is an integral part of global Charging business operations and is responsible for providing data and insights on business performance and associated processes.The Analyst will focus on building the database and reporting necessary to measure key performance indicators for the Global Charging team.
Developing intuitive and reliable dashboards using tools such as PowerBI or Tableau will be crucial to the Analyst's success.
The Analyst will be tasked with ensuring that the charging team understand the tools designed to help them increase their productivity.
To be successful in this role, the Analyst will need to be experienced in analytics, be effective working on a project basis and be a strong communicator.Responsibilities* Develop database, KPIs, and dashboards to facilitate business processes and increase transparency* Ensure consistency, reliability and quality of all standard reports* Automate business operations models* Build ad hoc reports and analyses based on requests from the business teams* Communicate effectively with managers to identify and address areas for improvement* Provide support on usage of dashboards and toolsRequired Qualifications* 2 to 3 years of experience in Analytics preferred* Minimum of Bachelor's Degree* Strong experience with SQL, PowerBI, Tableau and/or any other visualization tools.
Experience with Python or other programming language is a plus.
* Strong knowledge of Database Management concepts* Able to work independently and in a team, rigorous, detail-oriented, critical thinker and performance-driven* Can do attitude and self-driven individual* Strong written and verbal communication skills
","['tableau', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['tableau', 'powerbi', 'sql', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst I
Project Overview
If you want the opportunity to work on a state-of-the-art high profile program, look no further than the opportunity to frame the future of broadband.
Top 4 Daily Responsibilities:
· Work closely with the Sales and Marketing leads to understand their information needs and develop daily, weekly, monthly, and ad-hoc reports to highlight key performance metrics.
· Develop SQL scripts to structure, analyze, and make recommendations based on large data sets
· Create easy to understand dashboards from complex data sets, which have automated backend processes
· Assist with special projects as needed.
Required (must have)
· BA/BS degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, other similar quantitative field or equivalent practical experience
· Familiarity with sales and marketing functions (including field sales, retail, call centers, digital media)
· 3-4 years of experience writing queries, stored procedures or functions in SQL Advanced Sheets/Excel skills GSuite experience Experience creating data visualizations/dashboards
Desired
· Effective problem-solver with a proven ability to understand stakeholder needs
· Work with ambiguity and quickly deliver analysis that meets the business requirements
· Excellent business partnering and communication skills
· Genuine excitement and passion for developing and analyzing large, complex data sets and converting them into the information / insights that drive business decisions at all levels of the organization
· Capable of working on multiple projects and deadlines simultaneously Experience with Tableau
Jerry Piland
t: 214-396-9457 | e: jpiland@akorbi.com
6504 International Parkway | Suite 1500 | Plano, TX 75093
www.akorbi.com
Enterprise Solutions for the Global Economy
CONFIDENTIALITY NOTICE: This e-mail message, including any attachments, is for the sole use of the intended recipient(s) and may contain confidential and privileged information or otherwise protected by law.
Any unauthorized review, use, disclosure or distribution is prohibited.
If you are not the intended recipient, please contact the sender by reply e-mail and destroy all copies of the original message
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This is a 6 month + contract position.
If you want the opportunity to work on a state-of-the-art high profile program, look no further than the opportunity to frame the future of broadband.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Initial focus of this role will be on Tutoring.
The analyst will leverage data to uncover new insights and improve decision making in the organization.
Strong communication and analytic skills are critical for success in this role.
5 plus years' experience in product/business analysis or background in a quantitative field is preferred.
These offerings lower financial concerns for students by modernizing their learning experience.
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Analytical thinking and problem-solving.
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g.
Hadoop) Understanding of networks, databases and other technology Minimum 2-4 yrs.
experience with a Master's degree in Computer Science or equivalent with valid status.
Eligibility for training Citizens GC CPT OPT EAD If you are interested please reply back with your updated resume.
",['hadoop'],['busi'],2.0,"['hadoop', 'busi']"
BA,"Business AnalystQualification:Bachelors in science , engineering or equivalentResponsibility:Project Proposal and planning :* Provide inputs to the test manager on the effort estimation based on the understanding of the requirement if required.Knowledge Transition:* For small modules/ project.
* Participate in the client meeting to understand the requirement.
* Design KT plan (that includes KT scope, schedule, and deliverables like reverse KT document) and share the same with the customer.
* Provide status to the customer/ stakeholder on the KT session.
* Seek review inputs on reverse KT document from the Test Manager and customers.
* Provide training to the associates as a part of reverse KT.
* Upload customer details, application and testing artifacts.
* Create ROM (rough order magnitude) estimation to understand feasibility of the requirement.
* Support the Test Manager in performing high level impact analysis.Test Requirements Study:* For small modules/ project.
* Coordinate with BA at client side / refer the requirement document to understand the scope of requirements.
* Clarify doubts/ queries raised by offshore team regarding the clients' requirements.
* If required, seek clarification from the client on the same.
* Create ambiguity document (or clarification document) to track any clarification.
* Review testable requirements to ensure the test coverage.
* Identify gaps in the requirements and take actions to close the same.
* If requested, identify and document the test data requirement for the complicated projects.
* Review test data, screen flow documents etc Evaluate and identify various tools to aid test execution based on the understanding of the requirement.
* Identify test data source and tools to extract and validate the data generation.
* Guide team on data masking rule and tools, particular fields.Test Planning:* Create the test strategy (that includes release date, type of testing, scope of the project, detail explanation of particular release, risk, critical defects).
* Seek review inputs from the Test Manager.
* Create test plans (covering scope, risk, responsibility, timelines, resource (Man /Machine), deployment, exit/entry criteria etc).
* Identify the skill sets required and resources for the project.
* Review/Create detailed estimate based on the scope and understanding of requirements.For the small size projects:* Create test data plan and test automation plan capturing the test data, volume/ data type.
* Seek review inputs from the Test Manager on the same.
* Conduct the POC to automate the process based on the requirements identified by the Test Manager.Test Design :* Identify the complex test scenarios based on the understanding of systems, interfaces and application.
* Review the test scenarios identified by the Sr Test Analyst.
* Seek review from the onsite team on the test scenarios.
* Review the test cases and traceability matrix to ensure total coverage of requirements.
* Seek signoff from the client /onsite team on test scenarios and test cases.
* Based on the changes in the requirement, identify regression scenario and the impacted areas on need basis.
* Create a plan to capture the details on activities and tools.
* Provide technical guidance to the team in execution of regression scenario.Test Development:* Oversee the test data required for the testing activity.Only If required:* Identify the test data based on the analysis of the requirements.
* Identify the test data requirements to ensure test coverage and share the same with the Sr Test Analyst.
* Seek approval from the stakeholders on the same.
* Provide technical and process guidance t o the team on the test coverage and test managements.Test Execution/Functional Testing :* Perform sanity testing to ensure system readiness for testing.
* Validate readiness of the test environment for test execution.
* Seek sign off from the client on the same.
* Perform System test Execution.
* Track the downtime and report the same to the client.
* Review the test results and clarify doubts/query raised by team during execution.
* Review the defects logged by team and assign it to the right owner.
* Monitor various builds delivered by the development team.
* Participate in defect triage meetings with onsite team and customer BA on periodic basis for defect prioritization and fix.
* Only for onsite coordinator.
* Support the team in conducting UAT/BUT if applicable.Test Closure :* Create/ Review the test summary report and share the same with the test lead for the review.Defect Prevention/Leakage retrospection:* Provide inputs for the defect prevention and leakage retrospection to the team.Project Closure :* Create lesson learnt document and corrective action and share it with the project team.Production Support QA / Production Validation :* Oversee the compliance to SLA metrics during the production support.
* Coordinate with QA and support team to follow the standard operating procedure.Delivery Management :* Track resource availability based on the criticality of the project.
* Take corrective steps to ensure project health.
* Assess the technical skills of the resources.
* Provide requisite training.
* Seek additional resources from test manager, if needed.
* Participate in a monthly governance meeting (Progress on each application, Utilization Report, Types of defects, Value add provided by the team, Improvements in the form of artifact creation, productivity etc).
* Mentor associates and conduct one on one sessions to coach team members.
* Set goals for team members and monitor performance.
* Conduct performance appraisal for team members.
* Organize team initiatives on a periodic basis.
* Identify resources across the engagements for recognition.
* Address grievances when escalated.
* Identify skill gaps and assign trainings to be deployed to bridge skill gaps.Knowledge Management :* Create KT engagement level documents.
* Review KM documents related to project.
* (on need basis).Stakeholder/ Client management :* Review the daily deliverables and share it with the customers appropriately.
* Create and share weekly status reports with the client and daily status reports with the team.
* Facilitate calls between onsite and offshore teams to discuss the project status.
* Identify resources based on the estimation and required skill set.Solution and Competency Development :* Develop and build common reusable assets and accelerators framework that can be leveraged for newer engagements and across different verticals.Must Have Skills* Business Intelligence Testing* Apache Hadoop* PythonGood To Have Skills* Hive* ANSI SQL
","['hadoop', 'hive', 'sql']","['risk', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['hadoop', 'hive', 'sql', 'risk', 'regress', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"It is supported by leading global investors and pharmaceutical, technology, and healthcare companies.
For more information, please visit www.grail.com
You will also define the scope of technical projects and oversee their execution.
This position will require strong cross-functional skills, ability to translate business requirements into system requirements, strong change management skills and ability to drive business/system requirements and projects to completion.
You will Stay ahead of the new Coupa, Apttus, Salesforce features and functionality, and provide recommendations for improvements.
Work with other stakeholders & key partners to scope work and produce deliverable estimates.
Adapt to changing priorities of the business and seek out ways to develop new skills.
Balance multiple concurrent projects and contending priorities.
You will:
Translate business requirements into technical solutions that best leverage the current tech stack and offer other technical solutions for consideration where necessary
Experience in Designing and developing technical solutions for multiple Salesforce projects.Experience with both Sales and Service Cloud that provides Salesforce Customer Support and Customer Management.
Experience developing solutions for the Apttus Contract Lifecycle Management (CLM) systems including X- Author for Word & development of clause libraries and contract templates.
Serve as the technical leader/product owner and work with business users to map out the technical roadmap for automating complex business processes to achieve operational efficiencies
Advise the business and articulate the benefits and risks to a solution’s feasibility and functionality as a trusted technology partner
Design, configure and develop templates and workflows for contract management using Apttus CLM
build proof-of-concept (POC) and own any new feature implementation and maintenance of the system’s stability & support
Accountable for timely delivery of projects as per established project plans by working closely with the business teams
Participate in end-to-end implementation planning including project management, issue management, communication and change management
Provide hands-on technical expertise for Salesforce, Coupa & Apttus
Assist with data management and governance and also support reporting requirements and leverage Salesforce for data-driven decisions
Work within the framework of the Scrum standards to deliver business needs
Build configurations using recommended best practices while delivering scalable high-quality solutions to integrate Salesforce with downstream systems and Billing systems with financial systems like Coupa and NetSuite
Demonstrate a strong technical aptitude and understand both business and technical language and ideas and develop and maintain the strategic stakeholder roadmaps – short term to 12+ months
Drive adoption of technology and process changes
Methodologies: Waterfall, Agile - Scrum
Business Analysis: Visio, Requirement Analysis, Data Flow Diagrams, Business Process Modeling & Re-engineering, Gap Analysis, Cause & Effect Analysis, UAT, Use Case, Test Scripts.
Tools: & Software: Apttus X Author for Word
Query Tools: Salesforce dataloader
Project Documentation Tools: Smartsheet, Lucid Charts
About you:
4-5 years of hands-on Apttus Contract Management experience
Overall 4+ years of SFDC Administration experience with deep understanding of SFDC Security setting, Sharing rules, Permissions Sets, etc.
Understand Apttus CLM Out of the box components versus Custom components capabilities
Understand Coupa S2P process and administration
SFDC and/or Apttus CLM certification highly desirable
Prior experience supporting technology projects such as CLM, Billing, S2P, ERP, CRM & Contract Management systems etc.
Familiar with and able to drive the Agile development and release methodologies, especially for automation of business processes, improvements/redesigns
Ability to work across teams and influence ideas and execute them among various business groups
Bachelor’s degree preferably in Engineering, Management Information Systems, or equivalent years of industry experience
","['erp', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['erp', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job TITLE: Business Analyst
Term: Full Time
Skill: Required Bachelors or foreign equivalent in CS, CIS, MIS, Engineering, Mathematics (Any), or any related field.
Must be able to travel/relocate to various client sites throughout the U.S.
Experience: -
Job Title: Business Analyst
Job Duties:
• Responsible for data extraction, analyzing supply chain model , designing and executing the test scripts and test scenarios, collecting business requirements and analyzing trends with history data.
The daily activities will include documenting the acquired results of analysis and workflows as well as obtaining sign-off from the appropriate clients, coordinating with the groups of business unit who test, validate, evaluate new applications and functions, and determine issues in services and software.
Managing any change requests related to the working project plans daily to meet the agreed deadlines.
Using mathematical methodology to analyze data trends as well as analyze the supply chain model and collecting business requirements.
Job Requirement: Required Bachelors or foreign equivalent in CS, CIS, MIS, Engineering, Mathematics (Any), or any related field.
Must be able to travel/relocate to various client sites throughout the U.S.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Posted: Mar 27, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200129740
**This position could be located in Cupertino CA or Austin TX**
Key Qualifications
8-10+ years of experience working with data analysis.
Experience with accessing data stored in Hadoop-Hive, Oracle, PostgreSQL, and/or SPARK.
Working knowledge of SQL/HiveQL for accessing data, Tableau for presentation and R / Python for model building.
Data modeling experience in building Logical and Physical data models.
Skills:
Ability to work with large datasets to extract meaningful analysis and information.
Good interpersonal, written, verbal communication with presentation skills.
Attention to detail, data accuracy, and quality of output.
Sharp troubleshooting skills to identify and resolve issues in a timely manner.
Great teammate.
The technical business analyst will work with various teams to deliver data, dashboards, and insightful and performance-optimized analysis to facilitate business decisions.
You'll serve as a key partner of operations and engineering team, serving the needs of the Maps organization to analyze various data sets.
This role provides analytics for pilot programs to support operations in business analysis and decisions.
IIlustrate critical metrics to help guide pilot operations in effective business management.
Identify trends, areas of opportunity for operational performance enhancements and create presentations to convey analysis to influence strategic decisions.
This role will require working with multiple large data sets to parse them as required for analysis, documenting the processes, logic and reasoning for each dataset.
Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis and ongoing deliverables and presentations.
Design meaningful metrics to measure success of maps business processes and devise ways to measure them from various data signals.
Predictive analysis required to forecast timelines for overall project as well as within various process flows and business segments.
Education & Experience
CS, Statistics, Physics, Operations Research, or similar quantitative domain.
","['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl']","['data modeling', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",999.0,"['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'data modeling', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Understanding of and experience with extracting business requirements from direct interviews with users, business process owners, and IT.
Regarding user interviews, candidate must be able to identify and understand workflows, data touch points and interactions with systems such that use cases and user stories can be created that “leave no stone unturned” and are comprehensive, exhaustive and ensure the solution will meet ALL requirements.
Business Analyst candidates should have an eye toward BPI and Innovation while understanding the WHY of current state BPs, workflows, data sources, data uses, and be able to identify ALL “players” (human, software, data source, etc.)
in each BP / workflow.
Their work product should expose data integration points.
Their experience and skill should allow them to quickly identify where the integration challenges and major affected systems lie inside the solution AND at the boundaries.
Regarding IT, the candidate MUST be able to speak (and understand) their language and use their terms correctly.
Successful Bas understand and have experience in BOTH business and technology.
Their career path should be headed toward Solution Architect and recent work experience should exhibit that aspiration.
They should enjoy being mentored by EA / SA roles.
They should understand major HW platforms, SW packages, the role of databases, why SOA adds value and what that value is, the role of “Cloud”, the impact of Mobile, and some appreciation of custom SW vs. package integration.
In all cases, their work products should “stand alone” and be clearly understood by other team members anywhere in the world without rework or excessive explanation.
Desired Skills: Experience with (does NOT have to be expert in) SAP, Salesfoce.com, Configure-Price-Quote (CPQ), ERP functional areas, CRM solutions, data migration, MDM, Informatica
","['erp', 'sa', 'cloud']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['erp', 'sa', 'cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Posted: Mar 15, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200158494
You have industry knowledge of eCommerce ecosystems: product data and content that constitutes product catalog, the tools and systems that business users operate to create, maintain, validate and publish product information!
You are capable of turning high level requests into detailed requirement documentation through your analysis work.
You map out product catalog publishing processes, develop business use cases, write up crystal and clear user stories.
You lead UAT planning and execution across platforms and cross-functional teams
Key Qualifications
8+ years of hands-on experience working in large-scale product information management systems with extensive domain knowledge on product catalog and metadata structure
Excellent business analytical skills to drive business requirement definition that involves eliciting, analyzing, prioritizing, articulating and documenting business requirements
Ability to structure a large amount of information into business process and workflow maps, data analysis, business use cases and user stories
Ability in facilitating workshops and meetings, driving conversations and white boarding during requirement gathering, process reviews with cross functional teams
Strong verbal and written communication skills across functional and world wide audiences with different background
Ability to work effectively in an uncertain environment and bring order to it.
Flexible enough to work through ambiguity and bring clarity in a fast pace environment where change is constant
Ability to build relationships with business and engineering partners, negotiate scopes, manage changes, bridge communication gaps, resolve conflicts and reach agreements across the teams
Project management skills in coordinating multiple projects simultaneously with business partners from requirement definition to UAT and resource planning
Technical background in understanding and working with content authoring tools and systems is a plus
Smart, articulate, organized and self-directed
Process and details oriented
Passionate about information management
This is a hands-on position.
You are willing to roll up your sleeves and get your hands dirty with the complex world of Digital Content Management, and work with Content Specialist to solve their pains.
You will be responsible for outcome and delivery.
You will be representing Digital Content Management community and working with Product Management and Engineering teams throughout the project phases: define solutions that promote quality, scalability and best-in-class practices in the life cycle of product catalog production: demand management, production workflow, delivery processes, quality assurance.
Knowing the Digital Content Specialists, their processes and tools that they use.
You have strong analytical background and ask probing questions to know not only how but also why digital contents are managed in certain ways
Driving requirements that promote quality, scalability, smart production practices, and intuitive UI design
Prioritizing request, negotiating scopes, providing insightful feedback, influencing solutions, negotiating scopes and resolving conflicts throughout project phases
Owning and producing requirement documents that translate business asks into requirement documentation for Product and Engineering team to design and build solutions: business process flows, data mapping analysis, use cases and users stories
Leading user acceptance test from planning for UAT planning, defining test scenarios and test cases to executing UAT
Defining best-in-class systems and processes that will enable the Digital Content Specialists to support the business goals
Communicating effectively to world wide cross-functional teams and senior management regarding scopes, risks/benefits of solution options
Coordinating multiple projects simultaneously with Digital Content Specialists through out project phases, i.e.
from ideation to final business roll out
Managing business team’s adoption of these tools and processes through readiness planning, documentation, training, and support
Education & Experience
Requires BA/BS degree
MS or MBA is considered a plus
Lean/Six Sigma Certification, BPM Certification Or BA Certification a plus
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Hello Job Aspirants!I am seeking an experienced Business Analyst who has experience in ""purchase money mortgage""payment systems.
Someone who has strong experience in Property mortgaging would be ideal.
Experience in Change management, process improvements is good to have..
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"POSITION SUMMARY
Typical Tasks:
"" Provide technical guidance and lead others;
"" Promote and maintain a team environment;
"" Test and validate business analysis findings and recommendations;
"" Utilize a variety of information technology platforms and operating systems;
"" Design business processes;
"" Document business processes and models; Analyze business requirements and identify possible solutions;
"" Communicate effectively both verbally and in writing;
"" Produce reports, documentation, research for the purpose of addressing customer needs;
"" Engage with stakeholders and understand and respond to their needs in rapidly changing environments;
"" Maintain effective customer relationships.
""
Collaborates with other IT staff and/or vendors on business requirements and the implementation of new features;
"" Coordinates and participates in application upgrades and changes;
"" Documents functions and changes to new or modified functionality;
"" Participates in change processes and prioritization; implements approved system enhancements, releases and optimizations;
"" Participates in research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within the organization and if not, whether new solutions are feasible;
"" Provides information and support to Instructional Designers to facilitate end user training;
"" Provides input to the development of formal business cases when new or enhanced business solutions are proposed;
"" Provides updates on fixes to known issues and planned updates and upgrades;
"" Troubleshoots application issues and system error and escalates to Tier 3 or vendor as required;
"" Work with the business to develop detailed user acceptance test cases and flows; including devising test plans, creating test cases, establishing protocols and appropriate testing environments and coordinating testing;
"" Keeps current on new features and functionality to create recommendations for process improvements, best practices and utilization of the systems;
"" Conducts research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within the organization and if not, whether new solutions are feasible;
"" Considers the impact to current and future business environments and processes, assessing upstream & downstream effect of system and reporting changes;
"" Coordinates and participates in the evaluation of new module releases;
"" Interacts with others to identify, prioritize, and recommend alternate solutions and risk mitigation strategies;
"" Leads complex assignments involving software development life cycle, project planning, upgrade, build, optimization, resource allocation and implementation
"" Leads the evaluation of new software and upgrades for complex solutions.
;
"" Performs and/or coordinates complex assignments involving project planning, analysis, testing, monitoring, reporting, optimization and implementation;
Serves as escalation for troubleshooting application issues and system errors, and escalates to vendor as required;
Training and Experience:
Sufficient education, training, and experience to demonstrate the possession and direct application of the following knowledge and abilities.
Possession of a Bachelor's degree from an accredited college in Computer Science, Information Technology, Business, or related field,
AND
Three (3) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported at a level equivalent to the County's IT Business Analyst.
OR
Six (6) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported.
OR
Possession of a Bachelor's degree from an accredited college,
AND
Five (5) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported, three (3) years of which were at a level equivalent to the County's IT Business Analyst
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"APS unites publishers with advertisers across devices and media channels.
The Advanced TV team is responsible for building cloud-based advertising technology services that help broadcasters grow their business.
In this role, you will have the opportunity to join Amazons rapidly growing video advertising business.
The analyses you create will help drive publisher monetization, ad performance and product features.
To be successful in this role, you will need to develop metrics and dashboards for product/business teams, execute data extraction and transformation directly on big data systems.
Youll work with analysts in other teams and develop hard-hitting analyses to solve complex business challenges.
You are an analysis expert and a data evangelist who leverages a variety of platforms and analytical tools to extract critical insights from massive data sets.
Responsibilities will include:
· Analyze data to find actionable insights that lead to great business decisions and new product opportunities
· Collaborate with key stakeholders to translate business questions into verifiable hypotheses using complex, multi-source data
· Build dashboards and custom reports to track key metrics, empower other team members with data, and investigate business questions
· Execute deep-dive analyses addressing key business issues and present findings to stakeholders
· Demonstrate great judgment in quickly forming actionable, data-driven conclusions in the face of uncertainty
· Proactively make recommendations for new tests and initiatives to improve key metrics and customer outcomes
· Enable effective decision making by retrieving and aggregating data from multiple sources and compiling it into a digestible and actionable format
· Play an active role in strategic & operational planning discussions
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelor's Degree
· Experience defining requirements and using data and metrics to draw business insights
· 3+ years relevant experience in financial/business analysis
· Experience making business recommendations and influencing stakeholders
· Experience with Microsoft Excel
· Experience in SQL
Preferred Qualifications
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Engineering, Business, or related discipline
· Experience working directly in the advertising or ad tech space
· Advanced knowledge of Excel & SQL
· 2+ years of experience analyzing large datasets to solve business problems and presenting results
· Experience extracting, cleansing & manipulating data using SQL and Hive/Hadoop
· Proven analytical and quantitative skills with an ability to use data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause analyses
· Knowledge of fundamental statistical concepts for data analysis
· Ability to dive deeply into data integrity issues
· Eager to learn and employ new technologies to achieve faster and better results
· Ability to take loosely defined business questions and translate them into clearly defined technical/data specifications
· Experience with BI / data visualization tools
· Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills, able to communicate effectively with both business and technical teams.
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud']","['big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Ability to elicit business requirements and translate into technical solution design documents Working knowledge of business processes, system development and process improvements.
Proficient in gathering business requirements using UML, process flows and uses cases.
Expertise in modeling and mapping as-is and to-be business processes.
Experience with complete software development life cycle.
Understanding of technology capabilities and limitations.
Experience with and strong understanding of various technologies and platforms, including end-point devices (i.e.
mobile devices, laptops, tablets, servers, etc.)
Experience designing and reviewing test cases.
Experience with QA process methodology Knowledge of SharePoint O365 Self-starter with strong problem solving skills Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Responsibilities Partner with cross-functional stakeholders (i.e.
IT Security team, Project Sponsor, ValidationQualification team and Business counterparts, etc.)
to elicit, analyze, and translate information to create Business Requirement , User Requirements, andor Technical Requirements Act as a liaison between technical teams, senior management, and the business community, including managing communications between business stakeholders and technical teams Traceability Matrix creation and management Lead effort to obtain approvals for all types of Requirements Manage user change requests and change process Work with IT Security team, Project Sponsor, ValidationQualification team and Business counterparts, etc.
to gather and analyze information to develop new and update existing Process Flows and accompanying documentation (including swim-lanes diagrams and As-is To-be documentation, etc.)
Design comprehensive test plans to test the quality of software and business processes Work with IT Security team, Business counterparts, etc.
Work with Technical and Training Team to develop Training Plan, Materials, Training execution and Manage Training Plan approvals.
Work with Technical and Business team to develop Support Plan and Manage approvals.
Work with Technical and Business team to develop end-user communication.
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Typical Tasks:
"" Provide technical guidance and lead others;
"" Promote and maintain a team environment;
"" Test and validate business analysis findings and recommendations;
"" Utilize a variety of information technology platforms and operating systems;
"" Design business processes;
"" Document business processes and models;
"" Communicate effectively both verbally and in writing;
"" Produce reports, documentation, research for the purpose of addressing customer needs;
"" Engage with stakeholders and understand and respond to their needs in rapidly changing environments;
"" Maintain effective customer relationships.
""
Collaborates with other IT staff and/or vendors on business requirements and the implementation of new features;
"" Coordinates and participates in application upgrades and changes;
"" Documents functions and changes to new or modified functionality;
"" Participates in change processes and prioritization; implements approved system enhancements, releases and optimizations;
"" Provides information and support to Instructional Designers to facilitate end user training;
"" Provides updates on fixes to known issues and planned updates and upgrades;
"" Troubles shoots application issues and system error and escalates to Tier 3 or vendor as required;
"" Work with the business to develop detailed user acceptance test cases and flows; including devising test plans, creating test cases, establishing protocols and appropriate testing environments and coordinating testing;
"" Keeps current on new features and functionality to create recommendations for process improvements, best practices and utilization of the systems;
"" Considers the impact to current and future business environments and processes, assessing upstream & downstream effect of system and reporting changes;
"" Coordinates and participates in the evaluation of new module releases;
"" Leads complex assignments involving software development life cycle, project planning, upgrade, build, optimization, resource allocation and implementation
;
"" Performs and/or coordinates complex assignments involving project planning, analysis, testing, monitoring, reporting, optimization and implementation;
Serves as escalation for troubleshooting application issues and system errors, and escalates to vendor as required;
Training and Experience: Sufficient education, training, and experience to demonstrate the possession and direct application of the following knowledge and abilities.
Possession of a Bachelor's degree from an accredited college in Computer Science, Information Technology, Business, or related field, And Three (3) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported at a level equivalent to the County's IT Business Analyst.or Six (6) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported.
OR Possession of a Bachelor's degree from an accredited college,
and Five (5) years of experience providing technical and/or analytical support in the functional area(s) being supported, three (3) years of which were at a level equivalent to the County's IT Business Analyst.
Thank you.
",[None],"['end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['end user', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Confidential Client Workplace is responsible for creating innovative, scalable solutions that enable people at Confidential Client to do the best work of their career.
The ideal candidate will be passionate about Confidential Client’s mission, have a background in a technical or quantitative field, be an experienced problem solver, and will be comfortable communicating effectively with leadership.
Responsibilities & Qualifications
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders and identify opportunities for operational improvements or innovative solutions to problems
Properly understand and document the business outcomes and prioritize projects and requests based on the business value
Collaborate and plan with team members on data-driven projects, accomplishing the business’s needs
Partner with the business stakeholders to define strategies and success metrics for projects
Partner with team members to define internal KPIs and success metrics to improve program performance and demonstrate ROI
BA/BS degree in a technical field
5+ years of experience as a business analyst with a technical team
Preferred Capabilities
Distinctive problem-solving and analytical skills combined with impeccable business judgment
Self-starter and team player
Knowledge of project management methodologies including Agile methodologies.
Experience supporting global regions.
Experience with IoT and/or workplace technology preferred
Note: This position is a 1099-Contractor role
",[None],"['busi', 'data', 'kpi']",1.0,"['busi', 'data', 'kpi']"
BA,"The AWS EC2 Compute Business Development (BD) team is looking for a passionate, results-oriented Business Analyst to own defining, building, and scaling metrics and analytical insights for Outposts.
As a business analyst, you will use your analytical mind to drive operations, strategy, and planning across key BD teams.
Youll collaborate with engineers to build self-service reports and establish automated processes for large scale data analyses.
You will also work closely with members of the BD, Product and Sales teams.
Successful candidates will be analytical with strong business acumen and detail-oriented with proven problem-solving skills.
The ideal candidate has worked in depth in identifying business insights through data analysis, including experience extracting and manipulating large scale data set using SQL, leveraging BI services such as QuickSight and Tableau for data analysis, and producing digestible business intelligence and actionable information.
The candidate should also have strong communication and project management skills, enabling them to work with key business stakeholders to understand requirements and shape analytical deliverables.
He/she should also have a demonstrated ability to think strategically and analytically about business, product, and technical challenges, with the ability to work cross-organizationally.
Key responsibilities include:
· Advanced SQL skills to extract, aggregate, and load data from multiple data sources
· Work with and synthesize large data sets from multiple data sources in order to automate reporting
· Partner cross-functionally to navigate through data sources and introduce new metrics to measure the success of the business
· Design and build rhythm of the business processes and reporting that help business leaders understand performance and progress to goals in order to guide overall strategic direction
· Produce digestible business analytics and insights that lead to actionable results
· Manage and execute entire projects from start to finish including project management, data gathering and manipulation, synthesis and modeling, problem solving, and communication of insights and recommendations
· Perform ad hoc analysis as needed and present findings to senior management with effective written and verbal communication skills
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Finance, or related field
· 5+ years of professional experience in data analytics, business analysis, or comparable analytics position
· Advanced skills in data mining using SQL, ETL, data warehouse, and BI platforms, as well as Excel
Preferred Qualifications
· 5+ years of relevant experience in a business analyst, data analyst, or statistical analysis role
· Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills to translate ambiguous business requirements into complex analyses and actionable insights
· Ability to structure complex analysis and perform the analysis to drive insights
· Proven problem solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, and exceptional organizational skills
· Experience using AWS analytical services (e.g., Redshift, Data Pipeline, EMR, QuickSight)
· Experience with building multi-dimensional data models to serve as a foundation for future analyses
· Ability to deal with ambiguity
· Understanding of predictive modeling
· Understanding of R or Python/another scripting language
Amazon.com is an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer Minority / Female / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation/ Age.
","['ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'aw']","['etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['ec2', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'aw', 'etl', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'predict', 'econom', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Should enable the transformation and performance improvement of an enterprise or its parts, with respect to people, process and technology, by providing relevant capabilities, assets (human and non-human), processes and tools.
Should structure, analyze and visualize an enterprise's current state and They design and visualize the future state.
They also design and guide the change process from current to future state.
Developing sector knowledge is extremely important for all Business Analysts.
Functional analysts can specialize in Business, ERP, Application Management or Custom Software Development (CSD).
self-reliant analyst who has mastered at least one methodology.
You are developing your knowledge in a business and/or industry domain and an ERP solution or a technical tool / programming language.
",['erp'],"['busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['erp', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The position requires a highly dedicated individual who can deliver results in a high growth, ever-evolving environment.
This person will be responsible for the functional design and support of SaaS solutions for Order-to-Cash stream.
The candidate will be part of the SaaS Engineering team and will be supporting various business groups like finance, accounting, FP&A, Tax, Order Fulfillment, Costing and Planning teams.
The candidate will act as a liaison between finance, operations and the delivery teams, to help drive and implement process, systems and change adoption within the organization.
The ideal candidate will have worked in fast paced organizations with rapid growth and frequent change, helping to drive and execute on change initiatives.
Job Responsibilities
Documentation of business requirements and the associated metrics needed to identify if the requirements are achieved.
Efficiently optimize existing business processes to drive productivity in business groups
Must have the ability to train and help business users complete their daily tasks effectively.
Effectively communicate business requirements to the technical organizations, and vice versa.
Provides regular communication regarding the status of specific projects and interfaces with all areas affected by the project
Interact extensively with development teams to communicate business requirements in order to deliver efficient solutions in a timely manner.
Provide support to the Finance organization at all times, especially during month-end and quarter-end.
Minimum Job Qualifications:
Full-scope Netsuite implementation experience as a BSA on 2 or more implementation projects at mid-to-large sized organizations.
Experience with ARM module of Netsuite to implement ASC 606 is a big plus.
Bachelor's degree or equivalent in Finance, Accounting or Info Systems discipline.
Minimum of 8+ years of related work experience in an operational role and some experience with project and or change management.
Experience working with Auditors both internal and external ensuring that business processes and Change control processes are SOX compliant is mandatory.
Experience in a high change, rapidly growing business is a plus.
Experience with Order Management is mandatory.
Soft skills
Strong relationship building skills.
Effective communicator that works well in a collaborative team setting
Exceptional ability to gather organize and evaluate any information or data needed as input from stakeholders and development team to determine requirements and specifications.
CAN DO attitude.
Ability and desire to work in a fast-paced and continually evolving environment.
Ability to simultaneously manage multiple projects, priorities and complete objectives on time.
Excellent communication skills, including both verbal and written.
Excellent problem solving skills, conflict/resolution management, active listening, time management and excellent interpersonal skills.
Exposure to process development and change execution.
Ability to interact with all levels of business users across functional teams (end-users/executives).
Functional Requirements:
Completions of 2 or more complex Netsuite implementations in mid-to-large sized organizations.
Strong Netsuite ERP Knowledge and experience as a BSA.
Mandatory requirement is to have functional experience with the following Netsuite modules: Receivables, Payables, Order Management, and Inventory.
Experience in Advanced Revenue Management and Fixed Assets is a plus.
Experience with Supply Chain modules also a plus.
Must have knowledge of Netsuite technical components scripts, workflows etc.
Candidates must have experience of working with technical teams across different timezones.
Must be able to drive process changes and reverse engineer processes if needed
Extensive Netsuite reporting experience required.
The candidate must have experience in Netsuite ERP and must have a deep understanding of all financial and Order Processing modules and processes.
Strong experience required in NetSuite General Ledger, Receivables, Payables, Inventory (from a period close standpoint) etc.
Must have experience with month-end activities in the financial systems.
Must have worked with Advanced Revenue Management module in Netsuite.
Strong understanding of the Netsuite Technology stack and how all the different components work in tandem to build good solutions required.
Must have experience in the payment processing module in Netsuite.
Must be experienced in Tax calculations leveraging systems like Avalara, Onesource, etc.
Must be able to build Saved searches, customize reports in Netsuite to address business reporting needs.
Qualified applicants are considered for employment opportunities without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, age, marital status, protected veteran status, disability status or any other category protected by applicable law.
","['erp', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['erp', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'optim', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"* Define detailed business / functional requirements, process flow diagrams, and use cases; including performing gap and impact analysis.
* Writing and reviewing QA and User Acceptance test scripts.
* Manage UAT and any other required testing within the sandbox.
* Be an owner to investigate and understand existing systems, independencies and challenges and recommend future improvements that align with business needs and solve issues.
* Perform administration functions such as validation rules, user management, roles, hierarchy, approval workflows, record types.Skills and Experience:* 5 + years of experience with Salesforce , Apttus or similar CPQ tool, Marketo or similar.
* with the most recent 5 years as a Business Analyst with focus on the sales and marketing functions* Certified SFDC Admin preferred* Sufficient technical background to communicate with developers efficiently and effectively.
Ask yourself: Do you want to team with the best talent in the industry?
Do you want to work on disruptive technology?
Do you thrive in a fluid work environment?
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability.#LI-JM1
",['salesforc'],['busi'],999.0,"['salesforc', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst will coordinate project specific deliverables to ensure successful implementation of proprietary software.
Learn More
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
5FHqCP3uot
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Posted: Jan 24, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200123136
Imagine what you could do here.
The Access and Security business analyst will be responsible for working with the relevant sales and sales ops teams to understand their security and provisioning requirements and then with the IDMS team to enhance the Sales systems & tools ecosystem for meeting those needs.
Key Qualifications
Strong understanding of access management and web security concepts such as Single-Sign-On (SSO), Identity federation, Session Management, API security, etc.
BS or equivalent degree in Business management, Computer Science, Engineering or related discipline required.
Excellent communication and presentation skills (Executive presence strongly desired)
Knowledge of basic security concepts including (encryption using keys, SSL, HTTPS, identity and access management).
Excellent project management skills with a maniacal attention to detail.
Candidate must have relevant experience in Access & Provisioning applications, controls, and processes
Candidate must be able to analyze business problems and conduct root cause analysis
Prior experience in driving process improvement projects preferred
Prior experience in SLDC project management and analysis including scoping / timeline management, documenting use cases, process flows/swim lane diagrams, requirements (BRD) etc, UAT, change management etc.
Strong communication and presentation skills, flexible, open working style and an ability to establish trust and credibility quickly.
Experience with Agile methodologies, design thinking preferred
Experience with Six Sigma methodologies and Six-sigma certification preferred
It is essential that you can think strategically, connect the dots to see the bigger picture, as well as be comfortable getting in to the details of the deliverables.
To be a successful candidate for this role you must be a self-motivated, driven individual who is comfortable working in a global, matrixed, fast-paced environment.
RESPONSIBILITIES WILL INCLUDE (BUT NOT BE RESTRICTED TO):
Multitasking and switching gears to meet changing priorities and tasks to accomplish goals/objectives.
Working in a distributed cross-functional team environment where team members are spread across numerous locations and often communicate virtually to support on-going projects and programs.
Being responsible for understanding the complexities around Access management projects and ever changing provisioning and security needs.
Working with application development teams to configure and deploy single-sign-on and federated access solutions.
Identifying and fixing errors / issues with any of the solution components by working with IS&T and conduct root cause analysis
Education & Experience
Bachelors, Masters or equivalent in Computer Science, MIS, or Information Management
Big 5 consulting experience preferred
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Code : MIRI0008
Position Summary:
Job Position : Business Analyst
Date Posted : 30th May, 2014
Responsibilities:
Translate requirements into documentation deliverables such as user stories, functional specifications, workflow/process diagrams, and data flow/data model diagrams.
Work closely with the Development team to insure the effectiveness and quality of the components and systems developed.
Procure and deploy necessary peripheral tools, software's needed to ensure smooth execution of projects.
Capture, define, analyze and translate functional and non‐functional business requirements into activity diagrams, system use cases/user stories and supplemental specifications that contribute to effective software development.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Management Information Systems.
At Least 5 Years Relevant Experience in Business Analysis & Development.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst
Duration : - Long term
Responsibilities and Duties
o Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
o Strong problem solving and analytical skills.
o Excellent written and oral communication skills a MUST.
o PC literate in Windows environment including MS Office.
o Demonstrated ability to build and maintain strong networks.
o Self-confidence combined with openness to learning and applying new skills and concepts.
o Good sense of humor.
o Knowledge of or ability to understand technical terminology and concepts.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $68,000.00 - $73,000.00 per year
Benefits:
Health insurance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['ms office', 'excel']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This experience is relevant to one of my current openings.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Job Overview:
The team leverages big data to empower business decisions and deliver insights, metrics, and tolls to drive business growth.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with a team of high-performing analytics, data science professionals, and cross-functional teams to identify business opportunities, optimize product performance or marketing efforts
Analyze large-scale structured and unstructured data; develop deep-dive analyses and machine learning models to drive customer engagement and retention
Design and analyze experiments to test new product ideas or marketing strategies.
Convert the results into actionable recommendations
Communicate findings to senior leaders and evangelize data-driven business decisions
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field (Math, Statistics, Economics, Engineering)
8+ years of work experience involving large-scale data analysis with demonstrable business impact
Expert SQL/HQL knowledge
Experience handling large-scale, complex projects and initiatives
Willingness to not only drive projects, but help ensure all projects for the business unit move forward
Deep understanding of marketing across electronic devices
Experience in creating data pipelines and ETLs that combine data from disparate sources
Hands-on experience in Tableau, from data origination to productionized dashboards
Ability to travel internationally at least twice a year, and as needed
Willingness to meet with stakeholders during Seoul/Shanghai business hours
Preferred Qualifications:
Master's degree in related field
Business-level experience with R, Python, or Scala
Familiarity with Git and Airflow
Experience owning the analytics and performance of a large business unit
","['scala', 'git', 'airflow', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python']","['etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['scala', 'git', 'airflow', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'math', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Please work this req
Pay Rate: $55-60/hr on c2c
Client: HCL / Baker Hughes
Job title : Business Analyst
Lead Business Analyst
Duration:
6 Months.
Renewal will be based upon business needs.
Essential Responsibilities:
Onsite Analyst to facilitate data integration across multiple platforms
Gather business data integration requirements
Manipulate excel spreadsheets for uploading in various systems
Coordinate and collaborate with business and IT teams
Works with business and project teams to troubleshoot issues with data integration
Qualifications/Requirements:
Bachelor Degree in Business or Information Technology
Minimum of 10 years of hands-on experience in IT
Excellent MS Office Skills (Excel, Word, Outlook, etc.)
Demonstrates a logical and structured approach to time management and task prioritization.
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work under pressure and to strict deadline
Self-Motivated
Desired Characteristics:
Excellent communication, organizational and time management skills with ability to manage multiple priorities and meet deadlines
Client focused and support oriented, with strong customer service skills
Analytical and Detail Oriented
Action oriented and drive results
Adaptable to changing environment
Assumptions:
Local (Houston based) resources only, no travel required.
Baker Hughes is not paying for travel for out of town consultants.
Equipment List, SOW Specific Software and other Tools:
Baker Hughes will supply laptop with standard software package and sign-on credentials for consultant.
Houston, Texas Aldine Westfield Drive
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"Customer Success: Sr. Business Analyst
The Customer Success Insights team is the Chief Data Office for CS and other functions.
As a Sr. Business Analyst, in the CS Chief Data Office, you will be part of a team building products and tools that leverage the value of customer data.
Core Responsibilities:
● Play a key role in developing, delivering and maintaining inhouse products built on Tableau.
This will include helping with data validation and user acceptance testing.
● Regularly interact with end-users of the Tableau dashboards: Understand key user requirements, answer data related questions and troubleshoot issues as needed.
● Work with an India based development team to drive execution of the roadmap including enhancements to the existing product and development of new products.
● Be the operational lead for the Customer Success Systems and Tools.
Be the point of contact for data related questions, identify and resolve data lineage issues and other operational issues.
● Support role based access control and other administrative activities related to Systems & Tools.
● Become the subject matter expert on the database schema that supports various Customer Success Systems & Tools.
● Conduct ad hoc analyses and run reports as needed to support the business.
● Effectively communicate insights to Customer Success team members, Account managers, sales engineers and senior leadership.
● Create documentation and deliver training on Customer Success tools to enable self-service for internal stakeholders.
● Be the primary point of contact for Gainsight administration.
● Collaborate with the business, product managers and the insights engineering team to establish prioritized analytics and dashboards backlog.
● Implement processes for executing the development, measuring progress, and communicating results.
Requirements:
● Undergraduate degree preferably in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering or related degree.
● Experience in implementing and managing SaaS, BI, Analytics applications and reporting tools (such as Salesforce, Tableau) at enterprise scale.
● Fluency in SQL, Python.
● Experience working with databases and data sets.
● Strong analytical and problem solving skills.
● Proven ability to independently lead analyses to support the business.
● Experience in user requirement gathering, leading the prototype for all BI initiatives.
● Proficient with building models, driving analyses using Excel and other tools.
● Strong oral and written communication skills.
● Experience in working on / managing cross-functional projects.
Preferred Qualifications:
● Proven record of working effectively with cross-functional teams at all levels with the organization.
● Ability to work with different team members to design processes and implement strategic projects that solve business challenges.
● Prior experience working with Salesforce and Salesforce reports.
● Experience working with Gainsight and/or other Customer Success systems.
● High energy level and “can do” attitude.
● Self-starter who is comfortable with ambiguity and working in a fast-paced, change-oriented environment.
● Proven ability to balance multiple projects and priorities.
● Excellent verbal and written communication skills including the ability to develop and deliver executive level presentations.
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer MFDisabilityVeterans.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"The Business Analyst will work closely with functional leaders, institutional units, and subject matter experts in documenting business requirements, training materials, software integration and configuration projects.
Responsibilities
Excellent problem solving, documentation and communication skills
Collaborate with business users and managers throughout the project life time; from initiation to execution
Develop detailed business & functional requirements, including use cases, user stories and wire-frames
Conduct User Acceptance Testing and end user training
Provide point and click administration and configuration of CRM system
Provide ongoing consulting and expertise in key areas of focus
Data Cleansing – Assist in the ongoing cleansing of SFDC data and related applications with the support of stakeholders.
Data Loading – assist in transforming data into needed formats for data loads.
Desired Skills and Experience
Minimum 3-year year experience in Salesforce
Experience with Salesforce Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, Communities, CPQ,Apex
Experience with 3rd application - Netsuite, Zuora,Marketo, Salesloft, Skilljar,Clari - an Advantage
Previous experience developing requirements for CRM projects and implementation
Team player, self-motivated, and extremely detail-oriented
Technical understanding and the ability to learn
Time management, ability to multitask
Ability to deliver high quality work in a fast-paced environment
Fluency in Microsoft Office applications, especially Excel
Strong communication and interpersonal skills
Previous experience working in a SCRUM or agile environment preferred
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['data', 'cleans', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'data', 'cleans', 'end user', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Kindly review the job requirements below.
Must Have 3+ years of experience in Training and training material documentation Worked with CMS preferably Nuxeo Familiarity with Digital Asset Management Nice to Have Knowledge in Program Management Contact Information Talent Advocate Faran Call 832-941-5238 Email resumearthurlawrence.ne mailtoabrararthurlawrence.net t Applicants must have valid work authorization in the United States, as visa sponsorship is not available at this time.
Named one of the top ten fastest growing businesses in Houston in 2016.
Ranked 25th in the HBJrsquos Fast 100 Private Companies Award in 2017.
For more information, visit www.arthurlawrence.net httpwww.arthurlawrence.net
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Job Code-005
Business Analyst
Conduct due diligence and research on selective companies in the information technology industry.
Contact the management representatives of the companies and develop business relationships with them.
Build email communication templates and conduct actual email marketing of the website with the partner and client companies.
Create plan and conduct various digital marketing activities and manage the programs using social media and search engines.
Ownership of internet marketing campaigns using Facebook, Linkedin, Google and Twitter.
Develop content and share it across the digital media platform.
Leverage analytics to understand and get insights on the performance of various campaigns
Seed and execute various marketing ideas to encourage partners, clients to use the site and invite participation.
Assist clients in posting of opportunities and then encourage partners to bid for the opportunities.
Collect data and statistics on the usage of website through Google Analytics.
Develop and implement Web Analytics for the website.
Test the newer versions of the website from a functional perspective.
Email id:
ksen@unikul.com
This email address is being protected from spambots.
You need JavaScript enabled to view it.
",['javascript'],"['data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']",999.0,"['javascript', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Job Responsibilities:
• Writes and maintains test plans based on software requirements and design documents
• Participates in the development of change control standards and procedures that appropriately fit the
needs of the technical team and updates these procedures as the needs change.
• Verifies that system requirements are traceable, consistent, complete, and testable.
• Writes checklist to track all components involved in application changes
• Performs requirements, design and code walk through /reviews as requested
• Recommends corrective action to ensure compliance with test plans.
• Develops and maintains comprehensive documentation on all standards and ensures that the information
is appropriately published and distributed
• Verifies that software applications perform in accordance with system requirements and specifications
• Tests software applications for concrete, consistent, observable results.
• Tests new change control and testing tools to ensure proper installation and maintenance and to measure
tool performance
• Verifies function, performance, integration, and acceptance test results are in accordance with application
and departmental standards
• Measures the severity of failures and defects in accordance with test plan guidelines.
• Accurately and thoroughly documents application performance failures and defects during each quality
review session.
• Clearly and accurately communicates test results to programming staff and/or appropriate management
staff.
• Regularly enters issues/defects related to the test life cycle or change control environment into applicable
tracking system.
• Conducts testing meetings, as necessary, for problems encountered during the test life cycle.
• Acts as liaison for application groups and external agencies
• Assists users in developing test plans, test scripts, and implementation plans as requested
• Provides reports showing status and activity in the change control environment to technical teams and
appropriate management staff.
Qualifications:
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related area
mapping.)
• Demonstrated knowledge of Testing methodology and practices.
• Must have good knowledge of Microsoft Project/Sharepoint Workspace planning too
• Must have excellent customer service skills with strong decision making capabilities
• Must have excellent verbal and written communication skills
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This individual will be a knowledge specialist for the CRM/PRM solutions in the market, especially with Oracle Sales Online.
Key Responsibilities:
The Business Analyst would have expertise in functional knowledge of Sales CRM systems, and especially Oracle Sales Cloud (OSC) i.e.
sales functions, sales organizations, lead management, opportunity management, partner/channel management, partner deal registration process, quote management, territory management, OTBI etc.
The Business Analyst would have expertise in functional knowledge of Sales CRM systems, especially Oracle Sales Cloud (OSC) i.e.
sales functions, sales organizations, lead management, opportunity management, partner/channel management, partner deal registration process, quote management, territory management, OTBI etc.
Knowledge of key user requirements and ways to translate those needs into reality via Oracle Sales Online
Consulting ability to define and prioritize requirements, translate requirements into system functions, understand application configurations and customizations which can complete the solutions
Ability to drive projects at a Project Manager capacity – all business analysts are encouraged to be able to perform the PM job function to deliver small ~ large size projects.
Solid understanding to drive the initiative forward, driving and facilitating multiple meetings with solid minutes and actions, clear project status communication and proper escalation and risk mitigation capabilities.
Ability to work with the delivery team and business management, PM, other technical team members to communicate requirements and make sure delivered system meets those
Proven ability to independently perform Configure/develop, test, implement, document and maintain as it relates to the Oracle Sales Cloud platform and system administration
Coordinate with various Sales Business teams and IT Partners in developing or improving systems, processes, and procedures.
Handle OSC demand, analyze and respond.
Responsible for maintaining the functional areas of OSC, working closely with the OSC teams
Work with Oracle and other vendors for product bug resolution, including Service Requests management with Oracle
Provide estimated work effort for all tasks to be completed for project assignments
Identify, develop and evaluate alternatives to meet business requirements
Implement new enhancements including creation of custom objects, workflows, email alerts and templates
Building relationship with business team and delivering project artifacts on time with desired quality
Participate in cross-functional teams that address strategic business issues involving CRM and service operations
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate technical issues and resolve problems at all levels of the organization both internally and externally
Effective relationship management, communication, and presentation skills, with demonstrated success in dealing effectively with customers, vendors, peers, and senior management
Identify OSC usage problems and craft technical / communication plans to IT/business teams
Must be comfortable in rapidly changing and sometimes ambiguous work situations.
Keen attention to detail and complex problem-solving abilities from operational and technical perspective
Ability to work independently and engage supervisor as needed
Experience documenting and analyzing processes, procedures, and/or policies
Ability to handle full workload and meet proposed deadlines/ Ability to mentor junior team members
Must be a superb communicator, written and verbal
Very responsive to all asks and inquiries from both IT peers and business stakeholders.
Ability to travel 25 – 50% of the time to the key stakeholder locations
Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or related discipline
4+ years of experience with technical implementations of CRM/PRM projects and 3+ years of experience functioning as a CRM/RPM administrator/developer for Enterprise edition or higher (preferably at large, multi-dimensional organization)
Hands-on Design, Development and implementation of Oracle sales cloud Application
Responsible for Knowledge transfer and arriving at SLAs for steady state
Technical problem-solving skills
Candidate must have gone through at least one full project lifecycle of CRM implementation.
Should have solid grasp in Data migration from Other CRM product to Oracle Sales Cloud
Experience in Enterprise Application Integration
Experience working with Sales and Sales Operations organizations and its supporting functions
Demonstrated project management experience and ability to deliver large scale complex global initiatives
Interested?
#LI-AS1
","['oracl', 'cloud']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['oracl', 'cloud', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Opportunity Details
ID: 20747
Title: Business Analysts (Ref:102)
Rate: Market
Duration: Full time Position
Posted: 12/12/2018 11:22:59 AM
Status: Open
Details:
Business Analysts (Ref:102): Work in SAP CRM implementation for Utility clients (Gas and Electricity) by closely working with business/end users to understand, collect the requirements and document the same.
Review the system requirement specification documents, develop functional specification documents and configure based on SAP best practices; extensively worked on Configuration and implementation of SAP CRM and SD Functionalities.
Validation of the setup and code components; Work extensively in performance, integration and System integration testing; Create Queries, functional modules, programs, conversions, interfaces, reports, and enhancement; Track defects to accurately depict the status of the system, daily testing status reports and acting as a single point of contact for defect tracking issues and updates; Responsible for deployment, validation, hyper-care and post production support; Creation of functional/technical specification documents for the business requirement and translate those to SAP solutions.
Tools Used: SAP ECC 6.0, SAP CRM 6.0, SAP GATEWAY, HPALM.
Minimum Education: Masterâ€™s degree in Business Administration.
Minimum experience: Three (3) years.
Employer will conduct an on-line technical skills test to assess knowledge and abilities.
Three (3) years of experience must include three (3) years of experience in SAP ECC 6.0 , SAP CRM 6.0, SAP GATEWAY, HPALM.
Job Site: Fremont, CA.
Employer will accept three (3) years of experience gained before or after completing Master's degree in Business Administration.
",[None],"['end user', 'busi']",2.0,"['end user', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst- Operations & Finance
Key Responsibilities Include:
Analyze historical & seasonal production and product-mix data to identify and highlight key trends performing Exploratory data analysis and provide insights that helps strategic production planning process and waste control.
Develop and implement cost savings ideas to improve profitability and operational efficiency.
Analyze the business expansion and extension opportunities in support of annual strategic objectives
Develop product mix planning models to improve forecasting of production related expenditures
Prepare Quarterly reports of the consolidated P&L, EBITDA tracking, variance analysis to budget, providing financial reporting analytics across all business units
Qualifications and Education:
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills with flawless attention to detail
Quantitative techniques use for forecasting and modeling
Must be able to retrieve and interpret complex data, develop reports, draw conclusions and make recommendations
Advance skills in MS Excel & Google Sheets: Pivot Table, Vlookup, Slicer, Solver, IFS and Financial functions, data importing and linking
Experience with data analytics/visualization software ( e.g.
Rstudio, Tablue, Cognos), knowledge of QuickBooks or a Financial application is a plus
Experience with Outlook, Word, and Power Point
Must have strong communications and interpersonal skills with ability to build relationships with business partners as well as work with cross-functional teams
2-3 years of relevant experience, preferably in a retail, manufacturing or consumer product
Must be flexible to work in fast-paced, dynamic environment
Min.
Bachelors degree - in business, accounting or finance.
MBA a plus
","['cogno', 'excel', 'rstudio']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['cogno', 'excel', 'r', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'account', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst
Job Type: Contract
Owns and manages the Business Req Documentations, Software Req Specifications along with the dev team and the Functional Req Specifications.
Develop a clear understanding of the customer needs and documents it.
Clearly articulates and clarifies detailed business requirements that are intended for engineering and user interface design teams to build new software
Collaborates with business stakeholders and engineering teams to review designs, prioritize features, clarify scope, and negotiate trade-offs as required to meet schedule and resourcing challenges
Provides project management leadership during the implementation to ensure coordination of funding, release schedules, communicate status, issue resolution, resource alignment, and quality standards are met
Works with business stakeholders and Contract Manufacturer teams to develop launch plans and collaborate with the operations team to execute change management activities
Additional Requirements
3-5 years of business analyst or product management experience within leading software organizations
Proven ability to write detailed business requirements intended for software engineering, UI/UX design, and track record of working with engineering/design to create technology solutions
Experience leading the team through issue resolution during the entire development lifecycle.
Experience planning and leading software release cycles including prioritizing features, coordinating schedules across platforms, coordinating user testing, and communication with stakeholders on roadmaps, delivery status, and change management details
Ability to collaborate with software engineering teams to reduce technical debt, introduce new technologies, and migrate to new architectures
Experience using Agile development methodologies and familiarity in documenting business requirements and organizing work into Epics, User Stories, and writing Acceptance Criteria.
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title
Business Analyst
City
San Jose, CA
State
CA
Area code
94088
Postal Code
669
Experience
8+
Skill
Ecommerce and Exploratory Data Analysis (EDA) Industry, B2B
Tax Term
C2C/w2
Skills
Effectively carry out the translation of business requirements into functional specifications to satisfy the business needs and necessary system modifications
Interact with the business users and work closely with them to understand their business needs and opportunities
Undertake requirement elicitation, document and analysis, solution design, testing definition and execution
Supporting and implementing various development projects
Document the enhancement recommendations from project managers and business stakeholders and evaluate site design and functionality
Effectively analyze and monitor the services, market trends, and requirements
Undertake conversion of data to the new system and work with the application support personnel for the implementation of system software
Coordinate effectively with the stakeholders and technical staff
Ability to write clear reports and maintain the important records
Effective organizational and management skills
Roles:
6+ years of overall experience in handling B2B eCommerce projects as a Business Analyst
EDA Industry experience
Effective organizational and management skills
Expert in time management and the ability for achieving the given tasks within the allocated time frame
Expert judgment and decision making skills
Education: B.Tech.
or Equivalent
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'recommend']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'exploratori', 'busi', 'recommend']"
BA,"Professional Services solutions provider headquartered in the Bay Area and
serving clients globally.
Contact Center Services, Internal IT Support, Data Center Operations, Workforce
Solutions, and IT Professional Services.
The Global Security Strategic Initiatives (GSSI) team develops global programs
and the advancement of the Global Security organization.
are repeatable and scalable.
As the Global Security Strategic Initiatives (GSSI) Strategic Business Partner,
you will report to the Strategic Business Partnerships Lead and be responsible
for leading and/or supporting assigned GSSI projects and the cross- functional
efforts associate with their delivery.
Please note for this role working onsite
Responsibilities:
Conduct cross-functional strategic interviews with key internal Global
Security business partners
Gather customer feedback and complete benchmark studies to support a
business case or project investment decision package.
Ability to identify trends and their affects from various data sources.
Understand and help define the business drivers to provide insightful
recommendations for addressing complex operational and strategic problems.
Develop SBP support metrics
Evaluate the impact of proposed changes, with attention to scalability an
sustainability over time
Proof and edit communications, Best Practice documents, resource tools an
trainings
Provides other Strategic Business Partners with information and
recommendations to assist in the development of their correspondences with
external partners.
Create project plans and build consensus among diverse sets of
stakeholders.
Coordinate cross-functional projects from outline to implementation.
Coordinate meetings as needed
Assist in conceptualizing a strategy to increase the reach and impact of
Fosters strong cross pyramid
partnerships and able to effectively prioritize workload demands to meet
project deadlines
Creative formatting of web-based training templates and knowledge article
business reviews and presentation documents
Qualifications:
Bachelor s degree in related field or 3+ years relevant experience.
Demonstrated project management skills that drive results
Demonstrated leadership skills in a cross-pyramid capacity.
Knowledge of processes & procedures development
Knowledge of Balanced Scorecard
Excellent communication and presentation skills.
Strong analytical and critical thinking skills.
Highly motivated and able to work independently as well as in a team
environment.
Written and Verbal Communication Skills.
Proficient with Excel, Outlook, Word, PowerPoint.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['bay', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'bay', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Gathers and documents functional and business requirements and collaborates with other IT staff, project teams and/or vendors to produce desired outputs.
Ensure technological needs are met by analyzing and documenting business processes and providing related application configuration and support.
Participates in research to determine if solutions to business requirements currently exist within the organization and if not, whether new solutions are feasible.
Assesses impact to current and future business and technical environments and processes, evaluating upstream and downstream effects of system and reporting changes.
Recommends standardized and automated solutions in alignment with IT best practices.
Coordinates technological changes, verifying test results, and adhering to technical and business standards compliance.
Troubleshoot problems, identify root cause, and evaluate alternative solutions.
Works with the business to develop detailed user acceptance test cases and flows, including devising test plans, creating test cases, establishing protocols and appropriate testing environments and coordinated testing.
Attends meetings to review end user and tracking and trending issues, workflow problems, system capabilities, monitoring feedback, and potential system enhancement needs.
Communicates effectively with stakeholders both verbally and in writing.
Training and Experience: Sufficient education, training, and experience to demonstrate the possession and direct application of the following knowledge and abilities.
Education Requirement:
Bachelor's Degree in computer science, information systems, business or a closely-related field and three (3) years' experience providing technical and analytical support in information systems and/or business analysis.
Knowledge Of
Managed care / healthcare experience required
Business analysis principles and practices (IIBA or similar certification)
Business process design and workflow
Use of analytical tools (i.e.
relationship diagrams, workflow diagrams, swim lane diagrams, use case models, requirements documentation, business cases, etc.)
Business case development and quantitative skills
Testing methodology and validation
Knowledge of information systems and database structure
Project management (SDLC)
Advance knowledge of MS Office Suite Products (Word, Visio, Excel
","['ms office', 'excel']","['end user', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Business Analysts
About this job
Analyze existing business procedures, process and practices through application of software systems, and make recommendations to management and client to introduce more effective information technology business process and methods of operations.
Evaluate business functional requirements and organizational systems, perform data gathering, gap analysis and review, present recommendations, design and development of implementation processes, as well as documentation of the same.
Formulate and define systems scope and objectives based on both business needs and industry requirements.
Interact and work with team of software professionals to implement design changes.
Research and keep abreast of latest developments on management tools, models and methodology to devise most efficient methods of operations.
Must be able to travel temporarily to client sites throughout the U.S.
JOB REQUIREMENT
Masters or foreign equivalent in Business Administration, Management Studies, Commerce, Finance, Management Info Sys or related field.
In the alternative, will accept Bachelor or foreign equivalent in Business Administration, Management Studies, Commerce, Finance, Management Info Sys or related field plus five years of progressive experience in job offered or related field.
HOW TO APPY?
« Return to list
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"Oh!
Work with cross-functional, geographically dispersed teams to improve, define and manage new business processes and help develop overall technology solution design.
Assess existing processes and make improvement recommendations based on customer experience, cycle time and risk/reward analysis.
Assess and define business problems, identify options, assemble and analyze relevant supporting data, and shape recommendations for management approval
Perform process modeling, carryout fit-gap analysis and translate requirements to related technology solution design.
Coordinate meetings with subject matter experts, document and distribute meeting minutes, ensure actions items are completed on time, communicate project status, escalate issues to management as appropriate.
Support teams through all phases of the project including knowledge transition phase.
Establish, adopt, communicate and enforce industry standards, principles and practices.
Be an individual contributor on client engagement teams, working under the supervision of a Senior/Lead Consultant, to develop work product and lead specific project initiatives.
Bachelor’s degree in a related field and 10 years of work experience in systems analysis and design or
equivalent combination of education and experience.
Requires strong written, verbal, and interpersonal skills to convey both technical and non-technical
concepts to a wide audience.
Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, draw valid conclusions, and effectively present
findings and recommendations to management.
Experience in both in-house development solutions and implementation of vendor delivered
applications preferred.
Requires excellent analytical and problem-solving skills.
A comprehensive understanding of business
processes and the ability to quickly learn new processes.
Expresses detail level business/systems analysis using As-Is Swim lane Diagrams, UML Use Case and
other modeling standards.
Strong experience with Microsoft product suite, including Visio, Excel, PowerPoint, Word, Project and
SharePoint required.
Experience with wireframe creation tools.
Works independently, with guidance only in the most complex situations.
ERP knowledge and previous experience a plus.
Travel and after-hours support may be required.
Bilingual English /Spanish communication is required.
A driver’s license and the ability to be covered under company-sponsored vehicle insurance
program is also required.
It is not an exhaustive list of all the job's responsibilities.
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst
BusinessAnalyst
Key Qualifications Owns and manages the Business Req Documentations, Software Req Specifications along with the dev team and the Functional Req Specifications.
Clearly articulates and clarifies detailed business requirements that are intendedfor engineering and user interface design teams to build new software
Collaborates with business stakeholders and engineering teams to reviewdesigns, prioritize features, clarify scope, and negotiate trade-offs as required tomeet schedule and resourcing challenges
Provides project management leadership during the implementation to ensurecoordination of funding, release schedules, communicate status, issue resolution,resource alignment, and quality standards are met
Works with business stakeholders and Contract Manufacturerteams to develop launch plans and collaborate with the operations team to execute change management activities
Additional Requirements 3-5 years of business analyst or product management experience within leading software organizations
Proven ability to write detailed business requirements intended for software engineering, UI/UX design, and track record of working with engineering/design to create technology solutions
Experience leading the team through issue resolution during the entire development lifecycle.
Experience planning and leading software release cycles including prioritizing features, coordinating schedules across platforms, coordinating user testing, and communication with stakeholders on roadmaps, delivery status, and change management details
Ability to collaborate with software engineering teams to reduce technical debt, introduce new technologies, and migrate to new architectures
Experience using Agile development methodologies and familiarity in documenting business requirements and organizing work into Epics, User Stories, and writing Acceptance Criteria.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement Strong documentation skills, experience working in a regulated environment is required.
Strong IT skills in labeling and artwork management (preferably Prisym 360).
Knowledge of configuring the labeling system for Security, usability and reporting.
Generating reports and exporting in the right format etc.
Use of, or integration with Active Directory, setting up Group Policy to allow assigned designers, approvers, translators to work most efficiently in the system.
Understanding of data integration and business processes in the area of labeling and artwork management, involving SAP manufacturingor materials management and PLM systems.
Understanding the true ldquoend to endrdquo process involved in labeling.
Good understanding of printing processes and GS1 barcode construction and the use of each barcode type is a key requirement.
Understanding the use of SAPPLM systems within the labeling operations.
Experience with data exchangeinterfaces between SAP and other labeling systems.
Project implementation skills including business requirements gathering, requirements analysis, business system design, installation, configuration, user testing and validation support.
They're built in the day-to-day.
Agile, DevOps, Product, Tooling, Cloud in unison.
",['cloud'],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Role
Analyzes complex business problems and issues using data from internal and external sources to provide insight to decision-makers.
Identifies and interprets trends and patterns in datasets to locate influences.
Construct forecasts, recommendations, and strategic/tactical plans based on business data and market knowledge.
Create specifications for reports and analysis based on business needs and required or available data elements.
Skills/Experience You'll Bring
SQL, Tableau, Excel
Reporting, Data Visualization, Business Liason
Experience within Marketing Operations providing key insights into campaigns
Recruitment, hiring, training, and job assignments are made without regard to race, color, national origin, age, ancestry, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, disability, or any other protected classification.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'recommend']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'classif', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'recommend']"
BA,"business and technology services
Position: Business Analyst
Duration: Contract to Hire
to outsource their staffing requirements.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Job Overview:
Key Responsibilities:
Hypothesis Validations – Generate test hypotheses and clearly validate opportunities/recommend actions that can have positive improvements in customer experience and business KPI's.
Test Analysis – Drive proper A/B analysis with statistical rigor and perform cohort studies to answer ""why?""
on test result drivers.
Ideate more complex tests from an analytical and insightful reporting perspective
Tell a Concise Story – At completion of Tests, build timely, compelling, fact-based test recaps that strongly communicate the business 'story' behind the data and test outcomes
Communicate Results – Identify successes, failures, trends, and effectively communicate these findings to the organization.
If test results are positive – analyze KPI improvements in pre/post A/B test roll-outs; if results are negative – perform driver analysis to recommend next iteration of that test
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Quantitative field (Statistics, Engineering, Business), or equivalent experience
8-10+ years of experience in a similar role
Experience with SQL, Python, and R/SAS or any statistical package
Experience working with Big Data technologies like Hadoop, Spark, and Presto
Strong critical thinking and detail-oriented with an aptitude for solving unstructured problems.
Preferred:
Master's degree in Quantitative field (Statistics, Engineering, Business),
Experience in e-commerce product analytics
Fluent in English and Korean (verbal and written)
","['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa']","['hypothesi', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['spark', 'sql', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'sa', 'hypothesi', 'big data', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Req ID: 97234
Duties and Responsibilities:
The Business Analyst (BA) candidate should have enough understanding of the Retirement Finance industry to draft requirements that are easily understood by business partners and stakeholders.
The BA candidate will require a better than average skills (including communication).
The BA should be able to support the team by educating them on the business requirements and serve as an SME to answer questions.
The BA will spend time on defining what needs to happen regardless of the team doing the work.
The BA will work across the train, not specific to a team or application.
The BA will be required to work with other senior/lead BA’s on the train and business leads on gathering requirements.
The BA will have some technical knowledge, somewhat more than the average BA.
Having some knowledge to how something works technically will be helpful
Required Skills:
5+ years as Business Analyst.
#INDFSINS
#L1-NAM
Nearest Major Market: Charlotte
Job Segment:
Consulting, Business Analyst, Systems Analyst, Technology
",[None],"['financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['financ', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"ESSENTIAL JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Functional requirement gathering, business process analysis, writing business requirement document, Testing, creating workflows, analytics and metrics to support on-going & strategic projects and work collaboratively with cross functional & IT teams and maintain optimum service levels, including pursuing continuous improvement of business operations processes, using industry best practices.
Perform functional and technical analysis of core business operations processes (Order Management, Sales Operation, Contract Mgmt.
and Customer Master) integrations, gather business requirements and propose appropriate solution.
Partner with peers when coordinating business analysis, analytics, testing and problem-solving across business operations functions.
Build collaboration by encouraging trust, mutual respect, and shared purpose among team members.
Demonstrate proficiency in areas of business analysis, testing, dashboard, analytics, requirement gathering, business processes, security and data privacy.
Establish strong working relationship Sales, Marketing, Finance and Business Operations management.
Continually strive to provide more efficient or higher-quality products and services to respond to customers' needs.
Routinely seek customer feedback and incorporate the data into strategies and action plans and must appreciate the overall benefits and impact on the supported business organizations.
TRAINING RESPONSIBILITIES: (REQUIRED)
Complete all assigned and required training satisfactorily and on time
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Education and Experience (in years):
Bachelors degree in Information Systems, Computer Science, or related business process with 5+ years of related work experience OR Masters degree in field with 3+ years of related work experience
Knowledge and skills:
5-7 years of experience in business analysis and min 3 years of track record in delivering multiple business applications solutions with experience in communicating effectively to business and IT.
Strong interpersonal, organizational, planning and communications skills are vital, including strong analytical and problem-solving skills; ability to lead discussions, present ideas to audiences of all sizes, and Communicate/ interact effectively with all levels of the organization.
Ability to work in a team environment & interact effectively with others by making customer satisfaction and solution quality/integrity high priorities for self and team.
Ability to work under pressure to meet deadlines in completing various, multiple and changing business priorities, requirements, and projects.
Must be self-motivated, demonstrate a can-do attitude and be a ""results"" driven individual with a positive attitude for a timely delivery of agreed upon solutions.
PREFERRED REQUIREMENTS:
Working experience in a Medical industry/ FDA regulated environment is a plus.
Experience with both Salesforce Lightning and Classic platforms.
Strong working knowledge of Salesforce, Einstein, Power BI, CPQ, SAP, RPA, eCommerce.
PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS/ABILITIES:
Ability to work in an office environment.
Ability to travel domestically up to 10% of the time
Danaher Corporation and all Danaher Companies are equal opportunity employers that evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or other characteristics protected by law.
The EEO is the Law poster is available here.
","['power bi', 'einstein', 'salesforc', 'bi']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'einstein', 'salesforc', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Opportunity for a detail-oriented business analyst to join a project on the Devices & Services Accounting Systems team.
This person will be participating in design/development, testing, and maintenance of business process automations.
Work involves evaluating client needs, analyzing business requirements, and defining/building automated solutions to address complex business needs.
This role will also have business intelligence responsibilities and requires previous experience with the design and creation of workflows, automated processes and business reports.
Job responsibilities:
Design, build, launch, optimize and extend full-stack Big Data and business intelligence solutions
Become a subject matter expert on Devices & Services Accounting team data sets.
Partner with the Controllership team to understand accounting requirements for new business intelligence solutions relating to month end activities and reporting.
Help develop processes for reporting and researching financial data discrepancies/fluctuations.
Query system financial data and make sure all recorded activity is accurate and reconciled.
Skill/Experience/Education
Mandatory:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or a related field
Experience with Accounting team / processes of a large fast paced organization
Must possess advanced technical skills in Excel & VBA developing macros, Google Sheets & Appscripts and practical development experience using SQL, Javascript and/or Python
Highly developed analytical, conceptual, quantitative and problem-solving skill sets with an ability to quickly troubleshoot issues and think outside of the box;
Desired:
Experience working with statistical software (R, Python, MATLAB) and database languages/tools (Data Studio, Tableau, Qlikview, Looker)
Experience working with web-scale databases and building scalable data pipelines capable of aggregating and processing millions of events per day
implementing an Investment and/or accounting based application like SAP, Oracle Financials, Blackline etc.
will be strongly preferred
Experience with Business Intelligence Reporting Tools including report design and development for management reporting, KPIs, and business metrics; Experience empathizing with and influencing others without direct line authority, and resolving conflict diplomatically in tense high-pressure situations; Success working in a cross-functional, fast-paced environment and managing complex initiatives with strong attention to detail and organization skills; Excellent oral and written communication ability;
REQ 306320
","['looker', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'oracl']","['big data', 'data', 'kpi', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['looker', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'matlab', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'javascript', 'oracl', 'big data', 'data', 'kpi', 'account', 'optim', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"6 to 10 Years of experience on SFDC to direct the requirements development for applying technology to satisfy business needs.
Should able to elicit requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, business analysis, build wireframes, task and workflow analysis.
Should be able to critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts and decompose high-level information into details Work with business leads to transform and develop new requirements into Salesforce.com design and implementation.
Maintain a high level of situational awareness regarding all activities relevant to meeting project schedules, SLArsquos, and providing regular status updates to management and relevant stakeholders.
Create training materials and documentation for Salesforce.com users and train new end users on Salesforce.com and related applications Monitor user adoption rates and respond as needed (e.g., additional training sessions, communication, system modifications, etc.)
Develop functional specifications and system design specifications.
Coordinates and coaches project teams regarding proper test procedure, review techniques for test basis testing, test case definition, Use of Jira, use of other test services, test automation etc Expertise in providing the estimations on the requirements.
Ability to do multi- tasking and prioritization of the tasks Willingness to take up more challenging tasks Minimum years of experience 8+ Years Contact Details Joydeep Kumar 510-516-7800 Extn 106 joydeep.sitscient.com
",['jira'],"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['jira', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Position Title: HRIS Business Analyst
Job Requirements:
Possess intellectual curiosity, having the ability to see beyond what the customers wants to deliver what they need
Deliver presentations to business owners, IT technical folks and HR and IT leadership problems with solutions and reasonable timeframes
Build trust with process owners and executives through data driven analysis
Create and manage test plans
Provide support to end users
Case management of current production systems
Know when to escalate to IT, your leadership chain or to vendors
Job Qualifications:
Hands-on configuration of Oracle EBS & Taleo TMS
At least 3 years experience in cloud-based SaaS Human Capital Management (HCM) Systems such as Workday, Success Factors, or Oracle cloud
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or similar
Experience in HR business process designs and systems
Five plus years of experience in Business Analysis, Project or Program Management
Strong communication and written skills
Must be able to present to project teams but also present to senior management in a clear and concise manner
Lead requirements gathering sessions
Must be detailed oriented
Strong problem-solving skills
Must be able to operate independently with the judgment of when to escalate
Passion for Improvement; actively looks for ways to improve processes and tools
Ability to recognize, adjust and adapt to environmental or business/cultural nuances
","['oracl', 'cloud']","['end user', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['oracl', 'cloud', 'end user', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This role will serve as the IT Business Analyst within the Research and Early Development IT group supporting the Tumor Microenvironment Thematic Research Center department from a technical and business process perspective.
The successful candidate will manage relationship with research business areas, articulate IT capability gaps, document business requirements, and translate the requirements to technical specifications in supporting research users.
He or she will participate in strategic IT projects and responsible for analyzing, documenting, and testing of IT solutions in meeting business needs.
Responsibilities:
Establish a strong relationship with research leaders and scientists with up-to-date understanding of research processes and data workflows.
Partner with members of the research community to analyze scientific needs and communicate with scientists effectively.
Lead project teams in defining scope, documenting requirements, translating requirements to technical specifications
Work with IT Project Management and Delivery teams to implement solutions that meet business requirements.
Leverage analytical skills to facilitate the design of data models, data standards and analysis tools for the research community as well as other key stakeholders.
Stay informed of research IT industry trends and best practices by regularly participating in internal and external conferences.
Qualifications:
A minimum of a bachelor’s degree in Biology and relevant education background in Computer Science, Informatics or related field.
Advanced degree preferred.
A minimum of 7 years of information management and informatics work experience within Biotech or Pharmaceutical industry and proven track record of strong delivery.
The ideal candidate will possess a proven experience in support of scientific computing environments.
Experience in scientific laboratory research, business process analysis, requirement gathering, and computer system development.
Strong communication and interpersonal skills.
Proven leadership skills, particularly with building a business case, understanding research needs, and translating requirements to technical specifications.
Ability to establish and adhere to technical standards as well as ability to compromise when appropriate.
Project management of computer system development related activities, estimation, planning, controlling, and execution.
Experience with research computer systems, such as electronic laboratory notebooks, LIMS, biologics registration, biological assay data management, scientific collaboration systems.
Ability to translate complex business and technical problems into easily understood solution approaches.
Must have the ability to work in a matrixed environment.
",[None],"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Duration: 3 months
Duties:
Support the creation of a detailed business analysis for procurement in IT, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for IT as a business
Analyze current process of IT a business, how it uses procurement and what its goals are
Identify opportunities within IT procurement process, defining business requirements and reporting them back to stakeholders
Communicate with senior stakeholders in the organization to find out what they hope to achieve in their purchasing
- Formulate ways for IT as procurement processes to improve, based on market best practices
Oversee the implementation of new technology and processes as needed
Manage change, Run workshops and training sessions
Provide visibility through reliable data and dashboards to internal and external stakeholders
Skills:
Ideal experience in Management consulting
Oral and written communication skills
Interpersonal and consultative skills
Knowledge of business structure
Requirements engineering
Processes modeling
Facilitation skills
Analytical thinking and problem solving
Being detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Education:
Bachelor's Degree in administration, Business or Similar
Required:
Business process improvement
Detail-Oriented
Problem Solving
Management Consulting
Procurement
Additional
Business analysis
Purchasing
Requirements Engineering
Business Requirements
Buying/Procurement
IT Procurement
Training
Languages: English (Speak, Read, Write)
Minimum Degree Required:
Bachelor's Degree
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job TITLE: Business Analyst, Commerce Platform
Term: Contract
In addition to defining the requirements, the candidate will be performing User Acceptance Testing to verify that requirements are met from user perspective.
You will work on products such as developer portal, marketplace and user management.
A successful candidate will be hands-on with an established background in defining complex functional requirements that span across a range of interdependent systems.
Candidate should be well versed in website development, defining online protocols/API’s, and system integrations efforts.
This position will report to the Director of Product Management in San Jose, CA.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Translate business & product requirements into cross system functional requirements and user stories.
Work with Product Managers and system users to identify functional requirements and translate them into actionable features for engineering.
Groom and prioritize development backlogs in JIRA with clear balance between immediate and long-term goals.
Effectively support development team throughout sprint cycles by proactively removing roadblocks that may impact quality of service and on-time delivery.
Own the results.
Perform UAT and pilot programs on engineering deliverables and provide detailed feedback.
Work with engineering partners to acquire time and resource estimates for large and medium sized development efforts.
Experience: 5+ years of overall work experience in software development and software products; 2+ years experience as a Business Analyst
Technical proficiency, demonstrated through technical undergraduate degree or equivalent work experience
Experience defining new websites, online services and APIs, driving alignment between development groups and stakeholders.
Payment industry experience will be a plus.
Developer and app ecosystem experience will be a plus.
Skills & Ability:
Excellent writing and communications skills required.
Ability to work in a cross-functional environment.
Highly organized and process driven.
Education: NA
","['excel', 'jira']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The resource will be assisting the Microsoft Navision end users middot Incidents Triaging within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area middot Executing Standard Request within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area middot Documenting the business requirements for the enhancements work middot Participating in the DailyWeekly Operational calls with IT and Business middot Testing and Validating the fixes delivered by the Development team Role Scope Deliverables ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
middot Support Microsoft Navision and related software.
Knowledge of Sales and Distribution techniques, methods, and tools.
Subject matter best practices.
middot Knowledge of Microsoft Navision reporting capabilities.
middot Develop IT and end-user documentation for processes and procedures.
middot Participate in Service Desk function to resolve user related support calls.
middot Prepare and execute test plans for new functionality.
middot Publish communication related to the deployment of new functionality.
middot Translate user requests into user requirements and program specifications.
middot Work with Enterprise Shared Services and programmers to assure compliance to program specifications middot Develop training outlines for end-users and collaborate with documentation specialists middot Liaise with Divisional Management to understand direction within their functional area of responsibility middot Monitor compliance with Service Level Agreements for site.
middot Support business initiatives utilizing Project Management expertise.
middot Travel can range from 25-50. middot Gather user requirements to develop solutions and alternatives.
middot Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
middot Translate high-level information into details as well as summarize detailed information.
middot Communicate and collaborate with users to analyze information needs and functional requirements.
middot Collaborate with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
middot Work with users to define concepts under direction of project leaders.
middot Serve as the conduit between the user community and the software development team through which requirements flow.
middot Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates.
middot Liaise between the business, technology teams and support teams.
middot Other duties as assigned.
Key Skills Excellent knowledge of business processes and best practices.
middot Knowledge of Microsoft Navision in specified area (MMPP OM) middot 3-7 years of business experience in functional area.
middot 2-4 years of Microsoft Navision experience.
middot 4-year degree or 5-7 years' experience in related area.
middot Relevant technical certificates a plus.
middot 4+ years of related technical work experience.
middot Strong interpersonal and excellent documentation skills are a must.
middot Able to assume and complete assignments independently.
middot Ability to explain and champion technical concepts to a broad audience.
middot Excellent customer service skills required.
middot Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.
middot Strong project management skills and understanding of project management lifecycle.
middot Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']"
BA,"Sr.
IT Business Analyst Mountain View, CA Basic 10+ years of overall experience with a bachelorrsquos degree in Computer Science or Business Management OR 8 years of overall experience and an advanced masterrsquos degree in Finance or Business management.
(MBA preferred) Experience working with Big 4 consulting is strongly desired.
Demonstrated experience of stakeholder management and should be able to comfortably interact with senior client managers Demonstrated proven knowledge and success with consulting, designing, implementing, supporting, and leading significant tracks on larger project or leading medium-sized consulting engagements.
Proven Ability to work at the senior management level on key cross-functional initiatives Strong analytical skills and an ability to ldquothink outside the boxrdquo Excellent interpersonal, organizational, and communication skills and the ability to work effectively in a diverse corporate and client environment Demonstrated success presenting complex findings in a clear and compelling manner Proven ability to work with cross functional team in defining the business roadmap (full or MVP) Prior implementation Anaplan for at least 2 year Preferred Detail and action-oriented self-starter who is highly organized and methodical in approaching and processing to data and information Basic knowledge of sales and product management principles and practices a plus.
Superb written and oral communication skills.
Expert level Microsoft Excel and financial modeling skills.
Shows a passion for business analytics, modeling, and planning Aptitude for quickly ramping up on new technology and processes.
Clear understanding of open source technology components and their usage in building technology led capabilities for business use.
Proven track record of delivering projects on time and on budget while communicating with stakeholders.
Experience with project management toolssystems a plus.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",2.5,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"About Bill.com
Bill.com is a leading provider of cloud-based software that simplifies, digitizes, and automates complex, back-office financial operations for small and midsize businesses.
Customers use the Bill.com platform to manage end-to-end financial workflows and to process payments, which totaled over $70 billion for fiscal 2019.
The Bill.com AI-enabled, financial software platform creates connections between businesses and their suppliers and clients.
It helps manage cash inflows and outflows.
Bill.com has offices in Palo Alto, California and Houston, Texas.
For more information, visit www.bill.com or follow @billcom.
Mission:
You will partner with marketers across the organization to dig into strategic questions and your insights will help drive the prioritization and outcomes of the team’s efforts.
In addition, you are someone who considers themselves a growth driver, not just someone who will support the needs of the team, but a person who thrives on identifying and chasing opportunities to accelerate growth.
Professional Experience/Background to be successful in this role:
Bachelor's degree Business, Economics, Finance, marketing, or related field
Experience in a B2B SaaS organization, working with Marketing, Sales Ops and/or Finance organization
Core data experience with SQL, Python, Salesforce.com, Google Analytics, Microsoft Excel
Turning data into insights – Digging into strategic initiatives, developing insights through analysis, synthesizing and clearly communicating analysis both written and verbal.
Support forecasting and planning – Maintain and improve quarterly and yearly forecast.
Be a Growth Partner – Engage with marketers to co-develop, measure, and optimize campaigns.
Operational blocking and tackling – Executional excellence on the day to day responsibilities – understanding the marketing funnel, performance benchmarks and helping the team identify over/underperforming areas.
Competencies (Attributes needed to be successful in this role):
Ability to work with a variety of data sources to develop, and implement data and business intelligence visualizations to enable cross-functional teams to make data-driven business decisions
Ability to partner with stakeholders to formulate program KPIs and formulate solutions to track them
Ability to craft influential presentations to summarize findings
Track record of partnering with all levels of the organization
Expected Outcomes in 3 months:
· Strong understanding of the Marketing funnel, data flow and dashboards
· Strong understanding of Salesforce, and BDC Data warehouse data
· Competent in pulling Marketing, Sales, Product and Finance data
Expected Outcomes in 6 months:
· Identify and drive new opportunity identification process
· Contribute to adding new insights to dashboards and process automation
· Lead analytics efforts for sub-teams/channels
Bill.com is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity.
Bill.com Culture:
● Humble – No ego
● Fun – Celebrate the moments
● Passionate – Love what you do
● Dedicated – To each other and the customer
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'python', 'cloud']","['dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'python', 'cloud', 'dashboard', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'econom']"
BA,"Analyze current process of IT business, how it uses procurement and what its goals are Identify opportunities within the IT procurement process, defining business requirements, and reporting them back to stakeholders.
Communicate with senior stakeholders in the organization to find out what they hope to achieve in their purchasing.
Formulate ways for IT as procurement processes to improve, based on market best practices.
Oversee the implementation of new technology and processes as needed.
Manage change, Run workshops, and training sessions.
Provide visibility through reliable data and dashboards to internal and external stakeholders.
Skills Ideal experience in Management consulting.
Oral and written communication skills interpersonal and consultative skills.
Knowledge of business structure.
Requirements engineering processes modeling facilitation skills.
Analytical thinking and problem solving being detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy Education Bachelor Degree in Administration, Business, or Similar Skills and Experience Required Skills BUSINESS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT DETAIL-ORIENTED PROBLEM-SOLVING MANAGEMENT CONSULTING PROCUREMENT Additional Skills BUSINESS ANALYSIS PURCHASING REQUIREMENTS ENGINEERING BUSINESS REQUIREMENTS BUYINGPROCUREMENT IT PROCUREMENT TRAINING Thanks Regards, Kiran Athawale Recruitment Specialist kiran.athawalexoriant.com mailtokiran.athawalexoriant.com P +1 408-550-1269 M +1 408-721-2325
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Essential Functions and Responsibilities:
Identify potential efficiency improvements to existing business processes.
Automate (where possible) existing business and technical tasks, minimizing the number of manual processes.
Document application integration processes and participate in cross-training.
Identify and learn appropriate applications, data, and processes used and supported.
Facilitate testing, defect resolution, and user acceptance.
Perform post-resolution analysis to ensure problems have been adequately resolved.
Work with the existing team to understand requirements and application functionality/capabilities.
Provide documenting the problem-solving process.
Participate in the design, development, and delivery of software applications and their training programs.
Drive application administration/monitoring activities.
Qualifications:
Strong analytical and writing skills.
Ability to work independently.
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field, and at least 2 past projects on a similar technology stack.
Strong problem solving and analytical skills.
Attention to deadlines.
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to explain technical concepts to non-technical people.
Excellent organization skills and attention to detail.
Good to have:
SQL Server - Experience with stored procedures, Transact SQL, SSIS packages, Integration Services, and Reporting Services.
SQL Server administration experience is a plus.
SharePoint Experience with SharePoint features, third-party products, SharePoint Designer, web parts, site maintenance, development process, and customization.
Understanding of CSS, HTML, and JavaScript.
The Custom web part development experience is a plus.
Microsoft Office Strong understanding of Word, Excel, and Outlook.
Experience with advanced features such as VBA, pivot tables, as well as integration with SQL Server and SharePoint.
ERP Experience reporting from and integrating applications
","['excel', 'erp', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'javascript']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'erp', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'javascript', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Desired EducationSkills Experience in leading projects preferred Works independently on large, complex projects as a project leader Demonstrate advanced organizational business understanding Exercise independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance with broad scope and complexity Perform assigned tasks of high complexity using established procedures, standards, and guidelines Advanced presentation and facilitation skills Ability to communicate and influence organizational change and gain organizational support Is looked upon to strategize with and influence senior leadership on business related matters
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Scrum Master
Focus on championing great Agile and Scrum at both the team and organization level
Motivate and provide leadership in fast-paced and deadline-driven environments
Fulfill the duties of Project Manager, when necessary
Be heavily involved in planning stages to identify goals and vision
Remove impediments and block distractions in order to keep the Agile team focused
Possess, or rapidly develop a deep understanding of the product development and release processes
Build and maintain a relationship of trust with Product Owner and other stakeholders to facilitate teamâs interaction with these individuals
Work with the Agile team and Product Owner to negotiate items from User Stories to the Minimum Viable Product
Effectively and transparently communicate, face to face, in writing, and via the Agile Lifecycle Management tool, with client stakeholders on progress, impediments, etc.
Required:
Master's degree and Minimum of 1-year experience in an Agile environment serving as a Scrum Master.
Delivering results while working independently without supervision and guidance.
Intimate knowledge of Agile and Scrum.
Participate in/facilitate discussions to discover solutions, as well as capturing and transforming business and technology requirements into high-quality User Stories and Acceptance criteria.
Proficient with Agile Lifecycle Management tools (e.g.
Jira, Rally, VersionOne, etc.
), as well as with word processing, spreadsheet, and presentation creation tools, as well as Internet research tools.
Scrum Master (CSM, PSM, or SSM) certification preferred.
Powered by JazzHR
",['jira'],"['supervis', 'research', 'busi']",2.0,"['jira', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Key Tasks:
Advises and recommends areas of program planning, business requirements management, budget execution and program coordination
Prepares needs assessment
Validates resource requirements and develops cost estimate models
Conducts and coordinates financial, product, market, operational, and related research to support strategic and business planning within the various departments and programs of the client group
Interprets, evaluates, and interrelates research data, and develops integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision-making
Plans and coordinates the development of primary and secondary market research studies in support of strategic planning and specific marketing initiatives, as required, and presents findings of studies to client committees
Provides consultative, advisory, technical, and staff support, as appropriate
REQUIREMENTS:
BA or BS required plus minimum 6+ years of direct relevant experience
Ability to use survey and market research methodologies, systems, and techniques
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],"['research', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"IT Business Analyst
Duties:
Support the creation of a detailed business analysis for procurement in IT, outlining problems, opportunities, and solutions for IT as a business
Analyze current process of IT a business, how it uses procurement and what its goals are
Identify opportunities within IT procurement process, defining business requirements and reporting them back to stakeholders
Communicate with senior stakeholders in the organization to find out what they hope to achieve in their purchasing
Formulate ways for IT as procurement processes to improve, based on market best practices
Oversee the implementation of new technology and processes as needed
Manage change, run workshops and training sessions
Provide visibility through reliable data and dashboards to internal and external stakeholders
Skills:
Ideal experience in Management consulting
Oral and written communication skills
Interpersonal and consultative skills
Knowledge of business structure
Requirements engineering
Processes modeling
Facilitation skills
Analytical thinking and problem solving
Being detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Education:
BS/BA degree or equivalent
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"About Supercharger Operations
The Role
This dynamic analytics role will support the charging team's deployment operations with detailed progress, process and financial insights as it continues to accelerate network growth.
Responsible for analysis & insights for Deployment Operations from project inception to completion
Assist with budgets, forecasts and variance analyses
Ability to identify and communicate problems, solutions and opportunities
Provide financial and programmatic insights for new opportunities to be shared with internal and external stakeholders
Create and maintain dashboards, ad hoc reports, and assist in process design to ensure the capture of quality and reportable data sets
Maintain a strong understanding of the charging team's key performance indicators
Serve as a Supercharger business partner for internal cross-functional teams
Requirements
Bachelor's degree in finance, business studies or business administration
Experience coordinating in fast-paced environments and teams
Strong communication skills and experience working with senior decision makers
Energetic personality, with a flexible attitude towards critical tasks
Strong analytical thinker
Proficient with: SQL and Tableau
Programming experience preferred, but not required
Proficient with Microsoft Outlook, Excel (advanced), PowerPoint, Word
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint']","['dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'dashboard', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"JD:
Ideal candidate should have started as a developer and moved to a Business Analyst role.
Candidate is not expected to write codes but should be able to understand technical details / specification while talking to team / developers / client stakeholders.
8 years of exp
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Performing requirements analysis.
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff..
Performing user acceptance testing.
Managing projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
Updating, implementing and maintaining procedures.
Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Managing competing resources and priorities.
Monitoring deliverable and ensuring timely completion of projects
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"The resource will be assisting the Microsoft Navision end users 1) Incidents Triaging within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area 2) Executing Standard Request within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area 3) Documenting the business requirements for the enhancements work 4) Participating in the DailyWeekly Operational calls with IT and Business 5) Testing and Validating the fixes delivered by the Development team Role Scope Deliverables ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
bull Support Microsoft Navision and related software.
bull Knowledge of Sales and Distribution techniques, methods, and tools.
Subject matter best practices.
bull Knowledge of Microsoft Navision reporting capabilities.
bull Develop IT and end-user documentation for processes and procedures.
bull Participate in Service Desk function to resolve user related support calls.
bull Prepare and execute test plans for new functionality.
bull Publish communication related to the deployment of new functionality.
bull Translate user requests into user requirements and program specifications.
bull Work with Enterprise Shared Services and programmers to assure compliance to program specifications bull Develop training outlines for end-users and collaborate with documentation specialists bull Liaise with Divisional Management to understand direction within their functional area of responsibility bull Monitor compliance with Service Level Agreements for site.
bull Support business initiatives utilizing Project Management expertise.
bull Travel can range from 25-50. bull Gather user requirements to develop solutions and alternatives.
bull Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
bull Translate high-level information into details as well as summarize detailed information.
bull Communicate and collaborate with users to analyze information needs and functional requirements.
bull Collaborate with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
bull Work with users to define concepts under direction of project leaders.
bull Serve as the conduit between the user community and the software development team through which requirements flow.
bull Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates.
bull Liaise between the business, technology teams and support teams.
bull Other duties as assigned.
Key Skills Excellent knowledge of business processes and best practices.
bull Knowledge of Microsoft Navision in specified area ( MMPP OM) bull 3-7 years of business experience in functional area.
bull 2-4 years of Microsoft Navision experience.
bull 4 year degree or 5-7 years' experience in related area.
bull Relevant technical certificates a plus.
bull 4+ years of related technical work experience.
bull Strong interpersonal and excellent documentation skills are a must.
bull Able to assume and complete assignments independently.
bull Ability to explain and champion technical concepts to a broad audience.
bull Excellent customer service skills required.
bull Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.
bull Strong project management skills and understanding of project management lifecycle.
bull Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']"
BA,"• Reviews, analyzes, and evaluates business systems or practices and user needs.
• Documents requirements, defines scope and objectives, and formulates systems to parallel overall business strategies.
This tool is critical to the success of the business and provides the basis for managing the cloud business on a daily basis.
The two main areas of focus for this role are:
Assist in the writing of detailed technical requirements of enhancements for the development team
Assist the development team in developing and testing enhancements to the tool
• Address ad-hoc reporting requests and build standardized reports on a weekly basis to support the business
Desired Qualification and Skills:
• 8+ years of experience supporting sales and operations
• BA/BS, preferably in Information Systems, Business Administration or Computer Science
• High level of proficiency in SQL, PL/SQL
• Strong process, reporting and tools experience
• Oracle Application Express development experience
• Excellent interpersonal communication skills, both written and verbal with the ability to build strong professional relationship across groups and at all levels
• Familiarity with Oracle Applications is a plus
• Solid problem solving and decision-making skills
• Ability to work independently
• Strong communication and organizational skills
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Duties and Responsibilities:
Create new user accounts in SAP (lock/unlock users).
Check and maintain users profile and roles in SAP.
Provide production support ad troubleshooting in MM, SD, PM, and FI modules.
Carry MASS upload and modify data according to user needs.
Maintain excellent customer service, adhering to service management regulations.
Ensure compliance requirements are maintained as documented and required.
Provide training for SAP system users.
Generate and analyze project-wise cost reports through PS module.
Collaborate with the procurement and logistic team to implement the SAP standard procedure for material transaction.
Propose, test, and implement new projects and procedures in SAP.
Administer departmental databases, such as Access and SQL.
Work with internal and external auditors, as needed.
Interface with vendors and consultants, as needed.
Assist Finance during closing and reporting periods.
Qualifications:
Previous experience in SAP end user support on Materials Management, Project Systems, and Finance.
Knowledge of SAP standard procedure.
Knowledge of customization and configuration in MM and SD module.
Experience with data gathering, gap analysis, checking on configuration, and testing and implementation of new procedures in SAP.
Knowledge on procurement procedures, audit requirements, and compliance.
Experience in generating reports in SD, MM, FI and PS for audits.
Experience on materials requirements.
Knowledge of various types of purchase process and orders.
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint).
Experience with SD & QM module, a plus.
Powered by JazzHR
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['logist', 'analyz', 'data', 'financ', 'end user', 'account']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'logist', 'analyz', 'data', 'financ', 'end user', 'account']"
BA,"MINIMUM JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Experience/Education
• Must have a Bachelor’s Degree, six (6) additional years of experience or an Associate’s Degree with three (3) years’ experience may be substituted for the degree.
• Must have at least two (2) years of related experience, in addition to degree requirement.
• Must be a U.S. Citizen.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS:
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of the job.
Equal Opportunity for VEVRAA Protected Veterans.
",[None],[None],1.0,[]
BA,"Hello Associates,
Position: Salesforce Business Analyst
Duties/Responsibilities:
Compare and analyze data and processes between CRM systems.
Complete or oversee tasks relate to data validation, compensation tracking, process mapping or other relatedÂSalesforce.com activities.
Partner with business process owners and IT representatives at all levels to gather and document business requirements for keyÂsalesforce.comÂintegration initiatives
Maintain frequent communication with business process owners to ensure changes to SFDC and CPQ are consistent with business needs
Identify opportunities for process optimization, process redesign, or development of new process/policies
Develop operational measurements to identify business process issues and provide recommendations and solutions to business challenges
Create key documentation â Requirements, Process Flows, Use Cases, and Test Scripts
Â <strong>Requirements: I've already done that or have that!
4+ years of hands onÂsalesforce.comÂexperience including representing Sales during a CPQ launch.
2 years project management experience
Strong understanding of sales process is a must
Must possess business acumen, strong analytical, troubleshooting, problem-solving, and project management skills
Excellent customer interfacing, written and verbal communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills with demonstrated ability to present technical content to general audiences
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'optim', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Desired EducationSkills Experience in leading projects preferred Works independently on large, complex projects as a project leader Demonstrate advanced organizational business understanding Exercise independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance with broad scope and complexity Perform assigned tasks of high complexity using established procedures, standards, and guidelines Advanced presentation and facilitation skills Ability to communicate and influence organizational change and gain organizational support Is looked upon to strategize with and influence senior leadership on business related matters
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Job: Senior Business Analyst, Sales Operations
Work matters.
And the workplace of the future is going to be a great place.
People matter.
Role:
The preferred candidate will have experience supporting Sales, is comfortable managing large data sets, has strong attention to detail, has the ability to build financial models, has a creative problem-solving mindset, and has strong communication skills.
They will work cross-functionally across sales, operations, marketing and finance, with the primary objective of enabling sales leadership to make effective, analytically driven, and strategic operating decisions.
What you get to do in this role:
Assist in the development and reporting of key performance metrics to help drive increasing Sales productivity
Work directly with Sales Operations Senior leadership on business-critical reporting needs
Extract data sets, perform analyses, build financial models to support pipeline, coverage, renewal or other initiatives on a weekly/monthly/quarterly cadence
Manage operational process improvement projects
Support the implementation of Sales productivity, planning and reporting tools
Assist with annual planning and monthly forecasting processes for the AMS Sales organization
Analyze performance and productivity data and assist in preparing slides for QBR’s, or other Sales leadership presentations
Other ad hoc responsibilities in support of Sales and Operations
Minimum of 3 years’ experience in Sales Finance / Sales Operations or relevant advanced coursework portfolio
Excellent communication skills – verbal and written
Ability to communicate effectively and collaborate with others
Self-motivated with the ability to multitask and come up with creative solutions
Comfortable and flexible working in a fast-paced environment
Positive “can do” attitude and highly analytical; enjoys challenges & strives for success
Detail oriented and comfortable working with large data sets
Advanced Excel and PowerPoint capabilities.
Tableau or PowerBI experience preferred
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, gender identity, or veteran status.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'powerpoint', 'powerbi', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Requisition ID # 59201
Job Category : Business Operations / Strategy
Job Level : Individual Contributor
Business Unit: Human Resources
Department Overview
Position Summary
The successful candidate will evaluate the details of a business solution, requiring a good understanding of how technological solutions are implemented.
This role may require 10% of travel within the PG&E service territory.
Job Responsibilities
Assess multiple options before arriving at a solution.
Understanding the client’s business processes relevant to the project goal.
Create highly complex data models that have cross- functional impact.
Qualifications
Minimum:
BA/BS Degree in Marketing, Business, Computer Science, Engineering or other related field or equivalent work experience
6 years of job-related experience
Desired:
Advanced skill in writing SQL queries using Microsoft SQL Server/MS Access
Well-versed in data visualization best practices with proven experience using Tableau Desktop Professional
Highly proficient with Microsoft Excel/Access/Powerpoint/Power BI
Familiarity with utility operations
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint']","['busi', 'data', 'visual']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"Strong ability to communicate technical concepts clearly and effectively, with fluency in English.
Should have come from technical background - knowledge in Java or Python or Any Scripting Language
Should be able to understand functional and technical architecture of products
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff..
Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Managing projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
Updating, implementing and maintaining procedures.
Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Managing competing resources and priorities.
Monitoring deliverables and ensuring timely completion of projects
","['java', 'python']",['busi'],999.0,"['java', 'python', 'busi']"
BA,"need recent exp in revenue Mngt and familiar on application in resent project.
Basic Bachelorrsquos degree or foreign equivalent from an accredited institution required.
Will also consider three years of relevant work experience in lieu of every year of education At least 10 years of experience with Information Technologies.
Work 609-201-2600 Mob 409-237-0850 Email Id- venkatreddymalvisystems.com www.malvisystems.com
",[None],[None],1.0,[]
BA,"Your responsibilities:
Reviews, analyzes, and evaluates business systems or practices and user needs.
Documents requirements, defines scope and objectives, and formulates systems to parallel overall business strategies.
This tool is critical to the success of the business and provides the basis for managing the cloud business on a daily basis.
The two main areas of focus for this role are:
Assist in the writing of detailed technical requirements of enhancements for the development team
Assist the development team in developing and testing enhancements to the tool
Address ad-hoc reporting requests and build standardized reports on a weekly basis to support the business
Desired Qualification and Skills:
8+ years of experience supporting sales and operations
BA/BS, preferably in Information Systems, Business Administration or Computer Science
High level of proficiency in SQL, PL/SQL
Strong process, reporting and tools experience
Oracle Application Express development experience
Excellent interpersonal communication skills, both written and verbal with the ability to build strong professional relationship across groups and at all levels
Familiarity with Oracle Applications is a plus
Solid problem solving and decision-making skills
Ability to work independently
Strong communication and organizational skills
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'cloud']","['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'cloud', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"To improve capabilities in current systems and processes, the BSA will analyze business requirements, conduct fitgap analysis, evaluate solution options with tradeoff analysis, and define functional specifications with the development team.
The BSA will also participate in integration and user acceptance testing along with training and change management.
Other Job Responsibilities Has a good understanding of business functions and system interfaces Perform hands-on process design, solution design, prototyping, proofs-of-concept and development tasks as required in support of current and new projects Acts as a liaison between Technical team, Functional team, Business Functions, and vendor to drive systems implementations Perform fitgap analysis as-is vs to-be Minimum Qualification Must be skilled in analytical techniques, practices and problem solving Proficiency with Microsoft Office products .net, SQL, Jira PowerBI and Appian preferred Exhibits prior and current technical expertise in web technology, running SQL queries for data mining and analysis, keen to learn new systems and technologies Preferred Qualification Bachelorrsquos Degree in Computer Science or Information Systems Masters in Engineering Management Preferred Industry certifications PMP CSM preferred 2+ years Business Systems Analysis experience required
","['powerbi', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data mining', 'problem solving', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['powerbi', 'jira', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data mining', 'problem solving', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Primary Skills: Ideal experience in Management consulting
Oral and written communication skills Interpersonal and consultative skills
Knowledge of business structure Requirements engineering Processes modelling Facilitation skills Analytical thinking and problem solving Being detail-oriented and capable of delivering a high level of accuracy
Support the creation of a detailed business analysis for procurement in IT, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for IT as a business
Analyse current process of IT a business, how it uses procurement and what its goals are Identify opportunities within IT procurement process, defining business requirements and reporting them back to stakeholders
Communicate with senior stakeholders in the organisation to find out what they hope to achieve in their purchasing
Formulate ways for IT as procurement processes to improve, based on market best practices Oversee the implementation of new technology and processes as needed.
Manage change, Run workshops and training sessions
Provide visibility through reliable data and dahsboards to internal and external stakeholders
",[None],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['problem solving', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"DUTIES:
Act as the liaison between the Program Manager and project team to define business requirements, build test scenarios and establish a business requirements traceability matrix.
Work closely with Project Management, Product Owners, Developers, Quality Assurance and Application Engineering teams to complete and/or support project deliverables related to business case, business analysis, use cases, delivery management, test plans & test cases, test execution, user training guide, post go live support management, and project management & communications activities.
Support teams to implement software requirements and communicate system enhancements.
Manage deliverables for initiatives and adhere to development methodologies.
Assist in the development of user story scenarios and high level business requirements and detailed system & functional requirements.
Conduct research and analysis into the nature, effect and results of system problems.
Consult frequently with internal users to ensure a complete understanding of their needs and concerns.
Conduct meetings and presentations with stakeholders and business users.
Effectively communicate insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in a technical or business related field required.
4+ years of experience in a successful and professional business/systems analysis and project/program management roles.
4+ years of well developed verbal, written and listening skills
3+ years of relevant experience in MDM, Data Governance, and Data Quality domains
Advanced competency in G-Suite applications, primarily Slides & Sheets.
Excellent documentation, planning, organization, and communication skills to achieve stated objectives.
Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
Nice to have - 3+ years of supply chain experience
",['excel'],"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Hi
Hope you are doing great
Technical Business Analyst/Data Analyst
Duration : 12+month contract
Required Skills:
Candidate must have banking experience.
10+ years of business/Data Analytics experience with Data Mapping, Data Lineage with strong SQL and UAT testing experience.
Must have 10+ years of Informatician and SQL experience.
AWS is nice to have.
The Business/Data Analyst will Create SQL Queries to pull the data than transfer the data from Data Lake to the AWS cloud.
Use SQL Queries to gather data from Various lines of business and transfer from the Data Lake to the AWS cloud platform.
They will be required to complete the data lineage, data quality, and data mapping to ensure that none of the data is lost in the transfer.
Than the BA/DA will complete the UAT and Data Validation testing.
","['aw', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"A successful Global Security SBI Business Analyst is someone who 1) loves data analytics and has a passion for answering difficult business questions with data-driven decision making 2) is creative and a logical thinker who likes to answer complex questions through rigorous analysis, 3) has the ability to tell a synthesized, easy-to-follow data story, and 4) Is comfortable working through complex, ambiguous and innovative solutions for defining, prototyping and telling data-driven solutions for Global Security.
This is a Senior Analyst position that contains significant autonomy and ownership in the success of your workstreams data-driven stories.Responsibilities* Partner with Global Security functions and product owners to outline & identify key measures that achieve long-term business goals and objectives* Own data and analytics projects from initial ask through metric/score definition, testing, deployment, support, and further iteration.
Identify the right resources to help achieve success within analytics projects, including close partnership with data engineering to operationalize your solutions.
",[None],"['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['data', 'busi']"
BA,"All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Responsibilities Primarily responsible for the support and enhancement of the work orders, Activities, Workforce Management and Assets in Siebel eCommunications application (8.x).
Be able to document business problems, analyze them, come up with technically feasible solutions and be able to write FDDs (Functional Design Documents).
Liaise between Onsite and Off shore teams in creating Orders to help business testing Significant role in Hands on testing as well.
As a SITUAT tracker, resource should be able to compile and track the demandsProjectsIncidents for the system releases.
Requirements Bachelor's degree or equivalent combination of educationexperience in Computer Science, Information Systems or related field Minimum 5 years' experience as a Business Systems Analyst with special emphasis on CRMERP applications in a heavily customized multiple application environment.
Strong experienceknowledge of the Siebel work order, Activities, Workforce Management and Asset with Functional and technical application knowledge Strong experience in Production support is required.
Experience in Asset based ordering is required.
Experience in Planning and executing Data conversion activities is required.
Experience in Test script generation, conducting SIT and UAT with broad audience is required.
Experience in using Testing software like HP ALM is required.
Experience in working on the Home grown custom applications, Cloud applications as a Business analyst Experience in As-Is, fit-gap analysis, Vendor selection process is required User level Experience in Issue tracking tools such as Service now is desired Experience in MA projects is desired.
Superior interpersonal, oral and written communication skills.
Exceptional prioritization, proficient problem analysis, process and project management skills.
Results-focused, team-oriented professional with a strong work ethic.
Able to multi-task and work in a fast paced environment
",['cloud'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Financial Business Analyst
Share
Job ID: FA-0100-499
Open Since: 2019-11-05
City: San Jose
State: California
Country: United States of America
Job Skills:
Experience with Forecasting, Business analytics, and financial reporting.
Experience with SAP Business Objects and Essbase
Expertise in Python programming
Power-user of MS Excel
Previous experience developing and deploying data visualization Dashboards (Tableau / Qulik View /Power BI)
Requires Bachelors Degree.
Ability to handle large data sets with ease.
Ability to self-start/direct work in an unstructured environment, and comfortable dealing with ambiguity.
Enjoys working in a fast-paced changing environment
Genuine excitement and passion for developing and analyzing large, complex data sets and converting them into the information/insights that drive business decisions at all levels of the organization.
Knowledge of datacenter products preferred
Minimum Experience: 5 Yrs
Roles & Responsibilities:
Develop and maintain and forecast models in alignment with the product life cycles and product configuration rules.
They will be running through Big Data (data mining), organizing the data, generating reports and presenting findings to their management.
Analyze large amounts of data with complex relationships and derive insightful business-relevant operational analytics
Automate the repetitive manual process and drive operational efficiency
Own and maintain dashboards and refresh quarterly / monthly metrics
Collaborate with cross-functional teams in gathering product knowledge and incorporate into forecast and reporting.
Education:
Bachelor's Degree in Engineering
","['power bi', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python']","['big data', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'tableau', 'python', 'big data', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual']"
BA,"Sr. Business Analyst
Job Number: SST1707
Date Available: 07-02-2020
innovative technical solutions and consulting services to enhance
innovation, business value, and competitiveness.
For over 20 years,
cover the full spectrum of IT expertise.
level of quality that far exceeds their expectations.
Job Summary:
is comfortable performing in a client-facing capacity.
This role will
require working directly with both new and existing clients to
document project requirements and ensure solutions meet key needs.
In
this role, you will engage with everyone from key team members to
You will
also serve as the conduit liaison between internal business units,
vendors and the software application development team.
Although no
direct coding is required, a strong understanding of Agile SDLC is
very important.
Required Duties & Responsibilities:
Lead and mentor a team of Business Analysts engaged across multiple
projects
Accurately assess and gather business requirements from clients.
Document workflows, functional specifications and plans
Analyze the impact of a proposed solution across the client business
Assist in drafting business and functional architecture documents
Manage client expectations both pre- and post-implementation
Determine if a solution is needed and feasible
Essential Skills & Qualifications:
Requirements:
Requires minimum of 7 years of progressively responsible experience
in internal business and technical analysis
Possess a thorough understanding of business process and systems
flows; and ability to work with a global team to consider implications
to current- and future-state business environments
Requires demonstrated proficiency with technical writing
Customer management
Process engineering
Microsoft Excel, Microsoft PowerPoint
Data analysis, requirement analysis
Data modeling, UML diagraming, object modeling
Object-oriented concepts
User story writing
Use case writing and analysis, user experience foundation
Business systems programming and analysis foundation
Strategic product road mapping
Business case development
Agile and project management methodologies
Contact:
If interested, please send your resume and a brief cover letter with
your salary expectations and availability to
Niranjjani Nadanasabapathy
HR/Recruiting Coordinator
2550 Great America Way,
Santa Clara, CA 95054
o: x 824
c:
e:
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['data modeling', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'data modeling', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Hi,
There is an urgent requirement for the following.
Please let me know your interest ASAP.
Position: Navision Business Analyst
The resource will be assisting the Microsoft Navision end users
1) Incidents Triaging within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area
2) Executing Standard Request within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area
3) Documenting the business requirements for the enhancements work
4) Participating in the Daily/Weekly Operational calls with IT and Business
5) Testing and Validating the fixes delivered by the Development team
Role Scope / Deliverables: ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Support Microsoft Navision and related software.
Knowledge of Sales and Distribution techniques, methods, and tools.
Subject matter best practices.
Knowledge of Microsoft Navision reporting capabilities.
Develop IT and end-user documentation for processes and procedures.
Participate in Service Desk function to resolve user related support calls.
Prepare and execute test plans for new functionality.
Publish communication related to the deployment of new functionality.
Translate user requests into user requirements and program specifications.
Work with Enterprise Shared Services and programmers to assure compliance to program specifications
Develop training outlines for end-users and collaborate with documentation specialists
Liaise with Divisional Management to understand direction within their functional area of responsibility
Monitor compliance with Service Level Agreements for site.
Support business initiatives utilizing Project Management expertise.
Travel can range from 25%-50%.
Gather user requirements to develop solutions and alternatives.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
Translate high-level information into details as well as summarize detailed information.
Communicate and collaborate with users to analyze information needs and functional requirements.
Collaborate with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Work with users to define concepts under direction of project leaders.
Serve as the conduit between the user community and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates.
Liaise between the business, technology teams and support teams.
Other duties as assigned.
Key Skills: Excellent knowledge of business processes and best practices.
Knowledge of Microsoft Navision in specified area ( MMPP & OM)
3-7 years of business experience in functional area.
2-4 years of Microsoft Navision experience.
4 year degree or 5-7 years' experience in related area.
Relevant technical certificates a plus.
4+ years of related technical work experience.
Strong interpersonal and excellent documentation skills are a must.
Able to assume and complete assignments independently.
Ability to explain and champion technical concepts to a broad audience.
Excellent customer service skills required.
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.
Strong project management skills and understanding of project management lifecycle.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
Swati Singh
Technical Recruiter
10 Austin Avenue, Iselin, NJ - 08830.
Direct: 732-369-4134
Fax: - 732.601.4641
swati.singh@xchangesoft.net
www.xchangesoft.com
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']"
BA,"The Customer Success Insights team is the Chief Data Office for CS and other functions.
As a Sr. Business Analyst, in the CS Chief Data Office, you will be part of a team building products and tools that leverage the value of customer data.
Core Responsibilities:
Play a key role in developing, delivering and maintaining inhouse products built on Tableau.
This will include helping with data validation and user acceptance testing.
Regularly interact with end-users of the Tableau dashboards: Understand key user requirements, answer data related questions and troubleshoot issues as needed.
Work with an India based development team to drive execution of the roadmap including enhancements to the existing product and development of new products.
Be the operational lead for the Customer Success Systems and Tools.
Be the point of contact for data related questions, identify and resolve data lineage issues and other operational issues.
Support role based access control and other administrative activities related to Systems & Tools.
Conduct ad hoc analyses and run reports as needed to support the business.
Effectively communicate insights to Customer Success team members, Account managers, sales engineers and senior leadership.
Create documentation and deliver training on Customer Success tools to enable self-service for internal stakeholders.
Be the primary point of contact for Gainsight administration.
((Experience with Gainsight or other SaaS tools are needed)
Must Have Tableau with Salesforce or Gainsight
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $65,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year
Experience:
business analyst: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['tableau', 'salesforc']","['dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'salesforc', 'dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Businesss Analyst
WebEx Interview
Level: Mid level
Rate: $50-$60, C2C or W2
MUST have 6+ left if on H1B visa.
Must have the following experience.
Requirements:
Experience in driving projects, working with global teams and stalkholders.
5+ years of hands on experience.
5+ years of WebMethods experience
Core Java 2-5 years Is Required
EDI 5-10 years Is Required
EDIFACT At least 1 year Is Required
EDIINT 5-10 years Is Required
Unix/Bash At least 1 year Is Required
Nice to Have:
Mandarin speaking skills is a plus
","['unix', 'java']",[None],999.0,"['unix', 'java']"
BA,"Cupertino, CA
Position
Requires availability for meetings on-site, primarily in the Cupertino/Sunnyvale area, on multiple days each week.
Requirements
2+ years of Business Intelligence or data analytics experience
Senior-level Tableau knowledge and experience
Business analysis and requirements gathering
Data visualization - building dashboards and interactive visualizations via best practices in data presentation and UX design
Advising and training clients on potential effective uses of Tableau
Experience aggregating data from multiple sources
Experience scrubbing and importing Microsoft Excel and CSV data sources
Experience with at least two common SQL data sources (e.g.
SQL Server, MySQL or PostgreSQL)
Sourcing data from REST APIs
Ability to manage multiple projects and tasks
PREFERRED SKILLS
Tableau certification
Strong background in database structures and database development
Scripting/automation
Training, teaching, and/or business presentation experience
Experience with other analytics or visualization tools
FileMaker platform familiarity
Benefits
Competitive compensation, including a retirement plan and an excellent healthcare package with vision and dental.
Two main Bay Area offices full of friendly people: one in the center of Oakland (near BART) and one in the heart of Cupertino.
Support for employee productivity and continued learning in the forms of hardware, software, learning materials, training, and conferences.
Beez contribute in all the ways they want and can.
Looking forward to hearing from you!
Do you know someone who might be interested?
Let them know!
","['postgresql', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'mysql', 'tableau']","['healthcar', 'bay', 'data', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'hardwar']",999.0,"['postgresql', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'healthcar', 'bay', 'data', 'dashboard', 'busi', 'visual', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Responsible for maintaining the reporting structure and loading of head count data.
Responsible for the jobs and report updating processes.
Install software and simple desktop support for Finance.
Support the release-to- schedules and the monthly close process.
",[None],"['financ', 'data']",999.0,"['financ', 'data']"
BA,"What this job involves
The Business Analyst will be part of the Azara Product Management team, working to develop and deliver against a product roadmap for the AZARA product.
This position requires a high degree of collaborative and technical skills.
The role requires a high energy, intellectually curious, detail oriented professional with excellent time management, research, content management, analytical, problem¬-solving, project management, organizational, collaboration and technology skills.
The role also requires a variety of technical and business skills.
Participate in product roadmap discussions with the Azara Product Management team to identify and create requirements for priorities
Participate in user-facing discussions to understand and prioritize product feature needs
Work closely with Subject Matter Experts and internal contacts to define detailed reporting and
analytics requirements
Work closely with active product users to identify and understand needs and opportunities to modify or change existing content – changes to visualizations, new features, metric improvements
Work with Engineering to identify and test source data
Work with Engineering to develop, test and deliver reporting and analytics content
Form partnerships with identified contacts and subject matter experts
Work with partners to understand and document reporting and analytics needs
Create detailed requirements
Design or iterate through design process of early stage mockups of solutions to meet requirements
Investigate existing data sources to clearly define metrics and calculations
Prototype new components, reports and features as necessary
Collaborate with partners to finalize new components for inclusion in the Azara product
Identify and specify product feature requirements, documenting details of needs for development by Engineering team
Create or manage creation of user documentation for new components
EXPERIENCE & SKILLS
3+ years’ experience in corporate real estate or related fields
3+ years’ experience in IT or technology fields
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Business, Information Technology or related field required.
MBA or Master's degree in related field preferred.
Strong understanding of data warehousing, cloud computing, data architecture
Skill and experience managing change management projects/programs
Experienced in data management, data analysis and data integration
Excellent people skills and ability to interact with a wide range of client staff and demands
California Residents only
If you are viewing this on a mobile device you may want to view the CCPA version on a larger device.
This email is only to request an accommodation.
","['excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'information technology', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Hi
Hope you are doing great
Technical Business Analyst /Data Analyst
Duration : 12+month contract
Required Skills:
Candidate must have banking experience.
8+ years of business/Data Analytics experience with Data Mapping, Data Lineage with strong SQL and UAT testing experience.
Must have 10+ years of Informatician and SQL experience.
AWS is nice to have.
The Business/Data Analyst will Create SQL Queries to pull the data than transfer the data from Data Lake to the AWS cloud.
Use SQL Queries to gather data from Various lines of business and transfer from the Data Lake to the AWS cloud platform.
They will be required to complete the data lineage, data quality, and data mapping to ensure that none of the data is lost in the transfer.
Than the BA/DA will complete the UAT and Data Validation testing.
","['aw', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['aw', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Need 6+ years of experience in Business/product analyst
Should have a experience in Payments/Finance background
Immediate to senior level position
",[None],"['financ', 'busi']",999.0,"['financ', 'busi']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Tax Terms: W2-Contract
Visa: USC, Green Card and H4-EAD
Duration: 12+ Months
Essential Duties and Job Functions:
This BA will interact with the IT teams, operations teams
Documentation experience is required
Gathering requirements from business stakeholders and preparing specifications for use by IT development teams
Prior experience in the Retail sector
Interfacing with project development team members to communicate / clarify business requirements
Meeting with business users to gather / document requirements for enhancements
Tracking of enhancements and any requirements changes
Good analysis / documentation / communication skills
Education: minimum bachelors required
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"• Effectively carry out the translation of business requirements into functional specifications to satisfy the business needs and necessary system modifications
• Interact with the business users and work closely with them to understand their business needs and opportunities
• Undertake requirement elicitation, document and analysis, solution design, testing definition and execution
• Supporting and implementing various development projects
• Document the enhancement recommendations from project managers and business stakeholders and evaluate site design and functionality
• Effectively analyze and monitor the services, market trends, and requirements
• Undertake conversion of data to the new system and work with the application support personnel for the implementation of system software
• Coordinate effectively with the stakeholders and technical staff
• Ability to write clear reports and maintain the important records
• Effective organizational and management skills
Experience: Above 6 Years
Skills Required: COMMERCE BUSINESS ANALYST
Roles:
• 6+ years of overall experience in handling B2B eCommerce projects as a Business Analyst
• EDA Industry experience
• Effective organizational and management skills
• Expert in time management and the ability for achieving the given tasks within the allocated time frame
• Expert judgment and decision making skills
• Education: B.Tech.
or Equivalent
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"This role Will be involved in BAT UAT and work with Product owners.
Arunkumar, 408-484-3155
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Job Title : COMMERCE BUSINESS ANALYST
Duration : 6 Month
LinkedIn
Effectively carry out the translation of business requirements into functional specifications to satisfy the business needs and necessary system modifications
Interact with the business users and work closely with them to understand their business needs and opportunities
Undertake requirement elicitation, document and analysis, solution design, testing definition and execution
Supporting and implementing various development projects
Document the enhancement recommendations from project managers and business stakeholders and evaluate site design and functionality
Effectively analyze and monitor the services, market trends, and requirements
Undertake conversion of data to the new system and work with the application support personnel for the implementation of system software
Coordinate effectively with the stakeholders and technical staff
Ability to write clear reports and maintain the important records
Effective organizational and management skills
Roles:
8 years of overall experience in handling B2B eCommerce projects as a Business Analyst
EDA Industry experience
Effective organizational and management skills
Expert in time management and the ability for achieving the given tasks within the allocated time frame
Expert judgment and decision making skills
Education: B.Tech.
or Equivalent
",[None],"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Senior Business Analyst (Customer Success) - Remote / Telecommute
Job Type: Contract
Core Responsibilities:
Play a key role in developing, delivering, and maintaining inhouse products built on Tableau.
This will include helping with data validation and user acceptance testing.
Regularly interact with end-users of the Tableau dashboards - Understand key user requirements, answer data-related questions, and troubleshoot issues as needed.
Work with an India based development team to drive execution of the roadmap including enhancements to the existing product and development of new products.
Be the point of contact for data-related questions, identify and resolve data lineage issues, and other operational issues.
Conduct ad hoc analyses and run reports as needed to support the business.
Effectively communicate insights to Customer Success team members, Account managers, sales engineers, and senior leadership.
Create documentation and deliver training on Customer Success tools to enable self-service for internal stakeholders.
Be the primary point of contact for Gainsight administration.
Collaborate with the business, product managers, and the insights engineering team to establish prioritized analytics and dashboards backlog.
Implement processes for executing the development, measuring progress, and communicating results.
Requirements:
Undergraduate degree preferably in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Computer Science, Engineering, or related degree.
Experience in implementing and managing SaaS, BI, Analytics applications, and reporting tools (such as Salesforce, Tableau) at enterprise scale.
Fluency in SQL, Python.
Experience working with databases and data sets.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Proven ability to independently lead analyses to support the business.
Experience in user requirement gathering, leading the prototype for all BI initiatives.
Proficient with building models, driving analyses using Excel, and other tools.
Strong oral and written communication skills.
Experience in working on / managing cross-functional projects.
Preferred Qualifications:
Proven record of working effectively with cross-functional teams at all levels with the organization.
Ability to work with different team members to design processes and implement strategic projects that solve business challenges.
Prior experience working with Salesforce and Salesforce report.
The high energy level and “can do” attitude.
Self-starter who is comfortable with ambiguity and working in a fast-paced, change-oriented environment.
Proven ability to balance multiple projects and priorities.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills including the ability to develop and deliver executive-level presentations.
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'bi', 'tableau', 'python']","['dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'python', 'dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Mobile Equipment Maintenance and Engineering Business Data Analyst, PC Maintenance
These responsibilities will include writing purchase order request, general office administrative duties, maintaining fleet logs, creating daily, weekly, monthly quarterly and annual reports in reference to the health of the department on efficiency of KPI's, as well as financial health and budgeting forecast.
The ideal candidate for this position can demonstrate a history of being well organized, have a strong understanding of Microsoft Office, is PC literate, and able to learn new systems with ease.
Work responsibilities will require the candidate to work in the repair shop areas, on the factory floor, and in an office environment.
Responsibilities
Assist with writing technical documents
Manage rental fleet purchase orders and inventory
Maintain office supplies
Set up vendor accounts as required
Updating progress reports for ongoing projects
Track and maintain supplier records
5's Project support
Requirements
Outstanding written and verbal communication skills
Proven excellent computer skills and be able to demonstrate proficiency with MS Office products (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, etc.)
Specifically, Microsoft Excel intermediate skill level a must.
Demonstrated ability to work in a fast-paced office environment, able to multi task, meet critical deadlines with eye for accuracy and attention to details
Daily reconciliation of accruals and management of allocated funds to maintain health of the department's financial health.
Monthly meeting with vendors to ensure accurate accrual of all allocated finds accounted for.
Ability to work with all levels of project staff and organization
Willingness to be hands on with projects throughout the shops.
Willing to learn and understand the business KPI's to assist in forecasting future operations to drive efficiency.
Willingness to accept further expansion of this role as needed for the department's growth.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'kpi', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'kpi', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
Qg3RiDJlEU
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"RSUs!!
Are you a fit?
Salary: $100,000 - $120,000
If you like problem-solving and project management and enjoy working in a fast-paced environment, please read on!
Winners of numerous industry awards
Late-stage startup with RSUs offered
High exposure to executives with tons of growth opportunities
Job Details
Responsibilities:
Gather business & functional requirements, including use cases, user stories and wire-frames prior to project
Responsible for conducting User Acceptance Testing and end user training
Manage point and click administration and configuration for Salesforce CRM system
Work closely with business users and managers throughout the project, through completion
Assist in data loading needs and formatting
Requirements:
4+ years experience in Salesforce as Admin/Project Manager, Business Analyst, or similar role
Experience with Salesforce application integrations
Experience using Sales Cloud, Service Cloud preferred
3+ years Third Party Application experience (Skilljar, Marketo, etc)
Interested in hearing more?
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['end user', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'end user', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Responsibilities:
Operational monitoring of proprietary systems integrated with multiple wholesale power markets (ISOs/RTOs).
Identifying issues and working with the Product , Development, and Account Management teams to implement and test fixes.
Maintaining and customizing existing applications, ensuring maximum performance, and identifying ways to streamline daily operational monitoring and issue resolution, including the need for new or enhanced monitoring and analyst tools by defining business requirements.
Assisting in quality assurance for new features and applications.
Reviewing external documentation and regulations and determining the impact to existing systems, or the changes required to support new initiatives.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university.
Familiarity with software development and testing, or demonstrated experience in a technical field.
Familiarity with various technical languages and tools such as SQL, REST APIs, json, and XML (C# and HTML would be nice-to-have).
Preferred:
Minimum one year work experience in the wholesale power industry.
Hands-on experience with Sheduling/Settlement processes and using ISO system/portal in one or more of the following ISOs/RTOs: CAISO, MISO, PJM, ISO-NE, NYISO, SPP, ERCOT.
Experience working for or with electric utilities.
Experience with Agile/SCRUM development and using Visual Studio will be helpful.
Experience with systems integration, data warehousing, and data analysis.
Skills/Abilities:
High degree of analytical thinking and great attention to detail and sense of urgency.
Ability to take ownership of tasks and processes and drive them to completion.
Clear and Concise Oral and Written Communication.
Ability to work with technical programmers as well as external clients.
High proficiency with computers and mainstream application such as Microsoft Excel.
Commitment to customer service excellence.
Foster teamwork and collaboration.
Adhere to Business Processes and Work Flows.
Ability to multitask, meet deadlines and adapt to changing and evolving work environment priorities and demands in a fast-paced environment.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
business analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
APX.com
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'sql']","['data', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data warehousing']",1.0,"['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'data warehousing']"
BA,"Exposure to install base and service contracts (Oracle Apps CRM preferred)
Hands-on experience in business requirements analysis and documentation (preferably within Cisco)
Track record of having delivered projects within Cisco as a BA
Soft skills - good influencing skills a big plus
Excellent written and communication skills
Ability to present to stakeholders and get buy-in from senior management for projects
Six sigma a plus
","['excel', 'oracl']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"MUST HAVE EXPERIENCE WITH PHARMA DOMAIN
Desired Education/Skills:
Experience in leading projects preferred
Works independently on large, complex projects as a project leader
Demonstrate advanced organizational business understanding
Exercise independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance with broad scope and complexity
Perform assigned tasks of high complexity using established procedures, standards, and guidelines
Advanced presentation and facilitation skills
Ability to communicate and influence organizational change and gain organizational support
Is looked upon to strategize with and influence senior leadership on business related matters
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $50.00 - $87.00 per hour
Benefits:
Health Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Requirements definition and documentation
Work with customers and client stakeholders to understand and define business requirements
Work directly with technologists to develop use cases and functional specifications documents
Solicit, gather, and analyze, user input and requirements
Identify and involve key stakeholders
Identify and interview internal/external subject matter experts
Author and compile surveys
Interface with technical managers and teams
Collaborate with counterparts in IT (project, development, QA managers) and development resources to create and business requirements and project specification documents
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Job Title: Technical Business Analyst- Veeva
Client: Pharmaceutical, TBA
Pay Rate: $60- $65 pr.
Hr.
on W2 plus health, dental, vision insurance, 401k and PTO
Collaborate with internal and external stakeholders in requirements gathering/documentation, functional design, IT testing, coordinating user testing and providing as needed functional production support.
Initially this will focus on gathering and documenting requirements from the business.
Hiring Manager’s Notes
Open to look at candidates willing to relocate?
Yes, but local preferred
Years of experience/education and/or certifcations required:
BS degree and at least 5 + years equivalent experience
What are the top 3-5 skills requirements should this person have?
Project implemetation: Salesforce.com Veeva CRM
Biotech/Pharma Lifescience-Strongly preferred
What is a nice to have (but not required)
Documentation Skils
Develoment experience
Training Experience
Training Material creation
What type of environment is this person working in?
Group setting and Individual Setting
Work Schedule: to Friday 8-5 on site (After Shelter in place order is lifted)
Does this position offer the ability to work remotely on a regular basis or is it an on-site role?
If remote opportunity exists, what are the options (i.e.
1 day remote, 4 days on-site)?
No
Will there be Domestic and/or International Travel?
If yes, list proposed countries and % of time travelling: No
Powered by JazzHR
rVwdt6ZOxm
",[None],['busi'],1.0,['busi']
BA,"About the Role:
This role will manage activities around requirements gathering, analysis, documentation and communication to the development teams, as well as, the facilitation of business acceptance of new product, technology or process improvement releases.
The responsibilities of the individual in this position include:
Work as part of project teams implementing business solutions across the Investment Division
Create comprehensive business requirements used in the development of new processes or technology solutions
Work closely with the internal client teams to ensure understanding and proper implementation of requirements
Manage small projects and/or sub-teams of a project.
Estimate, plan, manage and execute projects or parts of projects
Create test cases, conduct acceptance testing and verify production completeness
Properly document and transition support of new business technology processes to IT
The successful candidate will have extensive demonstrable skills and experiences including the following:
Masterâs Degree
0-1 years Business Analyst experience
Strong experience in eliciting, documenting and communicating product/solution requirements, and liaising between business and implementation teams Experience with using SQL and Excel to query and analyze data
Experience in the investment management industry or data provision to the investment community
Strong ability to multi-task and exceptional organizational abilities
High attention to detail and accuracy
Strong experience in working with business applications to improve business outcomes
Exceptional written, verbal and presentation communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work effectively with associates on potentially tough issues, and the ability to provide guidance and assistance in effecting solutions/results
Powered by JazzHR
","['excel', 'sql']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Salesforce admin or equivalent certification required.
Ability to gather and transfer requirements from stakeholders into an action plan and deliver on that action plan leveraging internal systems as needed.
Attention to detail with the ability to analyze and solve complex problems as well as provide documentation, guidance, and instruction to users.
Ability to manage stakeholder expectations professionally.
Ability to work independently, with general direction and guidance.
Self-motivated, flexible, team player with solid multi-tasking, time management organization expertise with the ability to manage multiple and often changing priorities.
Proficient in Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio.
Look for ways to continuously improve processes procedures.
Manage and support operations related initiatives identified by the Professional Services management team.
Provide project and monthly metrics coordination and support.
Work with team to understand and prioritize field requests.
Manage the queue to provide prompt support to end users including consulting ecosystem to resolve issues and address questions.
System testing of new functionality or bug fixes.
Thank you.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'salesforc']",['end user'],999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'salesforc', 'end user']"
BA,"DUTIES:
Act as the liaison between the Program Manager and project team to define business requirements, build test scenarios and establish a business requirements traceability matrix.
Work closely with Project Management, Product Owners, Developers, Quality Assurance and Application Engineering teams to complete and/or support project deliverables related to business case, business analysis, use cases, delivery management, test plans & test cases, test execution, user training guide, post go live support management, and project management & communications activities.
Support teams to implement software requirements and communicate system enhancements.
Manage deliverables for initiatives and adhere to development methodologies.
Assist in the development of user story scenarios and high level business requirements and detailed system & functional requirements.
Conduct research and analysis into the nature, effect and results of system problems.
Consult frequently with internal users to ensure a complete understanding of their needs and concerns.
Conduct meetings and presentations with stakeholders and business users.
Effectively communicate insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Provide support for any tool issues or challenges that may arise.
Provide ongoing reporting as requested by the business.
Collaborate with leads to tackle ongoing issues list and partner on continuous improvement with enhancements.
Ability to work cross functionally with other departments to achieve goals.
REQUIREMENTS:
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree in a technical or business related field required.
4+ years of experience in a successful and professional business/systems analysis and project/program management roles.
4+ years of well developed verbal, written and listening skills.
Exceptional analytical and conceptual thinking skills.
The ability to influence stakeholders and work closely with them to determine acceptable solutions.
Excellent documentation, planning, organization, and communication skills to achieve stated objectives.
Experience creating detailed reports and giving presentations.
A track record of following through on commitments.
Excellent planning, organizational, and time management skills.
Ability to work & contribute independently and drive results & desired outcomes in a team-oriented work environment.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong analytical and organizational skills, detail orientation, and interpersonal skills.
Strong group / workshop facilitation skills.
Ability to lead cross-functional teams to deliver project results.
3+ years of relevant experience in MDM, Data Governance, and Data Quality domains
3+ years of supply chain experience.
Advanced competency in G-Suite applications, primarily Slides & Sheets.
EDUCATION:
BA or BS
",['excel'],"['research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'research', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Required Skills Min of 10+ yr. experience with Data Analysis Experience in large Multi-year Data cleansing and Migration projects Hands on experience writing data quality rules with business Testing and reconciliation of pre and post clean up Researching and documenting existing legacy application process and data flows, business needs and data models.
Hands on Talend data management experience especially in profiling data.
Experienced in creating reconciliation and data migration reports.
Good communications and end user interviewing skills to gather requirements from business SME in government organization.
Ready to work in GDD model (work with India team in different time zones) Talend Certified preferred.
",[None],"['data', 'cleans', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['data', 'cleans', 'end user', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams.
Powered by JazzHR
wZcEetMwun
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Posted: Apr 13, 2020
Weekly Hours: 40
Role Number:
200157401
Imagine what you could do here.
Bring passion and dedication to your job and there's no telling what you could accomplish.
The Retail Fulfillment Operations (RFO) team strives to provide cutting-edge innovation and operational excellence for best-in-class customer experience.
This role will have a combination of business insight and technical knowledge, used to develop and deliver reporting and analysis enabling rapid decision-making.
Key Qualifications
Experience: Data Analyst, Project Management, Operations, Supply Chain, Retail (stores and eCommerce).
Candidates with knowledge of SQL, Teradata, Tableau, Alteryx, and Excel.
Job :
Develop, maintain, and own robust reporting KPI’s that help to guide the business and measure success.
Build and create new reporting needs for both online/retail operations teams.
Experience with applying techniques to provide solutions to real business problems.
Specialist in taking complex data and helping to make it easily understood for business and technical teams.
Understanding of how to build business cases and defining how large/small a problem is.
Collaborate with business intelligence teams to build global reporting needs for business teams.
Understanding and ability to deep dive operational data and make recommendations to peers and leadership.
Support development of predictive models and simulations with partnerships with advanced analytics teams.
Serve as a liaison between online and retail teams in sales, finance, logistics, procurement, and operations teams.
Establish a global WBR, MBR, and QBR structure and build a sustainable metrics platform.
A team player with a “hands-on” and “can do” attitude that can influence through collaboration and leadership.
Being able to work effectively with other teams and taking them along for the journey is critical.
Analytical, curious and creative attitude.
Cut through ambiguity and be able to find a path or solution rather than waiting or deferring responsibility.
Excellence and a keen eye for detail should be a habit.
Experience in analytics and comfortable with large data sets and knowledge of relational databases.
Superb communication and presentation skills (keynote, xls).
Ability to make critical decisions and deliver results under extremely tight timelines.
Passion for the customer experience.
Education & Experience
Minimum 5 years experience in a data analytics or a supply chain analyst role,
E-commerce, inventory management, strategic data solutions, and supply chain
BS/BA degree required.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'sql']","['data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'sql', 'data', 'logist', 'kpi', 'financ', 'predict', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst, Sunnyvale Manufacturing
Business Context: This position will support Sunnyvale Manufacturing
Introduction to the role:The Analyst helps identify business processes that could be significantly improved or accelerated with the addition of data analytics tools including Excel, Power BI dashboards, or simple code (VBA/Python).
The focus of this position is to work closely with cross-functional units to gain an in-depth understanding of business strategy, processes, services, roadmaps and the context in which the business operates.
Key deliverables will be to gather, analyze, and report data to support operational goals and drive efficiency.
The Business Analyst will be responsible for reviewing business processes from end-to-end and identifying areas of the business where increased reporting / data visibility could accelerate or improve decision making.
Responsibilities will include a full range of activities from leading small to mid-size projects to assisting other project managers on larger more complex projects related to operational business functions.
ESSENTIAL JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Track and report key organizational performance metrics (regular reporting)
Update and enhance previously developed reporting systems
Identify and develop new reporting to drive operational improvement
Analyze production output, efficiency and utilized capacity
Support production management to forecast required manufacturing personnel
Analyze and highlight reoccurring issues in the production process Gather data for monthly operations review and work with senior business analyst to present the data and insights to upper management
Create dashboards in Microsoft Power BI / TIBCO Spotfire to empower various stakeholders across the business to make good business decisions
Collaborate cross-functionally to identify pain points and enable change
Project management
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Education or Experience (in years):
Bachelors degree with 2+ years of related work experience OR
Masters degree in field with 0-2 years of related work experience.
Knowledge and skills:
Assess business process and system inefficiencies while identifying improvement opportunities (proactive and reactive)
Ability to analyze and synthesize business requirements, including recognizing patterns and conceptualizing processes
Good analytical skills to perform root cause analysis, interpret data, and resolve issues
Elicit and clearly document business and systems requirements
Demonstrated fluency in business processes and process differentiation
Understand and negotiate needs and expectations of multiple stakeholders while using strong project management, ability to successfully manage multiple tasks at any given point
Must have experience working on large scale projects as well as handling day-to-day operational requests from the business
Proven ability to build bridges cross-functionally even when resistance is met
Proven Microsoft Excel skills (Pivot Tables, High Level Formulas: SUMIFS, VLOOKUP, HLOOKUP, INDEX/MATCH, etc.)
Experience creating dashboards in Power BI, TIBCO Spotfire, or similar visualization software
Ability to multi-task and meet completion commitments
Physical requirements/abilities:
Duties of this position include occasional access to the controlled manufacturing environment with exposure to noise, automation equipment, gowning procedures, etc.
Duties of this position require sustained concentration to computer focus
PREFERRED REQUIREMENTS :
Bachelors degree with 1 to 3 years in an analytical field, preferably with a clear connection to business such as: Operations, Statistics, Finance, Marketing, or Economics or equivalent combination of experience and education
Medical device experience
SAP experience
SQL experience
VBA or other coding experience
SharePoint experience
They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills for this job.
Danaher Corporation and all Danaher Companies are equal opportunity employers that evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sex, age, marital status, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or other characteristics protected by law.
The EEO is the Law poster is available here.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'bi', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'econom']"
BA,"Position-
Salesforce Technical Architect
Software as Service professionals demonstrate skills and experience related to Software as a Service (SaaS) - software delivery model in which software and associated data are centrally hosted on the cloud.
Salesforce.com professionals demonstrate skills in Salesforce.com which is the leader in CRM solutions for customer relationship management software and cloud computing.
As the successful candidate, you will be able to design technical architecture solutions that span multiple platforms and include integration and authentication across systems; manage the development lifecycle to ensure the delivery of highly secure solutions that are optimized for performance and built to scale; articulate design considerations, trade-offs, benefits, and recommendations for a technical architecture.
As the Technical Architect, you will have support from the Global Delivery Group as well as from local support resources provided by the global team.
Key Responsibilities:
- Collaborate with Functional team to determine how best to implement solution (decisions around declarative vs programmatic vs AppExchange, etc.).
- Escalation point for technical issues.
- Solution components that are outside of the Salesforce platform:
- Expert platform knowledge.
- Security.
- Integration (including a technology/not just) and data Migration.
- End to End Technical Solutions.
- Play TA role on projects: typically, part-time on more than 1 project at a time.
- People Manager have regular 1-on-1s, perform annual reviews, etc.
- Sales Support: Help scope, solution, and estimate sales opportunities alongside a delivery lead.
Assist in SOW creation, etc.
- Practice Development: Mentor resources, take on leadership roles to expand overall practice capabilities, etc.
Basic Qualifications:
- A minimum of 2 years of experience developing Salesforce customizations (Apex/VF), integrations, and developing and executing data migrations.
- A minimum of 2 years of experience creating the technical architecture for complex Salesforce implementations.
- A minimum of 5 years of experience in technology implementation for full lifecycle enterprise software projects.
Preferred Skills:
- Strong background in Cloud Computing solutions – cloud computing strategy, systems design, implementation and management.
- Demonstrated knowledge of XML, SQL, HTTP/HTTPS, and EAI processes.
- Familiarity with multiple implementation standards and methodologies.
- Programming Languages – APEX, VisualForce, Familiarity with ANT and Eclipse tools for working with the IDE.
- Salesforce.com and other certifications, required.
- Very strong work ethic with a customer service focus (high intensity).
- Bachelor’s degree in a related field preferred.
Professional Skill Requirements:
- Proven ability to build, manage and foster a team-oriented environment.
- Proven ability to work creatively and analytically in a problem-solving environment Desire to work in an information systems environment.
- Excellent communication (written and oral) and interpersonal skills.
- Excellent leadership and management skills.
Position-
Business System Analyst/ Administrator
Position Overview:
The Sales Systems team is looking for a detail and process-oriented Business Analyst to work closely with business owners to deliver on individual projects for the line of business teams.
He or she will drive cross-functional teams through requirement gathering sessions and document the business requirements.
He or she will be responsible for collaborating with partners and development teams to execute solution delivery.
The ideal candidate has demonstrated success in a business analyst role and has five years of SFDC experience.
Responsibilities:
Build strong partnerships and relationships with business and technical leaders.
Function as a business analyst that is accountable for business requirements gathering and documentation, writing user acceptance testing script and oversee and participate in testing of Sales Systems projects of varying complexity.
Partner with cross-functional teams and Sales Systems project teams to produce requirements and design for business capabilities that align with business and technology strategies.
Develop visual current state and end state business architecture models that can be leveraged in the analysis required for various technology project opportunities – includes the maintenance of roles and capabilities and the decomposition of business processes.
Identify solutions using standard analysis techniques such as business process and information flow modeling, case analysis, workflow analysis, functional decomposition analysis.
Skill/Experience/Education:
Mandatory:
4+ years of business process analysis and system design experience in sales processes.
3+ years of experience using and configuring Salesforce.com CRM as a business analyst.
Desired:
Undergraduate degree: Bachelor of Science / Bachelor of Arts.
Experience using multiple software development methodologies including one of the following: Waterfall or Agile/SCRUM.
Outstanding leadership, facilitation and problem-solving skills.
Ability to effectively collaborate and influence at all levels of the organization.
A broad enterprise-wide view of the business and varying degrees of appreciation of strategy, processes, and capabilities, enabling technologies and governance.
Strong situational analysis and decision-making abilities.
The ability to visualize and create high-level models (rigorous information-rich diagrams) that can be used in future analysis to extend and mature the business architecture.
Experience working in a fast-paced, high-growth, and results-orientated environment that demands excellence.
Ability to succeed in a highly collaborative team environment with multiple in-flight initiatives and stakeholders.
Exceptional communication skills and the demonstrable ability to communicate appropriately at all levels of the organization; this includes written and verbal communications as well as visualizations.
Position-
Salesforce Developer
Manage day to day development activities on the salesforce.com platform using Apex and Visual Force
Support the creation of customizations and integrations required to solution delivery
Configure the Salesforce.com application based on the business requirements
Develop custom applications using apex, visualforce, JavaScript, AJAX, HTML, CSS
Develop estimates for projects
Work closely with other developers in the team, business analyst, QA analyst and project managers.
Research Salesforce.com capabilities as needed to suit business requirements, and provide gap analysis
Certifications
Certified Salesforce Developer
Certified Salesforce Administrator
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $74,362.00 - $250,000.00 per year
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Salesforce: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
Varies
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Multiple locations
Fully Remote
","['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'javascript', 'cloud']","['data', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'javascript', 'cloud', 'data', 'account', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Role: Navision Business Analyst
Client : Thermo Fisher Scientific
Rate : 60 per hour max on C2C and $55/hr on W-2
The resource will be assisting the Microsoft Navision end users
1) Incidents Triaging within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area
2) Executing Standard Request within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area
3) Documenting the business requirements for the enhancements work
4) Participating in the Daily/Weekly Operational calls with IT and Business
5) Testing and Validating the fixes delivered by the Development team
Role Scope / Deliverables: ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES include the following.
Other duties may be assigned.
Support Microsoft Navision and related software.
Knowledge of Sales and Distribution techniques, methods, and tools.
Subject matter best practices.
Knowledge of Microsoft Navision reporting capabilities.
Develop IT and end-user documentation for processes and procedures.
Participate in Service Desk function to resolve user related support calls.
Prepare and execute test plans for new functionality.
Publish communication related to the deployment of new functionality.
Translate user requests into user requirements and program specifications.
Develop training outlines for end-users and collaborate with documentation specialists
Liaise with Divisional Management to understand direction within their functional area of responsibility
Monitor compliance with Service Level Agreements for site.
Support business initiatives utilizing Project Management expertise.
Travel can range from 25%-50%.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
Translate high-level information into details as well as summarize detailed information.
Communicate and collaborate with users to analyze information needs and functional requirements.
Collaborate with developers and subject matter experts to establish the technical vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Work with users to define concepts under direction of project leaders.
Serve as the conduit between the user community and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Develop requirements specifications according to standard templates.
Liaise between the business, technology teams and support teams.
Other duties as assigned.
Key Skills: Excellent knowledge of business processes and best practices.
Knowledge of Microsoft Navision in specified area ( MMPP & OM)
3-7 years of business experience in functional area.
2-4 years of Microsoft Navision experience.
4 year degree or 5-7 years' experience in related area.
Relevant technical certificates a plus.
4+ years of related technical work experience.
Strong interpersonal and excellent documentation skills are a must.
Able to assume and complete assignments independently.
Ability to explain and champion technical concepts to a broad audience.
Excellent customer service skills required.
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements.
Strong project management skills and understanding of project management lifecycle.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz', 'end user']"
BA,"As a Business Systems Analyst you will support the technology and processes that help run an efficient HR organization.
Responsibilities:
Work on system enhancements that improve the employee and business partner experience while maximizing the use of Workday system features and functionality
Support the definition and documentation of business requirements, processes and use cases
Participate in all test phases – unit, system and user acceptance; draft and execute test scripts to ensure no defects are released into production
Assist in the rollout of new functionality including the completion of workflow diagrams and support of pre and post-launch implementation activities
Provide communications to project members on progress and issues; assist in providing regular communications to end users and stakeholders
Support use of the Workday system, troubleshoot system issues and provide detailed analysis for resolution
Qualifications:
2 years experience with Workday HCM required
5+ years experience in HR, HRIT or related field
5+ years experience utilizing and/or supporting HR systems
Strong systems knowledge and aptitude to learn systems quickly
Demonstrated program ownership and delivery on commitments - great organizational skills with exceptional follow through and attention to detail
Has examples of improving operational processes and procedures, has the ability to drive program efficiency and high levels of customer satisfaction
Experience identifying and resolving issues
Customer service orientation with a desire to exceed expectations
Excellent written and verbal communications skills - ability to interface with all levels of the organization
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
6 month project
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"As an IT Business Analyst, your goals are:
2) to assist in reducing operational expense by analyzing costs and expenses
You will need both hard technical skills, as well as soft communication skills to analyze and communicate frequently with teammates in-person, by phone and by email.
As a regular full-time employee, you will have access to benefits including medical, dental and vision insurance; paid time off; paid sick leave and 401K.
Performance and compensation are reviewed at least annually.
As this position reports directly to the management team, you will be in a position to grow and take on more responsibility based on your performance.
Job Type: Full-time
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Perform business process analysis Health Care Insurance experience required.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst within the Sales Distribution functional area to be able to support the Sustaining Operations and Projects needs of the Navision business users.
The resource will be assisting the Microsoft Navision end users 1) Incidents Triaging within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area 2) Executing Standard Request within the Navision SD Functional Area and Navision MMPP Functional Area 3) Documenting the business requirements for the enhancements work 4) Participating in the DailyWeekly Operational calls with IT and Business 5) Testing and Validating the fixes delivered by the Development team
",['microsoft'],"['end user', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'end user', 'busi']"
BA,"Varian Medical Systems
https://www.varian.com/
6+ months
Milpitas, CA (Onsite interview required)
$55-67
Client needs a Business Analyst with Salesforce Cloud Services experience for a migration project.
Working in a software application project deliverable environment, candidate will have Salesforce functional experienceÂand understand the Salesforce Sales and Service cloud environment with previous experience in agile development projects.
Responsibilities
Requirements Documentation and delivery Functional testing and validation Determine program gaps in Salesforce.com development.
Help with systems integration requirements Build and develop customized reports and dashboards.
Workflow diagrams, functional maps and user stories, create wireframes
Areas of Focus
Support the design, implementation, and rollout of Salesforce releases Pro-actively identify areas of improvement and functional gaps in existing Salesforce.com setup
An understanding of contemporary requirements gathering, analysis, validation, and management practices.
Experience working with cross-functional teams across all levels of the organization.
Configure platform to meet requirements including installation and configuration of app exchange applications
Job Requirements
Experience as a Business Analyst or Technical Analyst working with the Salesforce Platform.
Good functional knowledge of Salesforceâs Sales and Service Cloud.
Experience configuring workflows and customizations for Salesforce implementation
Agile SCRUM development environment is preferred
Bachelors or Masterâs degree in computer science or related technical field or equivalent experience.
Excellent writing and verbal communication skills
","['excel', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'dashboard', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'dashboard', 'busi']"
BA,"Top 3 Daily Responsibilities:
Execute Analytics Reporting Requests Using LookML
Code Review LookML of other members of the team.
Required Experience/Skillsets:
3+ years of experience in Data Modeling with LookML and SQL
Experience with Looker, Salesforce CRM, Financial Analytics
Advanced understanding of SQL, LookML & Data Analysis
strong communication & stakeholder management
This is a 40 hr / wk consulting role that can go up to 2 years, and includes health insurance and related benefits.
Will start as a remote position due to COVID but will transition to onsite.
Can be based in New York, California, or other offices!
","['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc']","['commun', 'data', 'data modeling']",999.0,"['looker', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'commun', 'data', 'data modeling']"
BA,"Job: IT/Information Systems
Schedule: Full-time
Requisition ID: 201239
Opportunity:
Primary Function of Position:
As the Principal Business Analyst- Construction, this person will be responsible for collaborating with various internal and external groups to ensure that complex construction engineering projects are delivered on time and within budget.
Additional duties would also include extracting insights from large operational data sets related to strategic portfolio planning, workplace planning, occupancy planning, and construction projects.
The role will report to Sr.
Manager Corporate Operations FP&A and work in partnership with other team members (e.g., space planning, program management, finance, construction management, IT, workplace services, facilities management, real estate acquisitions, indirect procurement, building occupants, and executive leadership) to successfully track performance of ongoing and upcoming projects along with delivering operational insights.
In this role, assigned person will be performing following duties:
Develop dashboards of projects to provide insights related to project schedule, key progress indicators (KPIs), unit costs, and industry benchmarks.
Develop insights and reports for strategic planning, resource management, and continuous improvement.
Provide project controls support including comprehensive risk analysis of budgets and cost management of multiple projects.
Partner with a team of space planners, financial managers, project managers, and executive leadership to develop reports for tracking and measuring KPIs and operational insights.
Develop occupancy analysis reporting and dashboards to effectively communicate occupancy/vacancy ratios, capacity, department space trends, headcount projections, and workplace conditions.
Extract and organize data from sources such as occupancy planning tools, spreadsheets, and data bases to develop insights that help improve space utilization and efficiency.
Detailed Roles and Responsibilities:
PLANNING & CAPITAL/EXPENSE PROJECTS:
Support project teams in developing and maintaining project budgets, forecasts, cost plans and other financial information.
Analyze projects data to compare budgeted cost with accrued cost reports and utilize this data to monitor and track cash flow information related to financial metrics.
Participate in various ongoing strategic initiatives to develop new tools for planning, analysis and risk assessment of capital projects
Analyze projects data for cost and schedule to highlight trends and insights by developing custom reports and dashboards to help monitor and control projects throughout their life-cycle planning to execution phase.
STRATEGIC PORTFOLIO PLANNING:
Produce and maintain accurate and reliable supply and demand projection dashboards for space planning and potential future growth that will be reported to C-suite and other relevant stakeholders.
Partner with internal and external stakeholders to develop dashboards for business headcount forecasting, space tracking needs and metrics for budget allotment.
OCCUPANCY PLANNING AND WORKPLACE STRATEGY:
Analyze information for data integrity and consistency extracted from Computer Added Facilities Management (CAFM) system related to occupancy, space utilization and departmental allocation.
Develop occupancy analysis reporting and dashboards to effectively communicate occupancy/vacancy ratios, capacity, department space trends, headcount projections and workplace conditions.
Qualifications
Skill/Job Requirements:
Bachelors Degree in business, finance, civil engineering, or construction management from an accredited institution.
Masters Degree in business, civil engineering, or construction management preferred.
Experience in project controls of construction projects, space planning analytics, or related field
Excellent customer service skills including strong organizational, interpersonal and communication skills.
Strong analytical skills with experience in strategic planning, analysis, reporting, and KPI tracking.
Experience with data analytics tools for data visualization, business intelligence, and project controls such as Tableau, Excel, Smartsheet, Primavera P6, and SQL.
Detail-oriented, analytical, and capable of effectively assessing data.
Ability to work independently, as well as collaborate in a larger group.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Working knowledge/proficiency with project management, project controls concepts, computer applications such as scheduling software, financial tools, and spreadsheets.
Analysis of real estate and space related data, ability to identify trends and monitor performance
Financial and budget analysis experience.
Able to manage processes, relationships and influence effectively within a matrix organization
Ability to act as both a thought leader and operational expert around data visualization/reporting.
Ability to understand customer input in analysis and design; see issues, problems, or solutions that are not obvious to others; manage processes that are effective, easy to execute and replicate.
Ability to establish and meet goals, support and facilitate the work of others, and manage multiple projects/requests simultaneously with minimal direction.
Ability to quickly learn new tools, process improvement and change management.
","['tableau', 'excel', 'c', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['tableau', 'excel', 'c', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
uQ2fMCmOIs
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"With general supervision from the manager, the primary job function is to work largely independently to monitor, audit and analyze product performance, recognize opportunities and make recommendations to achieve overall profitability and growth in assigned states and line of business.
Provides assistance and contribute to product and pricing improvements and development of next-generation insurance products.
Essential Job Functions - Works independently to monitor, audit, and analyze product performance to identify issues and opportunities.
- Tests new rating models against existing ones to determine the performance of accuracy of prediction, loss ratio improvement, and segmentation.
- Provides assistance and contribute to product and pricing improvements and development of next-generation insurance products.
Recommends ideas to improve product offerings, process improvements, andor goal changes.
- Meets with management and team to present analysis needs Prepares reports, graphs, and charts based on research and analysis.
Operates within a project plan to incorporate business objectives, data scope, research methodology, resources, and timeframe.
- Serves as a contact for reporting needsissues regarding complex data.
Participates in the formation of business plans and forecasts and provides answers to questions about business data to appropriate business units.
Qualification - Bachelorrsquos degree in Business or related field of study - 3+ years of life insurance experience with product, pricing, underwriting, and insurance regulation knowledge.
- 3+ years of product management, product development andor analytical experience in insurance, consulting, or similar industry, or equivalent combination of educationexperience - Excellent communication, analytical and problem-solving skills - Proven history of taking the initiative and driving projects to completion - Analytical experience in life insurance domain Preferred qualification - Actuarial exams and designations (ACAS, FCAS, CERA) or risk and insurance designations from the Institutes (AINS, AIC, ARM, CPCU, etc.)
- Experience in defining digital transformation using AIML technologies - Strong understanding of Data Science and Analytics
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'supervis', 'graph', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend', 'segment']"
BA,"Desired Education/Skills:
Experience in leading projects preferred
Works independently on large, complex projects as a project leader
Demonstrate advanced organizational business understanding
Exercise independent judgment and discretion in matters of significance with broad scope and complexity
Perform assigned tasks of high complexity using established procedures, standards, and guidelines
Advanced presentation and facilitation skills
Ability to communicate and influence organizational change and gain organizational support Is looked upon to strategize with and influence senior leadership on business related matters
Responsibilities:
General Business Analysis
Develops communications needed to summarize analysis and to discuss recommendations for peers and executives.
Facilitates problems solving sessions and workshops with diverse set of business and technology team members.
Develops and creates enterprise wide level presentations for senior leadership; provides recommendations with supporting analysis collecting, monitoring, and measuring business performance financial, and operations
Proactively follows-up on issues and initiatives for senior leaders to ensure successful resolution and implementation
Works closely with leaders and other key stakeholders to ensure that key initiatives and activities are delivered in a timely and coordinated manner and aligned with the goals of the organization.
Manages the development, implementation and coordination of communication strategies and messaging for organizations and / or initiatives.
Acts as a thought leader, applying extensive unique subject matter expertise in the development of strategy or resolution of complex issues
Requires considerable direct exposure to senior leaders and is peer to organization leadership team
Build effective working relationships within and across IT, Business Finance, and other work groups
Metric Activities:
Manage bench marking efforts, coordinates support through IT departments
Works with IT and functional leadership to establish a variety of key business, financial and performance metrics
Create metrics and compile dashboards and reports; develop summary variance explanations and recommends remedial actions
Job Type: Contract
Pay: $79.00 - $97.00 per hour
Experience:
Business Analyst: 7 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
1 year
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",[None],"['dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['dashboard', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job title: Salesforce BSA with Service Cloud and Sales Cloud
Must have:
Salesforce BSA with 6-7 years of experience and who has worked on both sales + service cloud ( preferably has Apttus experience).
LinkedIn is Must
Job Type: Contract
Salary: $50.00 - $60.00 per hour
Experience:
Salesforce Business Analyst: 10 years (Required)
","['salesforc', 'cloud']",['busi'],999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'busi']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
Gl1DTorteU
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Roles and Responsibilities:
Support ISI's production and quality processes and all associated business systems functions.
Be able to lead and facilitate business user meetings to gather process information.
Create functional specifications, detailed design documents, testing scripts for SAP project and enhancements.
Conduct QA validations and User Acceptance Testing (UAT) tests.
Conduct deployment activities for projects and provide training to new users as required.
Skill/Job Requirements
Minimum of 8 years of experience in a full cycle implementation as well as in support projects.
Minimum of 5 years designing and configuring SAP PP modules knowledge of the key integration points between the other SAP modules
Minimum of 5 years designing and configuring SAP QM modules knowledge of the key integration points between the other SAP modules
6+ years related experience covering Business system analyst, and prior demonstrated implementation experience on at least one package ERP application.
SAP experience is required with a strong lead role in implementation is preferred
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent experience.
Hands on experience in Manufacturing, MRP (planning), Demand management, Inventory management.
Very conversant with a track record of implementing repetitive manufacturing business process supporting make to order and stock to order process.
Quality Management experience is required.
Production Execution: Should be very hands on with:
o Production Planning Master Data
o Production Order Types
o Production Order and Process Order Confirmation
o Working knowledge of PP/MM integration
o Discrete/Repetitive/Rework/Process Order execution configuration and process knowledge
With SAP Quality Management, the below skills are required :
o Sampling
o Info records
o Engineering workbench
o Inspection lot processing
o In Process/ GR/ recurring/Customer Return inspection
o Quality Certificates
o Quality Notifications
o Test Equipment management
Analyze business requirements and perform customizing, configuration, integration, upgrades, testing, documentation preparation, implementation and operational support for SAP Plant Maintenance module in the below areas:
o Master data
o Maintenance Notifications
o Maintenance Orders
o Calibration
Job Posting Type
Agency Recruited Worker Required
",['erp'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['erp', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Â
Ideal candidate should have started as a developer and moved to a Business Analyst role.
Candidate is not expected to write codes but should be able to understand technical details / specification while talking to team / developers / client stakeholders.
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Performing requirements analysis.
Documenting and communicating the results of your efforts.
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Ensuring solutions meet business needs and requirements.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Managing projects, developing project plans, and monitoring performance.
Updating, implementing and maintaining procedures.
Prioritizing initiatives based on business needs and requirements.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Managing competing resources and priorities.
Monitoring deliverable and ensuring timely completion of projects.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"10+ years of overall experience with a bachelor's degree in Computer Science or Business Management OR 8 years of overall experience and an advanced master's degree in Finance or Business management.
(MBA preferred) Experience working with Big 4 consulting is strongly desired.
Demonstrated experience of stakeholder management and should be able to comfortably interact with senior client managers Demonstrated proven knowledge and success with consulting, designing, implementing, supporting, and leading significant tracks on larger project or leading medium-sized consulting engagements.
Proven Ability to work at the senior management level on key cross-functional initiatives Strong analytical skills and an ability to ""think outside the box"" Excellent interpersonal, organizational, and communication skills and the ability to work effectively in a diverse corporate and client environment Demonstrated success presenting complex findings in a clear and compelling manner Proven ability to work with cross functional team in defining the business roadmap (full or MVP) Prior implementation Anaplan for at least 2 year Preferred Detail and action-oriented self-starter who is highly organized and methodical in approaching and processing to data and information Basic knowledge of sales and product management principles and practices a plus.
Superb written and oral communication skills.
Expert level Microsoft Excel and financial modeling skills.
Shows a passion for business analytics, modeling, and planning Aptitude for quickly ramping up on new technology and processes.
Clear understanding of open source technology components and their usage in building technology led capabilities for business use.
Proven track record of delivering projects on time and on budget while communicating with stakeholders.
Experience with project management toolssystems a plus
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'financial modeling', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Vishay Siliconix, a leader in the development of power semiconductor products which improves efficiency in electronic systems for consumer, industrial, automotive, medical, and military applications, is currently seeking a Senior Finance Business Analyst (Temp).
This position will be located in San Jose, California.
Responsibilities:
· Partner with a subset of departmental business owners to create annual operating budgets, quarterly forecasts, and longer-term strategic operating plans.
· Contribute to decisions with ROI analysis for ongoing investments and new initiatives.
Perform sensitivity and incremental cost/benefit modeling.
· Ensure disciplined financial management through real time review of revenue and expenses.
Provide root cause variance explanations and highlights opportunities and risks.
· Provide actionable intelligence with existing metrics or propose new metrics that illuminate trends and issues affecting the business.
Present findings and recommendations.
Communicate actual performance against forecast, quota, and plan.
· Prepare presentation materials in support of Monthly Reporting Packages, Quarterly Business Reviews and Executive/Board level presentations.
· Participate in the development of forecast models and methodologies and the implementation and maintenance of next generation planning and reporting tools.
· Work cross-functionally with Marketing, R&D, and Finance team members to align related but separate business plans and ensure a deep understanding of business drivers.
Requirements:
· 5+ years of experience in a financial planning and analysis or finance business partner role
· Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in Finance, Accounting, Business; MBA or CPA a plus but not required
· Familiarity with all aspects of corporate accounting and all pertinent GAAP including software revenue recognition
· Extensive knowledge of Excel and SAP and the ability to create and analyze complex financial models, including forward-forecasting models
· Passion for producing deliverables that are accurate, professional in appearance, and timely
· Appreciation for the complex interaction of various financial systems and the desire to learn new systems that maximize efficiencies and improve the quality of reporting
· Strong project management, planning, and organization skills, including ability to handle multiple projects simultaneously in a fast-paced environment with an ability to thrive in an environment where timeliness and accuracy are mandatory
· Data driven decision making mentality and sound business judgment through strong analytical thinking
","['r', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'forecast', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Primary Skills: Business Analysis, Procurement, Buying/Purchasing
Duration: 3+ Months with potential to extend
Contract Type: W2 Only
Support the creation of detailed business analysis for procurement in IT, outlining problems, opportunities and solutions for IT as a business.
Analyze current process of IT business, how it uses procurement, and what its goals are.
Identify opportunities within the IT procurement process, defining business requirements and reporting them back to stakeholders.
Communicate with senior stakeholders in the organization to find out what they hope to achieve in their purchasing.
Formulate ways for IT as procurement processes to improve, based on market best practices.
Oversee the implementation of new technology and processes as needed.
Manage change, Run workshops and training sessions.
Provide visibility through reliable data and dashboards to internal and external stakeholders.
Required Skills:
BUSINESS PROCESS IMPROVEMENT
DETAIL-ORIENTED
PROBLEM-SOLVING
MANAGEMENT CONSULTING
BUYING/PURCHASING
PROCUREMENT
To follow up with any questions, please contact Rahul Ambhore at 408-816-2020
If this position is not quite what you're looking for, visit akraya.com, and submit a copy of your resume.
",[None],"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"and The Weekrsquos (httpstinyurl.comydhjltys httpsapc01.safelinks.protection.outlook.com?urlhttps3A2F2Ftinyurl.com2Fydhjltysampdata027C017Cmafas.k40brillio. )
latest stories about the positive hiring sentiments of tech firms.
Lead discovery workshops, which includes the facilitation of large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations.
Responsible for identification and inventory of customer process pain points and gaps in best practices.
Perform rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Comfortable building and demonstrating Salesforce capabilities.
Strong presenter to C Suite level audiences as well as technical teams.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities).
Required skills 2+ yearsrsquo experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Should have Sales cloud, Service cloud implementation experience.
Strong presentation and communication skills.
Experience with Salesforce.com developer toolkit including Apex Classes, Controllers and Triggers, Visualforce, Force.com IDE, Migration Tool, Web Services is a plus.
Have hands on experience in several mid-size, global implementations using Salesforce service cloud.
Working knowledge of system development life cycle methodologies (Agile and Waterfall).
CPQ Integration experience with any Billing, or Subscriptions system is a plus.
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Northern California, Southern California, Seattle, Portland, Boston
Job Type :
Full Time
Job Compensation :
Industry Standard
Northern California
Southern California
Seattle
Portland
Boston
The Ideal candidate will be responsible for project delivery.
Ideal candidate should have the following profile:
Responsibilities:
Gather business requirements
Develop Requirements and Functional Design documents
Create workshop content
Conduct customer workshops
Create training collateral
Conduct training
Create Test Documents
Conduct User Testing, System Testing, and UAT
Develop wireframes for applications
Work with offshore
Perform QA
Providing training support
Provide change management support
Skills Required
Strong Business Analysis skills
Working knowledge of SharePoint (Online Preferred)
Nice to have knowledge of Photoshop
Working knowledge of SharePoint templates and user interfaces
Working knowledge of SharePoint Information Architecture (Security, Taxonomy, Search, Site Structure, Templates)
Excellent communication skills
Excellent organizational skills
Relationship builder
Interested candidates can send their resume to jobs@netwoven.com.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Oracle CPQ Business Analyst
Share
Job ID: FA-0100-429
Open Since: 2019-09-10
City: San Jose
State: California
Country: United States of America
The ideal candidate should have overall business/functional analysis experience with at least 5+ years of experience on the Oracle Big Machines CPQ platform.
Ability to clearly understand business requirements and convert them into a functional design, and to collaborate with business analysts and users to define solution approaches.
Having experience on Big Machines platform features, setups and technology including BML and BMQL.
Programming experience with BML is a plus.
Strong understanding of sales processes like opportunities, CPQ quoting, BM commerce, model configurations, pricing, discounting, promotions, approval matrix, and sales orders.
Good experience on Big Machines data model, data architecture, and data management, and familiar with integrations with other systems like salesforce.com.
In-depth understanding of the capabilities and constraints of the Big Machines platform.
Must be a confident self-starter individual who can completely own the delivery of high value work products.
Ability to communicate effectively with business users, management, and team members.
Planning and analytical skills as well as the ability to communicate ideas and plans verbally and in writing.
Minimum Experience: 5 Yrs
Roles & Responsibilities:
Work with business users to understand and document their business processes and requirements.
Understand the current implementation and architecture of client's Oracle Big Machines CPQ, including platform configuration and processes integrated with salesforce.com.
Perform mapping/gapping based on the requirements and Oracle Big Machines platform features, keeping in mind the existing implementation of CPQ.
Configure working prototypes in a development sandbox if required, and validate and refine prototypes.
Document the functional design and solution approaches.
Highlight the benefits of recommended approaches and any business process improvements from the suggested solutions.
Conduct meetings with business users and IT personnel, and publish status and progress reports.
During projects, clearly communicate project task status to key stakeholders.
Work with IT personnel to highlight any changes needed in the current implementation to achieve business requirements.
Assist with release planning and execution.
Trouble shoot issues in the CPQ environment and in related integrations.
Must have a strong understanding of sales processes.
Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Demonstrated organizational skills and detail orientation with ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment.
Education:
BS or MS degree in Business Administration, Information Systems, Engineering or a related field.
Oracle Big Machines certifications.
Optionally, Salesforce.com certifications.
","['excel', 'oracl']","['recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'recommend', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Are you looking for an opportunity where your skills and enthusiasm make a difference and where your voice will be heard?
RingCentral promotes a healthy work-life balance by providing catered lunch and breakfast on a daily basis as well as a kitchen stocked with a variety of complimentary beverages and delicious snacks.
Deutsche Bank: Executing like a Well-Oiled Machine.
Jeffries: Firing On All Cylinders.
Northland: As UCaaS Market Evolves, RNG Excels
Business Requirements & Analysis:
Works closely with IT department, Legal and business partners to understand processes, gaps and goals
Lead Business Requirements sessions and Interview cross functional Subject Matter Experts (SMEs) to elicit business requirements
Own RingCentral IT Data Inventory program
Analyze existing and future state business processes, systems and flows of data
Develop and maintain documentation related to developing and modifying business processes and systems
Partner with business, internal and external technology teams to define associated system requirements and solutions
Participate in systems implementation projects (requirements documentation, systems configuration, test documentation/execution, issue identification and resolution)
Acts as the liaison between the business units, technology teams and support teams
Critically evaluates information gathered from multiple sources, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding
Distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs to align with macro vision and strategy
Mentor Business Systems Analysts and help create best practices for Business Systems Analysis
Business Solutions Design, Delivery & Support:
Proactive and takes initiative to gather information, investigate gaps / issues, identifies potential solutions and presents to both Business and IT stakeholders
Work closely with Vendors, Implementation Partners, Architects, Developers and Business Units to ensure technical compatibility and user satisfaction
Facilitate review sessions with functional owners, subject matter experts and end-user representatives
Oversee project lifecycle for projects within Big Data team and other RingCentral IT divisions
Work with various teams to develop project milestones and timelines for development, UAT, production validation and go live
Support delivery of reporting, dashboards and business intelligence capabilities through partnership with IT and Business
Lead and perform data management and migration activities
Ensure training and timely communications in accordance with project timelines
Engage in other areas of IT such as Security, Compliance (SOX), Reporting, Production and participate in change management support to ensure projects are addressed from end to end and the needs, interests and success criteria of the business are met
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Information Systems or related field and equivalent practical experience.
Proficiency in ANSI SQL
8 - 10 years of knowledge and related industry experience implementing, configuring, customizing and integrating applications
Ability to write programs in object-oriented or functional languages would be a plus
In-depth experience and understanding of distributed systems design, hands-on experience with high-scale analytical databases (Redshift, Snowflake, Hadoop, Vertica)
Must be a self-starter, completely independent, thrives in a fast-paced environment, customer centric and have the interpersonal skills necessary to manage business and technology relationships
Ability to communicate effectively (written and verbally) with both technical and non-technical parties
Must exhibit strong understanding of security and confidentiality practices with systems that handle sensitive data (GDPR, CCPA, SOX)
Ability to deal with ambiguity and thrive in a rapidly changing business environment
Can do and open to learn attitude required
Experience with BI systems (Tableau, PowerBI) is a plus
Experience in system administration is a plus
About RingCentral
RingCentral, Inc. (NYSE: RNG) is a leading provider of global enterprise cloud communications, collaboration, and contact center solutions.
RingCentral's open platform integrates with leading business apps and enables customers to easily customize business workflows.
RingCentral is headquartered in Belmont, California, and has offices around the world.
RingCentral is an equal opportunity employer that is committed to workplace diversity.
","['snowflak', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerbi', 'hadoop', 'cloud']","['big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['snowflak', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'powerbi', 'hadoop', 'cloud', 'big data', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Search Jobs
Business Summary:
Job Role and Responsibility:
Demonstrate issue identification and resolution skills and partner with other cross-functional teams
Effectively communicate well-developed, scalable solutions
Partner with stakeholders for global projects and provide overall requirements, capture process objectives, validate design decisions, and processes/workflow requirements
Develop end-to-end process improvement and implement best known practices thru partnership with key stakeholders and IT
Drive and support implementation of production related system fixes
Develop ad-hoc reporting and analysis for management and stakeholders
Participate in the design and documentation of applicable training materials or user guides for processes that will be leveraged by SaaS Billing Ops teams
Participate in the Billing Platform Roadmap / Strategy determination
Identify performance gaps and launch remedial initiatives in partnership with cross functional teams
Act as operations backup where needed
Manage and coordinate NPI activities that impact cross functional business teams to achieve successful new SaaS product offerings
Required Skills:
BS/BA degree
9+ years Business Analyst experience and SaaS Order to Billing Business Operations related experience
Experience in implementation of industry-leading Subscription Billing platforms (e.g.
SAP Hybris, Zuora, other) OR in-house developed billing systems
Experience with SaaS/subscription quoting/billing, preferably within a high volume, e-commerce model
Deep understanding of SaaS business models in both direct and channel environments
Knowledge of and experience with enterprise systems and a solid understanding of enterprise integration
Strong collaboration and leadership skills and the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of management
Ability to manage multiple global projects concurrently meeting all critical deliverable dates
Superb communication skills, both written and verbal.
Experience working with cross-functional teams, including product management, development, quality assurance and various business partners
Flexibility and ability to adapt within a fast-paced, rapidly changing environment
Good work ethic and sense of responsibility
Preferred Skills:
Proficiency in ERP Systems such as Oracle/SAP/NetSuite
Authority in the execution of global change management
Strong problem-solving and analytical skills
Experience collaborating on projects and testing
Bachelor’s Degree
Search Jobs
","['erp', 'oracl', 'erp system']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['erp', 'oracl', 'erp system', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Security
Summary: Deploy a centralized person master data management solution to holistically solve for:
• Implementation of consistent cleansing rules and data quality testing
• Standardized mapping rules and logic for contact and account data
• Single Source of Truth for consumers to source person data
• Enablement of a ‘person 360’ view and improved reporting accuracy
• Design and implement AI-ML for automated pattern identification and data remediation
Role Name - Business Analyst
Roles and Responsibilities
• Responsible for defining, prioritizing, and overseeing delivery of the strategic MDM capabilities required by the business functions.
• Good understanding of SDLC and Agile methodologies
• Engage with business stakeholders to understand business requirements & demonstrate ability to develop and prepare business analysis, plans, business requirement definitions, testing traceability
• Support the functional design and implementation of projects and create solutions to meet business objectives and resolve system / process issues
• Responsible for business process understanding of data consumption.
• Data Lifecycle management processes and procedures.
• Establish SOP (Standard Operating Procedures) to maintain and improve data quality and to maintain and manage data supply chains
• Extensive validation skills of the gathered data for veracity, consistency and completeness
• Hands on experience in having designed AI-ML based use cases to increase pattern identification and data driven matching rules
Qualifications
Requirements:
• 10+ years of industry experience in Data Management practices and methodologies
• In depth knowledge of MDM capabilities, industry trends and best practices
• Ability to understand business functionality and translate it into application requirements
• Ability to create compelling business cases with accurate effort estimations
• Ability to adapt quickly to new technologies and changing business requirements
• Excellent understanding of business complexity and project interdependencies
• SAP MDG /Oracle/ Informatica Functional Knowledge is must.
• Working experience on GDPR /CCPA is an added advantage.
• Proven ability to provide guidance and make decisions that require judgment and consideration of possible impacts.
• Exposure towards building playbooks, SOP’s, KPI’s will be an added advantage.
• Implementation experience and drive business consumption of Master Data and attributes.
• Good Understanding on Data Quality rules building and maintenance.
Additional Information
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.
","['excel', 'oracl']","['data', 'kpi', 'cleans', 'account', 'busi']",2.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'data', 'kpi', 'cleans', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"AbbVies mission is to discover and deliver innovative medicines that solve serious health issues today and address the medical challenges of tomorrow.
Envision working with energetic colleagues and
inspirational leaders.
Now, place yourself in that mix; leading discussions,
asking the right questions and driving results.
All while wearing jeans to work!
Business
Analyst
WHAT YOUR NEW MANAGER WANTS YOU TO KNOW:
Im looking for an
analytical storyteller, you are responsible for bridging the gap between data
and the business using analytics to assess processes, determine requirements
and deliver data-driven recommendations and reports to executives and
stakeholders.
If you are looking to promote your career in the pharmaceutical
industry supporting Allergan Aesthetics growing business, I would be very
interested in receiving your resume.
Lets discuss what you can bring to the
team and what you aspire to do in the future.
Sincerely, Manager Workforce Planning
YOU ARE more than just a title, YOU ARE
A Leader in Critical Business Decisions.
You
will use your deep contact center operations experience to manage multiple
markets and call type groups that will help advise an ever-changing operational
model.
You will be responsible for the implementation of solutions for complex
business problems.
You will have the opportunity to design and develop
information models, perform data analysis, and create qualitative reporting
solutions to enable the business to make critical business decisions.
A Creative Thinker.
You
will drive analysis models that deliver options to manpower challenges in a
proactive manner to various business support teams within the Austin Customer
Operations.
You will build knowledge of the organization, processes and
customers.
YOU WILL:
Work well with data.
Conduct insightful
analysis using internal and external data
Support the business
effectively.
Partner with internal tools to build scalable reports and dashboards in support
of business needs
Drive operational
excellence
that supports cross-functional partners, and ensure the smooth running of
weekly, monthly and quarterly business rhythms
Leverage technical
abilities
to drive process improvements and automation efficiencies around headcount
planning, reporting, and ongoing communications to key stakeholder
Drive decision-making
and prioritization
for the business through analyzing data, identifying trends, and developing
best practices
Act as a leader for the
business.
Process, analyze, and interpret data sets to make business recommendations and
decisions
Creatively think ahead.
Build dashboards using
data visualization software (e.g., ThoughtSpot), including using advanced
functionality (e.g., data blending)
Collaborate and lead.
Develop meaningful
relationships with all operational leaders.
Effectively handle and lead
multiple tasks/projects independently
Develop/Manage
benchmarks/KPI's
within the major areas of operations to include staff performance to ensure
optimization of resources
Analyze project metrics
and create reports
on process performance against project initiatives and goals to support the
businesses objectives
Qualifications
YOU BRING:
MS Excel skills and
experience in working with the following Microsoft Suite and Reporting
Platforms: VBA, MS Excel, MS Access, SQL and/or MS Access skills required
Experience with
forecasting volume
Experience gathering unstructured data to produce insights
and reporting using Excel
Problem-solving and analytical experience
Experience communicating to various levels within an
organization
Excellent time management track
record
Experience
with Nice inContact
Capacity
Planning/forecasting experience is strongly desired
Contact Center
management experience in a scaling environment preferred
Strong analytical
capabilities with an understanding of statistical modeling
BA or BS degree in
business or a related field is preferred
LEADERSHIP SKILLS:
For this role, were looking for a leader who
is:
Excellence Focused
Optimistic
Open and Authentic
#LI-KJ1
Equal Employment Opportunity
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'vba', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'optim', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Identifying system gaps, run agile ceremonies, document requirements and communicating them to a wide group of stakeholders will be key responsibilities.
An ideal candidate will have strong facilitation, communication and interpersonal skills, attention to detail, and an ability to build relationships with all levels within the organization.
Profile and Job Responsibility Partner with other stakeholder teams across business units to develop necessary analysis and documentation in a collaborative way, communicating effectively and efficiently with managerial and executive teams.
Lead requirement analysis and design discussions with users, technical and business stakeholders and run all agile ceremonies with teams.
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications based on current and future state.
Be adept at decomposing high-level business needs into user stories and explaining detailed technical concepts at a high level.
Collaborate with developers, product managers, subject matter experts and users to communicate the proposed solution vision and analyze tradeoffs between usability and performance needs.
Devise solutions based on business problems.
The designs include requirements documentation, graphical representations (UML diagrams), and presentations that describe the desired solution or product feature.
Documentation will include business process flows, security access matrix, data mapping tables, integration diagrams, RACIs, application prototypes, user stories and specific, testable functional requirements.
Using Solid understanding of project management practices, SDLC and Agile deliverables, manage requirements delivery to: create and review backlog, plan sprint releases, manage releases builds and deployments, manage release expectation and communication with product management and users.
Proven ability to lead teams, create action plans & resolve obstacles to achieve deadlines.
Demonstrated ability to create a positive and professional business relationship with business and technology stakeholders at all levels.
Qualifications 3-5 years of experience functioning as a business analyst within a mid to large organization Expert experience with requirements gathering and management in Agile and Waterfall project approaches.
Detail oriented and critical thinker.
Successfully engage in multiple initiatives simultaneously.
Must be comfortable in rapidly changing and sometimes ambiguous work situations.
Comfortable working independently, adapting to shifting priorities, demands and timelines in a fast paced environment Keen attention to detail and complex problem solving abilities from operational and technical perspective.
Ability to work independently and engage other team members as needed Ability to handle full workload and meet proposed deadlines Expert written and oral communication skills, strong interpersonal skills, and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse groups, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
Principals only.
EOE.
Should you have any questions regarding the application process, please contact LPLs Human Resources Solutions Center at (800) 877-7210.
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Search by Keyword
More Options
Loading...
Country/Region
All
State
All
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert
form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Share this Job
AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest
Product Owner/Business Analyst - Austin, TX
Date: Apr 27, 2020
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Posting Address
1812 Centre Creek Dr.
Suite 240
Austin, Texas 78754
*KH
#LI-KH1
Position Overview
Product Owner/Business Analyst
You will be involved in the complete software development life cycle, seeing your epics and user stories into a finished product in a hybrid agile environment.
This will require a high degree of collaboration among highly-talented, cross-functional and geographically-dispersed development teams.
You will work closely with industry-best product management team, developers and other design team members to present business and customer needs and help develop end-to-end solutions.
Essential Functions
Conduct voice-of-customer studies to understand and document user work flows and use cases
Develop Epics and detailed user stories and work closely with development team members to help develop end-to-end Enterprise lighting solutions
Function as liaison between development team members and end customers, users and other stake holders
Develop marketing collateral including product specifications, training documentation, user manuals and user acceptance tests (UATs)
Assist with the preparation of wireframes and lead focus groups to validate concepts
Attend all scrum meetings including backlog grooming, sprint planning, daily standup, sprint review to answer all requirement questions and provide feedback on development artifacts and applications
Perform UATs and support field trials
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent in related field
2 or more years of experience conducting voice of customer studies
3 or more years of experience writing epics and detailed user stories in Jira, Azure DevOps or similar tool
2 or more years of experience performing User Acceptance Testing
2 or more years of experience developing marketing collateral
Experience in the Lighting or Building Automation industry
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in Controls and Device Automation industry
Experience working with geographically-dispersed teams
Experience with New Product commercialization
Position Criteria
A demonstrated ability to effectively communicate Business and Product requirements to Development and QA team members and answer questions
Solid decision-making skills and the ability to articulate reasoning while taking the bigger product picture into consideration
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and to follow directions
Ability to communicate and promote software development best-practices
Corporate Overview
An early, and one of many patents awarded, came for the creation of the first practical method to control electricity through the pull chain socket that remains unchanged today.
Division Overview
As one of the largest lighting fixture manufacturers in North America, it features a suite of brands that provide a full range of indoor and outdoor lighting products serving the commercial, industrial, institutional, and residential markets.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other protected class.
Nearest Major Market: Austin
Job Segment:
Quality Assurance, Cloud, Testing, Business Analyst, Technology
Find similar jobs:
Ingénierie,
Ingenieurwesen,
Ingeniería,
Engineering,
Engenharia
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
","['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"Common Purpose, Uncommon Opportunity.
The HRIS Business Analyst will be accountable for documenting requirements and improve business processes for ongoing improvements and enhancements, providing business expertise for technology projects and engaging with stakeholders to help them understand technology delivery.
The HRIS Business Analyst must have a passion for technical and business collaboration, and a desire to help automate and scale HR applications for a growing organization.
S/he is comfortable being a team player and a team leader, with a healthy balance of left and right brain skill sets.
Do you have a passion for HR and understanding how technology touches all parts of the employee lifecycle?
Do you approach challenges with a curious mindset?
Do you demand great execution and bold innovation, while obsessing over quality?
Do you love working with a team to make things happen and get things built?
Do you solve problems with creativity and get excited about improving processes for efficiency and automation?
Let's do this!
Essential Functions:
Hunt for big ideas that identify and solve important HR problems and move beyond incremental features and instead propose a complete end-to-end automated solution
Elicit and document requirements, perform impact analysis and create process improvement recommendations for small enhancement efforts that touch multiple domains in HR, but focus on efforts in Talent Management, Compensation, Payroll and Benefits
Be the HR champion and driver of requirements and scope for small enhancements that cross multiple functional disciplines.
Partner closely with stakeholders in both HR and IT to communicate status, share knowledge and bring disjointed processes together
Be on the constant look out for and proposed improved internal processes with an eye towards automation
Collaborate with IT and vendors to plan, implement, and build the right features / enhancements with a focus on solutions that solve for enterprise, end-to-end HR processes
Provide strategic consultation on HR technology and trends to the business and drive near and long term technology roadmaps
Take ownership for a successful product outcome and anticipate needs across HR functions, system development/IT, HR operations, and production support teams
Basic:
2 years of work experience with a Bachelor’s Degree or an Advanced Degree (e.g.
Masters, MBA, JD, MD, or PhD)
Preferred:
Bachelors Degree and 5 years or more of hands-on experience as a business systems analyst delivering or implementing enterprise HR technology solutions
5 or more years of experience eliciting and gathering business requirements, including proven experience with:
Running requirements workshops with multiple business stakeholders
Writing user stories
Creating process flows
Creating swim lane diagrams
Fit Gap Analysis
Impact Analysis
5 or more years of experience in Agile
5 or more years of experience creating and executing on project plans, tracking dates and status and providing project updates to peers and senior leadership
Ability to help document current and future state process, challenge the status quo and look across functions for ways to automate and reduce manual work
Exceptional communication skills and an above average ability to translate technology concepts to others and experience resolving conflicts across different groups of stakeholders
Exceptionally detailed oriented and knowledgeable about how to think about systems testing, including corner cases and unusual scenarios
A ""driver"" personality - constantly pushing toward clarity and delivery while balancing the need for great collaboration across a variety of stakeholders to achieve your objectives
Grit - You never hesitate to roll up your sleeves and tackle something hands-on, you persevere when others fall away
A high bar across the board - from your own contributions to the people you work with to the projects you work on
Savvy with data - You know how to gather, share and leverage data to make decisions
Self-directed - Able to navigate ambiguity and work independently
Deep functional experience with HR functional domains (you understand what it takes to make HR functions successful)
Expert story teller with proven experience building and presenting to senior leadership on complex topics
Hands-on experience with Workday or similar HCM
Preferred Skills & Qualifications:
· Experience with programming systems, including databases
· Experiencing configuring Workday, SmartRecruiters or other HR tools
· Experience as a Quality Engineer or tester
· Background working as a consultant
· MBA a plus
Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status.
Work Hours:
Incumbent must make themselves available during core business hours.
May require occasional meetings outside of core business hours to connect with global partners.
Travel Requirements:
This position requires the incumbent to travel for work 0% of the time
Physical Requirements:
This position will be performed in an office setting.
The position will require the incumbent to sit and stand at a desk, communicate in person and by telephone, frequently operate standard office equipment, such as telephones and computers.
Sponsorship/Relocation:
Work Authorization: Authorization to work in the U.S. is a precondition of employment for this position.
",[None],"['data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Main responsibilities:
Manage user support requests for troubleshooting issues and tracking the entire process through analysis, design, development, testing, deployment and requester approval.
Identify production issues, work in partnership with technical leads and effectively communicate plan of action to business units for solutions.
Qualifications
Bachelors or Masters degree
Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Power Point, Vision & Outlook)
Works and be proficient with e-mail systems computer programming systems and languages
Successfully completes regulatory and job training requirements.
Ability to work with others in a team environment
Additional Information
Various Sponsorship Benefits for International Students:
· OPT Sponsorship Jobs
· OPT Extension
· E-verified Employers
· H1B Visa Processing for OPT Candidates
· 50 plus direct customers
· Free Online training
· Excellent Salary Package
· Job Assistance and Support
· Real-time Certified S/W Trainers
· Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
· Online & onsite support provided
Training Process:
· 2 to 3 week online training using WebEx
· Training provided by instructors with extensive industry experience
· Daily training (Evening 2 - 3 hours)
· Teaching with 70% exercise and 30% lecture
· Real time examples and case studies to practice with
· Special one-on-one support before joining a project
· Limited Students in every batch
Marketing & Placement:
· Strong and motivated marketing team
· Marketers are specifically trained
· Great Marketing Support
· Mock-Interviews and interview training
· Placement in average of 4 weeks of marketing
· Online & onsite support provided
Interested?
Feel free to call me or text me at (609) 796-2021
Contact Details:
Amir
(609) 796-202
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"To accomplish this, TCJPD utilizes a comprehensive continuum of care that incorporates victim mediation services; direct supervision; alternative education; substance abuse services; residential, outpatient, and day treatment programs; in-home family counseling; and wrap-around and aftercare services.
TCJPD utilizes trauma-informed mental health assessments and psychological evaluations to identify youth in need of specialized services.
TCJPD provides onsite services and collaborates with community partners to help ensure that youth and families receive interventions that target their identified treatment needs.The Business Analyst I position provides routine technical consulting and support services for defining, developing and improving functional or business processes to meet user and organizational needs.
Works with departmental management and staff to define problems and management requirements.
Serves as a liaison between department users and the Information Technology organization in order to provide technical solutions to meet user needs.
Possesses expertise in supporting basic department applications and functions.
May assist with process redesign and documentation, as required for simple applications.
Assists with or translates routine to moderately complex organization requirements and assists with the translation of higher level organization requirements into functional Information Technology specifications and manages changes to such specifications.Distinguishing Characteristics:
",[None],"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",999.0,"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Do you relish the opportunity to dive headfirst into vast, high-impact projects and make foundational contributions across analytics, strategy and operations?
You can take an ambiguous assignment and move quickly to deliver iterative value.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"To accomplish this, TCJPD utilizes a comprehensive continuum of care that incorporates victim mediation services; direct supervision; alternative education; substance abuse services; residential, outpatient, and day treatment programs; in-home family counseling; and wrap-around and aftercare services.
TCJPD utilizes trauma-informed mental health assessments and psychological evaluations to identify youth in need of specialized services.
TCJPD provides onsite services and collaborates with community partners to help ensure that youth and families receive interventions that target their identified treatment needs.The Business Analyst III position provides moderately complex to complex technical consulting and support services for defining, developing and improving functional or business processes to meet user and organizational needs.
Works with departmental management and staff to define problems and management requirements.
Serves as a senior liaison between department users and the Information Technology organization in order to provide technical solutions to meet user needs.
Possesses expertise in supporting complex department applications and functions.
Conducts advanced process redesign and compiles documentation, as required for complex applications.
Translates high-level organization requirements into functional Information Technology specifications and manages changes to such specifications.Distinguishing Characteristics:
",[None],"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",999.0,"['supervis', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"52909050 HHSC Competitive Solicitation I.
All work products resulting from the project shall be considered ""works made for hire"" and are the property of the Texas Health and Human Services Commission may include pre-selection requirements that potential Vendors (and their Candidates) submit to and satisfy criminal background checks as authorized by the Texas law.
Texas Health and Human Services Commission will pay no fees for interviews or discussions, which occur during the process of selecting a Candidate(s).
The Health and Human Services Commission (HHSC) Claims Management Division (CMD) is responsible for overseeing the 1915(c) Waivers Migration to the Texas Medicaid Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care On-line Portal projects affecting Medicaid recipient service authorizations, functional assessments and approvals.
This project touches multiple long-term care processing applications including Texas Medicaid and Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care Online Portal , ID CARE, LTC Provider System and the Service Authorization System Online (SASO).
These systems collectively are part of the Texas Medicaid Management Information System (TMMIS).
This Worker will act as a Business Analyst and their role on the project will be as a Product Owner for Community First Choice (CFC) IDD Assessment.
Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internalexternal stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
OTHER SPECIAL REQUIREMENTS In submitting a resume for this solicitation, the vendor attests to their compliance with e-verify for the submitted candidate.
E-verify requirements are outlined in Appendix A, Section P. Immigration, of the Standard Terms and Conditions for Information Technology Staff Augmentation Contract.
ADDITIONAL TERMS AND CONDITIONS Vendor acknowledges that before a Purchase Order can be issued the selected candidate must sign and return the HHSC Information Technology Staff Augmentation Contractor Integrity Agreement, HHSC Form 4710.
II.
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
III.
TERM OF SERVICE Services expect to start 07302020 and are expected to be completed by 08312020.
Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 184 hours.
This service may be amended, renewed, andor extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing.
IV.
Any and all travel, per diem, parking, andor living expenses shall be at the Candidate's andor Vendor's expense.
","['excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Initially Remote Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Actual Years Experience Years Experience Needed Required Preferred SkillsExperience 8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Are you excited about the cloud computing industry and leveraging cutting edge data analytics technologies and methodologies?
Are you interested in driving business decisions through data analysis, reporting, and KPIs?
Do you want to work on a team of Business Analysts, Business Intelligence Engineers, and Data Engineers to solve AWSs most complex business problems through data?
The AWS Business Development (BD) Analytics team is looking for a passionate, results-oriented Business Analyst to own defining, building, and scaling metrics and analytical insights that will measure the success and drive the day-to-day behavior for the AWS BD team.
As a Business Analyst on the BD Analytics team, youll collaborate with engineers to build self-service reports and establish automated processes for large scale data analyses.
Successful candidates will be analytical with business acumen, and detail driven with excellent problem solving skills.
The ideal candidate will have worked in depth in data analysis, including experience extracting and manipulating data using SQL, leveraging advanced Excel features for data analysis, and producing digestible business intelligence and actionable information.
The candidate should also have strong communication and project management skills, enabling them to work with key business stakeholders to understand requirements and shape analytical deliverables.
He/she should also have a demonstrated ability to think strategically and analytically about business, product, and technical challenges, with the ability to work cross-organizationally.
A keen sense of ownership, drive, and scrappiness is a must.
Basic Qualifications
Basic qualifications
· Bachelors degree in a quantitative field such as Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Computer Science, Economics, Finance, or related field
· 8+ years of industry experience in data analysis.
Proven analytical and quantitative skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions and develop business cases
· 3+ years of experience in SQL and manipulating large data sets in a database
· 5+ years of advanced proficiency in Excel (including VBA, Pivot Tables, array functions, Power Pivots, etc)
Preferred Qualifications
Preferred qualifications
· Advanced proficiency in SQL, ETL, data modeling, and working with Big Data
· Computer programming experience in Python, Ruby, or Java
· Experience using AWS analytical services (e.g., Redshift, Data Pipeline, EMR, Machine Learning, Kinesis)
· Experience with web technologies (e.g., Ruby on Rails, Django, JavaScript) and the model-view-controller architectural pattern
· Excellent problem-solving skills
· Excited to learn new technologies and analytical methodologies relating to business intelligence and data analysis
· Strong communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills to translate ambiguous business requirements into complex analyses and actionable insights
· Experience partnering with executive-level leaders to identify and solve business issues through the provision of data analysis and insights
This position can be located in AWS corporate office in Seattle, as well as San Francisco, or Austin, TX.
","['aw', 'redshift', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'django', 'cloud', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'java']","['data modeling', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econom', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['aw', 'redshift', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'django', 'cloud', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'java', 'data modeling', 'etl', 'big data', 'machine learning', 'data', 'kpi', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'econom', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Interested in getting trained as business analyst.
Knowledge Experience of BA Process is a plus Ability to work under pressure and in fast pace environment.
Knowledge of Databases like Oracle and MS SQL Server is a Plus.
Technical skills in Java, .NET, SQL are plus Strong verbal and written communication skills Have a positive attitude Must have Bachelor's degree Master's Degree in Computer Science, Engineering or similar field a plus Responsibilities Include Planning Eliciting requirements Requirements organization Translating and simplifying requirements Requirements management and communication Requirements analysis Written and verbal communication, including technical writing skills Understanding of SDLC concepts Modeling techniques and methods Leadership Qualities.
For more details reach santoshamericanlabzmail.com
","['oracl', 'sql', 'java']","['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['oracl', 'sql', 'java', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The incumbent will serve as the main point of contact for client requirements gathering and software design prior to development.
**Essential Duties and responsibilities:**Project Delivery Responsibilities:+ Drive client functional requirement gathering (i.e.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"You will be responsible for creating reports, ad hoc data analysis and other business intelligence related tasks to support a global operations team servicing one of the largest financial institutions in the world.
You will be extracting and transforming data using SQL, leveraging advanced Excel features and Python for data analysis, and producing clear business intelligence and actionable information into visually appealing reporting.
Position Details:
Long term contract with possible contract extension or hire
Standard support hours: Mon-Fri 8:00am-5:00pm
Responsibilities:
Develop metrics and dashboard reporting to provide insight across all operational organizations, for the purpose of increasing efficiency and improving customer delivery.
Create queries, write reports, and present findings and then make recommendations to direct and upper level management.
Analyze current business and reporting processes and look for means to improve efficiency and reduce bottlenecks.
Build complex reports related to operations performance.
(ie.
Labor efficiency, Service Catalog volumes, SLA measurement, etc.)
Utilize Python/SQL to provide solutions as well as maintain legacy reporting within Microsoft Excel with VBA.
Work closely with all levels of management to prioritize business and information reporting needs.
Continually train and elevate skill level with the various applications used by the organization.
Qualifications:
Skills, Knowledge, Abilities
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Requires the ability to deal effectively and professionally with internal and external customers.
Must have outstanding organizational and multi-tasking skills and the ability to prioritize work effectively.
Requires excellent working knowledge of the Microsoft Office Suite, specifically Excel, including sorting, formulas, and macro definitions.
Strong organizational skills to multi-task demanding priorities; effective use of resources to deliver results.
Professional communication skills with the ability to successfully interact and gather detailed business requirements at all levels of the organization.
Ability to work effectively across many internal functional groups.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Passionate and continuous improvement minded
Advanced in MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint), Outlook, and ERP systems
Education/Experience Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, MIS, Mathematics or related field preferred
Prior professional experience in Data Entry and Analysis preferred
Proficient relational database experience (MS-Access, SQL)
6-12+ months Python experience (familiarity with Pandas highly preferred)
Intermediate-to-Expert-level VBA skills
Familiarity with a data visualization suite such as Tableau
Experience with version control a plus (ie.
Github)
","['ms office', 'github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'python', 'erp']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'python', 'erp', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Duties Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss them with Design and Development.
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals).
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences.
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed.
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.).
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management.
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop, and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences.
Skills and Qualifications Required 7 years of expertise in written and oral communications.
7 yearsrsquo experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements.
7 years relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 yearsrsquo experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst.
5 years Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within a public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution.
4 yearsrsquo experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc.
4 yearsrsquo experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
Preferred 5 yearsrsquo experience reporting to executive management.
1-year experience to Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1-year experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Contract - Onsite
Do you have eight or more years experience as a BA?
Do you live in the Austin area?
Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['risk', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Your Opportunity
This role, specifically, will be supporting the Branch Network, which is part of the Investor Services organization.
Investor Services is responsible for helping individuals and families with their financial needs, including retirement planning, charitable giving, estate planning, active investing or managing banking and lending needs.
The DAI Branch team supports the Retail Branch Network, providing quantitative analytics designed to measure performance and enhance the sales process.
What you are good at
The Sr.
Manager, Business Analysis role will identify, monitor and provide analysis of key metrics for the Branch Network, with the goal of identifying process improvements and areas of risk.
In addition, this role will be responsible for working with business partners to elicit, capture, and prioritize business requirements, and working with BI developers to translate those requirements to functional, dynamic deliverables.
Additionally, the role will be a point of contact for business partners needing consulting support in relation to projects that impact the Branch Network.
The ideal candidate will have experience with writing business requirements, data mining and analysis.
They should understand sales business models and be able to associate data to sales activities in the field.
A balance of analytical expertise and business experience is helpful.
Key Areas of Responsibility include:
Serve as consultant to key DAI business partners to understand business needs, and help determine solutions
Partner with Branch Leadership to understand sales needs and support evolution of the Branch Network
Elicit, capture and document requirements for reporting and analytical needs for the Branch, and help to size and prioritize those requests against the existing roadmap
Provide ad hoc analyses as needed to help understand what’s happening in the business, and to provide decision support for Branch leaders
Work with developers to translate requirements into reporting and analytic dashboards, to provide sales insights that can be acted upon by the field
Help run daily Scrum meetings, as well as sprint planning and retroactive sessions as part of the Agile/Scrum team
Provide QA support for deliverables, and help to manage the release process for new reporting/analysis as well as enhancements to existing products
What you have
Bachelor’s degree or 8+ years equivalent experience
3 - 5 years’ experience with data analysis and business process mapping
Proficiency in SQL, Jira, Business Objects or Tableau
Proficient with Microsoft Office products – Word, Excel, & PowerPoint with an emphasis on Excel skills
Strong communication skills required, both oral and written, to be delivered on multiple levels within the organization
Financial Services experience desired but not required.
Strong analytical skills – ability to analyze large data sets, derive key insights, and communicate ideas that can transform business processes and/or strategy
Ability to provide focus and direction in response to dynamic and unpredictable situations
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'jira']","['risk', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'powerbi', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'jira', 'risk', 'data mining', 'dashboard', 'data', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The position details are given below.
Study product samples and discuss with Design Development Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals) Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the Client.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 7 Required Expertise in Written and oral communications 7 Required Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements 7 Required Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 Required Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst 5 Required Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution 4 Required Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc.
4 Required Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5 Preferred Experience reporting to executive management.
1 Preferred Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1 Preferred Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Position Purpose: Perform various analysis and interpretation to link business needs and objectives for assigned function
Support business initiatives through data analysis, identification of implementation barriers and user acceptance testing of new systems
Identify and analyze user requirements, procedures, and problems to improve existing processes
Perform detailed analysis on assigned projects, recommend potential business solutions and assist with implementation
Qualifications:
Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience.
0-2 years of business process analysis (documenting business process, gathering requirements) experience in healthcare industry and/or working in a data driven environment.
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Applications, including Excel, Project, and Visio preferred.
Knowledge of data migration, software enhancement/planning, and Agile preferred.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or other characteristic protected by applicable law.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Req Ref No: GDTXBA2-22
Duration: 6.0 months
Under general supervision, prepares business specifications from which technical specifications are formulated.
Conduct preliminary investigation for project requests.
Reviews requirements, specifications, test, support and training plans to ensure they are in line with business objectives.
Conducts analysis of business goals, objectives, and needs of the business environment.
Makes recommendations to improve business processes.
Assist in root cause analysis in order to recommend product enhancements or other appropriate actions to improve productivity for the business units.
Utilize systems and data to resolve business issues in the most e effective manner.
May help less experienced personnel.
Has an overall understanding of the work environment and process.
Basic Qualifications for consideration :
Under general supervision, analyze, determine and document business requirements/client Statement of Work documents (SOW) and provide detailed specifications to programming.
Provide consultation to the client before, during and after implementation, including the development of new procedures the changes may necessitate.
Lead client calls during the implementation process.
Participate in testing, during and after application changes have been implemented.
Communicate progress and any potential problems to manager/project for awareness and/or resolution.
Uses limited independent judgment to make decisions based on precedents and established guidelines.
Solves problems using standard procedures and precedents
Performs other duties as required Performs other duties as required
Required Qualifications:
Education - Degree in Business, Engineering, Technology or related field.
Ability to learn the needs of the customer quickly and in line with the internal pace of the organization.
Ability to lead client calls.
Excellent command of Microsoft suite.
Preferred skills/experiences/education:
Experience with Business Analysis, Technical Requirements gathering and writing client facing Statement of Work documentation
Effective Communications Skills
Working knowledge of Service Now case management software.
Technical knowledge of the client systems and integrations.
Financial industry experience and/or manufacturing
Technical Writing experience
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
BKopfY92US
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst takes full ownership of the requirements specifications lifecycle throughout the projects execution, and is accountable for reaching the expected level of quality.
Key Responsibilities:
Responsible for requirement engineering: gather, document and manage the software requirements, in collaboration with internal and external stakeholders
Take full ownership of the requirements specifications lifecycle throughout the projects execution, and be accountable for reaching the expected level of quality
Ensure reusability of documented requirements so that subsequent projects can benefit
Produce standard requirements documentation during customer workshops at the beginning of the project
Participate in the tender response to cover the software business aspects
Study and understand customer needs, constraints and business processes
Work with the Project Manager and the technical team to understand the customer needs as well as delivering recommendations to all the stakeholders
Work with Project Manager in defining the project scope and ensuring its control
Write requirements specifications documents for the project by using the most efficient format (text, UML diagrams, graphics)
Act as requirements reference for the project manager, development, and QA teams throughout the project implementation
Manage and track the requirements specification changes
Contribute and lead knowledge sharing and continuous improvement programs
Use corporate tools for documentation and other project related activities
Report progress against deadlines as requested to project and team management
Contribute to PMO activities and lead improvement initiatives
Required Skills and Experience:
5+ years of experience in software business analysis
Working knowledge of Confluence and JIRA
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Excellent presentation skills and adapt to diverse attendance (from technical to executives), with a natural ability to simplify and synthetize complex concepts
You must be able to travel up to 30% of the time domestically during the workshops and specifications phases
Special Position Requirements:
This position is subject to requirements of CFIUS and will require U.S.
Citizenship
This position is subject to standard pre-employment background check, fingerprinting and drug screen
This position is subject to post-hire third party background checks with the Department of Justice and FBI
This position is subject to annual employment background check screening
Preferred Skills and Experience:
Bachelors Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field
Analytical mind, curious and creative, autonomous, a team-player with proven team development experience and a willingness to adapt
Are you ready to be part a part of something big?
","['excel', 'jira']","['recommend', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'jira', 'recommend', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Candidates selected for interview will be required to undergo criminal background checks and may be required to complete a drug screen in accordance with Federal and State Law.
The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology Duties Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design Development Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals) Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences.
Skills Required Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 7 Required Expertise in Written and oral communications 7 Required Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements 7 Required Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 Required Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst 5 Required Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution 4 Required Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4 Required Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5 Preferred Experience reporting to executive management.
1 Preferred Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1 Preferred Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Willingness to work in non-SAP technology stack team members.
Willingness to work in an onsite offshore team model.
Exposure to S4 Hana Or SAP Hana platform preferred.
",['hana'],[None],999.0,['hana']
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst IIIDuties: The candidate must work well in collaborative environments with minimal formal structure and be comfortable in uncertain environments with competing priorities.
The candidate must possess solid business acumen, a strong quantitative / technical background, natural curiosity, and the ability to effectively shift between communications styles based on the audience (technical peer review through leadership update).
Key Qualifications:
Experience applying analytical techniques to provide solutions to real business problems.
Experience with SQL and big data systems and tools.
Programming skills in Python, Java, C++, or similar language.
Creativity to go beyond current tools to deliver best solution to the problem.
Inquisitiveness and a desire for continued self-improvement and development of new skills.
Comfort working independently and making key decisions on projects.
Ability to tell meaningful stories with data.
Strong interpersonal skills with ability to connect with individuals at all levels and develop strong partnerships.
Strong verbal / written communication skills.
(Desired) Supply chain / manufacturing background.
Support discovery of business problems.
Perform data discovery and create proof of concepts.
Perform ad-hoc and reoccurring statistical analyses.
Work with data warehouse architects and software developers to generate seamless business intelligence solutions for business partners.
Job Requirements:
","['sql', 'java', 'python']","['big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['sql', 'java', 'python', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst
Texas Health & Human Services Commission
1100 West 49th Street, Austin, Texas 78756
QUALIFICATIONS:
EXPERIENCE:
Minimum Requirements: Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skills/experience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years
Required/Preferred
Experience
7
Required
Expertise in Written and oral communications
7
Required
Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7
Required
Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5
Required
Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5
Required
Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4
Required
Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4
Required
Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5
Preferred
Experience reporting to executive management.
1
Preferred
Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1
Preferred
Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
Services shall be provided during normal business hours unless otherwise coordinated through the Office of the Attorney General of Texas.
Normal business hours are Monday through Friday from 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM, excluding State holidays when the agency is closed.
The Worker(s) may be required to work outside the normal business hours on weekends, evenings and holidays, as requested.
Payment for work over 40 hours will be at the hourly rate quoted and must be coordinated and pre-approved through HHSC.
TERMS OF SERVICE
Services expect to start 08/01/2020 and are expected to be completed by 08/31/2020
Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 168 hours.
This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing.
DUTIES
The purpose of the Pharmacy Branch-Inventory Tracking Electronic Asset Management System (ITEAMS) Replacement project is to replace the existing ITEAMS with an automated solution that is Food and Drug Administration (FDA) compliant and able to integrate with outside systems to trace and track the distribution of Department of State Health Services (DSHS) pharmaceuticals
The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'normal', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst (Business Analyst III) position reports to the Manager of Product Management.
The Business Analyst (BA) performs advanced (senior-level) business analysis work in support of Rapid Application Development (RAD) using the Salesforce platform.
This role works closely with business owners through the product planning, requirements definition, and delivery of cycles for Salesforce solutions and web-based enterprise-wide usage.
The BA is the bridge between the customer and the development team.
Assists in the analysis of complex technical and business processes, identifying efficiencies and helping to prioritize needs.
Coordinates the gathering, development, and documentation of all requirements.
The BA works in partnership with Information Technology (IT) and subject matter experts, helping customers realize business value.This position works under limited supervision, with considerable latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgment.
Responsible for the creation and validation of system testing.
Essential Job Functions:Attends work on a regular and predictable schedule in accordance with agency leave policy and performs other duties as assigned.Elicits and oversees the business requirements for the implementation of Salesforce solutions to solve system-wide business requests.
When necessary fulfill the role of the Product Owner to act as the voice of the customer.
Accurately represents the business needs, and effectively communicates them with stakeholders and development team.
(35%)Creates and manages the product backlog by eliciting, and documenting all types of requirements as themes, epics, user stories with user acceptance criteria.
Works with all stakeholders to prioritize the backlog into a complete and cohesive representation of a products' roadmap, defects, and technical debt.
(20%)Collaborates daily with manager to ensure product roadmaps and delivery of features follows a predictable and steady pace through daily stand up meetings, product planning meetings, and other key ceremonies.
Participates in Agile ceremonies and leads them when the Product Owner or Scrum Master is not available.
(20%)Performs functional testing and manages User Acceptance Testing by ensuring adequate test cases exists and all User Acceptance Criteria are met.
(15%)Develops a deep expertise with assigned application.
Obtains stakeholder sign off on requirements and priorities.
Performs other duties as assigned.
(10%)Knowledge Skills Abilities:Knowledge of experience with Agile/Scrum methodology practices.Knowledge in Salesforce configuration, using development and testing environments for effective change management.Knowledge of the capabilities and limitations of computer systems or management information systems.Knowledge of large-scale IT operations and information technology industry trends.Knowledge of process or systems analysis and design work.Knowledge of Software Development Lifecycle (SDLC) process for report development.Knowledge of software usability concepts.Skill in defining all types of requirements, functional specifications, and other deliverables.Skill in business/systems analysis.Skill in working collaboratively and cooperatively with colleagues and in building consensus.Skill in interpersonal relationships, including the ability to work with people under pressure, negotiate among multiple parties, resolve conflicts, and establish and maintain effective working relationships with various levels of personnel in governmental entities.Skill in troubleshooting, performance tuning, and problem-solving.Skill in verbal, written, and presentation communication.Ability to guide technology decisions relative to the Salesforce requirements and serve as subject matter expert and design resource to others.Ability to provide technical assistance by responding to inquiries from others regarding errors, problems, or questions about programs.Ability to build consensus across multiple teams and working with teams located in different geographic locations.Ability to work independently and deliver results in an environment of broad, consultative management.Ability to provide excellent customer service.Ability to accurately track time spent working on projects, as well the ability to accurately estimate changes or enhancements.
Registration or Licensure Requirements:Certified Scrum Product Owner or IIBA CBAP preferred.
Initial Selection Criteria:Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major coursework in business or a related field.
Appropriate experience may be substituted for the required education on a year-for-year basis.Minimum of 5 (five) years of experience working on complex enterprise wide applications.Minimum of 5 (five) years of experience in an analysis role that required complex problem solving.Minimum of 3 (three) years of experience with the Salesforce product.Minimum of 3 (three) years of experience in Agile software development methodologies.
Additional Information:MOS Code:There are no direct military occupation(s) that relate to the responsibilities, and registration or licensure requirements for this position.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
","['excel', 'salesforc']","['predict', 'tune', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'salesforc', 'predict', 'tune', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"· Install and Administer Salesforce
· Support all Salesforce analyst activities listed below
· Allows for both Industry and Government input and allows and reflects all dates and stages in the capture management process, including initial interest/engagement, registration of company/data of all industry types, capability by Industry, requests for meetings/discussion, analysis of capability by Government; post-engagement activities, feedback, follow-on actions/engagements and outcome;
· Tracks roles and responsibilities clearly and allows for ability to securely upload and share information with outside contractors;
· Tracks interactions with the requirements, contracting, and small business activities and Industry separately and establishes separate mailing lists for each role;
· Tracks relationships and engagements, analyzes and scores these relationships to rate the chance of success and informs on the potential outcome of the engagement;
· Integrates with other systems
· Measure the effectiveness of engagements using the data collected;
· Recommend appropriate techniques and methods within the general scope of statistical analysis to support quantitative studies, recommendations and management decisions;
· Assist in providing statistical analysis and other support on the overall program and engagement mission.
This will include trend analysis, quantitative/qualitative studies, risk analysis, model building and recommendations to assist in management decisions;
· Execute technical analysis, reports documentation, graphics and publication services in support of program and engagement activities.
Skills/Experience
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent
3+ years as a Salesforce Business Analyst
Salesforce Certified
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Salesforce: 3 years (Required)
Austin, TX 78753 (Required)
Application Question:
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Preferred)
http://www.fermatsoftware.com
Benefit Conditions:
",['salesforc'],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'statist', 'recommend']"
BA,"Business Analyst, Customer Experience
The Customer Experience Analyst will deliver analysis of customer experience, digital experience, voice & text, social media, operational performance and other data streams to identify, recommend and support business enhancement strategies to improve the overall performance of each client.
This position works on an analytic team to assess key customer, internal and other processes that have an impact on the customer journey.
The Customer Experience Analyst also designs and implements initiatives to improve the customer journey and/or client internal processes.
The Customer Experience Analyst will interpret data, identify root causes, build client relationships and contribute to the development of improvement efforts.
Essential Functions/Core Responsibilities
Demonstrate experience in applying contemporary improvement techniques and producing results for a function and/or business unit.
Organizes and analyzes customer satisfaction data to identify trends, statistics, and issues to be shared with stakeholders to create and monitor resolution plans to increase customer satisfaction, KPIs, and other strategic/business decisions increase customer satisfaction, KPIs, and other strategic/business decisions.
Researches and uses competitive comparisons and metrics to increase customer satisfaction, KPIs, and other strategic/business decisions
Monitors and evaluates voice of the customer (VOC) data sources to identify and assess gaps in the customer experience.
Acts independently or engages appropriate SME to resolve customer concerns, as quickly and accurately as possible, to improve the customer experience.
Assists leaders with strategic planning, project management and roadmaps.
Continuously drives reporting improvement and efficiency by simplifying and automating where possible, eliminating redundancy across the organization, refining metrics, and building new reports to recommend actionable solutions to support decision-making, in support of continuous improvement of customer experience and language services.
Develops reporting on key metrics.
Distributes reports to business stakeholders on a regular basis.
Proactively delivers the most real-time, actionable customer insights possible, leveraging all tools and resources available to provide actionable solutions, participates in problem resolution and monitors and tracks improvement plans.
Collaborates with key internal partners to identify and understand customers’ underlying needs to recommend business solutions that address root causes of customer pain points.
Uses and establishes departmental processes for cultivating, analyzing and acting on customer feedback to drive an exceptional customer experience and effectively respond to customer needs.
Maintains VOC project plan
Analyzes qualitative and quantitative data and identifies opportunities.
Performs analysis of large client data sets and provides recommendations for improvement related to the project with limited direction.
Proactively determines areas for drill-down focus and conducts follow-up analyses to understand the drivers of performance gaps.
Conducts planning, data collection, data cleansing and data linkage in preparation for analysis.
Reviews and documents current processes as part of gap or root cause analysis and input to improvement initiatives; identifies gaps that may be contributing to overall business and CX results.
Reviews client documentation related to the initiative and conducts assessments.
Candidate Profile
Bachelor’s degree in related field from a four-year college or university with three to five years related experience
Strong organizational and project management skills.
Strong problem-solving skills; proven experience in consulting or improving business and/or CX processes.
Able to establish a course of action for self to accomplish a series of specific goals while using appropriate resources.
Good written and oral communication skills; strong interpersonal communication and ability to work well in teams.
Strong client service orientation
Experience with contact centers, customer satisfaction or CX data analysis is preferred
Experience with statistical concepts and applications
Experience working in an environment where work activities and deliverables are dependent on a diverse group of technical and business functional experts.
Experience working in an emerging and rapidly changing environment.
Demonstrated ability to meet deadlines, even in a demanding and changing environment
Ability to travel periodically.
Must have proficiency with contemporary analytic technologies.
MBA a plus
Six Sigma training and green belt certification a plus
Experience with speech and text analytic tools and/or other AI tools a plus
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cleans', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'kpi', 'cleans', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Candidates selected for interview will be required to undergo criminal background checks and may be required to complete a drug screen in accordance with Federal and State Law.
The Business Analyst will work on Long Term Care On-line Portal projects affecting Medicaid recipient service authorizations, functional assessments and approvals.
This project touches multiple long-term care processing applications including Texas Medicaid and Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care Online Portal , ID CARE, LTC Provider System and the Service Authorization System Online (SASO).
These systems collectively are part of the Texas Medicaid Management Information System (TMMIS).
This Worker will act as a Business Analyst and their role on the project will be as a Product Owner for Community First Choice (CFC) IDD Assessment.
Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internalexternal stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job #: 1071859
Job Type: DIRECT HIRE
Salary: 90-95K
If you meet below qualifications, please send resume in Word format to mramirez@apexsystems.com
Primary Responsibilities:
Drive business requirement workshops with customers and document business processes
Map customer business process Products.
Develop solutions to solve customer problems
Work with customers and internal teams to develop and document system designs
Create detailed functional specification and obtain sign off from customers
Maintain customer expectations on what’s in-scope for the project and what’s out of scope
Translate the functional specifications to executable PBIs and work with Configuration Teams to develop the solution
Demo system progress (Sprint Reviews) to the customer to validate configuration is on track
Drive user acceptance tests and enable user adoption by working with customers and end users.
Help identify and mitigate project risks
Maintain Requirements Traceability Matrix to ensure contracted scope is delivered
Desired Skills and Experience
Bachelor’s degree is required; Certification in business analysis (CBAP or CCBA) is a plus
Ability to understand and execute contracts
Detail oriented, analytical and extremely organized with strong time-management skills
Outstanding oral, presentation, and written communication skills, including technical writing
Understanding of software development processes and engagement methodologies
Excellent problem-solving skills, with a demonstrated ability to identify and solve problems
Ability to impact operations and effect change without being confrontational
Background in infrastructure management or capital project planning is a plus
More a function/analytical expert rather than technical
Will be a champion of the product and have full product knowledge
Travel 10%
EEO Employer
",['excel'],"['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ Months
Roles & Responsibilities:
Facilitating interactive sessions with business and cross functional teams.
Facilitating analysis of functional requirements and design of technology specifications, working with business/functional personnel, capturing requirements by interactive sessions with clients.
Participating and providing guidance to Business and Functional Units in developing and completing user acceptance testing, training, and implementation-related activities.
Facilitating interactive sessions with business and cross functional teams.
Developing/maintaining an understanding of key business drivers/impacts, assisting clients with identifying and solving business challenges.
Defining functional design and systems specifications.
Preparing/reviewing/delivering completed packages.
Required Experience:
Hands-on requirements elicitation and analysis, client management and technical documentation experience, including use cases, prototyping, and data modeling.
Business analysis experience on software development projects.
Hands-on requirements elicitation and analysis, client management and technical documentation experience, including use cases, prototyping, and data modeling.
Required Skills:
Strong collaborative, analytical, written/verbal communication (specifically technical writing) skills and well versed with MS Office suite of products and prototyping/screen mock-up tools such as Visio, SnagIt, or Adobe Illustrator, or Axure.
Business analysis experience on software development projects.
Strong collaborative, analytical, written/verbal communication (specifically technical writing) skills and well versed with MS Office suite of products and prototyping/screen mock-up tools such as Visio, SnagIt, or Adobe Illustrator, or Axure.
Must have strong collaborative, analytical, written/verbal communication (specifically technical writing) skills and well versed with MS Office suite of products and prototyping/screen mock-up tools such as Visio, SnagIt, or Adobe Illustrator.
",['ms office'],"['data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'data modeling', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Duties:
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements: Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skills/experience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years
Required/Preferred
Experience
7
Required
Expertise in Written and oral communications
7
Required
Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7
Required
Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5
Required
Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5
Required
Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4
Required
Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4
Required
Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5
Preferred
Experience reporting to executive management.
1
Preferred
Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1
Preferred
Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Budget/Business Analyst will verify, track, report, schedule, organize, and document new user requirements and update systems.
They will develop programmatic processes for functional requirement documents and new user requirements.
The Budget/Business Analyst will coordinate the review and analysis of functional specifications leading to design modules and program specification requirements.
They will perform configuration management.
They will provide administrative support.
The Budget/Business Analyst will plan and analyze requirements to determine feasibility of design within time and cost constraints.
They will coordinate the implementation, documentation, testing, operation and maintenance of program modules.
The Budget/Business Analyst will consult with other engineers or technical staff to evaluate interface between various system components or elements.
They will evaluate proposed solutions and perform with some latitude for unreviewed actions and decisions.
Key Responsibilities
Assist with the implementation of Momentum financial management software at the Department of Veterans Affairs
Collaborate with client stakeholders to understand business needs and processes and elicit clear, concise user requirements supporting the business case
Define “as-is” and “to-be” business processes; conduct and document gap analyses
Requirements management and analysis using specified VA tools
Translate user requirements, into simplified, well-organized user stories accompanied by clearly defined acceptance criteria
Collaborate with an Agile team to facilitate development and testing in support of user requirements
Use business requirements to drive the design or review of test cases, process change requests, and help manage project scope, product acceptance, installation and production deployment
Required Qualifications
BA/BS Degree
3 Years of Experience
Candidates that do not meet the required qualifications will not be considered.
Preferred Qualifications
3 years experience supporting Momentum implementation
Experience working in a SAFe Agile environment
Experience working with Cabinet Level Agencies including the Department of Veterans Affairs
Strong customer relationship capabilities
Excellent problem-solving skills
Ability to foster collaborative work in dynamic team environment
Management skills to select, develop, mentor, and motivate team members
Ability to interact with partners and clients
Ability to communicate clearly with all levels in an organization, with both verbal and written communication skills
Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Power Point, Project, Visio, One Note, Outlook)
Active VA Public Trust (High-Risk) clearance or must be able to pass a background check to obtain a VA Public Trust (High-Risk) clearance
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Posted: Apr 16, 2020
Role Number:
200141448
Key Qualifications
8+ years of experience working with data analysis.
Experience with accessing data stored in Hadoop-Hive, Oracle, PostgreSQL, and/or SPARK
Working knowledge of SQL/HiveQL for accessing data, Tableau for presentation and R / Python for model building.
Data modeling experience in building Logical and Physical data models
Skills:
Ability to work with large datasets to extract meaningful analysis and information.
Good interpersonal, written, verbal communication with presentation skills.
Attention to detail, data accuracy, and quality of output
Sharp troubleshooting skills to identify and resolve issues in a timely manner
Great teammate
The technical business analyst will work with various teams to deliver data, dashboards, and insightful and performance-optimized analysis to facilitate business decisions.
You'll serve as a key partner of operations and engineering team, serving the needs of the Maps organization to analyze various data sets.
This role provides analytics for pilot programs to support operations in business analysis and decisions.
IIlustrate critical metrics to help guide pilot operations in effective business management.
Identify trends, areas of opportunity for operational performance enhancements and create presentations to convey analysis to influence strategic decisions.
This role will require working with multiple large data sets to parse them as required for analysis, documenting the processes, logic and reasoning for each dataset.
Conduct analysis that includes data gathering and requirements specification, processing, analysis and ongoing deliverables and presentations.
Design meaningful metrics to measure success of maps business processes and devise ways to measure them from various data signals.
Predictive analysis required to forecast timelines for overall project as well as within various process flows and business segments.
Education & Experience
CS, Statistics, Physics, Operations Research, or similar quantitative domain.
","['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl']","['data modeling', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']",999.0,"['postgresql', 'spark', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'python', 'hadoop', 'hive', 'oracl', 'data modeling', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'segment']"
BA,"Telecom Client- Austin, TX (onsite)
Business Analyst (FIS Quantum)
Intial 6 months
An implementation and support experience with FIS Quantum is highly desirable.
The position will provide technical expertise and knowledge of treasury processes and practices to ensure that the Quantum system operates appropriately and efficiently in supporting daily Treasury functions across the globe.
The successful candidate will have good familiarity with treasury management systems and the associated processes within such systems.
An implementation and support experience with Quantum is highly desirable.
Responsibilities will include:
Daily monitoring of Quantum's processes to ensure that various file transmissions to and from the system are operating properly
"" Ensure that any Quantum production issues with an emphasis on the following modules ( Cash Management, Bank Reconciliation, Foreign Exchange, I/C loans, Money Market, Investments, etc.)
are resolved on time
"" Actively working with Quantum and with internal IT teams to resolve any issues with bank files and data transmissions between Quantum and other systems including retrieval of market rates as applicable
"" Resolving any accounting related issues within Quantum in collaboration with Accounting team
"" Maintaining and managing transaction mapping rules in the system to ensure that the system is accurately categorizing prior day transaction activity from daily bank statement transmissions into Quantum
"" Manage the set-up and maintenance of all static data elements (bank accounts, counterparties, general ledger, etc.)
and configuration defaults and rules for Quantum.
""
Build crystal reports to support Treasury Operations.
""
Being a subject matter expert in the functionality of the Quantum system by developing a deep understanding of how the system works
"" Developing and updating user guides, when applicable, to ensure that the Global Cash Management teams across the globe have access to up-to-date instructions on how to perform their required tasks in Quantum
"" Keeping Treasury Management up-to-date on issues/challenges within the system
"" Projects and other duties as needed by Treasury General requirements
",['c'],"['busi', 'account', 'data']",999.0,"['c', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Duration: Longterm Contract
Job DescriptionÂ
This position performs advanced, senior-level business analysis work.
The business analyst serves as the conduit between the program/customer community and the software development team through which requirements flow.
This position may support more than one project or be assigned to special projects at any time.
This BA will be involved at some level throughout the entire software development life cycle.
Upon establishment of the requirements baseline, the focus is shifted towards the management of the requirements specification and verifying the fulfillment of all requirements, including requirements for enhancements post-implementation.Â
II.
WORKER SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements:
.Years Skills/Experience
.4 Deriving requirements from interviews with customers and creating system requirements documents based on the interviews
.4 System Analysis and Design
.4 Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC)
.4 Business Process ReengineeringÂ
.4 Development and user stories and use cases
Preferences:
YearsÂ
.Skills/Experience
.3 Agile MethodologyÂ
.2 Business Process Development
.3 Strong communication, organization and facilitation skills
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This Worker will act as a Business Analyst and their role on the project will be as a Product Owner for Community First Choice (CFC) IDD Assessment.
Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internal/external stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following:
Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
Skills and Qualifications:
Required:
Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
Experience coordinating and developing test strategies
Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
Experience working in a team environment.
Preferred:
Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
They understand business as much as technology, and help their customers improve their profitability and efficiency by providing high value technology consulting, staffing, and project management outsourcing services.
Engineering services include Data Translation, CAD/CAM/CAE, Process & Product Engineering, Prototyping, and Testing/Validation within a wide range of markets and industries.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Position: Business Analyst
Starts: June 2020
Duration: 2-months
Status: Freelance
Rate: up to $68/hour
This is a freelance role staring in June slated to last 2-months.
The ideal Business Analyst will have experience using Tableau to source data to analyze, manage and update content.
The Business Analyst will also be helping process and synthesize qualitative feedback for focus groups.
The Business Analyst responsibilities will include:
• Analyze and interpret open source qualitative and statistical data to identify significant, relevant information, ultimately curating materials from around the web and other sources
• Identify relationships and trends in data, as well as any factors that could affect the results of the research
• Prepare data for processing by organizing information, checking for inaccuracies and adjusting the data appropriately
• Evaluate the external open sources of information to determine any limitations, in terms of reliability or validity
• Update and manage I&D Global Factbook Standard Operating Procedures
• Perform all other duties as assigned
Experience Required:
• BS, MS or Phd in Statistics, Business Analytics, Computer Science, Engineering, Industrial/Organizational Psychology or equivalent practical experience
• Minimum 5 years of experience in analytics and data role
• Experience with how to build and manage tableau dashboards
• Ability to translate business processes and data into analytic solutions
• 1-3 years specific I&D or culture-based experience, including talent management experience
• Strong foundation in data modeling, including at least 3 years of relevant business or people analytics experience
• Strong experience with Python or any scripting language
• Excellent experience with Microsoft Excel
• Stays up-to-date on new technologies and methods across data science and data visualizations
• Experience with SPSS, SAS or other related programs is preferred
• User experience with Apple hardware and software products is preferred
JUNE 2020
Submit resume (and samples if applicable) to: cc306@jobalert.creativecircle.com
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'python', 'spss', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Type of hire: Contract
Interviews: 2 Video Interview
JD:
• Must have in-depth knowledge of software development lifecycles including Agile development and testing.
• Experience leading requirements gathering sessions, capturing meeting notes, documenting clear and concise requirements.
Follows up on action items.
• Experience managing scope creep and clearly communicate with business stakeholders on feasibility and level of effort analysis.
• Assist in the maintenance and pruning of ticket backlog to ensure a coherent, actionable and prioritized product roadmap.
• Experience in dealing with enterprise-scalable multiple projects and cross-functional teams, and ability to coordinate across teams in a large matrix organization environment.
• Strong communication, technical and remote collaboration skill are a must.
• Collaborate closely with the development and testing teams within the organization to ensure projects are technically feasible, requirements are understood, and development is aligned.
• A Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related discipline
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Business Analyst
Duration: 2 months (Highly Extendable) Contract to hire
Client: State client
Requirement:
8 years Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 years Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 years Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 years Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverable, test scenarios and project status.
8 years Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 years Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 years Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 years Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 years Experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 years Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 years Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 years Experience working in a team environment.
Preferred:
3 years Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 years Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 years Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
Job Type: Contract
Experience:
Business Analysis: 8 years (Required)
MS Office word, excel: 5 years (Required)
Microsoft Project : 5 years (Required)
healthcare: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Austin, TX (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
","['ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"(1.)
Documentation work (2.)
To develop the codes for the project as per work assignation.
(3.)
To maintain the existing project and resolving the issues occurring in the existing project.
(4.)
To work upon the new requests raised by the client and develop those features.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internalexternal stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following A. Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.B.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.C.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.D.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.E.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.F.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.G.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.H.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.I.
Other duties as assigned.
Skills CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.8RequiredExperience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions8RequiredExperience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.8RequiredExperience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.8RequiredExperience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.8RequiredExperience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.5RequiredExperience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.
).5RequiredExperience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.5RequiredExperience coordinating and developing test strategies5RequiredExperience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.3RequiredExperience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.3RequiredExperience working in a team environment.3PreferredKnowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.2PreferredExperience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.2PreferredExperience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Perform advance work related to the development of applications and data management systems, under direction of the functional Director, needing minimal supervision.
To ensure that applications and data management systems are developed and maintained consistent with the HHSC mission, applicable laws, rules, policies, especially those related to security, executive decisions and user needs.
Deliver oversight of Programs requirement gathering, development delivery of superior UAT, and implementation that meets HHSC Clients' and Program needs.
Essential Job Functions:
Ensures effective communication between groups about the agency, IT, Program and end users (e.g.
the Providers - LMHA, LBHA, LIDDA) needs/preferences and various approaches to the development of new functionality, balancing options for and impact of modifications to applications, as well as recommendation for streamlining and improvement.
Participate in and provide oversight of the HHSC IDD-BHS IT projects and activities to plan, develop, maintain, and update applications.
Activities include but are not limited to participation in all phases of IT project planning; requirements gathering workgroups, oversight of application design decisions to ensure the consistency and quality of the application, user acceptance testing, deployment planning, and final deployment approvals with IT project managers, business analysts, developers, subject matter experts, and internal and external stakeholders.
Also works outside of the existing IT projects such as on IT estimates for legislative appropriations requests or grant applications.
Review business processes and lead brainstorming and requirement sessions to develop crosswalks of existing and new processes and systems.
EFJ1.
45%
Communicates information, orally and in writing, alone or with others, related to job responsibilities, HHSC, and ODS that are professional, logical, and concise.
Written documentation includes communications with all levels of the organization, providing information for the decision-making, and for application users such as instructions, release notes, online Help, and application related broadcast messages.
Provide oversight and approval of documentation produced by IT to include use cases, agile requirements documents, communications with users, and tickets.
Orally present information, formal and informal, to individual and group, is well organized, fact, and data-based to convince the end user.
Provide demonstrations of new, enhanced, or updated applications functionality as needed to the different stakeholders.
Identify potential risks and difficulties related to applications such as CMBHS and other systems and designs communication strategies to mitigate or avoid them.
EFJ2.
25%
As a member of the ODS ensures effective exchange of information between the ODS business team and the data analysts and training and technical assistance team.
Communicates with ODS Data Analysts about application development and changes that will impact the analysis and reporting of data and with the training and technical assistance team to ensure they are aware of upcoming releases and deployments.
Participates in and provides oversight of change control and request for work processes for the ODS business team to ensure they are effective and efficient.
To meet the multiple deadlines and work on projects with changing priorities, from leadership and legislative changes.
Uses the system to document the resolution of tickets.
Recommends participates in and provides oversight of process improvements.
EFJ3.
15%
Serves as backup for ODS Business team members, when needed.
Work with Senior leadership, program, and IT to ensure work product is delivered promptly.
Communicate with the internal and external stakeholders to deliver an oral and written presentation for the status of the multiple complex projects.
Acquires appropriate levels of training and experience needed to provide support to other teams and system enhancements, bug fixes, and training materials.
Shares and oversees the responsibility for running the business, and requests for ODS and IT support received through mailboxes and directly.
Leads by example in recommending process improvements and bringing efficiency within HHSC by reducing waste.
EFJ4.
10%
Other duties as assigned and special projects.
EJF5.
5% Knowledge Skills Abilities:
Knowledge of methodologies used for the IT development and maintenance of the software applications.
Ability to meet deadlines and dealing with ambiguity on projects with changing priorities.
Ability to provide oversight of complex processes, identify non-compliance and areas needing improvement, proving results and recommendations.
Ability to read and understand system requirements/design specifications and propose logical solutions to meet requirements/specifications.
Ability to effectively communicate business/program needs and preferences to individuals, IT and other individuals and groups so that effective solutions are identified.
Ability to communicate technical information to business/program areas so that effective solutions are identified.
Ability to analyze and interpret technical information including regulations, policies, and automation system documentation/ specifications to communicate in writing and translate to users and business.
Ability to read, interpret, and analyze existing system and technical documentation, manuals, and reports.
Ability to analyze business systems, processes, and workflows and communicate (in writing, graphically and orally) appropriate levels of detail.
Ability to maintain a professional demeanor when dealing with challenging and stressful situations.
Skill in coordinating, facilitating and providing oversight of fast-paced workgroups and their meetings.
Skill working with Microsoft Office suite such as Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Visio.
Registration or Licensure Requirements:
Certified Business Analysis Professional (CBAP) or Six Sigma certification is preferred.
Initial Selection Criteria:
Degree from an accredited college, university or technical school.
Experience may be substituted for education/Degree.
Experience in the Business Analysis and Project Management will be preferred.
Additional Information:
Requisition #
In-basket exercise required.
MOS Code:
Military occupation(s) that relate to the initial selection criteria for this position may include: 35F, IT, 23, 02111, 8E000.
HHS agencies use E-Verify.
You must bring your I-9 documentation with you on your first day of work.
I-9 Form - Click here to download the I-9 form.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Summary:
The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology
The purpose of the Pharmacy Branch-Inventory Tracking Electronic Asset Management System (ITEAMS) Replacement project is to replace the existing ITEAMS with an automated solution that is Food and Drug Administration (FDA) compliant and able to integrate with outside systems to trace and track the distribution of Department of State Health Services (DSHS) pharmaceuticals
Duties:
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up to date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
Requirements:
7 yrs expertise in Written and oral communications
7 yrs experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7 yrs required relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 yrs required experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5 yrs required familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4 yrs experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc.
4 yrs experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5 yrs experience reporting to executive management.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $70.00 per hour
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Public Health: 5 years (Preferred)
Business Analyst: 7 years (Preferred)
SDLC: 7 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Austin, TX 78756 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Preferred)
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Senior Business Intelligence Analyst
Classification: Exempt Position
Primary Responsibilities
The qualified candidate will have experience with the Microsoft Power BI business intelligence platform, databases, and ETL development and have a collaborative spirit.
Required:
A Bachelors Degree in Operations Research, Mathematics, Computer Science, Cost Accounting or related scientific or technical discipline.
Experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment while considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Minimum 5 years experience
Microsoft Power BI, Qlik, or Tableau dashboard development experience
Experience with SQL-based RDBMS
Experience with ETL, data prep, data quality, data cleansing, data normalization techniques
Client-facing communication skills
Ability to develop efficient data models for use in BI applications
Ability to meet moderate level background check or higher
U.S.
Citizenship required
Desired:
Master's degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Math/Statistics, Engineering, or related field
Experience in data mining, statistical, and/or machine learning techniques to enable data-driven decision making
Business related course work highly desired
Experience in an ML engineering or data science role building ML or predictive models
Experience with other programming or scripting languages (e.g.
Python, R)
Eligibility for Top Secret Clearance or similar background check for other Agencies
Why?
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.
","['power bi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'python']","['risk', 'etl', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'qlik', 'python', 'risk', 'etl', 'data mining', 'classif', 'machine learning', 'data', 'dashboard', 'predict', 'account', 'research', 'math', 'busi', 'normal', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The Senior Business Analyst is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, schedule concerns and Application Performance Monitoring.
Hands on Application Performance Management experience is required.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Hours: 6:00 a.m. 2:30 p.m. Monday - Friday Position is Onsite.
VA Austin Information Technology Center
This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans
Primary Responsibilities
A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
• Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
• Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
• Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
• Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
• Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
• Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
• Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
• Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
• Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
• Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
• Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
• Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
• Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
8 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
• Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
• Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
• Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
• Excellent organization and analytical skills.
• Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
• Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
• Must have experience with at least one of these tools: Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
• Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
• Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
• Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
• Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports
Preferred Qualifications
• Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
• Prior VA Experience
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Public Trust
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Systems Engineering
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.
Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"D.R.
It is engaged in the construction and sale of high quality homes designed principally for the entry-level and first time move-up markets.
D.R.
The right candidate will, with some supervision, clearly identify, define and document the business needs and customer requirements of the SBUs within DHIFS and communicate these to the information technology staff.
Act as liaison between the SBUs and IT to ensure system development and implementation proceeds as anticipated.
Designs appropriate application systems structures which will provide a solid foundation for well-written and reliable application programs.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Performs necessary investigation, analysis and evaluation to determine feasibility for IT related projects.
Advise the appropriate people on the implications of existing IT systems that can be applied to a problem.
Develops and/or evaluates previously refined data and programs and select from a range of alternatives to determine the appropriate action to be taken.
Develops or assists in the development of work plans, specifications, task sequencing, and the extent to which tasks may be performed concurrently
Assists the Project Manager in estimating resource needs for analysts, programmers, user personnel, consultants, equipment, etc
Receives some supervision; performs most routine duties independently; discusses or seeks approval on complex matters with the Project Manager or B.A.
III.
Develops time schedules, conversion, and test procedures for all aspects of system, from manual handling through computer processing.
Education and/or Experience
Fifth year college or university program certificate; or four to six years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field is preferred
2 – 4 years of systems design work experience or relevant financial services experience
Major systems development and implementation experience
Understand project management and control
Ability to communicate ideas and problem solutions
Ability to effectively work with people in other departments and/or outside of the enterprise
Must have 1 – 2 years experience in a relevant position within the financial services industry
Must be customer service oriented
Build YOUR future with D.R.
America's Builder.
",[None],"['supervis', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['supervis', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst accomplishes objectives through the analysis of business functions and process requirements.
The Business Analyst interacts with local operations managers and their team to develop business processes based on project requirements.
The Business Analyst is also able to communicate directly with clients to further refine processes based on client needs.
The Business Analyst interacts with the IT organization to translate project requirements into deliverable systems.
A forward-thinking, anticipatory professional driven by a passion to pursue your full potential and dreams.
A work environment that promotes collaboration, consistency and community service to empower people.
An inclusive culture that promotes career/life integration and invests in developing people in areas of focused expertise.
A team of professionals grounded in strong, personal relationships and a sense of belonging to a common purpose for adding value and making a difference.
“Fearless Unrivaled Flexibility”– It’s about results, not the hours you work.
Required Experience and Education
Two (2) to five (5) years’ experience as a Business Analyst or Project Manager, demonstrating a progression in complexity, scope, and number of projects managed
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, accounting, and/or business discipline preferred
Work with operational management to establish scope, deliverables and resources requirements
Conduct needs assessments and requirements gathering while developing business process models in order to meet project goals
Coordinate with IT to support systems development required for program operations, including, but not limited to, development of user stories and user acceptance testing
Support training of staff members, providing guidance for the use of project systems
Resolve issues and solve problems throughout the project lifecycle
Communicate project’s progress, problems, resolutions, and other business concerns to appropriate stakeholders in a clear, accurate, and timely manner
Develop tools and best practices for project execution
Possess excellent communication and written skills
Ability to think outside of the box and perform root cause analysis
Ability to learn quickly and lead in adapting to new technologies
Ability to manage multiple priorities, commitments and projects
Self-starter but ability to work well in team environment
Position may require travel
Other tasks that may be required to complete project requirements
Project Management Professional (PMP) certification is preferred
Certified Business Analysis Professional (CBAP) or equivalent certification is a plus
Proficiency in use of business analysis and project management tools required
Experience with M-Files, Hyland OnBase or another ECM solution is a plus
Proficiency in Microsoft SQL, Power BI, and SSRS is a plus
","['power bi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'bi', 'ssr']","['commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'ssr', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"As the Associate Business Analyst, you will be responsible for creating reports, ad hoc data analysis and other business intelligence related tasks to support a global operations team servicing one of the largest financial institutions in the world.
You will be extracting and transforming data using SQL, leveraging advanced Excel features and Python for data analysis, and producing clear business intelligence and actionable information into visually appealing reporting.
Position Details
Standard support hours: Mon-Fri 8:00am-5:00pm
Responsibilities:
Develop metrics and dashboard reporting to provide insight across all operational organizations, for the purpose of increasing efficiency and improving customer delivery.
Create queries, write reports, and present findings and then make recommendations to direct and upper level management.
Analyze current business and reporting processes and look for means to improve efficiency and reduce bottlenecks.
Build complex reports related to operations performance.
(ie.
Labor efficiency, Service Catalog volumes, SLA measurement, etc.)
Utilize Python/SQL to provide solutions as well as maintain legacy reporting within Microsoft Excel with VBA.
Work closely with all levels of management to prioritize business and information reporting needs.
Continually train and elevate skill level with the various applications used by the organization.
Qualifications:
Skills, Knowledge, Abilities
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Requires the ability to deal effectively and professionally with internal and external customers.
Must have outstanding organizational and multi-tasking skills and the ability to prioritize work effectively.
Requires excellent working knowledge of the Microsoft Office Suite, specifically Excel, including sorting, formulas, and macro definitions.
Strong organizational skills to multi-task demanding priorities; effective use of resources to deliver results.
Professional communication skills with the ability to successfully interact and gather detailed business requirements at all levels of the organization.
Ability to work effectively across many internal functional groups.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Passionate and continuous improvement minded
Advanced in MS Office (Word, Excel, PowerPoint), Outlook, and ERP systems
Education/Experience Requirements
High school diploma or its equivalent is required
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, MIS, Mathematics or related field preferred
Prior professional experience in Data Entry and Analysis preferred
Proficient relational database experience (MS-Access, SQL)
6-12+ months Python experience (familiarity with Pandas highly preferred)
Intermediate-to-Expert-level VBA skills
Familiarity with a data visualization suite such as Tableau
Experience with version control a plus (ie.
Github)
","['ms office', 'github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'python', 'erp']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'erp system', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'panda', 'python', 'erp', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what’s delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Must have SQL experience along with .Net
Must have Cloud XP with micro services knowledge
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let’s take this journey together.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
","['excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Bachelor's degree or equivalent, with minimum 5+ years of experience
Acts on behalf of the business owner or product owner to meet the needs of the Scrum Development Team and assure product delivery
Agile Methodology/SCRUM
Team Foundation Server (TFS)
Develops a clear understanding of the customer's needs and defines a Product Backlog
Constantly re-prioritizes the Product Backlog based on customer feedback, market changes and business priority.
Determines the appropriate product Release Date and Content
Actively manage internal and external stakeholders
Accept or reject the product teams work results at each Sprint Review meeting
Maintain a basic knowledge of software development
Manages an inventory of technology related assets hardware, software, application systems, databases, licenses, products
Experience in software Product Development (Products having a graphical user interface is a must.
Applications delivered to a mobile phone preferred.
Customer facing websites secondary.)
A strong understanding of software Agile methodologies
Demonstrated commitment to keeping sensitive information confidential
Ability to articulate ideas to both technical and non-technical addressees
Knowledge and understanding of Information Technology industry trends, directions and market experience; ability to relate them to own organization
",['tf'],"['busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['tf', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Business Analyst ServicingJob Title: Business AnalystLocation: Austin, TXSummary: The Default Business Analyst will report to the Business Analyst Manager, AVP.
* Create process flows, requirement documentation and* Create user scenarios, test cases, test case execution steps, and user test coordination.
* Analyze data, interrupt results and troubleshoot if results look incorrect; request changes as needed to meet business requirements.
* Report on common sources of technical issues or questions and make recommendations to product team.
* Provide analytical solution support for all Servicing units by researching and developing solutions for the business.
* Responsible for business and system performance report development.
* Document process and workflows; identify potential gaps; address through remediation.
* Assist with the implementation of projects and enhancements to Servicing systems.
* Experience and proven proficiency in delivering using Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) methodologies* Understands how to capture business requirements, testing of changes.
* Experience with industry EDI file transmission methods* Solid experience in writing SQL queries* Ability to meet deadlines while working under pressure.
* Handles simultaneous tasks and projects in a fast-paced environment.
* Able to work independently.
* Analytical and organized.
* Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
* Strong PC skills.
Must be proficient in MS Windows, MS Outlook, MS Office Suite, and MS Visio.Preferred Education/Experience:* In depth knowledge of MSP, with at least 3 years recent experience working with MSP.
* High school diploma or equivalent required, bachelor's degree preferred.
* Knowledge of FNMA, FHLMC, GNMA, FHA/VA workout requirements.
* Knowledge of FDCPA, CFPB Servicing Guidelines and state regulations related to debt collection practices.
* History of reliable attendance.
* Ability to work a schedule that includes occasional weekends; FT schedule working 8 hour shift M-F.* Must be able to pass background investigation.Core Competencies:To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:* Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.
* Team Work - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Puts success of team above own interests; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives;* Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work for spelling and grammar; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret written information.
* Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
* Diversity - Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; promotes a harassment-free environment.
* Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.
* Adaptability - Adapts to changes in the work environment; Manages competing demands; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events.
* Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.
* Judgment - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.
* Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently.
* Professionalism - Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; Accepts responsibility for own actions; Follows through on commitments.
* Quantity - Meets productivity standards; Completes work in timely manner; Strives to increase productivity; Works quickly.Other Duties: This job may require frequent sitting or standing for long periods of time.
This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Must be able to lift up to ten pounds.
Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information.
VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction.
HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
","['react', 'excel', 'sql', 'ms office']","['data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['react', 'excel', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Primary Job Function
Position will support largest Medical Device customer set including Group Purchasing Organizations (GPOs) and highly complex Integrated Delivery Network (IDN) representing 80% of Medical Device revenue across Abbotts largest Divisions, including all Medical Device Divisions of Cardiac Rhythm Management (CRM), Electrophysiology (EP) / Heart Failure (HF), Vascular (VAS) and Structural Heart (SH).
The ideal candidate must possess strong analytical capabilities to build strategic tools to understand large data sets to produce substantiated recommendations, develop relationships with internal EA field teams, Divisional field teams and key contacts at external customers and possess ability to understand complex contract terms and conditions in a highly regulated industry.
Must work effectively in a high-pressure, high-demand sales support environment and make sound judgments on high level questions / issues.
Core Job Responsibilities
Pricing strategy development for both national and regional health care systems spanning 25-150+ hospitals within GPO and / or IDN.
Examples include HCA, Ascension, Kaiser, VA, Premier, Vizient, Steward, Tenet, Excelerate, Baylor Scott and White and CHLI.
Customer-service oriented mind frame and skill sets to support the EA field sales teams and Divisional field sales team and their price/contract needs while balancing needs of the corporation.
Supports the Strategic Pricing and Contracting Manager with the development and implementation of price approvals / financial impact analysis and contract creation / maintenance.
Work within audit guidelines for contract approval and contract creation.
Must have well-honed sense of urgency and ability to work under pressure.
This includes the ability to multitask and manage competing priorities.
Must be able to learn and understand multiple product lines, multiple and varying business strategies and operational processes across all supported Business Units; including varying and complex analytical models including development of profit and loss statements for customer deals and understanding ROI models for capital contract structures.
Possess ability to manage and influence multiple relationships including Enterprise Accounts field teams, BU field teams, peers and key relationships with external customers.
Must be able to build rapport with diverse personalities.
Required to negotiate contractual terms with external customers.
Works directly with Enterprise Accounts field teams and Business Unit field sales and assists with deal evaluation and creation of analytical deliverables on a case by case basis.
Aggregate and individual account strategic analysis often must be built based on the composition of each customer.
Must possess ability to understand the level of data needed and technical skills to build custom models and analysis to support decision making process.
This includes the ability to identify and derive data from the appropriate systems and build analytical models across multiple data sets that can be adjusted to satisfy various proposal structures.
Lead planning calls with CSEs, RSDs and AVPs in multiple divisions to prepare RFP responses, gain alignment on pricing strategy and analytics and review strategy for Price Council.
Proficient in the use of Word and PowerPoint.
Demonstrated advanced skills in Excel as customized strategic analysis will need to be developed for deal modeling and customer facing analytics.
Assists with training field sales, typically on a day-to-day, deal-to-deal basis, on tools, policies, and procedures and contractual terms.
Must be able to advise on appropriate structures from a business perspective and have a basic understanding from a legal perspective; as well as ensure there are resources and systems to support.
Owns contract creation from start to finish collaborative effort with sales team to define price needs, analysis to determine financial impact, execution of required internal review for price approval, documentation of proper approval, and final creation of outbound contract offering to end customer.
Review and redline business terms and coordinate with Legal on contract redlines.
This includes working with customer templates and ensuring appropriate vetting through other departments which may include IP legal, privacy, OEC, LR&C, tech services, security, finance, risk management and customer service amongst others.
Must be able to appropriately determine the correct department for review, talk through customer requests and associated risks as well as incorporate responses into contractual terms.
Ability to create and vet various contract structures, which may include, but not limited to cross product division structures, central storage agreements and distributor agreements.
Execution of formal requests for proposals (RFP)s that may be on customer contract templates and require specialized formatting of documents and price files.
Information required of the RFP is often varied, including customized product cross references, company/product information and analyses reflective of the Medical Device portfolio.
Perform comparisons to industry/company benchmarks to identify contracting opportunities and best practices.
Work in industry leading customer space and must identify and highlight new trends to leadership as well as peer group.
Along with business operations partners, execute improvement programs to streamline the flow of various system operations.
Follows all management approved processes and procedures; alerts management when circumstances require deviation to the approved processes and procedures.
Understanding GPO contractual obligations and the impacts they have on various contracting processes and product launches.
Attention to detail is required.
Must be able to consider the broader scope when working through new contract structures and identify/address the effects it may have on other agreements and/or processes.
Use of good judgment in this highly diversified, fast paced, high pressure environment.
Supervisory/Management Responsibilities
None
Position Accountability / Scope
Reports to Manager, Enterprise Accounts Strategic Pricing and Contracting
Role will be based out of Austin, TX or Alpharetta, GA
Minimum Education
Bachelors degree
MBA preferred
Minimum Experience/Training Required
Minimum of 7-10 years of experience in business, finance or strategic pricing and contracting is required.
Excellent written and oral communications skills with attention to detail, ability to work under pressure, ability to work with general supervision, must be autonomous.
Leadership, problem solving, and negotiation skills
Strong analytical, strategic and problem-solving skills required.
High level technical skills to build customized analytics based on customer situation.
Ability to recognize technical needs and work to build and implement tools that can support the broader Enterprise Accounts Business Analyst team.
Strong quantitative & qualitative analysis skills, including experience working with large data sets
Demonstrated ability to work seamlessly with remote sites & business partners including building relationship with Sales personnel to be highly effective
Demonstrated ability to manage multiple projects simultaneously
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c']","['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Overview:
The Technical Business Analyst is a critical piece of the overall project team tasked with development, implementation, and maintenance of client systems.
Candidates for this position must be detail oriented, have strong written and oral communication skills, and demonstrate the ability to build and maintain effective client relationships throughout the life cycle of the project.
The resource will work with developers and end users in an application development environment and primarily be responsible for requirements gathering, technical specification documentation, developing test scenarios, and testing.
Essential Duties:
Analyze and define client business functions
Facilitate requirements gathering sessions with clients
Create wireframes and other visualizations to drive requirements
Communicate requirements to the project team for use in application development
Translating business requirements into user, technical, and system documentation
Creates detailed documentation to solve application and process issues.
Provide user, technical, and system documentation to clients
Develop and coordinate user test scenarios
Work with developers in a user testing environment
Act as point of contact for user test feedback, including implementation feedback, requests for enhancement, and reporting of issues
Logging reported issues and tracking accordingly
Ensuring the applications and the associated test applications developed meet client needs
Provide training on systems and applications as needed.
Required Skills:
Excellent business and technical writing skills
Project planning, status reporting and issue/risk management
High level of attention to detail
Cultivating and maintaining strong client relationships
Excellent oral communication skills; ability to take into account audience while communicating with clients and project team members
Proven ability to clearly identify, track, manage and resolve project issues and risks and act as the single point of contact between the development team, customer, and management
Proven leadership abilities
Ability to work closely with Senior Management in reporting project status and concerns
Employs a collaborative, team-oriented approach
Self-motivated; will seek out and engage the individuals necessary to achieve clarity and develop effective solutions
Willing to travel
Required Education/Experience:
Bachelor's degree majoring in Business, Information Systems, or a related field or equivalent work experience.
Preferred Experience: Experience with technical requirements gathering, technical specification documentation, developing test scenarios, and testing.
Employment Benefits:
Paid Health Insurance at the Employee Level
Paid Life Insurance/Accidental Death and Dismemberment
Long-Term Disability Insurance
Short-Term Disability Insurance (employee-purchased)
401(k) Plan
Holidays and Paid Time Off
Employee Incentives for Selected Certifications
Dental/Vision Insurance (employee-purchased)
This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
Powered by JazzHR
",['excel'],"['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
lS6b5Bh8TM
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Performs complex computer systems analysis work.
Analyzes business processes to identify opportunities and develop strategies for improving business productivity and achieving organizational objectives.
Develops and maintains complex Web-based and LAN-based software.Work may involve planning, assigning, and/or supervising the work of others.
Trains others, as needed.
Uses project management to manage and report project resources and status.Participates effectively on cross-functional teams in a spirit of cooperation and flexibility.
May develop and manage IT contracts.
Works under limited supervision with considerable latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgment.
This position is classified as a fulltime position (40 hours a week).
Work outside of regular hours may be required.
Performs other duties as assigned.Ability to interact with business stakeholders and subject matter experts.
Work with internal teams on product requirements and documentation.Essential Job Functions:Attends work on a regular and predictable schedule in accordance with agency leave policy and performs other duties as assigned.
(35%) Participates in system development activities (i.e.
Analyzes business process requirements and prepares detailed structured data flow analysis diagrams, verification of procedures, and database entity relationship diagrams to satisfy new software demands.
Develops and maintains functional and technical specifications via the preparation of detailed flowcharts, tables, reports and other descriptive materials necessary for coding, testing and documenting complex automated systems.
Documents all system development activities in accordance with Agency Software Development Lifecycle and Project Management guidelines.
Schedules work and assists supervisory personnel in assignment of tasks.
(30%) Responsible for coding, testing, and supporting highly complex applications to meet customer needs.
Rigorous testing includes coordination with the technical support staff for integration testing to ensure quality products before distribution.
Product support includes analyzing production problems as described by the customer, systems analyst, and/or customer support staff, problem solving to keep the customer's applications operational and ongoing maintenance and enhancements to software.
Ensures that the system or product is successfully installed and that customers are adequately trained in their use.
Assists trainers and technical support staff in the successful implementation of new software systems.
Trains IT staff in new methods and procedures.
(10%) Evaluates existing and proposed computer applications to verify business requirements, system requirements, and equipment configurations are taken into account.
Analyzes complex business processes, equipment, and techniques for applicability, reliability, efficiency, speed, cost, flexibility, and meeting customer needs.
These duties include coordinating applications interfaces with other areas within the Department as well as between State Agencies with the coordination of management.
(10%) Evaluates business processes, anticipates requirements, identifies areas for improvement.
(10%) Develop and present technical documentation to management.
(5%) Other duties as assigned include but are not limited to actively participating and/or serving in a supporting role to meet the agency's obligations for disaster response and/or recovery or Continuity of Operations (COOP) activation.
).Knowledge of project management methodologies and techniques.Knowledge of Business Analyst methodologies and techniques.Skill in communicating with both the customer and development communities on automation issues.Skill in writing complex software/utility programs for computer applications.Skill in estimating project timelines.Strong verbal and written communication skills.Ability to communicate with technical, non-technical, functional, management and executive staff.Ability to analyze complex business problems and provide database related solutions using SQL, ODBC and PC-based visual development tools.Ability to read, interpret, analyze existing program code, and make recommendations for improvement or replacement if required.Ability to analyze business processes, and to develop and present the business case for new or modified IT customer-related products and services.Ability to analyze problems and develop solutions; to perform detailed work accurately.Ability to direct developer staff; to ensure quality; to enforce programming standards.Ability to effectively work independently or with others in a team environment.Ability to work under stressful conditions with multiple projects and/or deadlines.
Registration or Licensure Requirements:Initial Selection Criteria:Preferred graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major course work in Math, Science, or Computer Science related.
Must have at least four years of experience developing/writing software/utility programs for computer applications Additional Information:REQ 457046 MOS Code:Note: There may be no military occupation(s) that relate to the initial selection criteria and registration or licensure requirements for this position.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
",['sql'],"['data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"IT Business AnalystJob Summary
Understand, define and conceptualize business needs, recommending solutions & approaches that deliver the desired outcomes while engaging in a variety of initiatives within the enterprise which may be strategic, tactical or operational.
Essential Functions
• Champion communication between IT and the business by assessing and articulating processes that fulfill business needs.
• Define product and solution scope while shepherding business outcomes from inception to completion while leading business analysis tasks and deliverables.
• Collaborate with business and IT partners to define and articulate business needs and the underlying solutions to meet those needs.
• Understand how the underlying data affects changes to process, products, and current systems & how data analysis can improve efficiencies and add value.
• Articulate solution ideas and balance them against whats technologically feasible and functionally reasonable.
• Effectively and efficiently manage business and functional requirements to fulfill current and future project needs.
• Advocate agile solution delivery ceremonies and execution while engaging in IT strategic & tactical projects and operational activities.
Job Requirements:
Knowledge, Skills & Abilities
• Strong understanding of business analysis core competencies, tools & techniques, knowledge areas and applicability in the real world.
• Strong understanding of the SDLC and communication competencies between developers and business stakeholders.
• Abreast with the Information Technology industry and have a foundational understanding of Business Intelligence & Analytics.
• Thirst for learning: staying up-to-date of cutting edge technology and initiatives such as Cloud computing, Big Data, Automation through DevOps, etc.
• Strong communicator to facilitate high level meetings with Sr.
Leadership, as well as outside 3rd party vendors.
• Delivery focused with the ability to follow through and lead assignments over the finish line.
• Ability to communicate with business partners and team members while instilling confidence and trust.
• Preferred experience in agile solution delivery.
Education & Experience
• Bachelors degree from an accredited university.
• 3+ years experience as a BA.
• Cradle-to-Grave project experience.
• Insurance, Annuities or Financial Industry experience preferred.
",['cloud'],"['big data', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['cloud', 'big data', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"The ideal candidate will have a natural curiosity about solving problems, identifying the right metrics to inspect the business, and to help leaders make great data driven decisions.
The successful candidate will work with a highly collaborative team, and have direct influence over analytical roadmaps, establishment of key performance metrics, dashboards and report development.
Theyll be responsible for working with senior leadership within HR, Recruiting, and business leadership to provide data and insights.
Responsibilities:
· Partner with teams to consult, define, develop, build and implement the right set of performance metrics, reports, and dashboards to effectively manage the business.
· Contribute to strategic planning processes and recommend process improvement initiatives, influencing the direction of the organization.
· Support data needs related to business cadence such as weekly, monthly and quarterly business reviews.
· Enable effective decision making by retrieving and aggregating data from multiple sources and compiling it into a digestible and actionable format.
· Conduct ad hoc analysis projects at times across multiple systems answering complex business questions and providing actionable insights to the leadership team to inform decisions and strategy.
· Partner and collaborate with peer Business Analysts and power users on best practices, prioritization of feature additions and input to the ongoing product roadmap.
#HRRecruitingEngine
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelor's degree in Business, Engineering, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or related field
· 5+ years of professional experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analyst role
· Experience writing and optimizing SQL to handle extremely large datasets
· Understanding of data warehousing and data modeling
· Direct experience with one or more major data visualization tools including Tableau/QuickSight/Power BI
· Experience building business forecasting models
Preferred Qualifications
· Advanced technical or business degree (MS or MBA)
· Experience using AWS analytical services (e.g., Redshift, Data Pipeline, EMR, Machine Learning, Kinesis)
· Experience in scripting languages for parsing and data analysis
· Proven problem solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, ability to influence others and exceptional organizational skills
· Ability to deal with ambiguity and competing objectives in a fast paced environment
· Be self-driven, and show ability to deliver on ambiguous projects with incomplete data
· Computer programming experience in Python, Ruby, or Java
· Experience with web technologies (e.g., Ruby on Rails, Django, JavaScript) and the model-view-controller architectural pattern
· Excellent communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills
· Ability to effectively communicate with both business and technical teams.
Ability to work collaboratively with non-technical customers and team members and translate business questions into analytical requirements with ease.
","['power bi', 'aw', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'bi', 'tableau', 'django', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'java']","['data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']",1.0,"['powerbi', 'aw', 'redshift', 'excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'django', 'python', 'rubi', 'javascript', 'java', 'data modeling', 'data warehousing', 'machine learning', 'dashboard', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'forecast', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Title : Business Analyst II -0 5370ITC684
Duration : 1 + Month
Job Type : C
The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology
Duties:
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
Skills :
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements: Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skills/experience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years
Required/Preferred
Experience
7
Required
Expertise in Written and oral communications
7
Required
Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7
Required
Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5
Required
Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5
Required
Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4
Required
Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4
Required
Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5
Preferred
Experience reporting to executive management.
1
Preferred
Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1
Preferred
Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'c', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"In this role, you will develop deep expertise of the Recruiting technology and processes and will work with business owners, technologists, and Recruiting partners to understand and document strategy, requirements and timelines.
You will participate in cross-functional teams through the process and policy design, delivery, implementation, and support of new tools and services as well as contribute to change management.
What you'll do:
· Data Analysis - Work closely with peers and stakeholders to access, pull, clean and analyze data from a variety of data sources.
Gather new data, link disparate forms of data, and/or creatively use existing data to propose metrics and present them in compelling way.
·
· Data Integrity - Work backwards from outputs (integrations, services, reports, etc.)
to ensure all required data is controlled, validated, and captured within upstream processes.
·
· Project Management Maintain project plans, identify resource needs, and manage project schedule; collaborate effectively across teams to define strategy, goals and commitment to timelines and deliverables.
·
· Communication - Own communications to project members and stakeholders on progress, issues, and risks including regular status updates and periodic white paper analysis.
·
· Operational Excellence - Drive regional and global HR data optimization and standardization while balancing the business need for flexibility and appropriate localization.
·
·
· Measurement - Develop measures to define progress and success; establish ongoing reporting requirements and key performance indicators for confirming return on investment.
·
· Business Requirements - Coordinate the collection of regional business requirements including process deviations and localizations.
Basic Qualifications
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, MIS, Math, Statistics or related discipline
· 7+ years of HR or related experience
· 5+ years of work experience writing SQL, data modeling, data mining (SQL, ETL, data warehousing) and using databases in a business environment with complex datasets
· Advanced Excel skills; experience with business intelligence tools
Preferred Qualifications
· Works effectively as part of a global team, possessing strong analytical, organizational, and problem solving skills, can flourish handling multiple tasks, workload, changing priorities, and tight deadlines
· Proven analytical and quantitative ability and a passion for enabling customers to use data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause analyses
· Strong verbal and written communication and data presentation skills that allow you to clearly, compellingly, and effectively influence audiences internally and externally, across organization boundaries.
· Able to source, work with, and combine disparate data sets to answer business questions.
· Inquisitive technical and business skills to understand, test, or challenge the status quo while working harmoniously with the business and technology owners.
","['excel', 'sql']","['risk', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'optim', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'risk', 'etl', 'data warehousing', 'data mining', 'data', 'analyz', 'clean', 'optim', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"As the Technical Business Analyst, you will be responsible for the acquisition and management of requirements for new projects, while helping to drive the technical implementation of applications.
The ideal candidate must use strong technical skills to support internal and external stakeholders with data, analysis, and strategy to drive key decisions and continued organizational growth.
This role requires hands-on data modeling, schema structuring, and experience with operational processes.
Responsibilities
Develop business process models and documentation for technology initiatives by working with internal business divisions, senior leadership, and technical teams.
Work in a consultative manner with business stakeholders to design and define the entities, attributes, relationships, data matching rules, data model & workflows necessary to support business data flow, test analysis, and enterprise KPI development.
Effectively communicate and document business and IT information in alignment with standard processes/procedures.
Coordinate and oversee stakeholder engagement activities, ensuring continued alignment with business strategies.
Conduct independent analysis and review requirements, utilizing knowledge of business systems and requirements, with the ability to supply alternative suggestions/improvements.
Play a crucial role as part of Data Governance team to develop, implement, and maintain data strategies that ensure data quality, provide standardization, and improve business information value.
Provide data stewardship support of company-wide data from a variety of sources.
Work with, develop, and update workflows for compliance and data quality initiatives.
Familiarity with Scrum initiatives.
Elicit and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, site visits, business process descriptions, user stories, and workflow analysis.
Have primary responsibility for backlog management, maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for an agile project.
Ensure a continued focus on successful delivery and providing genuine business value and benefits (i.e., business benefits rather than just technical delivery).
Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other STEM-related majors with demonstrable IT skills.
Minimum 3+ years of professional experience in a Technical Business Analyst role, with strong planning, problem solving and decision-making skills, as well as business case development/benefits realization experience.
Solid understanding of Agile and traditional business analysis methods; proven experience of working with an agile backlog, creating and maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for upcoming sprints.
Experience with managing full SDLC cross-functionally, including business process modelling, scenarios, user stories, use cases, acceptance criteria, etc.
Strong knowledge on relational databases and ability to understand and craft entity relationship diagrams.
Comfortable working closely with software development teams—both onshore and offshore,
Well versed in data warehousing concepts/issues and knowledge of data modelling.
Familiarity with business change/transformation management training and experience.
A good understanding of technology trends and movements.
A proactive “can do” attitude and a willingness to be “hands on” when required.
Other perks include Income Protection, Retirement plans/401(k) match, and cell phone savings plans.
",[None],"['data warehousing', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['data warehousing', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"* Working closely with government customer and other contractors to find solutions to difficult problems and manage multiple priorities at once* Reviewing, analyzing and evaluating business systems and user needs.
* Documenting requirements, defining project scope and objectives, and working with software and systems architects on designing systems to parallel overall business strategies.
* Creating workflow charts and diagrams; determining system capabilities; writing specifications.
* Providing project management support to development efforts.Skills and Attributes:* Must have at least eight years of experience with planning, designing, developing, and launching efficient business, financial, and operations systems in support of core program functions and business processes, with four years serving in a leadership role.
* Proficiency in developing robust business rules to resolve system issues and enhancements for systems.
* Proficiency in developing testing scenarios.
The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country.
Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions.
Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions.
Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.
\n\nGDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Business Analyst III, Chief Financial Officer Operations Support Team.
The position reports to the CFO Operations Support Director.
The successful candidate provides advanced (senior-level) business analysis, development, and support of both complex business process and system solutions to enhance daily operations of the CFO area.Work involves joining and contributing to a team to:* Assess and review user requirements, procedures, and problems to automate or improve use of CAPPS Financials 9.2 (PeopleSoft) and other systems used within the CFO area;* Act as subject matter/software expert to assist users with data questions by performing data analysis and research to troubleshoot technical and user issues;* Perform a liaison function with agency program areas, other subject matter experts, and the information technology department;* Provide research and project management/support;* Ensure data integrity and compliance with a wide variety of strict state and federal requirements.The candidate is expected to work under minimal supervision, with considerable latitude for the use of initiative and independent judgment.
(40%)a.
Screens and evaluates user requests for assistance and troubleshooting issues;c. Provides analysis of the CAPPS Financials application and other systems within the CFO area to support production operations;d. Determines software/system limitations and the impact on users to develop change requests;e. Develops queries, performs data analysis and identifies solutions for application problems and issues;f. Evaluates user business processes, application functionality, configurations, work-arounds, and fixes;g. Coordinates technical analysis, debugging, and resolution of production issues.
(2) Leads or participates in work groups, special projects, documentation, and training.
(40%)a.
Leads work sessions with agency subject matter experts;b. Identifies potential risks and difficulties related to CAPPS Financials and other financial systems and designs strategies to mitigate or avoid them;c. Documents process work flows for the CAPPS Financials application and interfacing systems;d. Reviews business processes, requirements, and crosswalks existing and new processes;e. Participates in reviewing, maintaining, and developing training materials, curriculum, and conducting training sessions;f. Effectively communicates technical information to non-technical customers.
(3) Conducts and coordinates user acceptance testing.
(15%)a. Identifies and documents system related business processes;b. Evaluates process work flows in CAPPS Financials and with interfacing systems and programs;c. Develops test scenarios and performs application testing;d. Communicates and coordinates with agency subject matter experts and support staff on testing for systems utilized within the CFO area;e. Facilitates agency approvals for the migration of fixes.(4.)
Performs related work as assigned.
(5%)Attends work on a regular and predictable schedule in accordance with agency leave policy and performs other duties as assigned.
Knowledge Skills Abilities:Considerable experience in process, business, or systems analysis and work on complex financial or administrative systems required.
ERP (Enterprise Resource Planning) system experience is a plus; PeopleSoft experience preferred.Working knowledge of databases such as Oracle, Access, or SQL Server.
Considerable knowledge of project management principles and practices.
HHSC Budget/Accounting data and process knowledge a plus.
Knowledge of design, development, and maintenance of systems to meet business requirements and needs.Extensive skill in coordinating and solving problems; and, in analyzing and evaluating complex data, policies, and issues required.
* Ability to meet deadlines and work on projects with changing priorities.
Registration or Licensure Requirements:Initial Selection Criteria:Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major coursework in business administration, computer information systems, management information systems, or a related field.One year of appropriate experience may be substituted for the required education on a year for year basis.
* Five (5) years full-time experience in business analysis, information technology process or systems analysis work.
Additional Information:Requisition # 455103HHS agencies use E-Verify.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
MOS Code:Note: Military occupation(s) that relate to the initial selection criteria and registration or licensure requirements for this position may include, but not limited to: 25B, IT, 3D0X1.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
","['erp', 'oracl', 'sql']","['risk', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",2.0,"['erp', 'oracl', 'sql', 'risk', 'data', 'predict', 'account', 'supervis', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Should have hands-on experience in AEM.
Should have worked as a Scrum master in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Workflow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram, etc.
Minimum years of experience - 7+ Contact - Devyani Kumari IT-SCIENT Phone 510.516.7866 Fax 877.701.4872 tel(877)20701-4872 Email devyani.kitscient.com mailtodevyani.kitscient.com
",[None],['data'],2.0,['data']
BA,"As the Technical Business Analyst, you will be responsible for the acquisition and management of requirements for new projects, while helping to drive the technical implementation of applications.
The ideal candidate must use strong technical skills to support internal and external stakeholders with data, analysis, and strategy to drive key decisions and continued organizational growth.
This role requires hands-on data modeling, schema structuring, and experience with operational processes.
Responsibilities
Develop business process models and documentation for technology initiatives by working with internal business divisions, senior leadership, and technical teams.
Work in a consultative manner with business stakeholders to design and define the entities, attributes, relationships, data matching rules, data model & workflows necessary to support business data flow, test analysis, and enterprise KPI development.
Effectively communicate and document business and IT information in alignment with standard processes/procedures.
Coordinate and oversee stakeholder engagement activities, ensuring continued alignment with business strategies.
Conduct independent analysis and review requirements, utilizing knowledge of business systems and requirements, with the ability to supply alternative suggestions/improvements.
Play a crucial role as part of Data Governance team to develop, implement, and maintain data strategies that ensure data quality, provide standardization, and improve business information value.
Provide data stewardship support of company-wide data from a variety of sources.
Work with, develop, and update workflows for compliance and data quality initiatives.
Familiarity with Scrum initiatives.
Elicit and document requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, site visits, business process descriptions, user stories, and workflow analysis.
Have primary responsibility for backlog management, maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for an agile project.
Ensure a continued focus on successful delivery and providing genuine business value and benefits (i.e., business benefits rather than just technical delivery).
Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, or other STEM-related majors with demonstrable IT skills.
Minimum 3+ years of professional experience in a Technical Business Analyst role, with strong planning, problem solving and decision-making skills, as well as business case development/benefits realization experience.
Solid understanding of Agile and traditional business analysis methods; proven experience of working with an agile backlog, creating and maintaining the quality of user stories and acceptance criteria for upcoming sprints.
Experience with managing full SDLC cross-functionally, including business process modelling, scenarios, user stories, use cases, acceptance criteria, etc.
Strong knowledge on relational databases and ability to understand and craft entity relationship diagrams.
Comfortable working closely with software development teams-both onshore and offshore,
Well versed in data warehousing concepts/issues and knowledge of data modelling.
Familiarity with business change/transformation management training and experience.
A good understanding of technology trends and movements.
A proactive ""can do"" attitude and a willingness to be ""hands on"" when required.
W2O Group offers a comprehensive benefit program and perks, including flexible PTO, expanded paid leave for new parents and the Your 4th Trimester program that helps new parents transition back to work, and a five-week sabbatical program.
Other perks include Income Protection, Retirement plans/401(k) match, and cell phone savings plans.
W2O Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
",[None],"['data warehousing', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['data warehousing', 'data', 'kpi', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"People that will come to the office excited to work and have some fun.
Are you good at defining and translating the why & what into how?
Do you like being the one that can connect process, people and technology to get the best results?
Were hiring a Sr. Business Analyst to join EAs Worldwide Customer Experience (WWCE) organization.
As the Sr. Business Analyst, you are a consultant helping teams identify and frame problems in a way that enables the creation of better customer experiences.
You will have a great systems approach and recognize the inter connectedness of people, process, and technology.
The Sr. Business Analyst is a part of the Solutions Services team that includes other analyst, workflow and tools managers and reports to the Director of Solutions Services.
Responsibilities:
Develop an understanding of business and both the technical and service systems.
Examine solutions holistically to understand the impact of changes to the player experience and operational impact.
Lead a Design Thinking culture in close collaboration with the Product Managers, Project Managers & Service Delivery Teams.
Recommend improvements to product, process and training.
Package up opportunities into leadership recommendations.
Excel at inspiring teammates with storytelling and data-driven rationale that you can translate into solutions.
Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Business management, or related discipline required.
You have 5 years as a business analyst helping diverse teams make decisions that improve outcomes.
Experience creating Business Cases, User Stories, Workflow Diagrams, Process Maps, and Research Design.
Identify areas for improvement and develop solutions to a variety of issues moderate to large scope and complexity.
Outstanding storytelling skills.
Proficiency in multiple media for storytellingwhile grounding storytelling in research.
Active listener, responsible, self-motivated and able to influence and guide teammates and executives.
",['excel'],"['research', 'recommend', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'research', 'recommend', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"BUSINESS ANALYST FOR DOCUMENTATIONAUSTIN, TX
• A Business Analyst I seeks, gathers, and analyzes information and data from stakeholders and subject matter experts.
• They transfer these findings into meaningful documentation used by the development and business teams, communicating with technical, non-technical, functional, management and executive staff.
• They work in cross-functional teams and work collaboratively before, during, and after the requirements gathering process.
• This role requires a technologically-savvy, detail-oriented, and self-motivated achiever who provides outstanding services to a wide range of customers.
• The Business Analyst I must take a big-picture strategic view while understanding the nuances of each project to effectively achieve client and business goals.
Required Skills:
• System management using TrackWise Digital or SalesForce experience, preferred but not required.
• Bachelor's degree in related field from an accredited college or university, and three years relevant experience.
• Microsoft Excel
• Microsoft PowerPoint
• Microsoft Project
• Microsoft Word
• Sharepoint
• SQL
• XML
This 6+ month position starts ASAP.
Please E-MAIL your resume (attachment to email) with rate and availability to Briana: briana@alphaconsulting.com
MUST BE ELIGIBLE TO WORK IN THE U.S. AS AN HOURLY W2 EMPLOYEE
#ZR
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'salesforc', 'powerpoint', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Intelligence Analyst
Background & Business Need:
The Inclusive Insights Team is looking for a contractor to use open source data to analyze, manage and update the content for each country in the I&D Global Factbook (tableau-based tool).
Additionally, the contractor will help process and synthesize qualitative feedback from the I&D Global Factbook focus groups.
Start Date: June/July 2020
End Date: August/September 2020
Hours per week: 40
Cost Center: TBD
Key areas of responsibility are:
Analyze and interpret open source qualitative and statistical data to identify significant, relevant information, ultimately curating materials from around the web and other sources
Identify relationships and trends in data, as well as any factors that could affect the results of the research
Prepare data for processing by organizing information, checking for inaccuracies and adjusting the data appropriately
Evaluate the external open sources of information to determine any limitations, in terms of reliability or validity
Update and manage I&D Global Factbook Standard Operating Procedures
Perform all other duties as assigned
Key KSAOs/Competencies:
Strong visualization skills and experience building and managing Tableau dashboards
Analyze and interpret qualitative and statistical data
An in-depth understanding of I&D and/or cultural research
Oral, written and interpersonal communication skills
Gives full attention to what others are saying, taking time to understand the points being made and asking questions as appropriate
Ability to work with tight deadlines (flexible and resilient), successfully managing multiple detailed-oriented tasks
Utilize logic and reasoning to identify strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems
Identifies complex problems and reviewing related information to develop and evaluate options and implement solutions
Highly thorough and detail-oriented
Education & Experience
BS, MS or Phd in Statistics, Business Analytics, Computer Science, Engineering, Industrial/Organizational Psychology or equivalent practical experience
Minimum 5 years of experience in analytics and data role
Experience with how to build and manage tableau dashboards
Ability to translate business processes and data into analytic solutions
1-3 years specific I&D or culture-based experience, including talent management experience
Strong foundation in data modeling, including at least 3 years of relevant business or people analytics experience
Strong experience with Python or any scripting language
Excellent experience with Microsoft Excel
Stays up-to-date on new technologies and methods across data science and data visualizations
Experience with SPSS, SAS or other related programs is preferred
User experience with Apple hardware and software products is preferred
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'python', 'spss', 'sa']","['data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'python', 'spss', 'sa', 'data modeling', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'research', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'hardwar']"
BA,"Primary Specialization
Technology > Technology Specialization L2 > AWS > Amazon Web Services
Secondary Specialization
Industry > Health & Public Service > H&PS- Health > Public Health
Secondary Specialization
Industry > Health & Public Service > H&PS- Citizen Services > Social Services
The Business Analyst is involved in projects that have more than one functional role.
He or she reports to the Functional Lead.
The Business Analyst is an important front-line Avanade representative because of his or her deep involvement with various stakeholders in the client's organization from end users to managers.
The Business Analyst acts as a primary link between the client and the technical project team, facilitating effective communication between them and ensuring that business needs are aligned with technical solutions.
Involved throughout the project lifecycle, the Business Analyst works with the client to understand their business strategy and objectives, current business processes and challenges, and how information flows and changes through the business.
The Business Analyst uses this information, coupled with deep understanding of the Medicaid platform, to help translate the business needs into a set of detailed requirements and proposed to-be processes.
The Functional Lead then transforms the requirements into a functional design and works with the Solution Architect and development team through the build, test, and implementation stages.
In these stages, the Business Analyst is also responsible for helping the client conduct acceptance testing and prepare for the new technology through effective communication, training, and user adoption planning.
Soft Skills
Has excellent written and oral communication skills for explaining complex concepts
Proactive
Effective in facilitating team and client meetings and workshops
Able to build relationships quickly
Has strong client interface and presentation skills
Effective in managing client expectations
Has knowledge of questioning techniques
Has passion for learning
Career Track
Client Delivery & Operations
Career Level
8 - 8
Skills
Primary Skill
Business Analysis
Other Skills
Systems Development Lifecycle (SDLC)
Medicaid background, ideally with Member Eligibility and/or Member Enrollment
","['amazon web services', 'excel', 'aw']","['commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['aw', 'excel', 'aw', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"BUSINESS ANALYST
Opportunity will be seven months with a strong chance for a long-term extension.
Primary Responsibilities/Accountabilities:
Under general supervision, analyze and determine business requirements and provide detailed specifications to programming.
Provide consultation to the client before, during and after implementation, including the development of new procedures the changes may necessitate.
Interpret client's existing systems and workflows through and including the balancing of daily operations.
Provide training to the client before, during and after changes, including the correct use of the client system and on-line assistance,
Communicate progress and any potential problems to manager/project for awareness and/or resolution.
Uses limited independent judgment to make decisions based on precedents and established guidelines.
Solves problems using standard procedures and precedents
Performs other duties as required
The above statements are intended only to describe the general nature of the job, and should not be construed as an all-inclusive list of position responsibilities.
Qualifications:
Education - BS in Computer Science, MIS, EE or related experience.
Ability to learn the needs of the customer quickly and in line with the internal pace of the organization.
Excellent command of Microsoft suite.
Preferred:
Project Management experience
Experience with Business Analysis and Technical Requirements gathering
Technical knowledge of client's systems and integrations.
Let's talk!
Additionally:
To get the best projects, you must already be on the inside of the best companies.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['analyz', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'analyz', 'account', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
ZxiJ6fSQJI
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what's delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor's Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Must have SQL experience along with .Net
Must have Cloud XP with micro services knowledge
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let's take this journey together.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
]]>
","['excel', 'sql', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Title :Business Analyst
No of Openings :1
Position Type : 12 Months Contract
City :Austin
State :TX
Required Skills :
SDLC
The workers responsibilities and skills must include:
Gathering business, functional and non?function requirements.
Defining product themes, epics, user stories and product features
Facilitating prioritization sessions for the product backlog.
Facilitating sprint planning sessions to establish a sprint backlog.
Documenting requirements and system design using approved agency formats.
Being a creative thinker to solve application issues.
Mediating business units that may have conflicting requirements.
Assisting in the translation of business requirements into detailed technical specifications
Facilitating and documenting AS?IS and TO?BE process flows
Writing test cases and scripts to validate code is working as documented.
Other duties as assigned
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
4PvnIvQqK7
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration Work Experience 1-3 years City Austin State/Province Texas Zip/Postal Code 73344
https://innovasourcing.com/wlhu
View similar jobs
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"The Business Analyst will review, analyze and evaluate business processes and user needs.
Investigate possible cost-saving areas.
Demonstrated problem solving and analytical skills.
High attention to detail.
Strong team player.
Excellent interpersonal skills.
Good planning and organizational skills.
Prioritize workload and meet strict deadlines.
Minimum Requirements
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Powered by JazzHR
BQQpMvMjbN
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'busi', 'analyz']",2.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"By combining advanced analytic methodologies with extensive health plan experience, Pulse8 has developed a suite of uniquely pragmatic solutions that are revolutionizing risk adjustment.
",[None],['risk'],999.0,['risk']
BA,"Job SummaryUnder minimal direction, the Senior Business Analyst is responsible for providing business analysis and project management.
Defines business solutions; assists with testing and quality assurance activities; coordinates the IT change management process; and improves department policies and procedures based on industry standards.
* Documents and analyzes required information and data.
* Prepares requirements, specifications, business processes and recommendations.
* Recommends technology solutions to resolve business issues.20%Design and Testing* Understands technical design specifications.
* Assists with defining test conditions.
* Develops accurate and complete test plans for projects under IT management.
* Conducts testing according to plan.
* Identifies and documents system deficiencies and recommends solutions.10%Project Execution* Assists in enforcement of project deadlines and schedules.
* Takes input from supervisor and appropriately and accurately applies comments/feedback.
* Understands the necessity of project standards and applies them consistently.
* Develops internal and external meeting objectives and agendas.
* Prioritizes multiple tasks effectively.
* Understands the components of running a fiscally successful project.10%Responsible for the Coordination and Completion of Projects* Monitors and summarizes progress of project.
* Prepares reports regarding status of project* Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
* Provides post-implementation follow up to measure project accuracy.5%Participates in Change Management* Participates in internal processes to accurately track and administer local modifications, implementations, etc.
* Assists with test plan development and quality assurance activities.
* Follows up to ensure the change is successful.5%Internal Operations and Innovation* Conducts effective progress evaluations in a timely manner.
* Mentors those with less experience through informal channels.
* Seeks and participates in development opportunities.
* Suggests areas for improvement in internal processes along with possible solutions.
* Leads internal teams/task forces.N/A* Performs other duties as assigned.
* Complete required regulatory Training as assigned.
* Maintain strict adherence and compliance to all laws, rules, regulations and internal controls specific to your role, including but not limited to Bank Secrecy Act, Anti-Money Laundering, USA Patriot Act, OFAC and Fair Lending regulations.QualificationsEducation* High School diploma or equivalent required.
* Bachelor's degree preferred.Experience* Minimum of three (3) years of exhibiting technical applications experience required.
* Minimum of three (3) years of systems analysis required.
* Minimum of three (3) years of business analysis experience required.
* Demonstrated excellence in providing superb customer service.
* Excellent analytical skills.
* Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening).
* Demonstrated knowledge of data standards (both data exchange and storage).
* Proficiency with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Microsoft Project, and Visio.
* Must be bondable.Physical DemandsThe physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee in order to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
* While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle or feel; reach with hands and arms; and talk or* Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision and ability to adjust* The employee is frequently required to stand and* Employee will make extensive use of the telephone requiring the ability to effectively and accurately explain complex* The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and frequently lift and/or move up to 10Work EnvironmentThe work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
* This position may involve periodic stressful* May occasionally require an adjusted work schedule, overtime, and evening/weekend* Public contact position, requiring appropriate professional* Frequent computer use at a workstation up to two hours at a* The noise level in the work environment is usuallyCritical Job CompetenciesUFCU Core Competencies.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Position Details
A Business Analyst interacts with the business stakeholders and subject matter experts in order to understand their problems and needs.
They gather document and analyze business needs and requirements conducts market analyses analyzing both product lines and the overall profitability of the business.
Create a detailed business analysis outlining problems opportunities and solutions for a business.
Through analysis translate business requirements into functional application requirements and provides input into high level design solutions.Other roles that fit this definition within a different function may include: Business Systems Analyst Technical Business Analyst and Conversions Analyst.
Shift
Standard, 40 hours/week
IND-PF
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Core to this need are:
Create, evaluate, and present technical business cases, ""as-is"" and ""to-be"" business processes, ""current"" and ""future"" technology integration design recommendations to colleagues, management and business customers.
Explain complex application functionality in a manner that can be understood, articulate ideas and solutions to influence others toward a desired outcome or solution; answer technical questions to support the case.
Drive User Story generation across business and technology teams to support a healthy backlog of capability development within assigned project scope.
Assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Manages and documents the business process redesign and functional specifications for the implementation of business solutions.
Ability to effectively partner, collaborate, and communicate with technical and non-technical colleagues at all levels.
Works with a team of development, operational, and transformational resources to design, develop/configure, test, and release new solutions or applications.
Use a variety of data analysis and organizational tools to support IT solutions.
Conducts data gathering and analysis to troubleshoot the data issues.
May assess the current processes, identify opportunities and propose the future system with an improved design and system flow.
Ensure what’s delivered meets business objectives and expectations.
Advocates a culture of change and continuous process improvement across the organization.
Creates business process maps, exception scenarios, and informer on test plans and procedures.
Present technical and business requirements to client and internal teams, with ability to speak to the whys and hows of the details
Able to effectively contribute in a fast paced work environment.
Qualifications/Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree in appropriate field of study or equivalent work experience.
Good understanding of Cloud implementations and general web development
Understanding of relational databases and distributed systems
4+ years of business/ process analysis on technical platforms and applications.
Advanced understanding of modern software development methodologies.
Advanced understanding of modern software development tools.
Applied experience in agile development teams, SAFe is preferred, along with understanding of waterfall and the transition between the 2 methodologies
Strong understanding of how business requirements are gathered, analyzed and documented as well as translated into technical specifications.
Highly adept user of MS Excel, and common data analytics tools required.
Detail oriented, analytical and inquisitive.
Ability to work independently and with others.
Extremely organized with strong time-management skills.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to work with offshore teams and accommodate time zone differences.
Strong verbal and written English communication skills required.
So let’s take this journey together.
Cognizant Softvision is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
No 3rd Party Agency Candidates.
Benefits
Great globally diverse culture
Flexible work-life balance
Ongoing career development
Competitive Salary
","['excel', 'cloud']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'cloud', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Salesforce Business Analyst / Consultant
As a Salesforce Consultant you will leverage your business and technical skills to uncover pain points within the client's current technology and processes.
This is the ideal position for someone with experience as a Salesforce Admin, Business Analyst, or Salesforce Consultant looking for a role working on a full-scale Salesforce implementation from start to finish.
*This project could be delayed due to market uncertainty.
If interested in other roles, please join the Talent Network for consideration: https://www.pinkuspartners.com/salesforce-talent-network/
Facilitate requirements development sessions in order to gain an understanding of the customer’s current state.
Present implementation needs and options confidently to technical teams as well as a C-Level audience.
Strong attention to detail is required.
Elevate the client experience as a knowledgeable liaison between technical teams, testing teams, and business stakeholders during the implementation phase.
Lead discovery workshops which may include large audiences, solution presentations, and prototype demonstrations
Execute rapid analysis and decomposition of complex business information into technical process components.
Perform business process modeling, user experience modeling, and basic technical architecture diagramming.
Effectively leverage multiple implementation team types (User experience, Change Management, Global Development Centers, Developer Communities)
Requirements:
Strong attention to detail
5+ years of experience working within the Salesforce platform on an Administrative or Development level.
Salesforce Admin Certification Required, additional certifications preferred
You have a strong understanding of Salesforce functionality and can clearly communicate its capabilities and limitations to customers.
Ability to build and demonstrate prototypes in Salesforce.
Comfortable with heavy involvement in user acceptance test planning.
You have experience with Sales Cloud, Service Cloud, and Community Cloud functionality.
You are a highly motivated individual with a desire to learn and contribute.
You have strong presentation and communication skills.
Hands on experience working with companies implementing Salesforce.com functionality in some of the following areas is preferred:
System Implementation & Adoption
Salesforce.com Service Cloud
Salesforce.com Community Cloud
Salesforce.com Sales Cloud
Experience with data migration tools is a plus.
Quickly scale your business with experienced and pre-vetted Salesforce Talent.
Job Type: Contract
License:
Salesforce (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
5 - 6 months
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Fully Remote
Benefits:
None
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
","['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['c', 'salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"D.R.
It is engaged in the construction and sale of high quality homes designed principally for the entry-level and first time move-up markets.
D.R.
Horton, Inc. is currently looking for a Business Analyst IIfor their Financial Services IT Department.
The right candidate will, with some supervision, clearly identify, define and document the business needs and customer requirements of the SBUs within DHIFS and communicate these to the information technology staff.
Act as liaison between the SBUs and IT to ensure system development and implementation proceeds as anticipated.
Designs appropriate application systems structures which will provide a solid foundation for well-written and reliable application programs.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Performs necessary investigation, analysis and evaluation to determine feasibility for IT related projects.
Advise the appropriate people on the implications of existing IT systems that can be applied to a problem.
Develops and/or evaluates previously refined data and programs and select from a range of alternatives to determine the appropriate action to be taken.
Develops or assists in the development of work plans, specifications, task sequencing, and the extent to which tasks may be performed concurrently
Assists the Project Manager in estimating resource needs for analysts, programmers, user personnel, consultants, equipment, etc
Receives some supervision; performs most routine duties independently; discusses or seeks approval on complex matters with the Project Manager or B.A.
III.
Develops time schedules, conversion, and test procedures for all aspects of system, from manual handling through computer processing.
Education and/or Experience
Fifth year college or university program certificate; or four to six years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field is preferred
2 – 4 years of systems design work experience or relevant financial services experience
Major systems development and implementation experience
Understand project management and control
Ability to communicate ideas and problem solutions
Ability to effectively work with people in other departments and/or outside of the enterprise
Must have 1 – 2 years experience in a relevant position within the financial services industry
Must be customer service oriented
Build YOUR future with D.R.
Horton,
America's Builder.
",[None],"['supervis', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']",1.0,"['supervis', 'data', 'information technology', 'busi']"
BA,"This team works virtually by staying in touch via Skype and have working meetings as needed.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Title: Business Analyst
Hours: 8-5, Monday to Friday
Remote: Due to Covid-19, consultant will work remotely until further notice.
Duration: On going
Resume Submittal by: 7/15/2020
This project touches multiple long-term care processing applications including; Texas Medicaid and Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care Online Portal , ID CARE, LTC Provider System and the Service Authorization System Online (SASO).
These systems collectively are part of the Texas Medicaid Management Information System (TMMIS).
This Worker will act as a Business Analyst and their role on the project will be as a Product Owner for Community First Choice (CFC) IDD Assessment.
Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internal/external stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
A. Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
B. Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
C. Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
D. Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
E. Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
F. Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
G. Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
H. Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
I.
Other duties as assigned.
II.
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements: Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skills/experience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years Required/Preferred Experience
8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
eLtII303GJ
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Search by Keyword
More Options
Loading...
Country/Region
All
State
All
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert
form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×
Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Share this Job
AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest
Product Owner/Business Analyst - Austin, TX
Date: Jul 9, 2020
#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}
Posting Address
1812 Centre Creek Dr.
Suite 240
Austin, Texas 78754
*KH
#LI-KH1
Position Overview
Product Owner/Business Analyst
You will be involved in the complete software development life cycle, seeing your epics and user stories into a finished product in a hybrid agile environment.
This will require a high degree of collaboration among highly-talented, cross-functional and geographically-dispersed development teams.
You will work closely with industry-best product management team, developers and other design team members to present business and customer needs and help develop end-to-end solutions.
Essential Functions
Conduct voice-of-customer studies to understand and document user work flows and use cases
Function as liaison between development team members and end customers, users and other stake holders
Develop marketing collateral including product specifications, training documentation, user manuals and user acceptance tests (UATs)
Assist with the preparation of wireframes and lead focus groups to validate concepts
Attend all scrum meetings including backlog grooming, sprint planning, daily standup, sprint review to answer all requirement questions and provide feedback on development artifacts and applications
Perform UATs and support field trials
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent in related field
2 or more years of experience conducting voice of customer studies
3 or more years of experience writing epics and detailed user stories in Jira, Azure DevOps or similar tool
2 or more years of experience performing User Acceptance Testing
2 or more years of experience developing marketing collateral
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in Controls and Device Automation industry
Experience working with geographically-dispersed teams
Experience with New Product commercialization
Position Criteria
A demonstrated ability to effectively communicate Business and Product requirements to Development and QA team members and answer questions
Solid decision-making skills and the ability to articulate reasoning while taking the bigger product picture into consideration
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and to follow directions
Ability to communicate and promote software development best-practices
Corporate Overview
An early, and one of many patents awarded, came for the creation of the first practical method to control electricity through the pull chain socket that remains unchanged today.
Division Overview
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other protected class.
Nearest Major Market: Austin
Job Segment:
Business Analyst, Cloud, Quality Assurance, Testing, Technology
Find similar jobs:
Ingénierie,
Ingenieurwesen,
Ingeniería,
Engineering,
Engenharia
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Already a Member
You are already a user of this site.
Please sign in.
Email*
Not you?
Password*
Forgot Password?
Sign in Cancel
required field
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
×
Create Profile
Working...
Next »
","['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"Direct the services of Supplier Provider to provide maintenance support for IT applications.
Work with Business Users to identify and prioritize IT support requirement
Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field and 5+ years of experience.
Must have prior experience with Java.
Must have experience gathering data from many different source systems, transforming the data per the business rules and creating final reports.
Candidate must be detail oriented and self-driven.
Must have technical know-how and give meaningful direction and resolve roadblocks for the team.
Preferred Requirements:
Knowledge of Data Stage is a plus.
All qualified applicants will receive due consideration for employment without any discrimination.
All applicants will be evaluated solely on the basis of their ability, competence and their proven capability to perform the functions outlined in the corresponding role.
",['java'],"['data', 'busi']",1.0,"['java', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Type of Requisition:
Regular
Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:
None
Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:
None
Suitability:
No Suitability Required
Public Trust/Other Required:
None
Job Family:
Business Process Analysis
Requirements:
Clearly and effectively communicate processes, ideas, and solutions to technical teams and customers
Documenting software and systems efforts in Agile or mixed Agile and waterfall environments.
Working closely with government customer and other contractors to find solutions to difficult problems and manage multiple priorities at once
Reviewing, analyzing and evaluating business systems and user needs.
Documenting requirements, defining project scope and objectives, and working with software and systems architects on designing systems to parallel overall business strategies.
Creating workflow charts and diagrams; determining system capabilities; writing specifications.
Providing project management support to development efforts.
Skills and Attributes:
Must have at least eight years of experience with planning, designing, developing, and launching efficient business, financial, and operations systems in support of core program functions and business processes, with four years serving in a leadership role.
Proficiency in developing robust business rules to resolve system issues and enhancements for systems.
Proficiency in developing testing scenarios.
Will serve as the primary contractor liaison with the business owner on business requirement related discussions, and will be essential to ensure the team is able to support the on-going business needs
Will meet with stakeholders to define business, financial, and operations requirements and systems goals.
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Travel Required:
None
Telecommuting Options:
Some Telecommuting Allowed
USA TX Austin
Additional Work Locations:
The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country.
Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.
",[None],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is an Information Technology (IT) position and will provide business analyst skills for Records & Content Management related projects.
This role will primary focus on a project to digitize physical records at TxDOT (Texas Department of Transportation).
To this end, the BA will assist in creating standardized processes for sorting physical records to identify content that is appropriate to scan.
They will also assist in identifying appropriate metadata to associate with content based on its Document Type.
Further, they will assist in recommending best practices for scanning the sorted content.
This role will also assist in educating the agency on the physical record sorting process.
The workers responsibilities and skills must include:
â Establishing best practices around Records Sorting, Metadata Identification, and Scanning at TxDOT
â Participating in Q&A Sessions with the end-users around Records Sorting/Management, Metadata, Scanning
â Creating Documentation around Metadata Standards
â Assisting in the supervision of records sorting at TxDOT
â Being a creative thinker to solve issues.
â Mediating business units that may have conflicting requirements.
â Facilitating and documenting AS-IS and TO-BE process flows
â Other duties as assigned
Â
WORKER SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS (Required)
Minimum (Required):
Skills/Experience
6 years' Experience with general IT SDLC processes.
5 years in business process creation 5 Skilled in gathering requirements from business divisions
5 years Skilled in documenting AS-IS and TO-BE process flows.
5 years Skilled in educating business unit staff on standardized processes
5 years possessing strong verbal and written skills in communicating with peers and different levels of users including executive staff.
Skilled in facilitating large group meetings with internal and external resources.
Skilled in collaborating with the technical and functional teams to develop the Technical Specification and other documents need in support of the solution
Â
Preferred (Optional):
Skills/Experience
Experience with one or more of the state of Texas government agencies
Experience in Records/Content Management and Disposition
Experience in Sorting Physical Records
Experience in Scanning Physical Records
",[None],"['supervis', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['supervis', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
h8CuPz6CXR
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Summary:
This team works virtually by staying in touch via Skype and have working meetings as needed.
Day to Day:
Data analysis of daily CSSE work documented in CSSE engagement tool
Creating weekly/monthly PPT presentations for executive meetings
There will be regular meetings, several times a week in working sessions to outline the work to be completed
REQUIREMENTS:
Daily work in MS Outlook and Word with Advanced skills in PPT and Excel to update documents
Strong business intelligence skills
Advanced Power BI and Tableau experience
Knowledge of data automation and intelligent DB functionality
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau', 'db']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'tableau', 'db', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The Business Analyst who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology.
Experience
Around 10 years of Expertise in Written and oral communications
Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc.
Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"The HHS-IT Business Operations (ITBO) Procurement Projects and Support (PPS) Business Analyst is a senior business analyst position responsible for gathering, compiling, analyzing, tracking, and drafting of functional and technical requirements for complex IT systems.
This position performs extremely detail-oriented work on major IT procurements in the development of procurement artifacts and project documentation.
The position requires the candidate to work closely with the PPS Director, Project Managers, and team members; Project Sponsors and similar leadership; and stakeholders from other divisions within HHSC.
Essential Job Functions:Gather and validate requirements for assembling Request for Offers (RFO's), Statements of Work (SOW), Attachments and Exhibits as part of major IT procurements.
Convert high-level business, technical, financial, legal and other stakeholder requirements into procurement requirements at an appropriate level of detail and categorization to complete documentation according to standard templates, using clear, concrete, and concise language.
Interpret new and changing business requirements to determine the impact on the solution and propose creative enhancements and changes to meet these new requirements.
40%Create / maintain presentation materials.
(Slide decks, Visio diagrams, and other presentation materials used with Stakeholders).
Coordinates and facilitates meetings during the procurement phases.
Coordinate and facilitate task, risk and issue tracking.
Serve as single point of contact and ownership for update of schedule, milestones, tasks, including but not limited to Security, Privacy, Legal, Finance, PCS, Risk Management, and Non-Disclosure Agreements.
30%Initiate Quality Control reviews of other complex project deliverables such as project charters, exhibits and attachments, contract and solicitation documentation, risk assessment plans with providing comments and feedback to document owners.
Develop and maintain process document containing common errors discovered during the quality control reviews.
Coordinate with business analysts on the PPS team to ensure reviews encompass updates to the processes.
Implement version control on all procurement artifacts.
20%Develop business relationships and act as a point of contact for stakeholder or other procurement related questions, including ability to work with different stakeholders and differing perspectives, following through on commitments, and tactfully communicating procurement sensitive information.
Assist program SMEs in development of up to date procurement artifacts ensuring all procurement relevant documents are gathered during a procurement lifecycle.
10%Knowledge Skills Abilities:* Knowledge of IT life cycle concepts; of business and management principles involved in procurement, and of project management principles and practices.
* Ability to analyze and interpret technical information including regulations, policies, and automation system documentation/specifications/to communicate in writing; to translate user/business needs into a technical style; to communicate technical instructions to system users; to analyze, evaluate, and integrate business rules into system requirements.
* Ability to visualize, diagram, and explain As-Is / To-Be business process flows.
* Ability to conduct data and/or requirements gathering meetings (JAD or JAR sessions), with adherence to meeting agenda, documentation of meeting outcomes, and the ability to drive Action Items to closure.
* Ability to perform project level analysis and produce project analysis documentations such as swim lanes, sequence diagrams, use cases, etc.
* Ability to work on complex business problems, analyzing and evaluating current business methods and procedures for improvements.
* Ability to direct and organize procurement activities; to establish project goals and objectives that support the State and HHSC strategic plans as well as Federal directives.
* Ability to identify problems, evaluate alternatives, exercise sound judgment, and implement effective solutions; to develop and evaluate policies and procedures; and prepare reports.
* Ability to communicate effectively, develop professional networks, and identify the internal and external dynamics that impact the work of the organization.
* Ability to build and maintain effective relationships with cross-departmental and inter-agency teams; including effective communication skills with technical and non-technical groups.
* Skill in the application of risk management strategies and the ability to routinely identify and effectively mitigate risks.
* Skill with the Microsoft project tool suite (Project, Visio, Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Access).Registration or Licensure Requirements:CTCD required within 12 months of hire Initial Selection Criteria:* Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major coursework in business, communications, computer information systems or a related field.
One year of appropriate experience may be substituted for the required education on a year-for-year basis.
* 5 or more years' experience performing business analysis for large scale IT projects.
* 2 or more years' experience preparing or responding to RFPs preferred.
* Experience with Medicaid and CHIP systems preferredAdditional Information:Requisition # 457111Graduation from an accredited four-year college or university with major course work in business, communications, computer information systems or a related field.
Experience and education may be substituted one for another.Note: Military occupation(s) that relate to the initial selection criteria and registration or licensure requirements for this position may include, but not limited to: 25B, 255A, IT, 182X, ISM, 8848, 3D0X1.
If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747.
If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'sequenc', 'data', 'financ', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Associate Business Analyst, is responsible for creating reports, ad hoc data analysis and other business intelligence related tasks to support a global operations team servicing one of the largest financial institutions in the world.
You will be extracting and transforming data using SQL, leveraging advanced Excel features and Python for data analysis, and producing clear business intelligence and actionable information into visually appealing reporting.
Position Details:
Long term contract with possible contract extension or hire
Standard support hours: Mon-Fri 8:00am-5:00pm
This is an Exempt Salaried Position based upon experience and skill level
Responsibilities:
Develop metrics and dashboard reporting to provide insight across all operational organizations, for the purpose of increasing efficiency and improving customer delivery.
Create queries, write reports, and present findings and then make recommendations to direct and upper level management.
Analyze current business and reporting processes and look for means to improve efficiency and reduce bottlenecks.
Build complex reports related to operations performance.
(ie.
Labor efficiency, Service Catalog volumes, SLA measurement, etc.)
Utilize Python/SQL to provide solutions as well as maintain legacy reporting within Microsoft Excel with VBA.
Work closely with all levels of management to prioritize business and information reporting needs.
Continually train and elevate skill level with the various applications used by the organization.
Education/Experience Requirements
High school diploma or its equivalent is required
Bachelor's degree in Business Administration, Computer Science, MIS, Mathematics or related field preferred
Proficient relational database experience (MS-Access, SQL)
6-12+ months Python experience (familiarity with Pandas highly preferred)
Intermediate-to-Expert-level VBA skills
Familiarity with a data visualization suite such as Tableau
Prior professional experience in Data Entry and Analysis preferredExperience with version control a plus (ie.
Github)
","['github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'panda', 'python']","['dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'recommend']",1.0,"['github', 'excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'microsoft', 'tableau', 'panda', 'python', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'visual', 'recommend']"
BA,"Organization: Accenture Federal Services
Accenture's federal business has served every cabinet-level department and 30 of the largest federal organizations.
Accenture Federal Services transforms bold ideas into breakthrough outcomes for clients at defense, intelligence, public safety, civilian and military health organizations.
So, you can deliver what matters most.
The Senior Business Analyst (Sr. BA) is a key member of the IT implementation team.
In addition to being responsible for business analysis, the Sr. BA will be responsible for coordinating all project scope-related activities, including gathering requirements to analyze, design and/or implement technology best practice business changes.
He or she will work with senior members of the team ensuring the successful delivery of a COTS implementation.
The Sr. BA should have solid function and/or industry knowledge with COTS products such as MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Pega, Appian.
Key Responsibilities:
Work with Delivery Lead/Project Manager to maintain and coordinate communication with the customer/client throughout each project.
Work with the project team to gather the business and functional requirements, by scoping defining, and prioritizing requirements.
Mapping functional requirements to COTS product features and functionality.
Understand and document requirements for configuring, testing and launching
",['salesforc'],"['commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['salesforc', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"The purpose of the Pharmacy Branch-Inventory Tracking Electronic Asset Management System (ITEAMS) Replacement project is to replace the existing ITEAMS with an automated solution that is Food and Drug Administration (FDA) compliant and able to integrate with outside systems to trace and track the distribution of Department of State Health Services (DSHS) pharmaceuticals The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology Duties Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design Development Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals) Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 7 Required Expertise in Written and oral communications 7 Required Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements 7 Required Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 Required Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst 5 Required Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution 4 Required Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4 Required Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5 Preferred Experience reporting to executive management.
1 Preferred Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
1 Preferred Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will be a key contributor on the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations.
You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan.
All information you provide will be kept confidential and will be used only to the extent required to provide needed reasonable accommodation.Guidehouse does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies.
",[None],['recommend'],2.0,['recommend']
BA,"A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment while considering functional benefits, technical
performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Utilizes expertise in Business Analysis to develop and maintain Lifecycle tailoring document(s),Systems Lifecycle (SLC)-compliant documentation, Analysis of Alternatives (AoA), gap analysis activities, application design documentation, and other required documentation.
Additional responsibilities may include researching the latest process and IT advancement to automate and modernize systems and drafting out discovered results.
Additional duties may include:
Creates, prepares, and produces marketing proposals and presentations
Enters, verifies, and maintains accurate customers/client information in CRM software
Establishes and builds relationships with customers
Conducts research to identify opportunities for business growth
Assists with design and development of sales and marketing strategies
Schedules and attends meetings with prospective customers
Assists with and conducts webinars and seminars
Job Requirements
Degree Requirements: Bachelor’s Degree
Experience: A minimum of five (5) years’ of direct experience is required
Certifications: N/A
Travel: Negligible
Clearance Requirements: This position requires an Active SECRET Clearance
Security clearance required
SECRET
Travel
",[None],"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'research', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Gather user requirements and write functional and detailed specifications.
Strong knowledge of MS Project, Excel, MS Word and Visio Drawing tool along with general familiarity with Outlook and other MS Office applications is also required.
Desire a working knowledge of Rational Unified Process methodology in developing use cases, use case model, supplementary requirements, and business rules is essential.
Must have excellent analytical skills and excellent written and verbal communication skills.
","['ms office', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This role is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics
Work Hours: Overnight 10:00 p.m. 6:30 a.m. Sunday Thursday Position is Onsite in Austin
This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans
Primary Responsibilities
A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
13 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
Excellent organization and analytical skills.
Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
Must have experience with at least ONE : Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports
Preferred Qualifications
Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
Prior VA Experience
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
ADP2 / IT2
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Night
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Systems Engineering
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.
Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"For more information visithttps://www.austinregionalclinic.com/careers/
PURPOSE:
Provides analysis of data for the Medical Home department that will allow the directors to make decisions about patient contact or physician education.
Produces or coordinates production of reports on demand as well as routine reporting based on measurements for the project.
Interfaces with the various health plan business analysts to ensure data integrity.
Carries out all duties while maintaining compliance and confidentiality and promoting the mission and philosophy of the organization.
RESPONSIBILITIES:
Produces ad hoc reports and analyses on demand to assist in decision-making and planning.
Monitors data for trends or issues relative to quality measurements.
Builds, tests and maintains reporting applications.
Creates technical documentation and workflow processes.
Researches and develops methods to improve reporting outcomes.
Consults appropriate reference materials to verify proper outcomes.
Writes queries into complex, multi-dimensional systems utilizing standard tools and languages including MS Access and SQL.
Designs and documents business logic using standard tools including MS Visio
Conducts self-directed investigation and testing of large complex data sets.
Aggregates and reconciles appropriate data from multiple sources.
Creates automatable logic on appropriate data for analytics and standard reports.
Performs other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS:
Education: Bachelors Degree required; major in healthcare management, MIS Computer Science or other analytical fields preferred.
Experience: At least 2 years working with health plan analytics demonstrating adeptness with health informatics for use in business intelligence applications and decision-making.
Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities:
Fluency in standard healthcare industry taxonomies and codifications including CPT, ICD9, DRG, NPI, TOB, Revenue Center, and others.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Strong organizational skills.
Exceptional attention to detail.
Ability to work in a collaborative, team oriented environment.
Exceptional level of critical thinking, decision-making, and problem-solving abilities.
Ability to investigate various topics such as new taxonomies/codifications and clinical quality measurement through self-directed research
Work Schedule: Monday- Friday 8am-5pm.
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"This role is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics
Work Hours: Overnight 10:00 p.m. 6:30 a.m. Sunday Thursday Position is Onsite in Austin
This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans
Primary Responsibilities
A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
• Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
• Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
• Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
• Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
• Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
• Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
• Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
• Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
• Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
• Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
• Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
• Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
• Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
13 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
• Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
• Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
• Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
• Excellent organization and analytical skills.
• Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
• Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
• Must have experience with at least ONE : Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
• Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
• Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
• Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
• Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
• Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports
Preferred Qualifications
• Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
• Prior VA Experience
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
ADP2 / IT2
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Night
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Systems Engineering
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.
Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
Job Requirements:
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Title: Business Analyst- Rhapsody
Duration: 6 Months
Plan and lead collaboration with IT, CDC and Business SMEs to document the Ecosystem routes and message paths
Uses problem-solving and analytical skills to identify opportunities to automate current manual correction of data
Roles & Responsibilities:
Identify and analyze routes, lookup tables, and data transformation within Rhapsody
Gather and analyze complex data and requirements
Produce high quality business process documents
Analyze and document the current case reports sending through ELR to the Ecosystem to improve performance
Works with IT, business users and leadership to help them understand the application functionality, development approaches, possible enhancements and process improvements for the Ecosystem
Review completed documentation and diagrams with IT, business SMEs and leadership
Required Experience:
Two years of administrative experience in a business or government agency with responsibility for assisting in the direction and/or coordination of office administration and other support.
Required Skills:
HL7 processing
MS SQL Server
MS SQL
MS Office Suite and Visio
Electronic Lab Results/Electronic Health Record Integration Architecture
Orion Health Rhapsody Administration and Route Development
Java, Java scripting
Public Health Information Network Messaging System (PHINMS)
ETL experience
SNOMED, LOINC, ICD-9, ICD-10
Preferred Skills:
Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements and their technical specifications.
Ensures the EIR accessibility and security is integrated into the project lifecycle at the appropriate points (planning, design, development, test, etc.)
and ensures that resources are included to implement EIR accessibility within the project.
","['ms office', 'sql', 'java']","['etl', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'sql', 'java', 'etl', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"Texas Health and Human Services Commission requires the services of 1 Business Analyst 3, hereafter referred to as Candidate(s), who meets the general qualifications of Business Analyst 3 Category, Core Technology Type and the specifications outlined in this document for the Texas Health and Human Services Commission.
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
8 years - Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 years - Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 years - Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 years - Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 years - Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 years - Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 years - Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 years - Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 years - Experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 years - Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
5 years - Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
5 years - Experience working in a team environment.
Preferred
3 years - Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 years - Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 years - Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
TERM OF SERVICE
Services expect to start 07/30/2020 and are expected to be completed by 08/31/2020.
Total estimated hours per Candidate shall not exceed 184 hours.
This service may be amended, renewed, and/or extended providing both parties agree to do so in writing.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'commun', 'busi', 'end user']"
BA,"Overview
Business Analyst:
Duration: 6 Months
Primary Responsibilities:
Ensure project tasks and products follow the development process and quality guidelines while meeting both functional and contractual requirements.
Work with peers from user area and contractor staff to coordinate, plan, assign, supervise, and evaluate the work of the project staff in a matrixed organization structure.
Manage deliverable content expectations, review processes, and acceptance criteria.
Ensure deliverables meet the agreed upon quality and content.
Develop and manage project budgets, schedules, work plans, resource requirements, and cost estimates and projections.
Ensure all team members understand the project standards and be able resolve challenges with the quality of any party's work products.
Communicate with the project stakeholders, management, and other relevant parties.
Document detailed system requirements.
II.Worker Skills And Qualifications
Minimum Requirements:
Years
Skills/Experience
6
Full-time experience in project management work, business analysis, or project administration.
Experience managing large, complex projects throughout all development phases.
6
Experience in structured design and development process, scope control, project estimation, risk mitigation, and preventive and corrective actions for overruns.
6
Experience managing project activities; establishing project goals and objectives; exercising sound judgment in making critical decisions; analyzing complex information and developing plans to address identified issues; demonstrate negotiation and facilitation skills; identify project risks and gaps; prepare reports; and communicate effectively.
5
Experience reviewing, analyzing, and evaluating business systems and user and stakeholder needs.
5
5
3
Experience writing Request for Information, Request for Offer (RFO) and Statement of Work (SOW) documents.
3
Experience simultaneously collecting requirements across multiple program areas or organizations that are geographically dispersed and that have varying business needs.
3
Preferences:
Years
Skills/Experience
4
Knowledge of project management theories and practices applicable to projects that are complex in scope; of systems and procedures used to evaluate a third-party vendor's performance; and of local, state, and federal laws and regulations relevant to the administration of the project undertaken.
",[None],"['risk', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'supervis', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Role: Junior Business Analyst
Job Summary
The primary function of the Junior Business Analyst will be to executive all phases of the business analyst life cycle consisting of but not limited to: requirements gathering, design, implementation, documentation and end user support.
A successful candidate will be driven and will make certain that project deliverables meet client specifications, are delivered on time and are of high quality.
Key Duties
Work with other Business Analysts and Product Owners to develop user stories and scenarios using requirements.
Collaborate with developers and tests to ensure requirements are implemented correctly and meet client’s expectations.
Actively engage and suggest solutions to client/customer needs and/or wants.
Support the design and development of both custom and core product features.
Understand the business need & gather requirements from clients.
Analyze requirements and prepare different use cases and user stories.
Develop one or more solution alternatives
Review of solution(s) with stakeholders.
Prepare Requirement & Solution Document
Assist in UAT.
Travel to work at client sites.
Demonstrated basic understanding of full software development life cycle using Agile methodology
College courses or related internship experience in requirements development and solution documentation
College courses or related internship experience with SQL; experience writing SQL queries to extract data from a database
HTML, CSS or similar experience would be great to have
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, including experience working directly with customers to discuss their requirements and objectives.
Powered by JazzHR
RxAAhpjIys
","['excel', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following:
A.
Provide knowledgeable project coordination and analysis to CMD projects.
B.
Provide strategic technical vision for systems and system enhancements.
C. Present project updates, recommendations, and key decisions to executive management.
D. Work with HHSC program staff and team to analyze and document the business processes and requirements.
E. Understand business and technical objectives of the project.
F. Coordinate with project leads, HHSC program and other subject-matter experts, contractor representatives, and other State agency representatives as required to ensure necessary tasks, deliverables and timelines are completed.
G. Organize project work sessions often including multiple departments.
H. Document risks and develop mitigation plans.
I.
Identify, track, and ensure resolution of issues and removal of barriers.
J.
Respond to inquiries from internal and external stakeholders.
K. Document reporting requirements and program decisions.
L. Other duties as assigned.
II.
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements: Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skills/experience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years Required/Preferred Experience
5 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions.
5 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
5 Required Experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
5 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
5 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internalexternal stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
Required Skills Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies (8 years) Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions (8 years) Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need (8 years) Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status (8 years) Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff (8 years) Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors (8 years) Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.)
(5 years) Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements (5 years) Experience coordinating and developing test strategies (5 years) Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
(5 years) Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology (3 years) Experience working in a team environment (3 years) Preferred Skills Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs (3 years) Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs (2 years) Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs (2 years) Medicaid Business Analyst -- MS Office, MS Project, Agile, Medicaid Long-Term Care Programs, Health and Human Services Programs Higher Competitive Rates will be considered for consultants with advanced skill set Corp to Corp Resumes are welcome Consultants may need a criminal background check Contact Number (608) 836 9920
","['ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Must be familiarexperienced with BPMN, and industry leading tools Visio, Bizagi, EA, ARIS, etc.
Proficiency and extended experience in defining detailed Business Requirements documentation and Use Cases.
Proficiency and experience establishing Requirements Traceability, and using supporting tools, TFS, Jira, etc.
Must be extremely Analytical, Detail Oriented and focused on High quality delivery of software Must possess strong communication and collaboration skills must be able to demonstrate an ability to be a self-starter and work closely and efficiently with Subject Matter Experts from different functional areas.
+3 years working in IT projects within an IT organization either as a consultant or full-time IT employee.
Experience in gathering the as-is process and working through the gap analysis when compared to the to-be processes.
Experience defining to-be processes.
Extensive experience facilitatingleading requirements gathering sessions.
Experience analyzing data to support driving business decisions.
Experience with documentation of user acceptance testing Ideal candidate can send resumes at anuja.kothasstech.us or call me at 770 391 0801 ext 119 Best Regards, Anuja Kotha Six Concourse Parkway, Ste2950 Atlanta, GA -30328 Ph 770-391-0801x 119 Direct 404 630 3533
","['tf', 'jira']","['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['tf', 'jira', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"For: Client
Associate Business Analyst | Digital Marketing | Adobe AEM
Austin, TX 78705
Client Name
XXX
Contract duration 3
Target Start Date 15 Jul 2020
Does this position require Visa independent candidates only?
No
Job Details:
Must Have Skills
Webcontent Management
Business Analyst
Adobe AEM
Business Analyst with knowledge in Webcontent Management, SALESFORCE, QTP, JAVA, HTML, CSS, Oracle.
Should have hands-on experience in AEM.
Should have worked as a Scrum master in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Workflow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram, etc.
Minimum years of experience
5+
Certifications Needed :No
Top 3 responsibilities you would expect the Subcon to shoulder and execute
Daily status updates
Coordination with offshore
Coordination with client
Interview Process (Is face to face required?)
NoBusiness Analyst with knowledge in Webcontent Management, SALESFORCE, QTP, JAVA, HTML, CSS, Oracle.
Should have handson experience in AEM.Should have worked as a SCRUm master in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Work flow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram etc.
This section has been enriched.
Please review and make any edits prior to saving the request template.
Skills:
Category
Name
Required
Experience
No items to display.
","['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java']","['data', 'busi']",2.0,"['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Overview
Business Analyst
Austin, TX
6+ Months
In-person interview @ Austin, TX.
No C2C at this moment, any visa works.
Thanks!
Minimum Requirements:
Years
Skills/Experience
3
Experience working on assessment and gap analysis projects
3
Experience documenting to-be and as-is business process and requirements
3
3
Experience working in a state of Texas or Federal agency on public health projects
3
Experience producing documents for executive management
3
Preferences:
Years
Skills/Experience
2
Knowledge of Health Registries
2
Knowledge of medical and diagnostic terms related to cancer
4
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
1
Experience producing documents for legislative bodies
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary:
Looking for high powered and quantitatively oriented IT Business Analyst to support the Projects in IT Domain.
Analyst will be required to analyze specific business problems and drive value in strategic areas of business.
What you will get to do:
The analyst would typically handle a high impact project at any time which should result in bottom line impact.
Most of the work would be around business understanding, data understanding, guiding junior analysts in data preparation, working with the statistical team to create models if required and result presentation.
The analyst would be required to understand the business model, business brief, and the information available for analysis.
Adhoc requirements would need to be fulfilled from time to time as well.
High Level of Business analysis skills is necessary.
Graduate or Post Graduate from Tier 1 with 0-2 years of experience
Ideal candidate would have strong analytical skills, ability to understand business situations and provide data backed analysis.
Basic Requirement:
Graduate degree in Computer Science.
Must have completed Masters Degree in Computer Science.
Experience in preparing basic flow diagrams, swim-lane diagrams
Powered by JazzHR
EIQs4AVGlN
",[None],"['statist', 'data', 'busi']",2.0,"['statist', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst 2
Duration: 6+ Months
The Worker will serve as a Business Analyst to review, analyze, evaluate current enterprise contract management practices and processes for business process mapping and re-engineering.
Through this assessment, the Worker will prepare solution options for business process improvements, identify any risks associated with contract management and monitoring processes, and develop written documentation of Enterprise Contracts Management program functions.
The selected candidate(s) will work under the direction of client’s Procurement management.
The Worker will serve as a Business Analyst to review, analyze, evaluate current enterprise contract management practices and processes for business process mapping and re-engineering.
Through this assessment, the Worker will prepare solution options for business process improvements, identify any risks associated with contract management and monitoring processes, and develop written documentation of Enterprise Contracts Management program functions.
Roles & Responsibilities:
Review and analyze the operations and activities of monitoring contract performance, which includes tasks such as identifying all contract management process (tools, applications, supporting documents), assessing contract management vs contract monitoring functions, evaluating vendor management business process;
Develop business process mapping.
Document and provide knowledge transfer to the Enterprise Contracts Management team for all solutions.
Review workflow functions of STS Contract Management and document the systems, processes, documents and tools used for each.
Worker will then compare and contrast the processes to see where similarities exist, and identify and document where the programs could be better aligned.
Worker will review and analyze hand-off functions between CPO programs to validate efficacy, verify value of the function and document recommended changes; and,
Map work functions and tasks to specific statute, code, rule, policy or procedure and validate necessity.
Evaluate effectiveness of process and functional alignment within programs.
Required Experience:
Experience in business process improvement (BPI) related to contract administration, management, evaluation, or monitoring of contract providers.
Experience mapping processes to statutory/regulatory requirements
Experience coordinating, and moderating work groups and white boarding process flow and documenting workflow
Required Skills:
Ability to clearly and concisely communicate both verbally and in writing;
Ability to work independently and as part of a large team;
Ability to work a flexible schedule to meet required deadlines;
Current knowledge of Texas procurement and contract laws, regulations, rules, policies, and procedures;
Knowledge of the client, including knowledge of client procurement processes and procedures;
Understanding of the Statewide Contract Management Guide;
Contract Management experience, training, and/or certification; and
Purchasing and procurement experience, training, and/or certification.
",[None],"['risk', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['risk', 'recommend', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
WV0OBffGIC
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Duties:
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
",['powerpoint'],"['optim', 'research', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'optim', 'research', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary
Under minimal direction, the Senior Business Analyst is responsible for providing business analysis and project management.
Defines business solutions; assists with testing and quality assurance activities; coordinates the IT change management process; and improves department policies and procedures based on industry standards.
The Senior Business Analyst maintains in-depth experience and knowledge of UFCUs business operations and all supporting business technology information systems; exercises technical and business knowledge to identify and document functional solutions to complex requirements.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
Relative Weight (in %; all functions
total should = 100%)
50%
Analysis and Business Solution Definition
Understands business owners direction, structure, and requirements.
Documents and analyzes required information and data.
Prepares requirements, specifications, business processes and recommendations.
Recommends technology solutions to resolve business issues.
20%
Design and Testing
Understands technical design specifications.
Assists with defining test conditions.
Develops accurate and complete test plans for projects under IT management.
Conducts testing according to plan.
Identifies and documents system deficiencies and recommends solutions.
10%
Project Execution
Assists in enforcement of project deadlines and schedules.
Takes input from supervisor and appropriately and accurately applies comments/feedback.
Understands the necessity of project standards and applies them consistently.
Develops internal and external meeting objectives and agendas.
Prioritizes multiple tasks effectively.
Understands the components of running a fiscally successful project.
10%
Responsible for the Coordination and Completion of Projects
Monitors and summarizes progress of project.
Prepares reports regarding status of project
Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Provides post-implementation follow up to measure project accuracy.
5%
Participates in Change Management
Participates in internal processes to accurately track and administer local modifications, implementations, etc.
Assists with test plan development and quality assurance activities.
Follows up to ensure the change is successful.
5%
Internal Operations and Innovation
Conducts effective progress evaluations in a timely manner.
Mentors those with less experience through informal channels.
Seeks and participates in development opportunities.
Suggests areas for improvement in internal processes along with possible solutions.
Leads internal teams/task forces.
N/A
Performs other duties as assigned.
Complete required regulatory Training as assigned.
Maintain strict adherence and compliance to all laws, rules, regulations and internal controls specific to your role, including but not limited to Bank Secrecy Act, Anti-Money Laundering, USA Patriot Act, OFAC and Fair Lending regulations.
Qualifications
Education
High School diploma or equivalent required.
Bachelor's degree preferred.
Experience
Minimum of three (3) years of exhibiting technical applications experience required.
Minimum of three (3) years of systems analysis required.
Minimum of three (3) years of business analysis experience required.
Credit union or other financial institution experience is preferred.
Specialized Knowledge, Licenses, Certifications, etc.
Demonstrated excellence in providing superb customer service.
Excellent analytical skills.
Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening).
Demonstrated knowledge of data standards (both data exchange and storage).
Proficiency with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Microsoft Project, and Visio.
Must be bondable.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee in order to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to finger, handle or feel; reach with hands and arms; and talk or
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, peripheral vision and ability to adjust
The employee is frequently required to stand and
Employee will make extensive use of the telephone requiring the ability to effectively and accurately explain complex
The employee must regularly lift and/or move up to 10 pounds and frequently lift and/or move up to 10
Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job.
This position may involve periodic stressful
May occasionally require an adjusted work schedule, overtime, and evening/weekend
Public contact position, requiring appropriate professional
Frequent computer use at a workstation up to two hours at a
The noise level in the work environment is usually
Critical Job Competencies
In addition to fulfilling the positions Essential Duties and Responsibilities, an individual must demonstrate UFCUs Core Competencies:
Leading & Developing Self Organizational Impact
#INDUFCU
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"This role is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics
Work Hours: 2:00 p.m. 10:30 p.m. Monday - Friday Onsite in Austin , TX
This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans
Primary Responsibilities
A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Other duties as assigned
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
8 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
Excellent organization and analytical skills.
Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
Must have experience with at least one of these tools: Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports
Preferred Qualifications
Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
Prior VA Experience
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
ADP2 / IT2
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Evening
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Systems Engineering
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.
Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Posting Address
1812 Centre Creek Dr.
Suite 240
Austin, Texas 78754
KH
#LI-KH1
Position Overview
Product Owner/Business Analyst
You will be involved in the complete software development life cycle, seeing your epics and user stories into a finished product in a hybrid agile environment.
This will require a high degree of collaboration among highly-talented, cross-functional and geographically-dispersed development teams.
You will work closely with industry-best product management team, developers and other design team members to present business and customer needs and help develop end-to-end solutions.
Essential Functions
Conduct voice-of-customer studies to understand and document user work flows and use cases
Develop Epics and detailed user stories and work closely with development team members to help develop end-to-end Enterprise lighting solutions
Function as liaison between development team members and end customers, users and other stake holders
Develop marketing collateral including product specifications, training documentation, user manuals and user acceptance tests (UATs)
Assist with the preparation of wireframes and lead focus groups to validate concepts
Attend all scrum meetings including backlog grooming, sprint planning, daily standup, sprint review to answer all requirement questions and provide feedback on development artifacts and applications
Perform UATs and support field trials
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent in related field
2 or more years of experience conducting voice of customer studies
3 or more years of experience writing epics and detailed user stories in Jira, Azure DevOps or similar tool
2 or more years of experience performing User Acceptance Testing
2 or more years of experience developing marketing collateral
Experience in the Lighting or Building Automation industry
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in Controls and Device Automation industry
Experience working with geographically-dispersed teams
Experience with New Product commercialization
Position Criteria
A demonstrated ability to effectively communicate Business and Product requirements to Development and QA team members and answer questions
Solid decision-making skills and the ability to articulate reasoning while taking the bigger product picture into consideration
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and to follow directions
Ability to communicate and promote software development best-practices
Corporate Overview
An early, and one of many patents awarded, came for the creation of the first practical method to control electricity through the pull chain socket that remains unchanged today.
Division Overview
As one of the largest lighting fixture manufacturers in North America, it features a suite of brands that provide a full range of indoor and outdoor lighting products serving the commercial, industrial, institutional, and residential markets.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other protected class.
Nearest Major Market: Austin
Job Segment: Business Analyst, Cloud, Quality Assurance, Testing, Technology
","['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"Business Analyst : Reports to the Assistant VP of Underwriting and will work under the Business Analyst Lead.You will be involved with projects in both underwriting and IT
Contract Length: Minimum 8 months 18 months
Onsite M-F 8-5, 40 hours (flexible schedule depending on manager)
Reports to the Assistant VP of Underwriting and will work under the Business Analyst Lead
Position will be involved with projects in both underwriting and IT
TopRequirements:
3-5 years of BA experience
Knows hands-on experience in building requirements and user stories
Has worked with large-scale, enterprise level projects
Experience with Agile
Must have P&C insurance industry experience
Must have Guidewire experience
Someone who has worked more in the business side
Team player who takes initiative
Critical thinking and multi-tasking skills are a must
",['c'],['busi'],1.0,"['c', 'busi']"
BA,"For more information, please visit www.genesis10.com.
Position Summary: The Business Analyst serves as a liaison among stakeholders with the goal of understanding the structure, policies and processes, and operations of the Underwriting department and recommending solutions to enable the department and organization to achieve its goals.
The position incumbent must demonstrate customer-centric behavior and the ability to build relationships across the team and business, a broad understanding of property insurance principles and processes, ability to create and manage project plans for requirements and testing, and articulate value of recommended solutions and alternative options.
Job Duties:
Serve as primary interface between business unit, support teams and IT department in order to elicit, analyze, validate and communicate requirements for changes to business processes, policies and information systems.
Serve as a department interface to define the scope of IT development or enhancement projects including defining, documenting and developing detailed business requirements documents, developing policies and procedures, creating testing and implementation plans, and promoting the needs and interests of the department.
Assist department management and collaborate with IT through the service lifecycle.
Evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, disseminate high-level concepts into details, distinguish actual needs and create logical and innovative solutions.
Research and resolve business problems by gathering input from key stakeholders, identifying root cause of problems and researching and recommending appropriate solution options.
Provides regular status reports and problem resolution summaries.
Collect, analyze and report performance data to identify, prioritize, and deliver improvements to the department.
Develop and analyze metrics and prepare analytical reports.
Assist in assessing training needs.
Assist Trainers and Instructional Designers in identifying training needs and developing training content.
Assist in developing Underwriting processes and procedures and defining deliverables for system development, system operation, change control, and training.
Minimum Requirements:
Three (3) years of business analyst or similar experience
Knows hands-on experience in building requirements and user stories
Has worked on large scale, enterprise level projects
Must have insurance or financial services industry experience
Must Have Guidewire Platform Experience ( Policy Center and/or Claims Center)
Team player and knows how to facilitate meetings
Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
International Institute of Business Analysis (IIBA) certification or demonstrated progress toward achieving the designation
Intermediate knowledge of operating systems, email, word processing and similar computer applications including the Microsoft Office Suite.
Ideal Experience:
Five (5) years of experience as a business analyst
Two (2) years of experience in the insurance industry
Experience in Property and Casualty Underwriting
Skills:
Ability to manage project assignments, conduct in-depth interviews, observations, research, documentation, and cost benefit analyses
Excellent written and oral presentations skills, including clear, effective verbal and written communication skills, and the ability to actively listen, problem solve, and communicate effectively with both business and technical users
Ability to analyze and document complex business processes
Demonstrates a proficient understanding of customer needs from a business and technical perspective
Intermediate to advanced level MS office skills for MS Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio
Aptitude to multi task projects and think analytically as issues arise
Ability to gather and interpret relevant data and information
Demonstrated experience working both as an individual contributor and as part of a team
Strong customer service skills and the ability to meet internal and external stakeholder customer requirements
Ability to exercise independent judgment in methods, techniques and evaluation criteria for obtaining results.
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Posting Address
1812 Centre Creek Dr.
Suite 240
Austin, Texas 78754
KH
#LI-KH1
Position Overview
Product Owner/Business Analyst
You will be involved in the complete software development life cycle, seeing your epics and user stories into a finished product in a hybrid agile environment.
This will require a high degree of collaboration among highly-talented, cross-functional and geographically-dispersed development teams.
You will work closely with industry-best product management team, developers and other design team members to present business and customer needs and help develop end-to-end solutions.
Essential Functions
Conduct voice-of-customer studies to understand and document user work flows and use cases
Develop Epics and detailed user stories and work closely with development team members to help develop end-to-end Enterprise lighting solutions
Function as liaison between development team members and end customers, users and other stake holders
Develop marketing collateral including product specifications, training documentation, user manuals and user acceptance tests (UATs)
Assist with the preparation of wireframes and lead focus groups to validate concepts
Attend all scrum meetings including backlog grooming, sprint planning, daily standup, sprint review to answer all requirement questions and provide feedback on development artifacts and applications
Perform UATs and support field trials
Basic Qualifications
Bachelor's degree in Engineering or equivalent in related field
2 or more years of experience conducting voice of customer studies
3 or more years of experience writing epics and detailed user stories in Jira, Azure DevOps or similar tool
2 or more years of experience performing User Acceptance Testing
2 or more years of experience developing marketing collateral
Experience in the Lighting or Building Automation industry
Preferred Qualifications
Experience in Controls and Device Automation industry
Experience working with geographically-dispersed teams
Experience with New Product commercialization
Position Criteria
A demonstrated ability to effectively communicate Business and Product requirements to Development and QA team members and answer questions
Solid decision-making skills and the ability to articulate reasoning while taking the bigger product picture into consideration
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently and to follow directions
Ability to communicate and promote software development best-practices
Corporate Overview
An early, and one of many patents awarded, came for the creation of the first practical method to control electricity through the pull chain socket that remains unchanged today.
Division Overview
As one of the largest lighting fixture manufacturers in North America, it features a suite of brands that provide a full range of indoor and outdoor lighting products serving the commercial, industrial, institutional, and residential markets.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other protected class.
Nearest Major Market: Austin
Job Segment: Business Analyst, Cloud, Quality Assurance, Testing, Technology
","['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi', 'segment']",1.0,"['azur', 'excel', 'jira', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi', 'segment']"
BA,"Summary: The Default Business Analyst will report to the AVP of Home Retention.
* Able to work independently;* Analytical and organized;* Excellent verbal and written communication skills;* Strong PC skills.
Must be proficient in MS Windows, MS Outlook, MS Office Suite, and MS Visio.Preferred Education/Experience:* In depth knowledge of MSP, with at least 3 years recent experience working with MSP;* High school diploma or equivalent required, bachelor's degree preferred;* Knowledge of FNMA, FHLMC, GNMA, FHA/VA workout requirements;* Knowledge of FDCPA, CFPB Servicing Guidelines and state regulations related to debt collection practices;* History of reliable attendance;* Ability to work a schedule that includes occasional weekends; FT schedule working 8 hour shift M-F;* Must be able to pass background investigation.Core Competencies:To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:* Problem Solving - Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gathers and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions; Works well in group problem solving situations; Uses reason even when dealing with emotional topics.
* Team Work - Balances team and individual responsibilities; Exhibits objectivity and openness to others' views; Gives and welcomes feedback; Contributes to building a positive team spirit; Puts success of team above own interests; Able to build morale and group commitments to goals and objectives;* Written Communication - Writes clearly and informatively; Edits work for spelling and grammar; Presents numerical data effectively; Able to read and interpret written information.
* Quality Management - Looks for ways to improve and promote quality; Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness.
* Diversity - Shows respect and sensitivity for cultural differences; promotes a harassment-free environment.
* Ethics - Treats people with respect; Keeps commitments; inspires the trust of others; Works with integrity and ethically; Upholds organizational values.
* Adaptability - Adapts to changes in the work environment; Manages competing demands; Changes approach or method to best fit the situation; Able to deal with frequent change, delays, or unexpected events.
* Dependability - Follows instructions, responds to management direction; Takes responsibility for own actions; Keeps commitments; Commits to long hours of work when necessary to reach goals; Completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with an alternate plan.
* Judgment - Displays willingness to make decisions; Exhibits sound and accurate judgment; Supports and explains reasoning for decisions; Includes appropriate people in decision-making process; Makes timely decisions.
* Planning/Organizing - Prioritizes and plans work activities; Uses time efficiently.
* Professionalism - Approaches others in a tactful manner; Reacts well under pressure; Treats others with respect and consideration regardless of their status or position; Accepts responsibility for own actions; Follows through on commitments.
* Quantity - Meets productivity standards; Completes work in timely manner; Strives to increase productivity; Works quickly.Other Duties: This job may require frequent sitting or standing for long periods of time.
This job profile is not intended to be an all-inclusive list of job duties and responsibilities, as one may perform additional related duties as assigned in order to meet the needs of the organization.Work Authorization: Must be able to verify identity and employment eligibility to work in the U.S.EOE/M/F/D/V.
Drug-free workplace.Physical Demands: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
Must be able to lift up to ten pounds.
Primary functions require sufficient physical ability and mobility to work in an office setting; to stand or sit for prolonged periods of time; to occasionally stoop, bend, kneel, crouch, reach, and twist; to lift, carry, push, and/or pull light to moderate amounts of weight; to operate office equipment requiring repetitive hand movement and fine coordination including use of a keyboard; and to verbally communicate to exchange information.
VISION: See in the normal visual range with or without correction.
HEARING: Hear in the normal audio range with or without correction.
","['react', 'excel', 'ms office']","['data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun']",1.0,"['react', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'normal', 'visual', 'commun']"
BA,"The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Other duties as assigned.
CANDIDATE SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS Minimum Requirements Candidates that do not meet or exceed the minimum stated requirements (skillsexperience) will not be considered for this opportunity and the resume will not be submitted to the customer.
Years RequiredPreferred Experience 8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,": Gather user requirements for the Service Catalog in ServiceNow.
1) Good communication skills2) Prior experience with ServiceNow 3) Prior experience and knowledge of Service Catalog4) Good analysis skills5) Ability to translate customer needs into stories for developer (1.)
To act as liaison between the business and technical teams | present outcome from analysis to stakeholders.
(2.)
To analyze and evaluate financial/operational/performance and manpower related data to identify trends and suggest on areas for improvement.
(3.)
To create/modify, track and report business metrics, operational analysis and service level agreements to key stakeholders.
(4.)
To support in implementation/upgrade of line-of-business applications/systems.
(5.)
To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.
Â
Experience : 4.5-8 Years
Â
Qualification : BE/B.Tech (Hons)
Â
Skill (Primary) : Tools and Standards-Support-ServiceNow
",[None],"['commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"This role reports to the Sr Director of IAM with Cybersecurity and is intended to help leadership team run a more effective IAM Program.
The role will also interface regularly with the Cybersecurity Program Office.
Conducts business process analyses needs assessments and preliminary cost benefits analyses in an effort to align information technology solutions with business initiatives.
Works with business users to define and analyze problems and align the most appropriate technical application or configuration solutions.
Solicits develops documents and manages requirements and provides detailed design and business rules to support the requirements throughout project life cycle up to and through change control.
Considers the business implications of the application of technology to the current and future business environment.
Reviews system test plans and system tests modules before implementation.
Creates reviews and delivers end user documentation user guide process flow charts and training materials and training for accuracy.
Works with the user to select or create appropriate scenarios to test all results to determine whether system changes met project specifications uses scenarios to assist the end user in acceptance testing In upgrades monitors production performance enhancements and system integrity with end users.
Develops detailed implementation and upgrade project plans in conjunction with other account team associates.
Ensures that documentation is updated when change requests are approved for the project.
Provides input on processes procedures or new approaches.
Day to Day
Leads large scale or complex business systems and application upgrades or enhancement development and installations.
Serves as the subject matter expert and consulting resource for a functional area.
Performs gap analysis risk management and estimates for business cases lead cross functional teams to select and deliver solutions direct work of developers and analysts.
Evaluates user requirements for one or more specialized business applications and translates those needs into defined user assessment plans or specifications.
Develops project plans and defines cost and time estimates for implementation and development of complex enterprise level solutions.
Creates business process flow charts for customer and technical review.
Consistently reviews the Request For Proposal RFP Request For Information ROI and vendor relationships and implement changes as necessary.
Develops white papers to be published and or presented at conferences present internal brown bag technical talks on cross functional and technical topics.
Oversees configuration requests for a solution and understand implications of configuration options across a solution and other integrated systems.
Creates high complexity functional and solution designs using a disciplined methodology.
Conduct and prepare FY21 strategic planning content with the team Excellent PowerPoint skills required
Drive execution of a number of smaller FY21 baseline initiatives.
Essentially act as BA PM type role
This is where process improvement Agile and ITIL skills are important.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'end user', 'account', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"Position:ÂBusinessAnalyst
Duration:Â12+Months<b>
TX<b>
The Compliance Specialist role is
responsible for the following:
Developing and managing a
comprehensive set of operational requirements, guidelines, and recommendations
(together forming a âprogramâ) to ensure IRM organizational output is compliant
WCAG 2.0 (AA) and Agency policies.
Development of program contents
(guiding documentation and instructions, Frequently Asked Questions, &
website content, etc.)
Review and audit of HTML webpages,
PDF, Microsoft WordÂ, VisioÂ, ExcelÂ, and PowerPointÂ documents for compliance
with Section 508, TAC 206 & 213, and WCAG 2.0 (AA).
Working with DFPS departments to
share department-wide publications and related guidance regarding electronic IT
accessibility requirements.
Consistently and accurately document
to internal or external publication.
Randomly sample and review electronic
documents including software test plans and test cases for Section 508, TAC
206 & 213, and WCAG 2.0 (AA) compliance.
Modifying and/or teaching &
training DFPS IT staff on how to modify existing applications and documents to
be 508, TAC 206 & 213, and WCAG 2.0 (AA) compliant.
A successful candidate must be very
familiar with Section 508, TAC 206 & 213, and WCAG 2.0 (AA) compliance for
documents, presentations, webpages and similar materials.
A successful
candidate will have experience reviewing products, services, webpages,
documents, presentations, and similar materials to ensure compliance before
internal or external publication.
A successful candidate will have experience
performing both scheduled and random audits of departmental documentation and
webpages to identify instances of non-compliance.
<b>
Â
Minimum Requirements:
<u>
Reviewing and auditing HTML webpages, PDFs, Microsoft WordÂ, VisioÂ,
ExcelÂ, and PowerPointÂ documents for compliance with Section 508 of the
Developing operational requirements, guidelines, and recommendations to
ensure IRM organizational output is compliant with Section 508 requirements.
Proficiency with Microsoft Suite (Outlook, Excel, Word, Power Point, and
Visio) andAdobe AcrobatÂ.
Experience testing electronic documents, webpages and software for
Section 508, TAC 206 & 213 and WCAG 2.0 compliance.
Experience communicating prioritized list of compliance issues and
potential compliance risks as well as clear mitigation strategies to management.
Experience providing advice to authors, content developers, and staff on
how to ensure output remains compliant
Degree B.A.
or B.S.
or higher in computer science, information
technology, management information systems or related field.
Equivalent
yearsâ experience specifically in an accessibility role can substitute for
college degree.
</ul>
Preferences:
Â Knowledge of various programming languages and frameworks including
HTML, CSS, JavaScript, Angular, JQuery, SQL, and Web Services
Â Quality Management, Continuous Improvement, Manager of Quality or
Organizational Excellence certifications are desirable.
Â Publication experience in the realm of accessibility (i.e.
A published
author in the field)
Â
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'jqueri', 'angular', 'javascript']","['risk', 'recommend']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sql', 'jqueri', 'angular', 'javascript', 'risk', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Title
Business Analyst (WCM, Adobe AEM)
Austin, Texas
Duration
3 Months
For: Apple
Must Have Skills
Webcontent Management
Business Analyst
Adobe AEM
Business Analyst with knowledge in Webcontent Management, SALESFORCE, QTP, JAVA, HTML, CSS, Oracle.
Should have hands-on experience in AEM.
Should have worked as a Scrum master in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Workflow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram, etc.
Minimum years of experience
5+
Certifications Needed :No
Top 3 responsibilities you would expect the Subcon to shoulder and execute
Daily status updates
Coordination with offshore
Coordination with client
Interview Process (Is face to face required?)
NoBusiness Analyst with knowledge in Webcontent Management, SALESFORCE, QTP, JAVA, HTML, CSS, Oracle.
Should have handson experience in AEM.Should have worked as a SCRUm master in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Work flow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram etc.
This section has been enriched.
Please review and make any edits prior to saving the request template.
Skills:
Category
Name
Required
Experience
No items to display.
Regards,
Rocky Singh Staffing Head
Direct Line: 609-357-9412 / 609-357-9406 Ext: 107 | Email: Rocky@itbtalent.com
www.itbrainiac.com
Princeton Forrestal Village, 116 Village Blvd, Suite 200, Princeton, NJ 08540, USA.
Do reply back with REMOVE on top of this email if you don't want to receive emails from my side
","['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java']","['data', 'busi']",2.0,"['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Title Business Analyst with AEM
Vendor Rate 65.00
Contract duration 3
Target Start Date 08 Jul 2020
Does this position require Visa independent candidates only?
No
Must Have Skills
Strong Business Analyst
Creating BRD
AEM
QTP
This is a Business Analyst position
Looking for candidates with strong BA experience with AEM skills.
Business Analyst will be working with an existing team to document existing content authoring process for future migration to a new system.
Sound knowledge in Webcontent Management, SALESFORCE, QTP, JAVA, HTML, CSS, Oracle.
Should have handson experience in AEM.
Should have worked as a SCRUm master as well in earlier projects.
Should have working experience of Work flow diagrams, data modelling, process flow diagram etc.
Minimum years of experience 5+
Certifications Needed :No
Top 3 responsibilities you would expect the Subcon to shoulder and execute
Managing accounts, leads, opportunities, workflows, reports
Should work closely with clients and other stakeholders
Should manage different teams across locations
","['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java']","['busi', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['oracl', 'salesforc', 'java', 'busi', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Job Information
Industry Administration Work Experience 1-3 years City Austin State/Province Texas Zip/Postal Code 73344
Business Analyst : Reports to the Assistant VP of Underwriting and will work under the Business Analyst Lead.You will be involved with projects in both underwriting and IT Contract Length: Minimum 8 months 18 months......
https://innovasourcing.com/cfgu
View similar jobs
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"Overview
Position: Business Analyst
Duration: 650 Hours
Interview: Face to Face
Only W2
The project involves converting Oracle Reports to Tableau dashboard reports; and developing best practices to advance data quality and data analytics with uniformly governed data requirements.
The workers will coordinate efforts with the DDS Director, other users, and developers to identify and map requirements for to capture and report data in a meaningful way for users and decision makers.
The Workers will assist with design requirements relating to the visibility, accessibility, and usability of the data.
The Workers will be involved with subject-matter experts in the DDS division and DFPS, technical teams in data gathering information, and testing and documenting test cases.
The Workers will also participate in identifying and documenting business processes.
The Workers must have demonstrated experience with Tableau including writing test cases and test plans and test reports.
II.
WORKER SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Minimum Requirements:
Years
Skills/Experience
7
Strong communication skills including written and verbal including reports, business requirements, presentations, and meeting facilitation.
5
Experience as Business Analyst on Technical Projects with expertise in large systems from which copious amounts of data are used for decision making.
5
Experience developing and documenting business process requirements and design.
5
Strong interpersonal skills for working with both technical and non-technical groups to complete project tasks in a timely manner.
4
Experience working with SQL.
4
Experience working with Tableau or any other business intelligence products.
4
Experience with SharePoint workflows and design
4
Experience with usability requirements for new technical tools, data, and reports.
Preferences:
Years
Skills/Experience
5
Experience facilitating productive meetings to formulate business requirements and communicate stakeholder needs to technical staff.
5
Experience with software development lifecycle with full Agile methodology practice.
5
Experience working on large-scale Enterprise conversion.
Certification
Tableau Certification
","['tableau', 'oracl', 'sql']","['dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",999.0,"['tableau', 'oracl', 'sql', 'dashboard', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"ONLY USC/GC/EAD GC/TN/H4EAD/H1B
NOTE: LinkedIn, PP Must for H1B, GC EAD, TN, H4EAD
Position: Sr Business Analyst
Duration: 6 Months +
Duties:
Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design & Development
Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals)
Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences
Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness; make corrections/updates as needed
Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management
Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences
Years Required/Preferred Experience
7 Required Expertise in Written and oral communications
7 Required Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements
7 Required Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 Required Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst
5 Required Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution
4 Required Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4 Required Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Purpose Texas Health and Human Services Commission requires the services of 1 Business Analyst 3, hereafter referred to as Candidate(s), who meets the general qualifications of Business Analyst 3 Category, Core Technology Type and the specifications outlined in this document for the Texas Health and Human Services Commission.
All work products resulting from the project shall be considered ""works made for hire"" and are the property of the Texas Health and Human Services Commission may include pre-selection requirements that potential Vendors (and their Candidates) submit to and satisfy criminal background checks as authorized by the Texas law.
Texas Health and Human Services Commission will pay no fees for interviews or discussions, which occur during the process of selecting a Candidate(s).
The Health and Human Services Commission (HHSC) Claims Management Division (CMD) is responsible for overseeing the 1915(c) Waivers Migration to the Texas Medicaid Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care On-line Portal projects affecting Medicaid recipient service authorizations, functional assessments and approvals.
This project touches multiple long-term care processing applications including Texas Medicaid and Healthcare Partnership (TMHP) Long Term Care Online Portal , ID CARE, LTC Provider System and the Service Authorization System Online (SASO).
These systems collectively are part of the Texas Medicaid Management Information System (TMMIS).
This Worker will act as a Business Analyst and their role on the project will be as a Product Owner for Community First Choice (CFC) IDD Assessment.
Worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internalexternal stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff, program staff, and TMHP staff.
The services to be provided include, but are not limited to, the following A. Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
B. Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
C. Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
D. Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
E. Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
F. Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
G. Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
H. Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
I.
Other duties as assigned.
Minimum Requirements Experience Years Required Preffered 8 Required Experience identifying project risks and issues and developingimplementing mitigation strategies.
8 Required Experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions 8 Required Experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 Required Experience in effective general writtenoral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 Required Experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 Required Experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 Required Experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 Required Experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 Required Experience coordinating and developing test strategies 5 Required Experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 Required Experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 Required Experience working in a team environment.
3 Preferred Knowledge of Texas Health and Human Services programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Medicaid Long-term Care programs.
2 Preferred Experience with Texas Health and Human Services programs.
PLEASE SEND RESUMES AND SALARY EXPECTATIONS TO careersArnAmy.com mailtocareersArnAmy.com THANK YOU!
","['excel', 'c', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['excel', 'c', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Business Analyst is responsible for coordinating and facilitating process improvement initiatives, new product implementations as well as system upgrades from administrative and other idea source areas.
The ideal Business Analyst candidate has excellent analytical and problem solving skills and the ability to make effective business decisions.
Experience with HealthEdge - Healthrules and CareManager.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.
",['excel'],"['problem solving', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"This worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internal/external stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff and program staff.
Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Skills/Experience: *
8 yrs required experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 yrs required experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 yrs required experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 yrs required experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 yrs required experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 yrs required experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 yrs required experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 yrs required experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 yrs required experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 yrs required experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 yrs required experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 yrs required experience working in a team environment.
Job Types: Full-time, Contract
Pay: $55.00 - $70.00 per hour
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analyst: 8 years (Required)
SDLC: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Austin, TX 78751 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Contract Length:
2 months or less
Full Time Opportunity:
No
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"But please consider not applying.
healthcare customers).
This person will own:
External (aka Customer) reporting oversight and delivery - Meticulously manage project timelines, scope and outcomes.
Conscientious about how data is structured to ensure consistency.
System architecture and scalability - Structure the tables and systems to ensure scalability and streamlined processes.
Lead the team - Improve all processes related to the Reporting Department and team to ensure streamlined communication, action and implementation.
Help your peers and reports build the competencies to innovate.
Innovate - Partner with the senior leadership team to evolve your team and its processes - proactively identify areas of research and focus that help people in need.
Experience: 5+ years working in data analytics or business intelligence position.
Experience developing insights into data.
Understands: (1) SQL, python, other data languages (2) Third-party tools such as Tableau, Periscope, Pentaho, (3) Enterprise ETL processes,
Motivated: Intrinsically motivated, results-oriented, and able to work autonomously to achieve goals.
Curious about solving problems using data.
Puts People Front and Center: Recognize the importance of the people in achieving the mission.
The work to attract, hire, retain, and develop people.
Planning: Prioritizes, uses time efficiently, plans for additional resources and develops realistic and actionable plans.
Problem Solver: Focuses on identifying and leading the team in fixing problems and irregularities in internal processes.
Comfortable navigating ambiguity and adapting on the fly to create clarity from chaos.
Austin Based: Located in, or willingness to relocate to, Austin, TX.
What You Get:
Stock options
401(k)
Short and long-term disability
Life insurance
Commuter benefits
You get to work in Austin.
What you work hard on every day will allow people to find the help they need and lead better lives.
That’s no small thing.
Your résumé
Thank you.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $75,000.00 - $110,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Experience:
business analysis: 4 years (Required)
SQL: 4 years (Required)
people management: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Additional Compensation:
Other forms
","['tableau', 'sql', 'pentaho', 'python']","['data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'pentaho', 'python', 'data', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'etl', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Study product samples and discuss with Design Development Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals) Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed Performing requirements analysis.
Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
Performing user acceptance testing.
Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences Required Skills Expertise in Written and oral communications (7 years) Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements (7 years) Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals (7 years) Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst (5 years) Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution (5 years) Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc.
(4 years) Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing (4 years) Preferred Skills Experience reporting to executive management (5 years) Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements (1 year) Experience managing projects using commercial applications serving as health registries (1 year) Sr. Healthcare Business Analyst -- EIR, Excel, Business Requirements Documentation, UAT, Data Analysis, Public Health Systems Higher Competitive Rates will be considered for consultants with advanced skill set Corp to Corp Resumes are welcome Consultants may need a criminal background check Contact Number (608) 836 9920
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
ZyWxZEz2zJ
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"This worker will have considerable latitude to use their experience and judgment to ensure successful completion of their assigned tasks.
The Worker will be able to multi-task, analyze priorities, communicate clearly, and set expectations for the phases of the project.
The Worker will be responsible for communicating with multiple internal/external stakeholders including executives, contractors, technical staff and program staff.
Analyzes program policies, procedures, and initiatives to determine the impact on business systems and functional areas.
Analyzes and reviews complex project deliverables such as project charters, business user requirements, design documentation, test plans, and risk assessment plans to ensure business requirements are met.
Acts as a Product Owner and liaison between State Staff and Vendors to translate operational and business requirements to vendors.
Reports project statuses to management based on established timelines.
Analyzes and writes User Stories with Acceptance Criteria based on business needs and according to the Agile methodology.
Develops business user test scenarios and participates in systems and user acceptance testing.
Identifies potential project risks and issues and develops mitigation strategies.
Manages schedule for deliverables as established.
Skills/Experience: *
8 yrs required experience identifying project risks and issues; and developing/implementing mitigation strategies.
8 yrs required experience reporting project status to management including risks, issues, and key decisions
8 yrs required experience translating business needs into technical objectives and identifying solutions to satisfy the business need.
8 yrs required experience in effective general written/oral communication, including documenting requirements, deliverables, test scenarios and project status.
8 yrs required experience utilizing business analysis skills and interacting with business end users and technical staff.
8 yrs required experience performing review and approval processes of complex technical user and system requirements written by vendors.
5 yrs required experience with Microsoft Office products (e.g., Word, Excel, etc.).
5 yrs required experience coordinating changes to user and system requirements.
5 yrs required experience coordinating and developing test strategies
5 yrs required experience with Microsoft Project or similar project management software.
3 yrs required experience utilizing the Agile methodology or other form of adaptive software development methodology.
3 yrs required experience working in a team environment.
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $55.00 - $70.00 per hour
Benefits:
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Business Analyst: 8 years (Required)
SDLC: 8 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Austin, TX 78751 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Benefit Conditions:
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['excel', 'microsoft']","['risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'risk', 'analyz', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"An employer in North Austin is looking to hire 1-2 Business Analysts to join their team.
These individuals will be working with external clients on customized software implementations.
Musts: *
Bachelors
Minimum of 4 years of experience working on product /software implementation projects
Experience working with enterprise systems and being part of the implementation process
Experience gathering requirements, documentation management, helping customize software and delivering
Experience working with external clients
Ability to travel 10% of the time (2-4 days at a time) _no travel until post COVID/ 2021_
Plusses: *
Experience working with state or government clients OR public sector
Working with offshore technical teams or clients
Certification in business analysis (CBAP or CCBA) is a plus
Experience previously working at other enterprise software companies (Oracle, SAP, Workday, Autodesk, ESRI, Bentley Systems, Ecosys, or e-Builder.
e-Builder is their direct competitor.)
Background in infrastructure management or capital project planning is a plus
Responsibilities: *
Drive business requirement workshops with customers and document business processes
Develop solutions to solve customer problems
Work with customers and internal teams to develop and document system designs
Create detailed functional specification and obtain sign off from customers
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $90,000.00 - $105,000.00 per year
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business analysis: 4 years (Required)
external customer: 1 year (Required)
software implementation: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
",['oracl'],['busi'],1.0,"['oracl', 'busi']"
BA,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Summary:
This team works virtually by staying in touch via Skype and have working meetings as needed.
Day to Day:
Data analysis of daily CSSE work documented in CSSE engagement tool
Creating weekly/monthly PPT presentations for executive meetings
There will be regular meetings, several times a week in working sessions to outline the work to be completed
REQUIREMENTS:
Daily work in MS Outlook and Word with Advanced skills in PPT and Excel to update documents
Strong business intelligence skills
Advanced Power BI and Tableau experience
Knowledge of data automation and intelligent DB functionality
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
","['power bi', 'excel', 'bi', 'tableau', 'db']","['data', 'busi']",999.0,"['powerbi', 'excel', 'tableau', 'db', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Sign In|New User
Position Information
If you want to build an exciting career, let’s talk!
Open Until Filled
Standards/Conditions of Employment Link
http://ftp.dot.state.tx.us/pub/txdot-info/hrd/careers/standard-conditions.pdf
Job Details
Salary Plan/Grade:
B-22
Job ID
117582
Job Title
Transportation Program Division Business Analyst II
$51614.00 – $84479.00 yearly
AUSTIN
Full/Part Time
Full-Time
Regular/Temporary
Regular
Overnight Travel
Up to 25% of the time
Military Occup Specialty Code
State Classification Code: 0222
State Classification Title: Business Analyst II
Occupational Category: Information Technology
To assist in determining whether your military experience may pertain to the minimum requirements for this position, Military Occupational Specialty (MOS) codes from each branch of the U.S. Armed Forces have been assigned to each state classification code/title where applicable.
The MOS codes are grouped by occupational category.
To view the MOS codes please click on link below and click on the appropriate occupational category.
http://www.hr.sao.state.tx.us/Compensation/JobDescriptions.aspx
Oversees, and executes analysis and delivery of highly complex reporting in support of agency and executive information needs as a staff member of the Transportation Programs Operations and Reporting Section in the Transportation Programs Division.
Work is related to the development, enhancement and/or maintenance of agency-wide transportation programs and contract management.
Work includes data extraction, analysis, and transformation of raw enterprise data, utilizing a variety of business intelligence and/or reporting applications, including the enterprise reporting application (Tableau), Jasper Reporting, and other applications requiring knowledge of SQL.
Facilitates, defines and develops reporting for information needs of Department executives in transportation and non-transportation related areas.
Facilitates the capture and implementation of metric definition data requirements, and reporting requirements.
Work requires contact with business specialist, information providers, project managers, and departmental executives.
Duties
The essential duties for this job include:
Facilitates capture and implementation of functional business requirements; assists in transformation of functional requirements into system requirements.
Develops and implements various reports to address areas of concern and improve business operations
Plans and coordinates activities associated with the delivery of highly complex business and information analyses, information repositories and Information Technology based applications.
Analyzes business value of proposed reporting enhancements and makes recommendations to project/program manager.
Analyzes multi-dimensional models, relational databases and Information Technology based applications for timely, accurate, relevant and intuitive information delivery.
Analyzes needs and constructs and implements decision-support based applications.
Provides training to other staff member on the use of systems, generating reports, and using the reports to improve their efficiency
Prepares and makes presentations.
Performs other job responsibilities as assigned.
Competencies
The required competencies for this job include:
Methods, Processes, applications used in the analysis and creation of reports and dashboards.
Determining business needs.
Analyzing issues, facts and available information to develop logical solutions; researching inconsistencies of facts or data; drawing correct inferences from information and making recommendations that support business decisions.
Analyzing complex business, technical and managerial problems and developing, recommending and implementing effective solutions.
Analyzing and organizing business and technical data.
Maintaining effective working relationships with others.
Meeting deadlines.
Must have experience developing reports in applications such as Jasper Reporting, Crystal Reports, or SSRS
Ability to communicate effectively.
Shows integrity and ethical behavior; respects confidentiality, business ethics and organizational standards.
Education
This job requires the following:
Bachelor's Degree in Business Admin, Computer Science, Manage Info Systems, or related discipline
Work Experience
This job requires the following:
5 years in business-related analysis, technical system analysis and design, project management and/or support
Experience can be satisfied by fulltime or prorated part-time equivalent
No supervisory experience required.
Related graduate level education may be substituted for experience on a year per year basis.
Licenses and Certifications
The following Licenses and/or Certifications are required for this job:
None
Other Conditions:
None
Conditions of Employment
Conditions for this Position: Standards of Employment
Remarks
You must complete the online State of Texas application to include work experience, education and all information necessary.
Your online application and additional information on your resume, if provided, will be reviewed to determine if you meet minimum requirements for the position.
Applicant Information
The Texas Department of Transportation is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, and does not tolerate discrimination in the workplace.
Applicant Information
Job postings expire at 11:59 PM Central Standard Time.
","['tableau', 'sql', 'ssr']","['classif', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'ssr', 'classif', 'dashboard', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'recommend', 'information technology']"
BA,"User Acceptance testing experience in a UAT environment.
Business Analyst experience.
Knowledge of Agile and Scrum testing.
Excellent knowledge of Agile & Scrum Testing.
Successful candidate must possess superior oral and written communications skills in order to clearly and effectively convey issues, reports, and other deliverables.
Skills needed:
Agile
Business Analysis
UAT experience
Experience with Jira
Experience with GIT
","['excel', 'git', 'jira']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'git', 'jira', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"This role is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics Work Hours: 2:00 p.m. - 10:30 p.m. Monday - Friday Onsite in Austin, TX This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans Primary Responsibilities A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
* Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Other duties as assigned Basic Qualifications * Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
8 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
Excellent organization and analytical skills.
Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
Must have experience with at least one of these tools: Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports Preferred Qualifications * Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com .
Pay and Benefits Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here .
Commitment to Diversity All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"This role is responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
The qualified candidate must have extensive IT experience in the analysis, design, and evaluation of information systems utilizing commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS) and development software.
Must be well versed in understanding structured analysis and design methodologies for the translation of systems requirements from business needs with a proven track record.
Must be able to evaluate cost factors and risk.
Qualified candidate will have experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics Work Hours: Overnight 10:00 p.m. - 6:30 a.m. Sunday - Thursday Position is Onsite in Austin This is an exciting opportunity to use your experience helping the IOSS mission.
The mission of the Department of Veterans Affairs (VA), Office of Information & Technology (OI&T), Information Technology (IT) Operations and Services (ITOPS), Infrastructure Operations (IO) is to support One VA world-class service to Veterans and their families by delivering results-oriented, secure, highly available, and cost-effective information technology services.
IO support helps to provide critical services focusing on consistent availability of Veteran-facing applications and quick delivery of benefits for Veterans Primary Responsibilities A Senior Business Analyst has experience in the effective use of data provided by cost estimators to create overall cost versus benefit assessment.
* Experience with at least one monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Candidate will be responsible for considering functional benefits, technical performance, risks, and schedule concerns.
Responsible for the execution of team monitoring, proactive engagement, problem identification, analysis, reporting, coordination, tracking, and resolution.
Understands problems in business context to identify critical transactions that may be at risk, prioritize problem resolution efforts, dispatch the right resources, and fix problems affecting key functionality or end users.
Reviews and updates business-specific dashboard views, providing a tailored display of scheduled events, incident tracking, and metrics.
Ensure forthright communication and coordination of high-priority monitoring requirements with business and OIT leadership; acts as central point of contact for business engagements.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Supports SLA monitoring and engagement activities.
Participates in Project Management activities/meetings as related to business-centric releases and developments
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Required technical experience with at least one of the monitoring tools, ticket management systems; Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Other duties as assigned Basic Qualifications * Bachelor Degree and 5 years of experience.
13 years of additional experience in lieu of Degree
Federal Government requirement.
Ability to work in a matrix team environment, actively and effectively managing relationships with customers, build and release managers, technical teams, product development, project managers, and other application managers.
Experience leading information technology projects involving innovation and/or modernization.
Experience developing and reporting upon metrics relative to operational and financial performance.
Excellent organization and analytical skills.
Exceptional ability to communicate with leadership, staff and customers
Manage shift operations and engagement across all lines of effort for the assigned shift.
Must have experience with at least ONE : Service Now, Introscope, Splunk, AppDynamics, and application monitoring toolsets.
Ensures team cohesion, cross-functional coordination, and collaboration across shift structure (turnover) and enterprise partners.
Ensures responsiveness to staff and customer initiatives and requirements.
Responsible for the maintenance and development of performance data collection and reporting (dashboards).
Provides liaison to OIT enterprise leadership, business customers and end users
Compiles disseminates daily shift turnover/pass-down reports Preferred Qualifications * Desired experience with Solar Winds, XpoLog, and Aternity.
For more information, visit www.Leidos.com .
Pay and Benefits Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision.
Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement.
More details are available here .
Commitment to Diversity All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law.
","['excel', 'splunk']","['risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'splunk', 'risk', 'dashboard', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Job Purpose Texas Health and Human Services Commission requires the services of 1 Business Analyst 2, hereafter referred to as Candidate(s), who meets the general qualifications of Business Analyst 2 Category, Emerging Technology Type and the specifications outlined in this document for the Texas Health and Human Services Commission All work products resulting from the project shall be considered ""works made for hire"" and are the property of the Texas Health and Human Services Commission may include pre-selection requirements that potential Vendors (and their Candidates) submit to and satisfy criminal background checks as authorized by the Texas law.
Texas Health and Human Services Commission will pay no fees for interviews or discussions, which occur during the process of selecting a Candidate(s).
The purpose of the Pharmacy Branch-Inventory Tracking Electronic Asset Management System (ITEAMS) Replacement project is to replace the existing ITEAMS with an automated solution that is Food and Drug Administration (FDA) compliant and able to integrate with outside systems to trace and track the distribution of Department of State Health Services (DSHS) pharmaceuticals The Business Analyst is someone who analyzes an organization or business and documents its business or processes or systems, assessing the business model or its integration with technology Duties bull Evaluating business processes, anticipating requirements, uncovering areas for improvement, and developing and implementing solutions.
Study product samples and discuss with Design Development bull Leading ongoing reviews of business processes and developing optimization strategies.
Design and develop supporting documentation for products (e.g., user manuals) bull Staying up-to-date on the latest process and IT advancements to automate and modernize systems.
Understand and translate complex information for users of varying backgrounds, experiences bull Conducting meetings and presentations to share ideas and findings.
Periodically review all documentation for timeliness, accuracy, and usefulness make correctionsupdates as needed bull Performing requirements analysis.
bull Develop documentation for a variety of media (print, PowerPoint, video, etc.)
bull Effectively communicating your insights and plans to cross-functional team members and management bull Gathering critical information from meetings with various stakeholders and producing useful reports.
bull Working closely with clients, technicians, and managerial staff.
bull Manage updates and revisions to technical literature.
bull Research, develop and document technical design specifications and test scripts.
bull Performing user acceptance testing.
bull Serving as a liaison between stakeholders and users.
bull Able to write in explanatory and procedural styles for multiple audiences Minimum Requirements Experience Years Required Preffered 7 Required Expertise in Written and oral communications 7 Required Experience communicating with customers to obtain business requirements, documenting those requirements, and tracking and documenting the specifications associated with those requirements 7 Required Relies on limited experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
5 Required Experience in the field of public health as a senior Business Analyst 5 Required Familiar with standard concepts, practices, and procedures within public health organization or a related HIV private sector medical institution 4 Required Experience analyzing raw data using Excel, etc etc.
4 Required Experience following test scripts to participate in User Acceptance Testing.
5 Preferred Experience reporting to executive management.
1 Preferred Understands Electronic Information Resources (EIR) accessibility and security requirements.
PLEASE SEND RESUMES AND SALARY EXPECTATIONS TO careersArnAmy.com mailtocareersArnAmy.com THANK YOU!
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'data', 'optim', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Analyze complex problems, derive options and solutions and present in an understandable manner to stakeholders, developers, testers and users at multiple levels.
Act as a liaison with technology and business unit subject matter experts in support of Transactions Monitoring project.
Solicit information from business and IT SMEs about application functions, data and process flows.
Document application functions, data and process flows using prescribed template, or appropriate fit-for-purpose format
Participate in integration design process and provide detailed documentation and requirements as appropriate.
Document reports required by system stakeholders.
Oversees the acquisition, analysis, strategy and dissemination of subject matter knowledge.
Conducts high level business analysis involving complex business requirements and processes.
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
sErSX0rrnV
",[None],"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']",2.0,"['data', 'analyz', 'busi']"
BA,"• 5 yrs relevant experience in:- Experience with Pega RPA or any Robotics Platform or Product
Service Supplier/Vendor management
IT Service Management (ITSM)
ITIL framework
Process mapping
Functional Decomposition of IT O&M functions
• Experience with Agile delivery programs
• Must be able to work quickly with a high degree of accuracy with cross-functional teams
• NO SPONSORSHIP OFFERED AT THIS TIME
Education
• SAFe Agile Certification Preferred
Clearance:
• The ability to pass a Moderate Background Investigation (MBI)
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.
Job Requirements:
• Coordinate with the technical development team to ensure complete understanding of functional specifications
",[None],[None],1.0,[]
BA,"New businesses are making their way into the market rapidly and this in turn is increasing the competition.
With growing competition and hunger to be the best in industry, there is a need for consistent performance and perseverance to achieve the success in business.
Business Analyst jobs are for those individuals who can play a major role in making things right for the business.
Responsibilities :
Evaluating output requirements and formats
Construct workflow charts and diagrams; studying system capabilities; writing specifications
Improve systems by studying current practices; designing modifications
Recommend controls by identifying problems; writing improved procedures
Define project requirements by identifying project milestones, phases and elements; forming project team; establishing project budget
Monitor project progress by tracking activity; resolving problems; publishing progress reports; recommending actions
Maintain user confidence and protect operations by keeping information confidential
Required Skills :
Work Well Under Pressure
Communication
Problem Solving
Critical Thinking
Relationship Building
Masters in Computer science/IT
0-3 years of experience
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'recommend', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst - Loan IQ Specialist
Jacksonville
Refer someone
The successful candidate will be a Loan IQ Specialist.
In this position, you will work closely with business stakeholders to understand their functional requirements, product configuration needs and work in collaboration with the systems and IT teams to deliver fit for purpose solutions.
You will support the existing platforms and user base in their day to day use of the platforms.
Your excellent communication and stakeholder relationship management skills will be vital to assist with project specifications and product training.
You will also have a good understanding of key business drivers and expertise in corporate lending.
You will have accounting and financial systems experience, allowing you to seamlessly investigate system accounting and functional issues, whilst working with the relevant partners and vendors to resolve and manage the defects providing a consultative workaround.
You must have experience using Finastra Loan IQ to be suitable for this position.
Commodities and Global Markets provides clients with an integrated, end-to-end offering across global markets including equities, fixed income, foreign exchange and commodities.
",['excel'],"['commun', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst I
Duration: 12 Months
Day to day:
Working with internal business partners to create technical requirement for applications and processes.
Conduct system testing as needed
Things looking for on resume:
Technical project based experience
Exposure to Project management methodologies such as agile
Interaction with technical teams (developers)
Forty hours per week is the expectation in the absence of specified hours.
Attendance and punctuality are essential components of the position; therefore, unexcused absences and tardiness could result in dismissal.
Demonstrates an understanding of customers tactical goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions.
Manages project risk through comprehensive mitigation assessment and planning techniques.
Actively manages the work efforts of multiple functional resources through the project plan.
Establishes basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders including team members, peers, managers, customers, vendors, and other affected departments to coordinate efforts across multiple business units and ensure continuous efficient management of projects; gathers input and feedback.
Analyzes and reports project status and research information; monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content.
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.
Responds to operational issues and RFIs within defined areas of responsibility while progressing on project work.
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.
Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.
4 year degree.
1+ years plus experience in project management, PMP certification a plus
Top 3 Must Have Skillsets Required:
Technical Requirements Expericence
Wealth Managment Operations Experience
Agile
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"You will be the go-to individual for all Web Development project management tasks and goals.
By various testing protocols, you will be expected to identify potential issues and bottlenecks, related to all web and business systems and help resolve them.
Responsibilities:
Organize, prioritize, manage and plan all Web Development Department projects.
Elicit requirements for any web or business system project.
Expedite to ensure deadlines are met in a timely fashion.
Help investigate and pinpoint current customer issues and provide long-term solutions.
Identify web and system issues and report those findings to the Web Development Team for remediation.
Pull accurate reports for office staff and upper management as requested.
Evangelize a ""chess player's"" mentality by exploring and implementing new solutions, tech tools, etc., to create efficient and future-proof solutions based on current business needs.
Provide keen insights for business growth opportunities.
Requirements/Skills:
2+ years of professional office experience
Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal
Ability to debug by using web browser developer tools and console
Microsoft Office Suite
Verse with various Business Intelligence tools and flexible to learn new programs
Mid-level debugging and User Acceptance Testing (UAT)
Conduct market and technical research
A great attitude and willingness to always learn new technical skills!
Extra Consideration:
Mid-level understanding of HTML and CSS
Knowledge of JavaScript
Benefits:
Competitive benefits and pay
Fringe benefits
Flexible office hours
Upbeat team and variety of fun team building activities
","['javascript', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['research', 'commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['javascript', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Jr. Business Analyst
Duration: 1+ year extendable contract
Working with internal business partners to create technical requirement for applications and processes.Conduct system testing as needed
Demonstrates an understanding of customer's tactical goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions
Manages project risk through comprehensive mitigation assessment and planning techniques
Actively manages the work efforts of multiple functional resources through the project plan
Establishes basic scope control procedures
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders including team members, peers, managers, customers, vendors, and other affected departments to coordinate efforts across multiple business units and ensure continuous efficient management of projects; gathers input and feedback
Analyzes and reports project status and research information; monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines
Responds to operational issues and RFI's within defined areas of responsibility while progressing on project work
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans
4 year degree and 3-5 years plus experience in project management preferred
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"POSITION SUMMARY
Business Analyst - Madison, Wisconsin
***This position will sit in Madison, Wisconsin
The business analyst is relied upon during all stages of the solution sales and delivery lifecycle
for their analytical and problem-solving capabilities, as well as extensive technical and domain experience.
They have excellent communication and
These professionals are
expected to be active listeners, innovative thinkers, and creative problem solvers.
project management backgrounds to comprehensively collect and document solution requirements in a fast-paced team enviornment.
They are instrumental
to navigating delivery phases, driving solution quality, and ensuring client adoption and outcomes.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES:
· Closely collaborates with other members of the solution engineering team to own business requirements for customer projects and
proactively manage scope and deliverables to ensure success
· Uses excellent interpersonal, technical and communication skills to lead discovery sessions and interview clients about data systems to gather
provide measurable value and meet or exceed customer expectations.
· Gathers, stores, analyzes, prepares, documents, and summarizes artifacts and solution requirements for data modeling, reports, analytics, and
other components
· Translates business, systems, data and reporting requirements into highly specified technical project requirements including data models,
solution mockups and wireframes, workflows, and other artifacts
· Develops and maintains effective, efficient and reusable checklists and routines (solutioning toolkit) for extracting required and
requested information from clients and systems
· Prepares and communicates customer-facing deliverables including PPTs, analysis workbooks, solution requirement specifications to facilitate
validation and decision making
· Helps conduct validation sessions and facilitate customer decision making related to key requirements
· Identifies and addresses any/all roadblocks, obstacles, and impediments that have an impact on timelines; continuously works with all
· Serves as the voice-of-the-customer during the solution engineering stage and conducts internal testing of solutions while
· Take part in solution activate events and change management to help drive end user adoption
· Works as a key contributor on a collaborative, fast-growing and highly skilled client delivery team
· Operates from both a technical perspective and a business point-of-view and communicates strategies and solutions with both technical and
non-technical team members
· Performs data and software system testing and validation
· Develops training plan for client groups on use of software and
solutions
QUALIFICATIONS:
· Bachelors degree (B.S.)
in technology field plus two to four years related experience, or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
· Knowledgeable in one or more healthcare domains (providers, administrators, population health, payers, revenue cycle, etc) with an interest
in expanding knowledge into any and all domains and other industries
· Experience with IT systems, reporting, and analytics
· Experience with agile software development lifecycles
· Excellent written and oral communication skills.
· Active listener with strong organizational, problem-solving, and analytical skills.
· Ability to manage priorities and workflow.
· Ability to work on complex projects with general direction and minimal guidance.
SKILLS & COMPETENCIES:
DRIVE & ENERGY
· Disciplined with a commitment to delivering results
· Achievement oriented self-starter work approach
· Inspires continuous improvement & breakthrough thinking
LEADERSHIP
· Team player who builds relationships and influences and motivates others
· Excellent interpersonal skills
· Effective at building consensus and gaining agreement
· Performs all aspects of his/her role with integrity
DECISION MAKING
· Displays analytical and conceptual thinking
· Simplifies complex ideas/concepts and effectively translates to others
· Exercises good judgment
· Values process improvement
",['excel'],"['healthcar', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']",1.0,"['excel', 'healthcar', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'commun', 'data modeling']"
BA,"job summary:
Day to day:
Working with internal business partners to create technical requirement for applications and processes.
Conduct system testing as needed
Things looking for on resume:
Technical project based experience
Exposure to Project management methodologies such as agile
Interaction with technical teams (developers)
Forty hours per week is the expectation in the absence of specified hours.
Attendance and punctuality are essential components of the position; therefore, unexcused absences and tardiness could result in dismissal.
Demonstrates an understanding of customers tactical goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions.
Manages project risk through comprehensive mitigation assessment and planning techniques.
Actively manages the work efforts of multiple functional resources through the project plan.
Establishes basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders including team members, peers, managers, customers, vendors, and other affected departments to coordinate efforts across multiple business units and ensure continuous efficient management of projects; gathers input and feedback.
Analyzes and reports project status and research information; monitors project performance to maintain the quality of services, deliverables, and content.
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.
Responds to operational issues and RFIs within defined areas of responsibility while progressing on project work.
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.
Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.
4 year degree.
1+ years plus experience in project management, PMP certification a plus
Top 3 Must Have Skill sets Required:
1.
Technical Requirements Expericence
2.
Wealth Managment Operations Experience
3.
Agile
education: Bachelor's degree
",[None],"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['risk', 'analyz', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Job Summary
Through your creativity and ability to communicate interpersonally with multiple business contributors, you have the opportunity to advance and earn sustainable bonuses.
If you desire to work with people and operate as a facilitator and mediator to align desired outcomes, then this job could be perfect for you.
Job Responsibilities
Create product tests to determine improvements and assess effectiveness prior to public debut and release of new designs.
Maintain an organized database detailing important analytics, timelines, and goals for reference by executives and other staff members.
Transfer and translate information between departments including IT, marketing, and finance to maintain effective communication and facilitate information dissemination.
Execute occasional audits to assess departmental processes and identify potential improvements to advance organizational efficiency.
Research benchmarking data and develop strategic tactics to improve the overall function of the organization and gain the edge on competitors.
Job Skills & Qualifications
Required
Bachelor's degree
At least 2 years of experience in analysis, reporting, and QA/QC
Ability to use Microsoft Office, particularly Excel, to synthesize analytical and statistical data
Ability to communicate effectively
Preferred
Experience with statistical software like SAS and Python
Experience with forecasting and product pricing
","['excel', 'microsoft', 'sa', 'python']","['data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'sa', 'python', 'data', 'financ', 'research', 'busi', 'forecast', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The analyst will also liaise with business leaders and frontline staff to understand, document and prioritize business requirements across affected business areas.
Success will be measured by your ability to develop complete and accurate business models including process, data and organization changes.
Responsibilities:
Working directly with customers to collect and evaluate data using MS Access, Excel, VBA development and SQL querying.
The Analyst will also leverage an existing SQL Server Database and multiple Access databases to enter, update, and mine existing data points.
The Analyst must be able to develop using Visual Basic for Application (VBA).
Develop project initiation documents defining high-level scope.
Develop business requirements document describing the project's objectives and listing the requirements for each business area prioritized into mandatory, desirable and optional categories.
Requirements will have an associated business case which will allow the project leaders to make informed decisions about delivery of the project.
Create business cases defining the costs and benefits associated with requested changes.
Create user Acceptance test plans.
Deliver weekly reports for the project manager showing progress against outstanding milestones, status, resource requirements, issues, risks and dependencies.
","['excel', 'vba', 'sql']","['risk', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']",999.0,"['excel', 'vba', 'sql', 'risk', 'busi', 'data', 'visual']"
BA,"Working as a consultant you will be connected to work that matters, putting your expertise to its best use while developing skills for the future.
Most consultants work in a model where they have the flexibility and autonomy to choose projects aligning to their experience, skills and desired lifestyle.
Other opportunities exist in team-based, strategy and solutions work.
PURPOSE OF THE ROLE
This requires special attention to increasing both the profitability and the stability of the business.
You will combine your systems knowledge with your functional experience in accounting, information management, human capital, internal audit, and supply chain to help Clients ensure project success.
Respect for people and opinions and confidently offer your point-of-view with clients and among colleagues
A drive for proactively cultivating relationships with clients and colleagues
Optimism when faced with challenges and complex situations, coupled with the drive to solve client issues
Dedication to continuous improvement and development of your skillset and talents
A strong personal identification with RGPs values loyalty, integrity, focus, enthusiasm, accountability and talent
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ROLE
Lead business stakeholder engagement meetings, striving to understand the Clients processes and building trust among business groups
Define and document business requirements and functional specifications from business users and subject matter experts
Understand as-is business processes to effectively identify and document the to-be requirements
Identify root cause(s) of an issue to help determine the optimal solution(s)
Write test plans and/or perform User Acceptance Testing (UAT) and functional testing of new solutions
Perform business needs analysis and design workflows, including as is and to be process mapping
Collect timely feedback from stakeholder groups and ensure terms of requirements and specifications are being met through the solutions being built
DESIRED EXPERIENCE AND REQUIREMENTS
BA or BS in Business, Accounting or related field required; MBA preferred
A minimum of 5 years of Business Analyst experience
Exceptional communication skills and professionalism
Strong analytical skills and problem-solving ability
Experience in technical writing (business cases, project charters, etc.)
Experience in business process improvement efforts
Experience with SQL, Tableau, or related systems is a plus
Strong business acumen
Equal Opportunity Employer
","['tableau', 'sql']","['optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['tableau', 'sql', 'optim', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"The IT Business Analyst serves as a liaison for IT and assigned business areas and provides consultative guidance to achieve business objectives by serving as a resource in the analysis of business and user needs and the application of technology solutions, to help define and achieve objectives, identify risk and implement technology solutions.
Analyzes and documents business and user needs and ensures technical requirements and project plans are in alignment with business needs.
Defines technology and business process scope and objectives as well as detailed business requirements and works with IT partners to translate into technical systems requirements.
Is accountable for researching the use and implications of technology solutions for assigned client areas and formulating recommendations for systems users to enable continuous improvement.
The IT Business Analyst utilizes strong knowledge of assigned business area(s) operations and the IT systems/applications used.
Prepares written project deliverables and requirements documents.
Essential functions:
• Documents business requirements that capture business needs and process scenarios.
Researches, documents and clarifies process and workflow questions.
• Works with IT partners to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Accountable for ensuring business requirements are reviewed, addressed and accurate in deliverables before release.
Accountable for understanding and communicating accurate business requirements to IT partners and ensuring technical specifications accurately reflect business needs.
• Manages and documents all changes to business requirements throughout a project or initiative.
• Facilitates communication between the IT organization and assigned business area(s) including educating IT on the direction of the business.
• Identifies opportunities for application enhancement for future upgrades.
• Coordinates produce and distribute business documents such as reports, system and process documentation.
• Actively participates in project meetings.
Leads requirements gathering sessions.
• Facilitates evaluation of delivered technology solution to ensure it satisfies the business needs.
Accountable for triaging issues, identifying the root cause of systemic issues and ensuring a fix is identified and implemented.
• Builds internal partnerships to improve communication, coordination, collaboration and effective working relationships.
Ensures client needs and expectations are met.
• Provides guidance to assigned client areas to facilitate understanding of use and implications of technology solutions, formulates recommendations for systems users to enable continuous improvement.
• Writes or assists with writing test conditions, scripts, and/or scenarios.
Participates in testing.
• Identifies risks, evaluates controls and prepares findings and recommendations.
• Participates in monitoring and evaluating the effectiveness of technology solutions, policies, practices and processes and establishing metrics for released applications.
• Prepares and executes rollout or maintenance plans for supporting products (e.g.
applications, reports, databases, tools) once they go live to the end-user.
• May mentor and coach less experienced IT Business Analysts
Job Duties:
• Experience in applying research methodology to business solutions.
• Knowledge of systems development concepts and methods
• Experience with business requirements and business process analysis to ensure IT solutions meet the business needs Experience with MS Suite products including Word, Excel and PowerPoint
• Experience managing multiple priorities.
• Experience with MS Suite products including Word, Excel and PowerPoint
• Industry knowledge in related business area
• Solid understanding of the Project Management methodologies and SDLC
• Ability to communicate technical information clearly and articulately
• Ability to adapt to a rapidly changing environment
• Ability to manage tasks independently and take ownership of responsibilities
• High critical thinking skills and the ability to evaluate alternatives and present solutions that are consistent with business objectives and strategy.
Required Experience:
3-5 years of professional experience in an IT Analyst field
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Profile Summary
CAI is hiring!...
Duties & Responsibilities
Gathering, documenting and tracking business requirements;
Assisting with development and review of system design;
Identifying, tracking and documenting action items;
Assistance and management in the development of use and test cases;
Providing oversight for test cases and monitoring and reviewing of test results;
Monitoring and reporting on testing activities in all project phases;
Facilitate and document project meetings, as needed;
Identify, manage and trace requirements by type throughout the entire project life cycle;
Manage scope, define assumptions, constraints and dependencies for the design and testing of the requirements;
Prepare, review and monitor compliance of all projects;
Prepare, execute, monitor and report on testing activities/status in each testing phase;
Validate post implementation with Requirements Traceability Matrix (RTM) and manage defect identification, tracking and resolution;
Assist in the preparation of training materials
Identify and communicate potential project risks and issues for Department review;
Prepare and post updated documentation; and
Other duties as outlined in the RFP or as necessary to meet the goals and objectives established in this RFP.
Qualifications
Experience/Education Required
Minimum of six (6) years of experience in HHS IT systems procurement planning, implementations and certification
Physical Demands
Ability to safely and successfully perform the essential job functions consistent with the ADA and other federal, state and local standards
Sedentary work that involves sitting or remaining stationary most of the time with occasional need to move around the office to attend meetings, etc.
If you have questions, or would like to speak with a Recruiter directly, send an email to the contact person below and note the job identification number in the subject line.
Recruiter First and Last Name
Recruiter Title
Recruiter Phone #
Recruiter Email
www.cai.io
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"Business Analyst The Business Analyst will gather requirements, implement systems and system changes, and support a transportation management system.
The main responsibilities of this role will be to gather and document technical and non-technical requirements from business members at all level.
The BA will also track and report progress of tasks and projects assigned, perform system configurations, document and conduct Unit testing and support QA and UAT testing.
Requirements Prior experience as a Business Analyst or Business Systems Analyst, preferably within the logistics and transportation industry Strong in business requirements gathering and documentation creation Experience conducting and documenting unit testing ad supporting UAT sessions Prior experience performing Transportation Management System (TMS) upgrades, configurations and customizations including planning and scheduling, implementation testing and coordination preferred SQL background preferred
",['sql'],"['logist', 'busi']",1.0,"['sql', 'logist', 'busi']"
BA,"BUSINESS ANALYST
Opportunity will be one year with a strong chance for a long-term extension.
Primary Responsibilities/Accountabilities:
Forty hours per week is the expectation in the absence of specified hours.
Attendance and punctuality are essential components of the position; therefore, unexcused absences and tardiness could result in dismissal.
Demonstrates an understanding of customers tactical goals and effectively participates in the development and implementation of business solutions.
Manages project risk through comprehensive mitigation assessment and planning techniques.
Actively manages the work efforts of multiple functional resources through the project plan.
Establishes basic scope control procedures.
Develops documentation; monitors and reports project status; assesses the effectiveness and accuracy of documentation.
Initiates and maintains reporting relationships with project stakeholders including team members, peers, managers, customers, vendors, and other affected departments to coordinate efforts across multiple business units and ensure continuous efficient management of projects; gathers input and feedback.
Effectively assists in directing both internal and external resources to achieve business solutions within project guidelines.
Responds to operational issues and RFIs within defined areas of responsibility while progressing on project work.
Collaborates and communicates with other project managers and leaders to coordinate cross-project initiatives and activities.
Identify and eliminate obstacles to solution plans, business goals or implementation.
Working with internal business partners to create technical requirement for applications and processes.
Conduct system testing as needed
Qualifications:
Assists in the development and implementation of contingency plans.
4 year degree.
1+ years plus experience in project management, PMP certification a plus
Technical Requirements Expericence
Wealth Managment Operations Experience
Agile
Preferred:
Technical project based experience
Exposure to Project management methodologies such as agile
Interaction with technical teams (developers)
Let's talk!
",[None],"['risk', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']",1.0,"['risk', 'commun', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Health Business Analyst – Care Analytics
The Health Business Analyst within the Commercial Care Analytics team will assist in a diverse range of analytical projects with a focus on targeting, investigating and quantifying cost and utilization drivers using claims, authorization and case management data.
The ideal candidate will have strong technical skills, with a combination of clinically-driven data analytical experience (e.g., knowledge of prevalent conditions in the population, experience with CPT/ICD codes, understands drivers of medical expense, etc.
), great communication skills and a natural curiosity to understand health insurance informatics.
The Skills You Bring:
Analyze claims, authorization and care management program data to identify areas of opportunity and provide analyses and conclusions in support of Care business stakeholders.
Assist in the evaluation of Case, Disease and Utilization Management program ROI and cost savings using analytical methods and techniques.
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to clinical conditions, member utilization of medical services and care management program outcomes.
Produce basic spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (e.g., Excel, PowerPoint, Tableau).
Translate business intelligence requirements into performant data models, data visualizations, and/or automated dashboard reporting
Modify existing programs and write basic SAS, SQL or R programs for data extraction.
Proactively seeks training and builds knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources.
Develop, build, and maintain data processes in support of ongoing opportunity analysis and condition analytics for integrated medical management
Required:
2 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics
Strong knowledge and experience with SQL and query optimization
Familiarity with statistical programming languages such as R, Python, or SAS
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree Business Analytics, Statistics, Data Science, Health Economics or similar program
Master’s degree in a related field
Working knowledge of clinical conditions, procedure codes (CPT-4, HCPCs) and diagnosis codes (ICD-10)
Experience evaluating ROI and financial impact of care and disease management programs
Experience creating automated data solutions
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'sa']","['data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'python', 'sa', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'optim', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Minimum requirement
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
(Must have)
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC Methodlogies.
Creating artifacts.
Powered by JazzHR
34OhWlemM4
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Ref ID: 01120-9502597289Classification: Business Analyst
Compensation: DOE
Responsibilities include:
•Performing complex business and systems analysis in very diverse systems.
•Ability to navigate large organizations effectively and work with others in other locations effectively
• Coordinates the analysis of change requests and sets meetings to determine the business requirements
• Tests changes against new business requirements and a regression suite.
• Participates in the testing, debugging and implementation of changes
• Develops and maintains documentation regarding data flows and controls
• Communicates with other departments and various levels of management
• Some travel may be involved
Job Requirements:
• 5-7 years of business system analyst experience required • Proper and Casualty insurance industry experience is preferred • Strong testing and production support background is needed • Knowledge of forms authoring tools is a plus • Extra-ordinary attention to detail with a focus on high quality is required.
• Must have strong written and verbal communication skills to interact with vendors, senior business partners, business support and other IT associates.
• Must possess the intangibles needed to be a leader no matter the setting (project teams, remote teams, local teams, etc.).
•Must be proficient with business analysis - including creation of workflows, documenting of use cases and business requirements documentation, test cases and data analysis.
•Requires strong design experience including functional requirements documentation, test cases, requirements coverage •Technical Skills proficiency with ALM and SQL a plus.
Ability to triage issues that involve reading use of XML.
• Education equivalent to a college degree in an information technology related or business administration related discipline, supplemented by insurance or computer-related courses/knowledge, or the equivalent in related work experience.
If you are interested in this position, email your resume to neil.savage@rht.com This position is NOT C2C eligible.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.
",['sql'],"['regress', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['sql', 'regress', 'data', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Advanced and experienced professional in the systems process design, middle management of implementationexecution of programs and scaled Insurance environments space and have experience on Insurance policy writing and backend(Statistical and AccountingBilling) software implementation projects.
The Senior Business Systems Analyst will solicit, understand, and document the customer's business requirements, processes and workflows developing both written and visual depictions of requirements and process flows.
You will also work with developers to create the functional specifications that meet those requirements, serve as a subject matter expert to the developers building those functions, and work with the QA team to test the developed functionality.
This role works closely with other BAs, SMEs Developers, Testers, and Production Support through each stage of the software development lifecycle and also demonstrates both existing and new functionality to the customer stakeholders.
This job requires an experienced analyst who can partner effectively with all levels of the organization, lead others, drive results, proactively identify and resolve problems, and make challenging decisions.
As an experienced analyst, you will be responsible for recommending and instituting business analysis best practice, tools and methodology towards standardization of BA deliverables and procedures, and collaborating with Development and QA Leads to uphold and improve Agile processes.
Principal Responsibilities Develop and maintain understanding of customer workflows and business needs to support Deliver precise functional specifications to include functional hierarchy, workflow, business rules, interface design and definitions, outstanding issues, data analysis, and data mapping to clients and development staff.
Be responsible for direct interaction with clients including, but not limited to, eliciting comprehensive business requirements and use cases and recommending appropriate solutions.
Gather requirements and help build and document specifications for development.
Work with Technical team to develop high level labor estimates to develop and deploy functionality Conduct gap analysis between application and stated customer requirements and collaborate with Architects and Developers to estimate project impact.
Work with Development, QA, and Production Support teams to communicate, verify, and test the desired functionality changes.
Work with the clients to demonstrate the changes to the system to ensure all relevant business needs are addressed.
Develop training materials and provide training in one-on-one or classroom environment.
Manage multiple competing priorities through effective organization and communication.
Recommend and institute BA best practice and methodology and tools Perform QA of BA team deliverables Responsible for Vendor(s)Team development, performance goal-setting, management and evaluation reviews Required Skills and Experience 8-10 or more years of experience.
Demonstrated team leadership, Insurance application development, management and performance evaluations and actions Understanding of business analysis principles, processes, and techniques.
Ability to develop and prepare use cases, functional specifications, and technical requirements.
Ability to understand and represent the needs of the end user in a software development environment.
Strong consultative and advisory skills Excellent written and verbal communications.
Strong MS Office skills (Word, Excel, PowerPoint).
Strong MS Visio skills Bachelor's Degree or higher in technology-related field or relevant experience in complex large sale implementations of software in the Insurance Carriers, MGA, MGU these skills are required and must be demonstrated.
Workflow Development, Rules and Business Process Engineering are required
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'end user', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Job Title: Business Analyst- Oracle Financials
Duration: 6+ Months
Roles & Responsibilities:
Maintains a Stakeholder Management Plan for each active Oracle Module assigned as well as develop new Stakeholder Management Plans for new solutions
Performs job impact analyses when new functionality is introduced which feeds into training and communications
Consistently strives to promote and integrate Oracle ""Best Practices” with business owners at all levels
Participates with Business and IT to identify and prioritize Oracle/Business Requirements and the supporting business case.
(Requirements Definition) Capture all functional requirements and define to-be flows.
Oracle EBS Module(s) including iSupplier, Payables, General Ledger, Receivables, Cash Management, Web Applications Desktop (ADI), Procurement, Project Costing, Project Billing, Enterprise Asset Management,
and Grants Management knowledge as a hands-on SME.
Develops user documentation utilizing Oracle AIM documentation templates; keeps it current; including system and user reference and operational manuals and checklists, case studies, and training materials.
Conducts training classes for assigned modules.
Sends out communications to stakeholders when certain functionality changes/or training is required.
Analysis Methodologies.
Strong analytical skills for solving problems of a complex nature.
Proven ability to meet deadlines while simultaneously working multiple projects.
Extensive experience of enterprise-wide project controls, analysis, processes, and metrics.
Previous lead role on Oracle implementation(s) a plus.
Knowledgeable in at least 1-2 methodologies, such as SDLC, RUP, Agile, AIM.
Analyzes Help Desk tickets for trends and actions.
Holds meetings with ticket owners to set priorities and expectations.
Manage medium to large scale, moderately complex to complex analysis projects, under minimal supervision.
Creates, monitors and follows through on Oracle Service Requests, as needed.
Required Qualification:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business or a related field with at least 8+ of hands-on experience in an analysis and development position, which includes client needs analysis, installation, migration, integration and deployment systems.
or combination of post high school education and minimum of 10+ years of hands-on experience as a Payroll Business Analyst, Payroll Manager, Business Consultant, or Business Systems experience in an analysis and development position which includes client needs analysis, installation, migration, integration and deployment systems.
or combination of post high school education, Oracle certification R12, and minimum of 10+ years of hands-on experience as a Payroll Business Analyst.
equired 2+ years of techno-functional experience with Oracle Financial Modules.
Required Skills:
Proactively communicate and collaborate with external and internal customers to analyze information needs and functional requirements to produce a Business Requirements Document.
Determine requirements using interviews, document analysis, requirements workshops, surveys, site visits, business process descriptions, use cases, scenarios, and task and workflow analysis.
Ability to conduct a facilitated session to derive all of the above.
Critically evaluate information gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, decompose high-level information into details, abstract up from low-level information to a general understanding, and distinguish user requests from the underlying true needs.
Work independently with users to define concepts and under direction of project managers, drive and challenge business units on their assumptions of how they will successfully execute their plans.
Primary point of contact in support of the Oracle Financial modules (AP, GL, AR, CM, FA, EAM, GM, Projects, iProcurement and all associated tasks.
Be the SME for functionality and future enhancements.
Strong analytical and product management skills required, including a thorough understanding of how to interpret customer business needs and translate them into application and operational requirements (MD50/BR100).
Excellent verbal and written communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group, executives, managers, and subject matter experts.
Serves as the conduit between the customer community (internal and external customers) and the software development team through which requirements flow.
Be the liaison between the business, technology teams and support teams.
Works with end-users to implement the system, providing technical guidance and training to ensure a smooth transition.
Ability to effectively work with others in a team environment.
Project Management Practitioner.
Ability to create simple to very complex SQL queries to support ad hoc data needs and perform edits to other existing scripts.
OBIEE knowledge of base tables and relationships.
Knowledge of XML reports, API, PL/SQL, OBIEE and other relevant packages.
Must have experience creating use cases, process flows and RICE artifacts.
Previous lead role on Oracle implementation(s) a plus.
Experience working with the HRMS Module
Proven ability to meet deadlines while simultaneously working multiple projects.
Strong skills and experience in reporting, SQL, Oracle OBIEE, Interfacing/SFTP and System Integration experience.
","['excel', 'oracl', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'oracl', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"IT Business AnalystDUTIES:
• Document IT strategic planning through models, diagrams, and presentations using tools such as Excel, Visio, and PowerPoint
• Develop and maintain IT roadmaps utilizing swimlane diagrams, Gantt charts, and similar tools
• Partner with IT and the business to support the documentation and maintenance of IT policies, practices, and procedures
• Engage with IT process owners to understand process steps, draft procedures using MS Visio, MS Word, etc., and drive toward completed documentation that aligns with the IT Governance Risk Compliance (GRC) program
• Engage policy and procedure owners as necessary to ensure deadlines are met, approvals obtained, guidelines followed, and repository / system of record are up-to-date as defined by the IT GRC program
• Coordinate execution of control mechanisms and testing against technical procedures via requests to technical owners
• Ensure controls are being executed timely and accurately, that they are documented in the repository system with required artifacts (SharePoint & Service Now).
• Provide assistance to Internal Audit team, external auditors, and technical owners to ensure timely, quality and compliant results
• Analyze IT process challenges to formulate practical solutions through use of software, analytical tools and techniques, business process knowledge, technical knowledge, and general common sense
• Help promote others to follow and conform to applicable policies, procedures and processes
• Manage and organize IT related meetings, prepare meeting agendas, and record and maintain meeting minutes
• Foster relationships and engage in regular communications with IT, vendors, and corporate customers
• Consistently deliver quality services regarding important issues / priorities and deadline-sensitive information
• Execute and facilitate improvements to resource management including license management, audit support, training, and entitlements
• Support IT financial planning and monitoring processes and activities
• Drive improvements to financial management to most effectively invest financial resources through all aspects of IT including forecasting, purchasing, asset management, service utilization, value realization, etc.
QUALIFICATIONS:
• Bachelor's degree in business, accounting, finance, computer science, information systems, engineering, or a related field strongly preferred; equivalent combination of education and experience may be substituted in lieu of degree
• 3 + years experience in business process analysis, project methodology, or systems development life cycle.
• Experience working in IT
• Experience with formal documentation throughout the SDLC process.
Job Requirements:
","['powerpoint', 'excel']","['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Business Analyst or Accountant with focus on Sales & Use Tax.
Efficiently manage sales use and other excise tax as well as manage exemption certificates for multiple locations in multiple states.
Timely correspondence with state and local tax regulators to resolve variances and other issues.
Other areas of responsibility include
(using software i.e.
Avalara)
Manage compliance data process; pull and retrieve sales and use tax accrual data
Reconciliations of the month-end tax accruals related to sales and use tax
Ensuring maintenance of proper tax records
Prepare monthly, quarterly, annual tax reports, payments, necessary paperwork, and reports.
(or oversee preparation)
Assess and research difficult tax issues to identify solutions.
Identify potential tax saving opportunities.
Ensure you comply with regulations by forwarding required information to state and local authorities.
Offer support and guidance during audits by documentation retrieval to support sales and use tax audit defense.
Keep track of industry trends and changes related to taxes.
Other Finance areas of responsibility include:
Assist with posting cash payments
Assist with Balance Sheet & Bank reconciliations
Assist with Ad hoc projects and analysis
Assist with Monthly Billing
Assist with Collections
Analyst Requirements:
A minimum of 3 years’ tax experience a plus or similar role
Strong computer skills including MS Office (Vertex or Avalara a plus)
Knowledge of accounting with General Ledger and Sales & Use Tax
Strong analytical and project management skills, including the ability to analyze large data sets in Excel
Strong written and oral communication skills, including the ability to present ideas and suggestions clearly and effectively.
","['ms office', 'excel']","['data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['microsoft', 'excel', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Role:
This position is responsible for managing the mobile and online banking systems used by members.
Serves as the project manager for the deployment of upgrades and enhancements.
Leads efforts to test and deploy new services, coordinates system support and delivery to the membership.
Major Duties and Responsibilities:
Serves as the project manager for the deployment of upgrades and enhancements, and leads efforts to test and deploy new services.
Is the Subject Matter Expert with a thorough understanding of how the mobile and online banking platform interacts with all other systems.
Acts as the primary contact and coordinates system support and maintenance.
Manages the vendor relationships, staying informed of the product roadmaps and advising management of new features on a regular basis.
Key application strategist who understands the business application needs.
Stays informed on changing trends in the industry, and advises on new and emerging trends.
Researches, evaluates, and makes recommendations for system changes, enhancements, and implementations of new applications.
Experience:
Three to five years of mobile and online banking platform experience.
Exceptional communication skills required.
Education:
A two-year college degree or completion of a specialized course of study at a business or trade school
",[None],"['recommend', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']",1.0,"['recommend', 'research', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Analyze an organization and design its processes and systems, assessing the business model and its integration with technology.
Assess current state, identify customer requirements, and define the future state and/or business solution.
Research, gather and synthesize information.
Additional Job Details:1 - Business Process Design (P4 - Expert) | 2 - Requirements Analysis (P4 - Expert) | 3 - Account Sales Planning (P3 - Advanced) | 4 - Effective Written Communications (P3 - Advanced) | 5 - Healthcare Delivery (P3 - Advanced) Must have skills?
1.Business Process Tools 2.Business Process Design 3.Requirements Analysis Nice to have skills?
1.Heathcare Delivery 2.Account Sales Planning
",[None],"['analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role: EDI Business Analyst
Duration: Long Term – 2 yrs
Job Code: 0035
The EDI Business Analyst primary function is to serve as a single, consistent point-of-contact for EDI legacy system migration.
This position will work with business users and project stakeholders using the analyst's independent judgment to onboard new users, manage updates to existing interfaces, and solve issues presented.
The analyst also will coordinate with internal team members such as IT management, EDI analysts, software engineers, quality assurance analysts, operations directors and managers, and project managers on EDI issues.
The analyst will act as project manager for some projects including, but not limited to, gathering and documenting business requirements for technical tasks and projects; evaluating business challenges and recommending solutions; interpreting partner system requirements and specifications; analyzing data, layouts, requirements and documentation to determine development needs; supporting the staff's interfaces and applications during the production phase; assisting in preparing documentation and creating task lists; performing data audits to validate information supplied to customers; and running reports as needed.
The EDI Business Analyst will be required to perform administrative tasks in support of the team such as processing and tracking projects, managing system access applications, and handling incoming and outgoing project communications.
Key Responsibilties:
· Gathers, analyzes, and documents business requirements for electronic interface development.
· Manages the flow of questions and feedback during the development, testing, and production phases of software solutions.
· Communicates complex technical procedures effectively; makes data exchange concepts clear, simple, and understandable to both technical and business staff.
· Creates and manages project tasks lists.
· Maintains system protocols by writing and updating procedures.
· Audits data to validate information supplied to and received from customers.
· Prepares client related documentation.
· Prepares technical reports by collecting, analyzing, and summarizing information and trends.
· Works with customers, sales, programmers, and other consultants to implement solutions.
· Provides consultation and support to customers to ensure developed technical specifications meet their requirements.
REQUIREMENTS:
Desired Qualifications:
Education
· Bachelor's degree in Business or an Information Technology field
Experience and Skills
· Minimum three years of experience as an IT business analyst.
· Understand the legacy EDI process and document the business rules and requirements for migration to an Edifecs XEngine based EDI solution.
· Competency in technical requirements documentation and use case writing.
· Professional verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to effectively correspond with both business and technical staff and translate needs accordingly.
· Proficient in Microsoft Office tools.
· Ability to work effectively in a team environment with minimum supervision.
· Skilled in project management methodologies.
· Customer service oriented
· Heavy analytical and problem-solving capabilities
· Strong work ethic
· - Ability to follow complex instructions.
Competencies / Skills
· Analytical Skills - Ability to use thinking and reasoning to solve a problem.
· Communication, Oral - Ability to communicate effectively with others using the spoken word.
· Communication, Written - Ability to communicate in writing clearly and concisely.
· Detail Oriented - Ability to pay attention to the minute details of a project or task.
· Interpersonal - Ability to get along well with a variety of personalities and individuals.
· Judgment - The ability to formulate a sound decision using the available information.
· Problem Solving - Ability to find a solution for or to deal proactively with work-related problems.
· Time Management - Ability to utilize the available time to organize and complete work within given deadlines.
Manages multiple priorities and competing demands
All qualified applicants will be considered for employment without regard to race, color, sex, religion, age, physical or mental disability, veteran status, citizenship status or any other status protected by federal, state or local law.""
",['microsoft'],"['data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'supervis', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Remote work to start until the Jacksonville office re-opens.
Possible extension
As a successful Business Analyst you will need to develop an in-depth knowledge of your business area in order to assess and manage the effect of requested business changes.
You will also liaise with business leaders and frontline staff to understand, document and prioritize business requirements across affected business areas.
Success will be measured by your ability to develop complete and accurate business models including process, data and organization changes.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities: Develop project initiation documents defining high-level scope.
Develop business requirements document describing the project's objectives and listing the requirements for each business area prioritized into mandatory, desirable and optional categories.
Requirements will have an associated business case which will allow the project leaders to make informed decisions about delivery of the project.
Create business cases defining the costs and benefits associated with requested changes.
Create user Acceptance test plans.
Design business models incorporating process and data models.
Deliver weekly reports for the project manager showing progress against outstanding milestones, status, resource requirements, issues, risks and dependencies.
Job Requirements
Essential
College degree and 2 years’ experience as a Business Analyst
Experience with writing user stories
Experience integrating new technologies into a business platform
Experience with integrating new technologies with existing technologies
History in working in an agile environment
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communications skills required
Strong organizational and time management skills with the ability to multi-task
Detail and process oriented
Strong tactical execution abilities
Proficient computer skills, including MS Office suite - specifically Excel and PowerPoint
Demonstrated initiative/confidence with pro-active mindset
Demonstrated ability to prioritize tasks
Job Types: Full-time, Part-time, Contract
Pay: $50.00 - $56.00 per hour
Experience:
Business Analysis: 7 years (Preferred)
sql: 8 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'commun', 'data', 'busi']"
BA,"Job Summary -:
Position Title: Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ Months Contract
Interview Process (Phone + Skype)
Business Analyst
As a successful Business Analyst you will need to develop an in-depth knowledge of your business area in order to assess and manage the effect of requested business changes.
You will also liaise with business leaders and frontline staff to understand, document and prioritize business requirements across affected business areas.
Success will be measured by your ability to develop complete and accurate business models including process, data and organization changes.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Develop project initiation documents defining high-level scope.
Develop business requirements document describing the project's objectives and listing the requirements for each business area prioritized into mandatory, desirable and optional categories.
Requirements will have an associated business case which will allow the project leaders to make informed decisions about delivery of the project.
Create business cases defining the costs and benefits associated with requested changes.
Create user Acceptance test plans.
Design business models incorporating process and data models.
Deliver weekly reports for the project manager showing progress against outstanding milestones, status, resource requirements, issues, risks and dependencies.
Job Requirements
degree and 2 years' experience as a Business Analyst
Experience with writing user stories
Experience integrating new technologies into a business platform
Experience with integrating new technologies with existing technologies
History in working in an agile environment
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communications skills required
Strong organizational and time management skills with the ability to multi-task
Detail and process oriented
Strong tactical execution abilities
Proficient computer skills, including MS Office suite - specifically Excel and PowerPoint
Demonstrated initiative/confidence with pro-active mindset
Demonstrated ability to prioritize tasks
Inception in 2007, privately held, Debt free
375+ In- house Team of Sales, Account Management and Recruitment with coast to coast COE.
Awards & Accolades:
2018 Fastest-Growing Private Companies in America as a 5 times consecutive honoree Inc. 5000
2018 - Spirit of Alliance Award by Agile1
2018 - 40 Under 40 Leadership Awards by Triangle Business Journal
2018 Fastest 50 by NJBIZ
2018 Techserve Excellence Award (IT and Engineering Staffing)
2018 Best of the Best Platinum Award by Agile1
2018 40 Under 40 Award Winner by Staffing Industry Analysts
2018 CEO World Gold Award by SVUS
2017 Best of the Best Gold Award by Agile1
Vivek Ghildiyal
Technical Recruiter
Direct # (415)-868-4733
Board # (201) 340-8700 Ext.
461
Fax: (201) 221-8131
vivekg@net2source.com
425 Market Street Suite # 2200 ,San Francisco, California, 94105
www.net2source.com
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"The Operations Business Analyst supports the line of business by performing complex operational and analytic tasks including reviewing report performance data, performance against established metrics and account information.
Partners with the business to increase focus on drivers of productivity, quality, and efficiency.
Interprets results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to more complex data mining independently.
Analysis focus is on process improvement and in some cases compliance with internal or external audit.
Works directly with business leaders to identify analytical requirements and address report gaps.
Familiar with a variety of mortgaging servicing concepts, practices and procedures.
Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Performs a variety of tasks with limited supervision.+ Delivering Results - Strive to set and understand goals and work to reach short-term goals and support long-term strategy.+ Communication - Share information, concepts and opinions with others that results in clear understanding and desired outcome.
Also, the ability to answer complex inquiries, provide information, consult with customers and manage difficult customer interactions.+ Problem Solving -Identifies business issues which require an analytical solution, utilizes business knowledge to identify the root cause of business issues and to propose solutions .+ Organization and Data Analytics: demonstrating the ability to understand financial concepts and analyze financial data; understanding business principles.+ Technical Knowledge: Performs advanced technical tasks, using tools such as Excel or SAS.
Performs functions to provide performance information to LOB leaders.+ Work with business to define reporting requirements and analysis needs to help drive performance or meet various operational needs.+ Assure the integrity of data through automated extraction, manipulation, processing, analysis, and reporting.+ Identify data process improvements and leverage technology to automate and streamline existing processes.+ Evaluate as-is processes, identify gaps, risks and recommend solutions that clearly add value to customer experience, employee efficiency, costs and cost structure, controls and revenue.
Expresses thoughts and ideas clearly and concisely.+ Independent logical problem solver; analytical ability to synthesize data and project outcomes.+ Maintains the highest standards of honesty, fairness and ethics.
","['excel', 'sa']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'sa', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Health Business Analyst – Risk Adjustment & Quality/HEDIS Analytics
The Health Business Analyst within the Commercial Risk Adjustments and Quality Analytics team will assist in technical and analytical projects with a focus on targeting, investigating, summarizing and evaluating enrollment and claims data in support of ACA risk adjustment and/or HEDIS quality programs.
The ideal candidate will have strong technical skills, with a combination of dataanalytical experience, great communication skills and a natural curiosity tounderstand health insurance concepts.
The Skills You Bring:
Analyze enrollment, medical and pharmacy claims, risk adjustment scoring and/or HEDIS quality measurement criteria to support business operations, prioritization and member or provider outreach campaigns to help ensure accurate capture and closure of risk or quality care gaps
Assist in the evaluation of new or revised regulations in support of ACA Risk Adjustment and HEDIS quality programs, using analytical methods and techniques
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to enrollment, claims, risk score and quality measures and programs
Produce basic spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (e.g., Excel, PowerPoint, Tableau)
Modify existing programs and write basic SAS or SQL programs for data extraction
Proactively seek training and build knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources
Required:
2 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics
Experience writing SQL/SAS code or related code
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Health Economics or similar program
Master’s degree in a related field
Working knowledge of ACA Risk Adjustment program, risk scoring models, EDGE Server submission process or HEDIS quality measures and programs
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"Title: BSA - ITSM
Type: Contract-to-hire (6 month contract)
Details
The BSA will be the lead for a number of key Enterprise projects supporting Kemper.
You will perform analysis and capture detailed requirements for new and existing implementations.
Responsibilities:
Facilitate and ensure execution of IT Service Management (ITSM) processes across the organization
Oversite of production changes and approval to production
Create documentation and implement process to drive Incident Management and other IT Support procedures
Support the team through enablement of ITOps visibility for the NOC, Technical teams, and Leadership
Provide training to teams as needed to support the processes governed by the Service Management Team
Position Qualifications:
Strong process driven mindset and skills required
Demonstrated analytical and problem-solving skills required
Demonstrated communication and collaboration skills required
Demonstrated ability to pull various people together and drive for closure required
Technical aptitude and a thorough knowledge of Microsoft Office required
Excellent organizational and time management skills; Strong attention to detail a must
Project leadership experience is a plus
IT Audit Experience is desired
Familiarity with ITIL a plus
Knowledge of ServiceNow is a plus
","['excel', 'microsoft']",['commun'],999.0,"['excel', 'microsoft', 'commun']"
BA,"For more information, visit globalpaymentsinc.com and follow Global Payments on Twitter (@globalpayments), LinkedIn and Facebook.
Summary of This Role
Responsible for acting as a liaison between stakeholders, and development.
You will ensure you elicit, analyze, design, and communicate requirements for changes to business processes and technology.
What Part Will You Play?
Coordinate cross-functional teams (developers, QA, designers) to develop business requirements and guide product development.
Minimum Qualifications
2-4 years business analysis experience.
Ability and desire to analyze and improve user workflows in mobile and web products (screens, pages, UI elements, overall user experience).
Strong understanding of Business Analysis and requirements documentation.
Working knowledge of Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC).
Experience producing professional quality work products such as process flows, use cases, screen mockups, business requirements and functional/system specifications.
Understanding of project life cycle.
Able to conceptualize and think creatively.
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both written and verbal.
Must possess skill sets and demonstrate proven experience developing, improving and streamlining processes to meet established goals and objectives.
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience in lieu of degree.
Preferred Qualifications
Mobile app product experience.
UI (User Interface) and user experience analysis and design experience
Screen modification and wireframe experience.
Experience with methodology - Agile/Scrum, Waterfall, or RUP (Rational Unified Process).
Working knowledge of UML (Unified Modeling Language)
For more information about your rights, click here.
This includes assistance in completing the job application (online or otherwise) and reasonable accommodations during the hiring process.
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability
",['excel'],"['commun', 'busi', 'analyz']",1.0,"['excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
4P7t6bE0fl
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"Duties:
• Detailed documentation preparation for requirements, use cases, functional, non- functional requirements.
• Creating UML Diagrams.
• User Interface prototypes development.
• Process flow development.
• Conducting JAD sessions.
• Designing UI mockups.
Qualifications:
• Previous experience in business intelligence, analysis, or another related field.
• Strong problem solving and critical thinking skills.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Master's degree in Business Administration, Management Information Systems, or any related business or IT management field of study that provided the required skills and knowledge, and 6 months of related experience in any position that provided the required skills and abilities.
No travel or telecommuting
Employee privileged benefits are offered.
Powered by JazzHR
Sx3l14pc1z
",[None],"['problem solving', 'busi']",2.0,"['problem solving', 'busi']"
BA,"This position requires a self-starter with good communication skills that works well in a dynamic environment.
Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.
",[None],['commun'],999.0,['commun']
BA,"Pay: $35/hour
JOB SUMMARY
Note: The essential functions listed represent the major duties of this role, additional duties may be assigned.
Project Implementation & Management
• Demonstrates an advanced working knowledge of Care Strategies, including internal capabilities and processes and external channels, to effectively execute all aspects of the project management lifecycle and associated implementation processes (e.g.
requirements, testing, operational readiness, and launch).
• Responsible for leading and collaborating with teams across the enterprise, including but not limited to business partners (Actuarial, Legal, Compliance, Service, Pharmacy, Network, Care, Finance, IT, Product Design, Product Management, Marketing, Communications, Sales) to ensure all issues identified in technical design to meet business requirements are resolved to business standards.
• Participates on and/or leads critical or complex initiatives and projects and resolves complex cross-functional issues to effectively achieve business needs within time, quality, cost and compliance requirements with no guidance required.
; Influence and gain acceptance of ideas and suggestions.
• Supports implementation of technical design for new products/programs and capabilities and transitions oversight of those products / processes/ capabilities to operational owners or other applicable internal areas.
• Supports launch activities (e.g.
Go-To-Market; Communications) for new products/programs and capabilities as needed.
• Proactively creates and manages robust, organized and specific project/operational readiness plans, tasks lists, forms lists, etc.
that align to goals and objectives with no assistance.
• Pro-actively engages on short-term as well as long-term planning
• Accountable for the successful execution of testing activities (UAT, pre-implementation testing and post-implementation validation testing), working with IT and cross-functional teams to ensure any issues identified that do not meet business standards are resolved prior to implementation
Enterprise Coordination / Collaboration
• Maintains frequent contact with internal and external business partners to obtain and share information for influencing decisions, selling concepts, and/or providing advice and counsel that impacts business decisions and objectives.
• Demonstrates advanced knowledge of the subject being discussed, understands the format or environment in which the discussion is occurring along with the different styles; is able to effectively listen and modify approach by the verbal and non-verbal cues being given; is effective with writing and presenting in both formal and informal settings.
• Supports the conceptual design of complex tools, systems, processes, programs, etc.
that will directly impact care strategic decisions and objectives by contributing subject matter expertise, developing/maintaining project plans, overseeing meeting management tasks such as scheduling and documentation
Care Business & Technical Acumen
Develops and maintains an advanced knowledge of business unit and organizational designs, provides guidance to management based on subject matter expertise.
• Is able to navigate internal systems to locate departmental procedures (e.g.
SOPs, DTPs) and follow with no guidance.
Assists with the development of new process and procedures and provides recommendations to improve processes.
• Serves as subject matter expert and mentors/coaches less experienced coworkers on the technical and interpersonal skills needed for effective job performance.
• Leads, supports or participates in the execution of training and communications for internal and external audiences.
• Identifies gaps and opportunities to improve processes to support enterprise, organization objectives
Preferred Skills
• Proficient with SDLC project methodologies such as Agile, waterfall etc.
• Experience in the health care Industry
• Advanced communication skills (written and verbal)
Competencies
• Places the customer first
• Builds Collaborative Relationships
• Demonstrates Flexibility and Supports Change
• Takes Initiative
• Drives Results
",[None],"['financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']",999.0,"['financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend']"
BA,"Position Summary
Get in on the ground floor of a startup of cutting edge technologists in the Fintech space who are enabling the future of the financial industry by removing the barriers presented by legacy core financial systems.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities
More specifically, you will be providing implementation support to Banks.
Additionally you will
Have the opportunity to work with clients to understand their current product set in addition to their current processing environment
Consult with clients to configure products and institution options to meet their needs
Work with clients during User Acceptance Testing to identify required modifications
Conduct and document a controlled testing process prior to delivery to the client
Work with Product Management and Development as necessary in the troubleshooting of issues
Test converted data and work with the end user on the verification and acceptance of the data
Collaborate with team members in all areas of implementation project management, product management and development
Interview stakeholders, gather and analyze data, study data and business problems
Work with clients to create testing use cases
Education and Experience Minimum Qualifications
5+ years of Financial/Banking Industry experience is a must
5+ Implementation/BA experience Required
Bachelors degree or commensurate experience
5+ years of hands-on financial industry experience in Information Technology, loan servicing, deposit operations, card processing, interface development, or CRM systems
Ability to execute on time-sensitive project deliverables
Experience analyzing and interpreting data, as well as discussing business and technical topics to capture technical requirements
5-7 years experience working with a project team, understanding process, terminology, and the expectations of project deliverables and timelines
Core Competencies
Ability to coordinate multiple tasks to completion with minimal supervision and under strict deadline
Demonstrated ability to train and/or mentor in technical subject areas
Experience working remotely and at client locations
Familiarity of Core Banking processes and Software
Familiarity with Json data interchange
Must be able to perform analysis of data
Strong communication including oral and presentation skills
Must be willing to work under deadlines and be detail oriented
Prior system conversion experience
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills
Knowledge and experience working with core banking
Ability to multitask and change direction in ever changing environment
Location/Travel
· Remote (telecommute) position within the contiguous United States.
· Travel up to 30%.
Supervisory Responsibility
None.
Work Environment
This job operates in a professional office environment.
This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as laptop computers and smartphones.
Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; climb stairs; balance; stoop, kneel, crouch or crawl; talk or hear; and taste or smell.
The employee must occasionally lift or move up to 20 pounds.
Specific vision abilities required by the job include close vision, distance vision, color vision, peripheral vision, depth perception and the ability to adjust focus.
Position Type/Expected Hours of Work
This is a full-time position.
Days and hours of work may vary but generally Monday through Friday 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.
This position may require long hours and weekend work.
Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veteran
H1B, etc.,) to fill this position.
",['excel'],"['data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']",1.0,"['excel', 'data', 'analyz', 'end user', 'supervis', 'busi', 'commun', 'information technology']"
BA,"Health Business Analyst - Risk Adjustment & Quality/HEDIS Analytics
The Health Business Analyst within the Commercial Risk Adjustments and Quality Analytics team will assist in technical and analytical projects with a focus on targeting, investigating, summarizing and evaluating enrollment and claims data in support of ACA risk adjustment and/or HEDIS quality programs.
The ideal candidate will have strong technical skills, with a combination of dataanalytical experience, great communication skills and a natural curiosity tounderstand health insurance concepts.
The Skills You Bring:
Analyze enrollment, medical and pharmacy claims, risk adjustment scoring and/or HEDIS quality measurement criteria to support business operations, prioritization and member or provider outreach campaigns to help ensure accurate capture and closure of risk or quality care gaps
Assist in the evaluation of new or revised regulations in support of ACA Risk Adjustment and HEDIS quality programs, using analytical methods and techniques
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to enrollment, claims, risk score and quality measures and programs
Produce basic spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (e.g., Excel, PowerPoint, Tableau)
Modify existing programs and write basic SAS or SQL programs for data extraction
Proactively seek training and build knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources
Required:
2+ years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics
Experience writing SQL/SAS code or related code
Preferred:
Bachelor's degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Health Economics or similar program
Master's degree in a related field
Working knowledge of ACA Risk Adjustment program, risk scoring models, EDGE Server submission process or HEDIS quality measures and programs
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The Jr.
The position requires outstanding customer service and communication skills, proven analytical and solutions-driven mindset, ability to collaborate across multiple stakeholder groups, and strong detail-oriented problem-solving skills.
Requirements
Masterâs degree in Computer Science / Information Technology
0 to 2 years of experience as a business analyst
Agile/Waterfall Knowledge
Working with SQL
Written and Oral Communication
Collaboration and ability to influence others
Quality and accuracy
Attention to detail
Proactive and Persistent
Problem Solving and conflict negotiation
Planning, prioritization and monitoring
Powered by JazzHR
",['sql'],"['problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']",1.0,"['sql', 'problem solving', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology']"
BA,"ERP Business Analyst - Finance is primarily responsible for the initial implementation and on-going support of the Oracle Cloud Healthcare Suite for Financial Management (general ledger, accounts receivable, asset management, leases, grants and projects).
While this position is specific for Finance, the analyst will be involved across all specialties (Human Resources, Talent Management and Supply Chain) at various times throughout the product life cycle.
Essential Functions
Serve as a functional leader in configuration of various Oracle modules, but with primary emphasis/expertise in Accounting/Finance.
Assist in identification of opportunities for implementation of new features or features not currently in use, make recommendations and work with end-users to implement features or changes to improve efficiencies.
Assist in writing test-plans/scripts and assist with testing of configurations as well as training of end-users.
Create/maintain Oracle system/application documentation (requirements, processes and procedures).
Participate in periodic Oracle change control meetings.
Provide Oracle product support to all functional business areas.
Serve as an Oracle subject matter expert (SME) for learning how the ERP works—with primary emphasis on one--including staying abreast of newly-released features, maintenance updates and patches.
Performance Skills
Must possess experience enhancing/implementing/configuring/fixing, both technically and functionally, large organizational systems.
Must possess excellent verbal and written communication skills and demonstrate experience articulating issues/concerns/solutions.
Must be able to lead functional discussions to analyze build requirements and brainstorm solutions.
Demonstrate a clear understanding of the cross-functional impact of all Oracle modules, with emphasis on the one assigned.
Able to work independently, schedule time efficiently and set priorities in a fast-paced environment.
Build and foster professional relationships.
Expected to work alongside associates from other departments when executing daily responsibilities and as a contributor to cross-functional projects
Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree or Associate’s degree, plus a minimum of 15 years related work experience.
More than 5 years of experience
Strong business operations experience with emphasis on the selected/assigned module.
","['erp', 'oracl', 'excel', 'cloud']","['financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['erp', 'oracl', 'excel', 'cloud', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Health Business Analyst – Value Based Analytics
The Health Business Analyst within the Value Based Analytics team will be accountable for supporting a diverse range of analytical projects while owning routine reporting processes.
This role will be focused on Provider Value Based Programs (Alternative Payment Models) including ACO, PCMH, Episode Based Payment (EBP) Bundles, and MLR Shared Savings incentive programs.
The Skills You Bring:
Act as support Analyst for assigned projects and proactively identify topics for analysis.
Assist in development of routine financial reconciliations and process payments to Value Based Provider (VBP) groups.
Identify drivers of VBP performance as it pertains to Quality, Access, and Affordability for the attributed population.
Routinely update and analyze performance dashboards used to monitor and evaluate patterns, costs, and trends as they relate to VBP population management
Produce basic spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (e.g., Excel, PowerPoint, Tableau).
Modify existing programs and write basic SAS, SQL or R programs for data extraction.
Proactively seeks training and builds knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources.
Required:
2 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics
Experience writing SQL/SAS/R code or related code
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Data Science, Health Economics or similar program
Master’s degree in a related field
Working knowledge of Alternative Payment Models, including but not limited to concepts such as risk adjustment, member-to-provider attribution methodologies, episodic groupers, and the ACA.
Experience analyzing Alternative Payment Models with a focus on identifying population-based performance drivers and compiling financial reconciliations.
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'mlr', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'mlr', 'r', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'account', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom']"
BA,"Job SummaryDevelop analysis and provide insights, analysis and reports.
Provide analyses and recommendations if corrections are needed.
* Write SAS and/or SQL programs for data extraction.
Modifies existing programs for data extraction* Accountable for developing insightful and actionable summaries and recommending actions* May assist in training other team members on basic technical skillsRequired Work Experience* 4 years related work experience.
* Related Bachelor's degree or additional related equivalent work experience* Experience with analytics and inferential statistics.
","['sql', 'sa']","['statist', 'recommend', 'account', 'data']",1.0,"['sql', 'sa', 'statist', 'recommend', 'account', 'data']"
BA,"Are you ready to take your career to the next level?
At the present time, LoanCare subservices over 1 million loans in 50 states.
",[None],[None],999.0,[]
BA,"Job Title: Investigations & Case Management Senior Business Analyst
Corporate Title: Vice President
Overview
On-site gym, cafeteria, health center, and communal meeting areas
An open seating environment that encourages networking and collaboration across functions and businesses
Your Key Responsibilities:
Facilitates scoping and business priority-setting for change initiatives of various size and complexity.
Helps develop and enhance team members and stakeholder relationships
Contributes to selection of the most appropriate means of representing business requirements in the context of a specific change initiative, ensuring traceability back to source.
Create user acceptance testing (UAT) plan and work with BA to write UAT scripts and exit criteria, establish test team and confirm UAT requirements, confirm traceability of scripts to business requirement documents and functional requirements documents (BRDs & FRDs), review system integration testing (SIT) results with technology and conduct UAT
Discovers and analyzes requirements for fitness for purpose as well as adherence to business objectives and consistency, challenging positively as appropriate.
Analyzes business processes; identifies alternative solutions, assesses feasibility, and recommends new approaches
Obtains formal agreement by stakeholders and recipients to scope and requirements and establishes a base-line on which delivery of a solution can commence.
Liaison with applicable stakeholders, including global and regional Operations, Data, Technology, DFS 504 and Business teams, to ensure appropriate ownership of deliverables and associated risks and issues
Manages requests for and the application of changes to base-lined requirements.
Identifies the impact on business requirements of interim (e.g.
migration) scenarios as well as the required end position
Implements stakeholder engagement/ communications plans, including, for example; handling of complaints; problems and issues; managing resolutions; corrective actions and lessons learned; collection and dissemination of relevant information
Your Skills and Experience:
Extensive broad practical experience in the role, with repeated practice performing business analysis in a variety of complex situations.
Must have a keen eye for detail with a focus on quality control
Undergraduate Degree from an accredited college or university
Participation in or potentially completion of Association of Certified Anti-Money Laundering Specialists (ACAMS) courses and certification desired.
Proficiency with MS Office Products: Word, Excel, PowerPoint, and Visio
Must have extensive prior experience with delivering AML Transaction Monitoring or Financial Investigations or similar AML discipline projects in the Financial Services industry and must have knowledge in core AML products.
Excellent verbal and written English and ability to tailor communication to various audiences
How You’ll Lead:
Ability to influence key project resources without direct reporting responsibility
Must be a team player; able to thrive in a fast-paced environment and meet competing/changing deadlines
Desire to learn new content and understand the regulation so enable effective challenge of design effectiveness
Click these links to view the following notices: EEO is the Law poster and supplement; Employee Rights and Responsibilities under the Family and Medical Leave Act; Employee Polygraph Protection Act and Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision.
","['powerpoint', 'ms office', 'excel']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"This entry-level position will offer the opportunity to learn the business methods and processes for Enterprise Asset Management as applied to a variety of industries for purposes of optimizing production equipment reliability.
The position will also afford the business analyst the opportunity to learn and work with IBM Maximo; a contemporary, web-based, best of breed Enterprise Asset Management system.
The role of business analyst is to work with senior consultants as they lead customers in applying industry best practices for asset management while implementing the Maximo product.
Business Analysts will also support the final solution deployment by assisting customers with using the system properly once the system is placed into product.
Essential Job Duties:
A successful candidate for this position will be able to execute the following job duties under direction of Cohesive Senior resources:
Workshop Participation
Document Meeting Minutes
Design of User Experience
Build of User Experience Prototypes
End User Training Program Execution
Post Software Deployment Support
Documentation of Business Processes and Functional Requirements
Report Designs
Mobile Solution Requirement Definition
Software Quality Assurance Testing Definition and Execution
Support Change Management Activities
End User Training Material Development
Ensuring Quality of Written Materials
Other duties as assigned
Required Qualifications
Master’s degree or equivalent from a nationally recognized higher educational institution in the United States, in the field of Business, Engineering, or Information Technology.
Exceptional written and verbal English communication skills
Willing to relocate.
Must have an aptitude for using and applying technology to address business problems and requirements
Proficient in use of the Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint)
0-3 years experience with ERP, CRM systems, or equivalent systems
Must enjoy working in a team environment and with individuals alike
Must be a resourceful self starter with the ability to work alone
Must be capable of weekly travel to customer locations for long duration projects.
Powered by JazzHR
aYsGXUFH5q
","['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel']","['commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']",2.0,"['powerpoint', 'erp', 'microsoft', 'excel', 'commun', 'busi', 'information technology', 'end user']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
54scl8KjPU
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Help users solve their IT problems and provide targeted instructions to users to improve their skills and confidence in using computer systems and the Cobalt application to meet their business needs.
Promptly notify Service Desk management of issues that require management attention.
Validate documentation for accuracy and adherence to Service Desk standards
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"The Business Analyst role is a subject matter expert to process, research and resolve complex title exceptions, analyze data, clear account exceptions and identify process exceptions trends for process improvement opportunities.
This position will be responsible for:
Minimum 2+ years of title exception process, closing, or related experience.
Minimum of 4 years mortgage banking or related experience.
Experience with processing/managing pipeline with key performance indicators.
Proven track record for problem/issue resolution.
Analytical - to review, analyze loan data, issue resolution, and summarize findings.
Ability to gather and document business requirements.
Adaptability to change, competing priorities, and multitasking effectively.
Ability to assist others in managing the change process.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills required.
Attention to detail and accuracy.
Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite including Microsoft SharePoint Server, Visio, Excel, and PowerPoint
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
ceSGLnJJHP
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"The Operations Business Analyst supports the line of business by performing complex operational and analytic tasks including reviewing report performance data, performance against established metrics and account information.
Partners with the business to increase focus on drivers of productivity, quality, and efficiency.
Interprets results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to more complex data mining independently.
Analysis focus is on process improvement and in some cases compliance with internal or external audit.
Designs, develops, implements and maintains business controls and solutions ensuring compliance with Investors and Regulatory requirements, including Chase policy.
Works directly with business leaders to identify analytical requirements and address report gaps.
Familiar with a variety of mortgaging servicing concepts, practices and procedures.
Relies on extensive experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.
Performs a variety of tasks with limited supervision.
Delivering Results - Strive to set and understand goals and work to reach short-term goals and support long-term strategy.
Communication - Share information, concepts and opinions with others that results in clear understanding and desired outcome.
Also, the ability to answer complex inquiries, provide information, consult with customers and manage difficult customer interactions.
Problem Solving -Identifies business issues which require an analytical solution, utilizes business knowledge to identify the root cause of business issues and to propose solutions .
Organization and Data Analytics: demonstrating the ability to understand financial concepts and analyze financial data; understanding business principles.
Technical Knowledge: Performs advanced technical tasks, using tools such as Excel or SAS.
Has a advanced familiarity with internal technology systems.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities (in order of importance)
Performs daily control processes for the line of business that support inventory management.
Develops and communicates solutions for the line of business by effectively gathering, compiling and reviewing information and data, evaluating existing systems and procedures, identifying alternate courses of actions, development of tools and/or improvements.
Individually solves business problems and completes analysis.
Performs functions to provide performance information to LOB leaders.
Work with business to define reporting requirements and analysis needs to help drive performance or meet various operational needs.
Assure the integrity of data through automated extraction, manipulation, processing, analysis, and reporting.
Identify data process improvements and leverage technology to automate and streamline existing processes.
Evaluate as-is processes, identify gaps, risks and recommend solutions that clearly add value to customer experience, employee efficiency, costs and cost structure, controls and revenue.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree (or equivalent experience) in Finance, Economics, Statistics, Math, Business Administration, Computer Science, or related discipline strongly preferred.
One to three years of prior experience in mortgage banking preferred.
3-5 years experience working management reporting and performance analysis techniques strongly preferred.
Demonstrated, in-depth knowledge of Loan Operations knowledge of Chase systems.
Exposure to and ability to learn basic database concepts and ad-hoc data query basics.
Demonstrated ability to work as team player, and to develop alternative solutions to complex problems, think outside the box, and recommend the best solution.
Detail oriented with strong organizational skills; ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneously and prioritize work efforts.
Able to communicate effectively to an audience including all levels of LOB leadership.
Develops partnerships with team members and peers.
Ability to operate in a collaborative and cooperative environment, and must possess the strong interpersonal skills necessary to work effectively with colleagues at various levels of the organization.
Proficiency within the Microsoft Office Suite: must have proficiency with Word; Excel functions including pivot tables, charts, embedded queries and macros.
Experience with MS Access, Visual Basic and PowerPoint is a plus.
Strong oral and written communication skills.
Expresses thoughts and ideas clearly and concisely.
Independent logical problem solver; analytical ability to synthesize data and project outcomes.
Maintains the highest standards of honesty, fairness and ethics.
Will be exposed to confidential information.
Keeps others inform med of key business information, issues decisions and action.
Adapts well to increasing scope and complexity of work brought on by business growth.
Unique Requirements
5 years of recent default mortgage servicing experience.
3 - 5 years experience within the Mortgage Servicing Platform (MSP).
Extensive experience with modification supporting applications (Lender Live, Default Workflow, Agent Desktop, i-Vault).
In depth knowledge of the Modifications process from application to system maintenance.
Ability to work with various supporting lines of business to obtain results.
Strive to think outside of the box to find gaps and improve processes that assist in enhancing the overall customer experience.
A desire to dig into processes and procedures and raise concerns to management.
Strong enthusiasm to work in an ever changing environment and ability to grasp changes.
Proven track record of defining metrics, transforming large amounts of data into meaningful business views, and identifying improvement opportunities.
Self-starter, works well independently and as a team player
Independently multitask and prioritize assignments to meet strict deadlines.
Additional Requirements
Familiarity with the Pre-Approved Modification process.
Knowledge of both the Foreclosure and Liquidation process.
In depth knowledge of investor and insurer guidelines.
Ability to review formal guidance's from investors/ insurers and work with legal and compliance to interpret changes and impacts.
Equal Opportunity Employer/Disability/Veterans
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sa']","['risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']",1.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'sa', 'risk', 'data mining', 'data', 'financ', 'account', 'econom', 'supervis', 'math', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'visual', 'statist', 'commun']"
BA,"The Business Analyst role is a subject matter expert to process, research and resolve complex title exceptions, analyze data, clear account exceptions and identify process exceptions trends for process improvement opportunities.This position will be responsible for:+ Minimum 2+ years of title exception process, closing, or related experience.+ Minimum of 4 years mortgage banking or related experience.+ Experience with processing/managing pipeline with key performance indicators.+ Proven track record for problem/issue resolution.+ Analytical - to review, analyze loan data, issue resolution, and summarize findings.+ Ability to gather and document business requirements.+ Adaptability to change, competing priorities, and multitasking effectively.+ Ability to assist others in managing the change process.+ Excellent verbal and written communication skills required.+ Attention to detail and accuracy.+ Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite including Microsoft SharePoint Server, Visio, Excel, and PowerPoint
","['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft']","['data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']",999.0,"['powerpoint', 'excel', 'microsoft', 'data', 'analyz', 'account', 'research', 'busi', 'commun', 'pipelin']"
BA,"You will be involved in the design or modification of business systems.
Responsibilities:
Performing requirement gathering sessions to gather information from stakeholders.
Converting Business requirements into Functional requirements.
Working on impact analysis.
Identifying and validating high potential business opportunities for stakeholders.
Developing customized business strategies that are aligned with corporate strategic objectives.
Handling requirements, change and defect tracking.
Qualifications:
0-4 years’ experience as a Business Analyst/Business Systems Analyst.
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
Ability to understand business processes and adapt.
Powered by JazzHR
KJzsiWtyFT
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"The Business Senior Analyst is an intermediate-level position responsible for liaising between business users and technologists to exchange information in a concise, logical and understandable way in coordination with the Technology team.
The overall objective of this role is to contribute to continuous iterative exploration and investigation of business performance and other measures to gain insight and drive business planning.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
",[None],['busi'],999.0,['busi']
BA,"City
Jacksonville
State
Florida
Telecommute
No
Department
Administration
Understands and considers both the business and the technical needs of all customers with the goal of providing a quality product or process that meets the business objectives.
Examines costs, benefits and risks associated with the proposed investment/project and recommends alternatives for solutions throughout the business life cycle.
Collaborate with stakeholders and users to synthesize, articulate and document business objectives and requirements by applying system and analytical thinking methodology and discipline.
Proficient understanding of business strategy and business planning principles and applies to project work (areas may include but not limited to: value proposition, mission/strategy, goals/objectives, technology assessments, funding, management/administration, etc.).
Develops detailed project charter and plans, work assignments, target dates, and other aspects of assigned projects.
Applies systems engineering methodologies and discipline throughout the project lifecycle.
Performs data analysis and defines and documents business requirements and translate to functional specification early in the development cycle, concluding with design synthesis and system validation while considering the complete system.
Assist project leaders in coordinating deployment of deliverables.
Manages projects of mid-level complexity, which may include sub components of larger scale projects as directed by project leaders.
Demonstrates system and analytical thinking capability.
Progressive knowledge and demonstrated use of business analysis and engineering methodologies and tools.
Maintains effective correspondence and in-person communication.
Builds credibility, rapport and partners with others to understand their needs and provides conflict resolution, problem solving, and ability to drive consensus.
Work in partnership with stakeholders to develop a solid knowledge base of business needs.
Qualifications
Bachelor's degree and 6 years' experience in business analysis, business administration, engineering, information science, health or science related field.
Additional qualifications
Master's and 4 years' experience in business analysis, business administration, engineering, information science, health or science related field preferred
Exemption status
Exempt
Compensation Detail
Education, experience and tenure may be considered along with internal equity when job offers are extended.
Benefits eligible
Yes
Schedule
Full Time
Hours / Pay period
80
Schedule details
M-F, day shift
Weekend schedule
As needed
Jacksonville is the largest city in area in the continental United States.
A beautiful coastal Florida city that features excellent year-round climate, over 20 miles of beaches and outstanding outdoor recreational, cultural and family-oriented amenities.
The ""River City by the Sea"" has an excellent school system, reasonable cost of living and a thriving business environment.
Medical professionals and patients are drawn to Jacksonville by an extraordinary network of high-profile healthcare facilities.
Jacksonville continues to grow as more people relocate from all over the U.S. and abroad, to see what the great River City has to offer!
Category
Administration, Business, Finance
Job posting number
133213BR
Recruiter
Jessica Gartner
Equal opportunity employer
Email
",['excel'],"['risk', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'data', 'financ', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Role: SFMC Business Analyst
Duration: 6+ months
Requirements:
Strong communication skills
Familiarity with Agile framework
Familiarity with SFMC (Salesforce Marketing Cloud)
Can start ASAP for transitioning and KT provided screening is all good
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"SFMC Business Analyst | Jacksonville, FL | 6+ months
Strong communication skills
Familiarity with Agile framework
Familiarity with SFMC (Salesforce Marketing Cloud)
Can start ASAP for transitioning and KT provided screening is all good
","['salesforc', 'cloud']","['commun', 'busi']",999.0,"['salesforc', 'cloud', 'commun', 'busi']"
BA,"Sr. Health Business Analyst – Network Performance Analytics
Please note that there are two open positions available for this posting.
One is intended to be an integrated role that combines Network and Care-related topics/projects, and the second is focused on Network-specific needs.
The Senior Health Business Analyst within the Commercial Network Performance Analytics team will provide analytical support for provider negotiations, assessing financial reimbursement models, and various provider network initiatives.
Additionally, analytical support may be needed across other key functional areas of the organization including Actuarial, Care, Payment Integrity, Product, and Segment requiring development of analytical approaches, conclusions and effective communication to various targeted audiences.
The ideal candidate will have strong critical thinking skills, experience working with large data sets, ability to draw inferences, an understanding of various provider reimbursement methodologies with a combination of clinically-driven dataanalytical experience (e.g., knowledge of prevalent conditions in the population, experience with CPT/ICD codes, understands drivers of medical expense, etc.)
and a natural curiosity to understand health insurance informatics.
The Skills You Bring:
Analyze claims data in conjunction with provider reimbursement methods to determine financial impacts, cost drivers and improvement opportunities in support of provider negotiations.
Outputs are also used for forecasting, planning, assessing risk and developing strategic considerations.
Utilize analytical assessment and relevant knowledge and experience to influence outcomes and guide a strategic approach to provider negotiations
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to clinical conditions and member utilization of medical services.
Act as primary Analyst for assigned projects and proactively identify topics for analysis
Analyze claims, and other healthcare data to identify areas of opportunity and provide analyses, conclusions and recommendations to business stakeholders
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to the delivery of health care services for all provider types including hospitals, physicians, ambulatory surgical centers and select ancillary providers.
Develop analytical models, spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (e.g., Excel, PowerPoint, and Tableau)
Write SAS/SQL programs for data extraction
Proactively seeks training and builds knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources.
Ability to work in team environment emphasizing collaboration and the development of synergies.
Explain complex business analytics results to non-technical audiences
Required:
4 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and demonstrated clinical thinking skills
Experience writing SQL/SAS code or related code
Advanced Excel skills (ability to create and build pivot tables, formulas, macro automations, etc.)
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Data Science, Health Economics or similar program
Master’s degree in a related field
Working knowledge of various provider reimbursement methodologies
General knowledge and experience in the healthcare industry
","['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa']","['risk', 'segment', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'tableau', 'powerpoint', 'sa', 'risk', 'segment', 'data', 'analyz', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Sr Health Business Analyst – Value Based Analytics
The Senior Health Business Analyst within the Value Based Analytics team will be accountable for leading a diverse range of analytical projects.
This role will be focused on Provider Value Based Programs (Alternative Payment Models) including ACO, PCMH, Episode Based Payment (EBP) Bundles, and MLR Shared Savings incentive programs.
The ideal candidate will have strong technical skills, great communication skills, experience analyzing and communicating drivers of financial outcomes in the Healthcare business (particularly in the Individual and Small Group ACA market), and a natural curiosity to understand health insurance informatics.
The Skills You Bring:
Act as primary Analyst for assigned projects and proactively identify topics for analysis.
Perform routine financial reconciliations and process payments to Value Based Provider (VBP) groups.
Identify drivers of VBP performance as it pertains to Quality, Access, and Affordability for the attributed population.
Build and analyze performance dashboards for reporting, interpreting, and communicating population-based data for internal and external customers.
Develop Excel-based models and spreadsheets that are well-documented containing advanced formulas and functions that are used to evaluate historical trends, forecast future expectations or draw key conclusions to answer key business questions.
Write SAS, SQL or R programs for data extraction and analysis.
Assist other analysts in training and building knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources.
Explain complex business analytics to non-technical audiences.
Required:
4 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics.
Intermediate level experience writing SQL /SAS/R or related code
Advanced Excel skills (ability to create and build pivot tables, formulas, macro automations, etc.)
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Data Science, Health Economics or similar program
Master’s degree in a related field
Working knowledge of Alternative Payment Models, including but not limited to concepts such as risk adjustment, member-to-provider attribution methodologies, episodic groupers, and the ACA.
Experience analyzing Alternative Payment Models with a focus on identifying and explaining population-based performance drivers and presenting financial outcomes.
","['excel', 'sql', 'mlr', 'r', 'sa']","['risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['excel', 'sql', 'mlr', 'r', 'sa', 'risk', 'data', 'analyz', 'dashboard', 'account', 'econom', 'busi', 'statist', 'commun', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Sr Health Business Analyst – Provider Performance Analytics
The Senior Health Business Analyst will lead a diverse range of analytical projects with a focus on investigating and quantifying cost and utilization drivers using claims, episodic grouper, and other healthcare data.
The Skills You Bring:
Demonstrate passion about member health and well-being.
Utilize relevant knowledge and experience in a dynamic and complex healthcare environment.
Act as primary Analyst for assigned projects and proactively identify topics for analysis.
Analyze claims, and other healthcare data to identify areas of opportunity and provide analyses, conclusions and recommendations to business stakeholders.
Monitor and evaluate patterns, costs and trends as they relate to physician performance, including utilization of medical services and appropriateness of care.
Develop analytical models that are well-documented containing advanced formulas and functions that are used to evaluate historical trends, forecast future expectations or draw conclusions to answer key business questions.
Write SAS, SQL or R programs for data extraction and analysis.
Assist other analysts in training and building knowledge/experience of technical tools, coding languages and data sources.
Explain complex business analytics results to non-technical audiences.
Required:
4 years related analytical work experience with a focus in the health or medical industry or equivalent combination of transferable experience and education
Bachelor's degree required
Experience with analytics and inferential statistics.
Intermediate level experience writing SQL /SAS/R or related code
Advanced Excel skills (ability to create and build pivot tables, formulas, macro automations, etc.)
Preferred:
Bachelor’s degree Business Analytics, Finance & Economics, Mathematics, Statistics, Data Science, Health Economics or similar program
Working knowledge of provider reimbursement, procedure codes (CPT-4, HCPCs), diagnosis codes (ICD-10), and health insurance business
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa']","['data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']",1.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa', 'data', 'analyz', 'financ', 'busi', 'statist', 'econom', 'recommend', 'healthcar']"
BA,"Requirement
Compare and validate potential 3rd party technology solutions as needed
Translate and simplify requirements for optimizing execution and outcomes
Elicit input from multiple stakeholders and integrate feedback to identify the optimal solution
Contribute to maintaining an environment where continuous improvement of the development process is in focus and where everyone’s common goal is to deliver outstanding software as fast as possible
Perform GAP analysis to determine if business requirements are being met
Help coach the team through tough challenges e.g.
delivering new functionality with a tight deadline while the team optimizes existing code for performance
Actively try to identify areas of improvement and conceptualize methods on how to be more efficient
Help Product Owner and team write high quality user stories explaining business problems and product concepts in a concise manner
Use of requirements to drive the design or review of test cases and process change requests
Qualification
Master's in Computer Science or Engineering Management or Project Management or Information Systems/Technology (Preferred).
Knowledge of SQL.
Exposure to SDLC methodologies.
Creating artifacts
Powered by JazzHR
tYM8Z70uEn
",['sql'],"['optim', 'busi']",2.0,"['sql', 'optim', 'busi']"
BA,"Help users solve their IT problems and provide targeted instructions to users to improve their skills and confidence in using computer systems and the Cobalt application to meet their business needs.
Promptly notify Service Desk management of issues that require management attention.
Validate documentation for accuracy and adherence to Service Desk standards
Minimum Requirements:
Masters degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or any related field of study.
No travel; no telecommuting.
Must be Open for Re-Location.
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],['busi'],2.0,['busi']
BA,"This role will serve as an internal SME and technical point of contact ensuring data integrity, testing, reporting, and datawork flow for process improvement.
Oracle EBS Module(s) including Human Capital Management (HR), Oracle Self-Service Human Resources (SSHR), Oracle Performance Management, Oracle iRecruitment, Oracle Learning Management, Oracle Advanced Benefits (OAB), and Oracle HRMS Intelligence (HRMSi) knowledge as a hands-on SME.
Knowledgeable in at least 1-2 methodologies, such as SDLC, RUP, Agile, AIM.
Analyzes Help Desk tickets for trends and actions.
Holds meetings with ticket owners to set priorities and expectations.
Maintains HRMS set-ups for functional areas such as Jobs, Positions, Grades, Compensation, Benefits, Benefits Enrollments, Performance Management, etc.
Ability to create simple to very complex SQL queries to support ad hoc data needs and perform edits to other existing scripts.
OBIEE knowledge of base tables and relationships.
Knowledge of XML reports, API, PLSQL, OBIEE and other relevant packages.
Must have experience creating use cases, process flows and RICE artifacts.
Previous lead role on Oracle implementation(s) a plus.
Requirements Knowledgeable in at least 1-2 methodologies, such as SDLC, RUP, Agile, AIM.
Analyzes Help Desk tickets for trends and actions.
Holds meetings with ticket owners to set priorities and expectations.
Maintains HRMS set-ups for functional areas such as Jobs, Positions, Grades, Compensation, Benefits, Benefits Enrollments, Performance Management, etc.
Ability to create simple to very complex SQL queries to support ad hoc data needs and perform edits to other existing scripts.
OBIEE knowledge of base tables and relationships.
Knowledge of XML reports, API, PLSQL, OBIEE and other relevant packages.
Must have experience creating use cases, process flows and RICE artifacts.
Previous lead role on Oracle implementation(s) a plus.
All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States.
All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.
An Equal Opportunity Employer MFDisabilityVeterans.
","['oracl', 'sql']","['data', 'analyz']",999.0,"['oracl', 'sql', 'data', 'analyz']"
BA,"* Manage work to produce customer value by planning and forecasting, setting objectives and priorities, establishing goals, clarifying accountabilities, assigning work and utilizing management and financial controls.
* Lead analysis, provide recommendations, and represent Analytics with both internal and external stakeholders.
Work closely with leaders across business areas to drive results across the business.
* Lead team in best practices for using Analytical tools, processes and software.
",[None],"['recommend', 'account', 'busi']",999.0,"['recommend', 'account', 'busi']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Sr. Health Business Analyst - Network Performance AnalyticsPlease note that there are two open positions available for this posting.
One is intended to be an integrated role that combines Network and Care-related topics/projects, and the second is focused on Network-specific needs.The Senior Health Business Analyst within the Commercial Network Performance Analytics team will provide analytical support for provider negotiations, assessing financial reimbursement models, and various provider network initiatives.
Outputs are also used for forecasting, planning, assessing risk and developing strategic considerations.
",[None],"['risk', 'busi']",999.0,"['risk', 'busi']"
BA,"* Utilize relevant knowledge and experience in a dynamic and complex healthcare environment.
* Act as primary Analyst for assigned projects and proactively identify topics for analysis.
* Develop analytical models that are well-documented containing advanced formulas and functions that are used to evaluate historical trends, forecast future expectations or draw conclusions to answer key business questions.
* Write SAS, SQL or R programs for data extraction and analysis.
* Intermediate level experience writing SQL /SAS/R or related code* Advanced Excel skills (ability to create and build pivot tables, formulas, macro automations, etc.
","['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa']","['busi', 'data', 'healthcar']",999.0,"['r', 'excel', 'sql', 'sa', 'busi', 'data', 'healthcar']"
BA,"The Business Senior Analyst is an intermediate-level position responsible for liaising between business users and technologists to exchange information in a concise, logical and understandable way in coordination with the Technology team.
The overall objective of this role is to contribute to continuous iterative exploration and investigation of business performance and other measures to gain insight and drive business planning.
Qualifications: 5-8 years of experience in business analysis or systems analysis Demonstrated ability to effectively use complex analytical, interpretive and problem-solving techniques Proven interpersonal, diplomatic and influencing skills Consistently demonstrate clear and concise written and verbal communication Education: Bachelor's degree/University degree or equivalent experience SAS programming skills Basic to intermediate level experience in an Apps Development role Accountable for all phases of development processanalysis, design, construction, testing and implementation; provides user and operational support on applications to business users Knowledge of Citi Cards or Retail Services or Retail Fraud processes and terminology is preferred, but not required Must demonstrate strong analytical and creative problem solving skills (analyze and troubleshoot reports/data to ensure accuracy) Strong organization and planning skills Excellent communication and interpersonal skills (interact with various levels within the organization) Experience in translating business needs to requirements and experience in requirements gathering Works well under pressure, manage conflicts and challenges Can work under ambiguity, result oriented, keep focus ------------------------------------------------- Grade : ------------------------------------------------------ Time Type :Full time ------------------------------------------------------ Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['excel', 'sa']","['data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sa', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Back to job search
Business Analyst - Loan IQ Specialist
Jacksonville
Refer someone
The successful candidate will be a Loan IQ Specialist.
The group is a global provider of specialist finance and asset management solutions across: Technology, Media & Telecoms (TMT); Energy, Renewables & Sustainability; Resources and Structured Lending.
This an exciting and challenging role wherein you will report to a global stakeholder and customer base spread across the entire Macquarie Group.
In this position, you will work closely with business stakeholders to understand their functional requirements, product configuration needs and work in collaboration with the systems and IT teams to deliver fit for purpose solutions.
You will support the existing platforms and user base in their day to day use of the platforms.
Your excellent communication and stakeholder relationship management skills will be vital to assist with project specifications and product training.
You will also have a good understanding of key business drivers and expertise in corporate lending.
You will have accounting and financial systems experience, allowing you to seamlessly investigate system accounting and functional issues, whilst working with the relevant partners and vendors to resolve and manage the defects providing a consultative workaround.
You must have experience using Finastra Loan IQ to be suitable for this position.
Find out more about Macquarie at www.macquarie.com/about
About Macquarie
The best investment you can make is in yourself.
Macquarie is a diversified global financial group providing clients with asset management, banking, advisory and risk and capital solutions across debt, equity and commodities.
Find out more at www.macquarie.com/careers
Job no: CAF-949535
Work type: Full time
Category: Mid-level, Other
Group: Commodities and Global Markets
Division: Specialised and Asset Finance
Recruiter: Sophie Miller Chatfield
Opening Date: 05/12/2019
",['excel'],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"The Business Senior Analyst is an intermediate-level position responsible for liaising between business users and technologists to exchange information in a concise, logical and understandable way in coordination with the Technology team.
The overall objective of this role is to contribute to continuous iterative exploration and investigation of business performance and other measures to gain insight and drive business planning.
Qualifications: 5-8 years of experience in business analysis or systems analysis Demonstrated ability to effectively use complex analytical, interpretive and problem-solving techniques Proven interpersonal, diplomatic and influencing skills Consistently demonstrate clear and concise written and verbal communication Education: Bachelor's degree/University degree or equivalent experience SAS programming skills Basic to intermediate level experience in an Apps Development role Accountable for all phases of development processanalysis, design, construction, testing and implementation; provides user and operational support on applications to business users Knowledge of Citi Cards or Retail Services or Retail Fraud processes and terminology is preferred, but not required Must demonstrate strong analytical and creative problem solving skills (analyze and troubleshoot reports/data to ensure accuracy) Strong organization and planning skills Excellent communication and interpersonal skills (interact with various levels within the organization) Experience in translating business needs to requirements and experience in requirements gathering Works well under pressure, manage conflicts and challenges Can work under ambiguity, result oriented, keep focus ------------------------------------------------- Grade : ------------------------------------------------------ Time Type :Full time ------------------------------------------------------ Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Minority/Female/Veteran/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.
To view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO is the Law Supplement CLICK HERE .
To view the EEO Policy Statement CLICK HERE .
To view the Pay Transparency Posting CLICK HERE .
","['excel', 'sa']","['data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']",1.0,"['excel', 'sa', 'data', 'account', 'problem solving', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Back to job search
Business Analyst - Loan IQ Specialist
Jacksonville
Refer someone
The successful candidate will be a Loan IQ Specialist.
The group is a global provider of specialist finance and asset management solutions across: Technology, Media & Telecoms (TMT); Energy, Renewables & Sustainability; Resources and Structured Lending.
This an exciting and challenging role wherein you will report to a global stakeholder and customer base spread across the entire Macquarie Group.
In this position, you will work closely with business stakeholders to understand their functional requirements, product configuration needs and work in collaboration with the systems and IT teams to deliver fit for purpose solutions.
You will support the existing platforms and user base in their day to day use of the platforms.
Your excellent communication and stakeholder relationship management skills will be vital to assist with project specifications and product training.
You will also have a good understanding of key business drivers and expertise in corporate lending.
You will have accounting and financial systems experience, allowing you to seamlessly investigate system accounting and functional issues, whilst working with the relevant partners and vendors to resolve and manage the defects providing a consultative workaround.
You must have experience using Finastra Loan IQ to be suitable for this position.
Find out more about Macquarie at www.macquarie.com/about
About Macquarie
The best investment you can make is in yourself.
Macquarie is a diversified global financial group providing clients with asset management, banking, advisory and risk and capital solutions across debt, equity and commodities.
Find out more at www.macquarie.com/careers
Job no: CAF-949535
Work type: Full time
Category: Mid-level, Other
Group: Commodities and Global Markets
Division: Specialised and Asset Finance
Recruiter: Sophie Miller Chatfield
Opening Date: 05/12/2019
",['excel'],"['risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']",999.0,"['excel', 'risk', 'financ', 'account', 'busi', 'commun']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
BA,"Junior Business Analyst
As the Business Analyst, you will be responsible for analyzing, defining, documenting and testing business and system requirements for complex, high profile projects.
You will act as a liaison between management, developers, quality assurance and the business partners.
Skills & Experience
Experience/Knowledge in capturing, analyzing and documenting business requirements
Ability to capture requirements with efficiency, accuracy, and attention to detail on a consistent basis
Experience conducting interviews with key stakeholders to gather pertinent information
Interact with executives, managers, subject matter experts and development teams
Experience documenting requirements using use cases, activity diagrams and domain models
Object-oriented design
Collaboration with QA team to develop and manage test plans
Preferred
Knowledge of HP ALM or HPQC
Experience working with software development
Preferred Qualifications
Powered by JazzHR
",[None],"['busi', 'analyz']",999.0,"['busi', 'analyz']"
